<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23082 </DOCNO>
<HT>  "cr00000029894001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<H2>   June Reports </H2>
<DATE1>  1 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-31 MAY94-DPRK-U.S.-IAEA 
<H3> <TI>      DPRK Continues to Press for Nuclear Talks With Washington </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       DPRK Continues to Press for Nuclear Talks With Washington </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                                  In the face of a mounting crisis over North Korea's nuclear 
reactor refueling activities, Pyongyang is still pressing for 
bilateral talks with Washington and trying to create the 
impression that it wants to see a peaceful resolution to the 
crisis. 

                                  END SUMMARY 
   Byongyang media have not been observed so far to report or 
comment on a 30 May UN Security Council resolution that 
reportedly called on the DPRK to proceed with discharging spent 
fuel rods from its 5-megawatt nuclear reactor "in a manner which 
preserves the technical possibility of fuel measurements" in the 
future (Yonhap, 30 May).  However, Seoul radio on 31 May reported 
that Kim Su-man, North Korea's deputy UN ambassador, brushed 
aside the UN statement as "another attempt" by Washington and the 
International Atomic Energy Agency (IAEA) to "crush" Pyongyang 
and contended that "all pending issues" concerning North Korea 
must be resolved through bilateral talks between Pyongyang and 
Washington and "not by the UN Security Council" (KBS-1, 31 May). 
Kim reportedly added that Pyongyang nonetheless is "willing" to 
hold "further negotiations with the IAEA, even though the agency 
had previously rejected a North Korean proposal made in an effort 
"to reasonably solve" the nuclear issue. 
   Earlier Statement     Kim's reported remarks are consistent with 
a  claim made in a 28 May Foreign Ministry spokesman's statement 
that reiterated the importance Pyongyang attaches to a "package 
solution" with the United States on the nuclear issue (Pyongyang 
radio, 29 May).   Relatively nonconfrontational in tone, the 
statement claimed that North Korea is "fully ensuring" the 
continuity of nuclear safeguards and is "even" discharging fuel 
rods "in such a way as to preserve technical feasibility" of 
selected measurement of the rods in the future.  While admitting 
that there have been disputes with the IAEA on the methods of 
nuclear fuel withdrawal, the statement claimed that the agency 
came to "an understanding" that its method of selecting and 
segregating fuel rods is not acceptable to the DPRK because it is 
tantamount to an "ad hoc" inspection--something Pyongyang has 
been rejecting pending the outcome of future DPRK-U.S. talks. 
The statement went on to allege that the agency "took note" of 
the "theoretical feasibility" of the North Korean method of 
preserving fuel rods for future measurements.  The statement also 
pledged North Korea's "active efforts" to ensure the 
"transparency" of its nuclear activities and its "utmost" effort 
to seek an "ultimate solution" to the nuclear i$sue through 
"DPRK-U. S. talks." 
   Other Signs     DPRK media in recent days have also sought to 
create the impression that Pyongyang is seeking a peaceful 
solution to the nuclear crisis. As it has done in the past when 
tensions escalated on the peninsula, Pyongyang again used a 
foreign investment-related law to signal its purported hope for a 
peaceful resolution of the nuclear issue.  The North Korean news 
agency KCNA on 27 May published the full text of a set of 
regulations governing the operation of foreign enterprises in 
North Korea's free trade zone--regulations adopted two months 
earlier.  The timing of the publicity seems designed to convey 
the impression that at least part of the North Korean leadership 
is looking beyond the current nuclear crisis.  Similarly, 
attesting to the eagerness with which Pyongyang is looking for 
any signs of softening in Washington's attitude toward North 
Korea, KCNA on 28 May publicized a letter attributed to "U.S. 
Congresswoman Elizabeth Purse" to President Clinton and the 
chairman of the U.S. House Armed Services Committee, in which she 
reportedly counseled against "escalating tensions" in Korea and 
called for "pursuing a policy for normalizing relations" with 
Pyongyang. 
(AUTHOR:  YIM.  QUESTION AND/0R C0MMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, ASIA 
DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6534.) 
EAG/HEBBEL  cka 31/1600z may 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23083 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000029994001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   2 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-01JUN94-Russia-U. S. 
<H3> <TI>      Russian Objects to U.S. Role in Silo Dismantlement </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Russian Objects to U.S. Role in Silo Dismantlement </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                                In what may be another example of growing Russian mistrust of 
U.S. motives in bilateral negotiations with former Soviet 
republics, a senior Russian military official has voiced 
objections to planned U.S. participation in the dismantlement of 
formerly Soviet SS-18 ICBM silos in Kazakhstan.  The official's 
protestation thus challenges not only U.S.-Kazakhstani 
dismantlement agreements but also, by inference, similar accords 
between the United States and Ukraine. 
                           END SUMMARY 
   In a statement carried by ITAR-TASS (17 May), Aleksandr Volkov, 
first deputy commander-in-chief of the Russian Strategic Missile 
Forces, said that the reported plan for involvement of U.S. 
specialists in the dismantlement of SS-18 silos in Kazakhstan 
"contradicts the Russian-Kazakh agreement on strategic nuclear 
forces and the treaty on military cooperation."  ITAR-TASS added 
that the "idea" for U.S.-Kazakhstani cooperation in this field 
"emerged after the visit of [Kazakhstani] President Nursultan 
Nazarbayev to the United States" in February.  The news agency 
also quoted Aleksandr Piskunov, deputy chairman of the State Duma 
Committee on Defense and a member of the centrist New Regional 
Policy faction, as saying that the planned U.S. involvement 
ignores "the right to intellectual property" of the builders of 
the missile complexes and thus "contradicts international norms." 
   Although the text of the Russian-Kazakhstani agreement, signed on 
28 March by Presidents Boris Yeltsin and Nursultan Nazarbayev, 
has not been observed to have been published, Colonel-General 
Igor Sergeyev, commander-in-chief of the Russian Strategic 
Missile Forces, said in a televised briefing of foreign military 
attaches that the accord "gives Russian status to the formations 
and units of the [formerly Soviet] strategic missile forces 
stationed temporarily on Kazakhstani territory" (Moscow NTV, 28 
April).  NTV's commentator added that under the agreement, once 
the warheads and missiles are removed from Kazakhstan, the silos 
will be dismantled "apparently by Russian specialists." 
Izvestiya (4 May) and Segodnya (6 May) also reported that the 
agreement recognizes the missile forces in Kazakhstan as being 
Russian. 
   Increasing Mistrust? 
   Although the Russian Government has not been reported to have 
issued a formal protest of the U.S.-Kazakhstani silo- 
dismantlement plans, Volkov's objections may reflect a broader 
suspicion of U.S. motives in negotiations with former Soviet 
republics that involve Russian military-security interests, as 
exemplified in the following: 
   -- In June 1993, Russia, apparently concerned about the integrity 
of its nuclear secrets, reacted coolly to a proposal by then-U.S. 
Defense Secretary Les Aspin that nuclear weapons in Ukraine 
slated for dismantlement be temporarily stored there under 
international supervision.  Russian Defense Minister Pavel 
Grachev openly dismissed the idea, and the Ministry of Foreign 
Affairs stressed in a public statement that the weapons in 
Ukraine "belong to the Russian Federation" and that Russia has an 
"obligation" under the Nuclear Nonpoliferation Treaty "not to 
transfer the nuclear weapons and control over nuclear weapons to 
any third party" (ITAR-TASS, 6 June 1993; Interfax, 17 June 
1993).  In a subsequent commentary, veteran Izvestiya military- 
affairs correspondent Viktor Litovkin (See Note 1) claimed, 
without attribution, that "Moscow" assessed the Aspin proposal 
"as a thinly disguised attempt by America to gain official access 
to Russian nuclear secrets" (Izvestiya, 29 June 1993). 
   -- In March, a television news commentary questioned the 
"maneuvering" of U.S. diplomacy in Ukraine and Georgia, 
suggesting that U.S. bilateral talks with leaders of Georgia on 
introducing international peacekeepers to Abkhazia and with 
Ukraine on nuclear disarmament had undermined previous agreements 
arrived at with Russia's participation (Russian TV, 9 March). 
   -- Russian officials reportedly have reacted negatively to 
prospective U.S. involvement in Kazakhstan's Baykonur space 
center.  For example, the reformist Moskovskiy Komsomolets (30 
March) reported that an offer by U.S. Defense Secretary William 
Perry to act as a mediator between Russia and Kazakhstan on the 
fate of the space center "has elicited a certain distrust from 
Russian leaders."  The article also questioned whether Secretary 
Perry had "actually agreed on something behind the Kremlin's 
back" during his March visit to Almaty.  Suggesting that the 
United States was seeking a larger role in the fate of Baykonur, 
the Russian Defense Ministry newspaper, Krasnaya Zvezda (29 
March), cited proposals to create an "international consortium" 
to run Baykonur and suggested that "other space powers headed by 
the United States" would gain "advantages" over Russia under such 
a scheme.  The article also hinted darkly that during 
Nazarbayev's visit to the United States, "some kind of agreement 
on the joint use of Baykonur was signed--although the details are 
not being made public." 
   (Note 1)  Litovkin often appears to use his articles to provide a 
platform for the views of top Russian and CIS military officials. 
In an indication of the favor in which he is held by military 
officials, Litovkin was among the first group of journalists 
invited to visit and write about a Typhoon-class ballistic 
missile submarine, the world's largest and Russia's newest class 
of missile submarines (Izvestiya, 28 February 1992). 
   Outlook 
   Russian officials--particularly those associated with the 
military--are clearly wary of bilateral security or space-related 
negotiations between the United States and former Soviet 
Republics.  These officials apparently fear that Russian military 
secrets could be compromised and perceive Washington's increasing 
involvement with countries on Russia's periphery as a threat to 
traditional Russian dominance in the region.  (Regarding the 
latter concern, an article in the 30 March Moskovskiye Novosti 
alleged that the United States was partly responsible for 
lessening Moscow's ability to use "the language of stern demands" 
to deal with its neighbors.)  With Yeltsin under continuing 
pressure from nationalistic critics to backtrack from policies of 
cooperation with the West, Russia can be expected to continue to 
view with suspicion any security-related dialogue between the 
United States and Russia's neighbors in which it is not included. 
   (AUTHOR:  ROBERTON.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL 
CHIEF, ANALYSIS BRANCH, RUSSIA DIVISION, (703) 733-6070.) 
ENEAG/PINKASOVIC/PF 01/1637z Jun 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23084 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000030094001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   2 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY-FBPSP 94-11-ASIA 
<H3> <TI>      PACIFIC RIM ECONOMIC REVIEW -- 1 JUNE 1994 </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       PACIFIC RIM ECONOMIC REVIEW -- 1 JUNE 1994 </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
Table      of Contents 

   JAPAN:  Auto Industry - FEATURE:  Auto Companies, Parts Suppliers 
Taking Advantage of NAFTA 

   Construct ion Equipment Industry - 1993 Construction Equipment 
Shipments Down 8.1 Percent 

   Economic Trends - FEATURE:  Mixed Reaction to Proposed MFA 
Safeguards on Textile Imports; Japanese Firms Expect Continued 
Exchange Rate Instability 

   Financial Issues - FEATURE:  Ashikaga Bank Suspends Dollar 
Remittances to North Korea; FEATURE:  Favorable Tax Treatment for 
Pro-North Korea Businesses; FEATURE:  Securities Firms, Banks Show 
Interest in Mexico; FEATURE:  Norinchukin Striving for Universal 
Bank Status 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - CHINA:  Apparel Firms Establish 
Operations in Shanghai, Shandong, Jiangsu 

   CZECH REPUBLIC:  Sakura Bank Signs Cooperation Agreement With 
Czech Banks 

   INDONESIA:  FEATURE:  Kanebo, Toyobo Building Textile, Garment 
Plants 

   KAZAKHSTAN:  Mitsubishi Negotiating Oil Pipeline Feasibility 
Study 

   UZBEKISTAN:  Banks Sign Cooperation Agreements With Uzbek 
National Bank 

   VIETNAM:  Electronics Parts Firm To Triple Production of Coils 

   Machine Tools/Robotics - March Machine Tool Orders Declined 6.1 
Percent 

   Semiconductors/Computers/Electronics - NEC To Establish Research 
Center in Germany 

   CHINA:  Domestic Developments - FEATURE:  Approaches To 
Transforming State Enterprises Outlined; Fujian Suspends Unqualified 
Projects in Development Zones; Guangdong Overfulfills Quota for 
Selling Treasury Bonds; Guangdong Suspends Approval of Land Sales 
for Luxury Projects; Statistics Show Gap in Staff Wages in Shenzhen; 
Fiber-Optic Cable To Link Hangzhou, Fuzhou, Nanchang; Computer 
Software Sales Reach RMB 4 Million; Sichuan Becomes Largest Natural 
Gas Producing Province 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - Border Trade Slows Between 
Heilongjiang's Harbin City and Russia; Shandong Province Encourages 
Foreign Investment in Agriculture; Japanese Investment in Shandong 
Shows Sharp Increase; Shandong Signs Cooperation Agreement With ROK 
Province; Shandong Reports 150 New Joint-Venture Projects With 
Singapore; Sino-Singaporean Industrial Park To Be Built in 
Shandong's Qingdao; Agricultural Bank, Australian Firm Set Up Joint 
Consulting Venture; Australia, Guangdong's Zhuhai Cooperate in 
Building Glass Wool Plant; Philippine Aluminum Group Sets Up Company 
in Fujian's Xiamen; Beijing Contracts Construction Projects, Labor 
Service Abroad; Jilin First Quarter Results in Attracting Foreign- 
Funded Enterprises; Hebei Signs Letter of Intent With Brazil; CITIC 
Hong Kong Expands Golf Course in Conghua City; New World Group 
Largest Overseas Investor in Wuhan; Bank of China Hong Kong Invests 
$470 Million in Shandong; Hong Kong Bank Leading Foreign Lender to 
China; CITIC Pacific To Expand Investment in Mainland Power 
Projects; Foreign Firms Consider Relocation in Face of Rising Hong 
Kong Costs; Hong Kong Inflation Falls to 7.7 Percent in April; 
Haikou Bonded Area Introduces Preferential Investment Policies; 
Fuzhou State-Owned Firms Receive Foreign Capital 

   Taiwan:  Trade Deficit With Japan Expected To Hit $15 Billion for 
1994; Some Restrictions on Investment in PRC To Be Lifted; Indirect 
Investment in PRC Continues in First Quarter; Meeting on Economic 
Ties With Italy Held in Taipei; Registered Investments, Machinery 
Imports Down in First Quarter 

   SOUTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  Government Puts Brakes on Samsung Auto 
Venture; FEATURE:  Shipbuilders Face Japanese Competition, Foreign 
Trade Pressure; Growth Rate in Crude Oil Imports Slows in First 
Quarter; Automobile Exports to Some International Markets Stalled; 
Exports to Russia Increasing; Exports to China Decreasing; Daewoo 
Securities, Cheil Bank To Invest in Chinese Stock; Hyundai Completes 
Offshore Natural Gas Facility; Hyundai To Build Steel Container 
Plant in Qingdao, China; Tongyang To Build Steel Tube Plant in 
Shanghai; Daewoo To Take Over Three Sudanese Textile Corporations; 
Lucky Metal Advances Into European Market; Hanguk Pharmaceutical 
Exports to Chile, Brazil 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA - INDONESIA:  Prospects For Renewed Economic Ties 
With Iraq; Indonesian-Malaysian Consortium Planning Thermal Power 
Plant; Nation Becomes Third Largest Coal Exporter 

   LAOS: Thai Land Development Venture Division of Profits 

   MALAYSIA:  Technology Findings To Be Commercialized; Japan To 
Establish Fiber Optic Cable System 

   SINGAPORE:  Line To Get Tankers, Container Ships by 1996 

   THAILAND:  Exports Increase 19.7 Percent, Overall Economy 
'Satisfactory'; Rice Exports, Earnings Increase in First Quarter 

   VIETNAM:  Draft Labor Law Recognizes Right To Strike; Economic 
Courts To Start Operations in July; Trends in Japanese Investment, 
Aid Described; Navy Company, Japanese Counterpart Form Joint 
Venture; List of BOT Infrastructure Construction Projects; Hanoi 
Prison To Be Singaporean Hotel Venture; Thai Bank, Conglomerate in 
Partnership With Agriculture Bank; French Bank Loans to Businesses; 
52 Foreign Investment Projects in Agriculture Licensed; Early 1994 
Export Index Reported; Malaysia To Help Build Export Processing 
Zone; More Foreign Projects Licensed in April; UK Firm To Build 
Hanoi Trade Center; First Quarter Industrial Output Up 12.1 Percent; 
Indian, French Firms To Build $40 Million Cement Plant; Proton To 
Assemble Cars in SRV 

   (Pacific Rim Economic Review FBPSP 94-11) 

   JAPAN:  Auto Industry - FEATURE:  Auto Companies, Parts Suppliers 
Taking Advantage of NAFTA -- SUMMARY:  Nissan Motor Co., Honda Motor 
Co., and their respective parts suppliers are taking steps to 
increase local production and further integrate their North American 
operations.  According to media reports, the companies are trying to 
lower costs, given the appreciation of the yen, and are also 
responding to incentives provided by the North American Free Trade 
Agreement (NAFTA) to integrate production among their factories in 
Canada, Mexico, and the United States. 

   High Yen, NAFTA Spur Higher Local Content -- Japanese automobile 
manufacturers and auto parts makers with production facilities in 
North America are rapidly increasing the ratio of locally made 
parts.  According to the 21 April NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN, their 
general aim is to avoid losses stemming from appreciation of the 
yen, but the "underlying aim" is to profit from the "tariff-free 
nature" of NAFTA.  Previously, the companies were motivated to 
increase local content levels to "ease" economic friction between 
Japan and the United States, but according to NIKKEI SANGYO, their 
actions now have "strategic meaning." 

   NIKKEI SANGYO stated that "each company is strongly conscious of 
NAFTA" and is anticipating the benefits from the lowering of tariffs 
between Canada, Mexico, and the United States.  In particular, the 
firms are looking to substitute "high priced imported goods" with 
locally produced parts that will cost less due to favorable exchange 
rates and lower tariffs.  NIKKEI SANGYO reported that several 
companies are even looking to reduce production costs in Japan by 
exporting "suitable" parts from North America to Japan.  In 
addition, Japanese auto parts makers want to remain price 
competitive with their U.S. competitors for orders from the U.S. 
"Big Three" automakers, which are increasing output now that U.S. 
auto market has recovered. 

   Nissan at the 'Forefront' of Integrated Production -- According 
to the 21 April NIKKEI SANGYO, Nissan is at the "forefront" of other 
Japanese automakers in localizing production in North America and is 
urging its affiliated parts makers to take advantage of NAFTA.  The 
11 May NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN reported that Nissan is aggressively 
promoting both the production and export of autos and parts from its 
production bases in the United States and Mexico to regain price 
competitiveness affected by appreciation of the yen. 

   In the United States, according to the 29 April NIHON KEIZAI 
SHIMBUN (NIKKEI), Nissan has decided to increase auto production by 
an average of 10 percent to over 440,000 autos in FY94.  Nissan 
Motors Manufacturing Co. (NMMC), Nissan's U.S. production base in 
Tennessee, will soon reach full capacity production for the first 
time since it was established in 1980.  NMMC currently produces two 
passenger vehicles, the Altima and Sentra, and one commercial 
vehicle, the Nissan Truck.  According to NIKKEI, NMMC will increase 
Altima production from 161,000 units in FY93 to 180,000 in FY94, a 
12 percent rise; increase Sentra output from 139,000 to 140,000, a 
1.0 percent increase; and expand Nissan Truck output from 100,000 to 
l20,000, a 20 percent increase. 

   Nissan is trying to bolster local production by increasing 
shipments from the United States.  The 14 April NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 
reported that the company will stop exporting Nissan Trucks from 
Japan to Canada, and instead will begin shipping them to Canada from 
NMMC.  Nissan will ship 3,300 trucks from NMMC to Canada in FY94, 
which should cut the "transport lead time" from one month to one 
week and save approximately $200 dollars per vehicle.  Eventually, 
Nissan expects that nearly 70 percent of the cars it sells in 
Canada, including the Sentra and Altima, will be made by NMMC. 

   In Mexico, the 11 May NIKKAN KOGYO reported that Nissan will 
increase auto production from 180,000 units in FY93 to 200,000 in 
FY94.  NISMEX, Nissan's Mexican subsidiary, has three plants in 
Mexico.  Its Aguascalientes plant plant assembles AD Wagons, AD 
Vans, and Sentras; the Cuernavaca plant also produces Sentras as 
well as Nissan Trucks; and the Lerma plant manufactures engine parts 
and materials, according to the 26 April NIKKAN KOGYO. 

   The 11 May NIKKAN KOGYO also reported that Nissan has decided to 
begin exporting its Mexican-made vehicles to Central and South 
America instead of relying on vehicles exported from Japan.  The 
company is encountering "severe" competition by South Korean 
automakers, and appreciation of the yen has reduced the price 
competitiveness of vehicles imported from Japan.  According to the 
paper, Nissan has decided on this move to regain price 
competitiveness and maintain its foothold in the expanding Latin 
American market. 

   Localizing Production of Critical Components -- The 4 May NIKKEI 
reported that Nissan is increasing engine production in North 
America to the point where "virtually all" engines for U.S.- 
assembled vehicles are made in Mexico and the United States, making 
it the "leader" among Japanese automakers.  Nissan plans to expand 
engine production in North America by 15 percent to 415,000 units 
per year (11 May NIKKAN KOGYO).  NIKKEI stated that this move by 
Nissan will help it maintain price competitiveness and meet local 
procurement goals. 

   NISMEX is responsible for producing engines for all Altimas and 
all 2,400-cc Nissan Trucks produced in North America.  The 26 April 
NIKKAN KOGYO reported that Nissan is also expanding its capacity to 
locally machine crankshaf ts used in engines assembled by NISMEX. 
Nissan will invest about 3 billion yen ($29 million) in new machine 
tools at its Aguascalientes plant to increase the number of 
crankshafts processed from 5,000 to 15,000 units per month by the 
summer of 1995. 

   NMMC has been tasked with producing 1,600-cc engines used in 
Sentra models and the "Quest" minivan, which Nissan jointly 
developed and is producing in Ohio with Ford Motor.  Furthermore, 
NIKKEI reported that NMMC will begin producing a 3,000-cc engine- 
-now exported from Japan--for large Nissan Truck models.  This will 
increase NMMC's engine output by 20,000 units a year, which will 
raise the ratio of engines produced in North America for autos 
assembled in the United States to "about 99 percent."  Nissan will 
continue to import about 5,000 engines for the 2,000-cc Sentra 
models, since the volume is too small to warrant local production, 
NIKKEI reported. 

   Nissan has also decided to produce "multi-ring beam suspensions" 
in the United States and Mexico.  [For information on Nissan's 
suspension production, see the 20 April 1994 Pacific Rim Economic 
Review, page 3].  According to the 31 March NIKKEI, the company will 
soon be manufacturing in the United States or Mexico virtually all 
"critical" parts, except transmissions, for autos built in North 
America. 

   Nissan-Affiliated Parts Makers -- The 7 April NIKKEI SANGYO 
SHIMBUN reported that Kansei Corp., a Nissan-affiliated manufacturer 
of automotive meters, is building a "mutually inclusive" auto parts 
production and supply system between its bases in the United States 
and Mexico.  Because parts imports from Japan are no longer price 
competitive, Kansei is moving to integrate production in North 
America to maintain economies of scale and lower costs. 

   Kansei will begin shipping about 200,000 meter components 
annually from its Tennessee base to its factory in Aguascalientes, 
Mexico, for assembly in instrument panels for Nissan Sentras 
assembled in Mexico.  According to the paper, Kansei will also begin 
shipping 150,000 ashtrays annually from Mexico for Sentras built in 
the United States. 

   According to the 21 April NIKKEI SANGYO, Unisia Jecs Corp., a 
Nissan-affiliated maker of "high function" auto parts, is also 
moving to establish a "mutual" supply system of auto parts between 
its plants in North America.  The company plans to ship power 
steering pumps and other parts from the United States to Mexico and 
send oil pans from Mexico to the United States. 

   Honda To Produce Autos in Mexico, Suppliers To Follow -- On 9 
May, Honda Motor Co. announced that it would build passenger 
vehicles in Mexico.  According to the 11 May NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN, 
Honda will become the first Japanese automaker to have production 
bases in all three NAFTA countries, and the second, following 
Nissan, to manufacture autos in Mexico.  The company also hopes to 
export vehicles made in Mexico to other Latin American countries. 
The 5 May NIKKEI stated that Honda is looking to establish its North 
American plants as "export bases."  The company already exports 
thousands of vehicles from the United States to Japan and other 
countries, and on 4 May, it announced that it will export Civics 
manufactured in Canada to Taiwan and Brazil.  [See the 18 May 1994 
Pacific Rim Economic Review, page 1]. 

   Regarding its Mexican production plans, Honda plans to build a 
new auto plant this July near its motorcycle plant in Guadalajara at 
a cost of $50 million, NIKKAN KOGYO stated.  When operations begin 
in November 1995, the plant will produce 15,000 Accords annually for 
sale in Mexico.  Once production reaches 30,000 units per year, 
Honda will begin exports to other countries in Latin America, but 
the company does not plan to export finished vehicles from Mexico to 
Canada or the United States.  On the other hand, all Accord engines 
and a number of parts will be exported from the United States to 
Mexico. 

   Honda Parts Suppliers Expanding Local Production -- According to 
the 3 February NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN, Mitsuba Electric Manufacturing 
Co., a Honda-affiliated maker of electrical equipment, is moving 
aggressively to shift production of automobile parts to the United 
States to raise its local content ratio.  Initially, Mitsuba will 
transfer the assembly of starter motors to its U.S. joint venture 
firm, CME Corporation, and may eventually transfer the assembly of 
fan and wiper motors. 

   Mitsuba is planning to increase its local content ratio for parts 
produced in the United States to 9O percent by FY97, which will be 
double that of FY92, according to the 21 April NIKKEI SANGYO. 
Mitsuba plans to reach a 75 percent local content level in 1996, and 
then will adjust procurement levels based upon exchange rate levels. 
The paper stated that it would be cheaper for the company to export 
from Japan if the yen falls to between 120 and 130 to the dollar. 
If the yen stays around 100 to the dollar, however, Mitsuba "cannot 
make a profit" unless its local procurement level is raised to 90 
percent. 

   NIKKEI SANGYO also reported that Showa Co., a Honda-affiliated 
maker of hydraulic shock absorbers, has merged three of its North 
American subsidiaries to "benefit from greater economies of scale," 
and Stanley Electric Co., a Honda-group member that makes automotive 
electrical equipment, has begun designing and producing metal molds 
in the United States.  The paper stated that these firms are moving 
to lower production costs by producing in the United States, not 
only for Honda, but also to satisfy increasing orders from the Big 
Three auto manufacturers. 

   Construction Equipment Industry - 1993 Construction Equipment 
Shipments Down 8.1 Percent -- According to figures compiled by the 
Japan Construction Equipment Manufacturers' Association, total 
shipments of construction equipment in 1993 fell 8.1 percent 
compared to 1992 to 1.72 trillion yen ($16.4 billion).  This was the 
third consecutive yearly decline.  Excluding auxiliary equipment, 
shipments were down 8.5 percent to 1.52 trillion yen ($14.5 
billion).  Total auxiliary equipment shipments came to 210.2 billion 
yen ($2 billion), down 5.5 percent. 

   Of the eight construction equipment categories, tunneling 
machines showed an increase of 17.0 percent, but all other 
categories fell. Shipments of construction cranes were down 22.5 
percent, basic machinery 21.3 percent, tractors 4.6 percent, and 
hydraulic shovels 1.0 percent.  Domestic demand fell 8.9 percent to 
1.28 trillion yen ($12.17 billion), while foreign demand was down 
5.9 percent to 434.1 billion yen ($4.13 billion).  (Tokyo NIKKAN 
KOGYO SHIMBUN 9 May 94 p 10) 

   Economic Trends - FEATURE:  Mixed Reaction to Proposed MFA 
Safeguards on Textile Imports -- SUMMARY:  A trade issues 
subcommittee of the Ministry of International Trade and Industry 
(MITI) has recommended applying Multifiber Arrangement (MFA) 
safeguards on textile imports to Japan to help the industry 
restructure, according to press reports.  There are doubts within 
industry circles, however, that MITI will actually enact the 
safeguards because this action may be perceived as a shift in 
Japan's trade policy. 

   The Trade Issues Subcommittee of the Textile Industry Council, 
which is an advisory organ of MITI, publicly disclosed its 
recommendations on 17 May, according to the 18 May NIKKEI SANGYO 
SHIMBUN.  Based on these recommendations, MITI has begun defining 
implementation rules for enacting the safeguards. 

   According to the 18 May Osaka Edition of MAINICHI SHIMBUN, the 
subcommittee recommended the application of MFA safeguards because 
the rapid increase in textile imports, mainly from China and other 
Asian countries, is "destroying the production foundation" of the 
domestic textile industry.  Since 1987 the industry has experienced 
"record deficits" of 7 to 1O billion yen ($67-95 million) annually. 
In 1993, textile imports accounted for a 51 percent share of the 
domestic textile market, MAINICHI reported.  MFA safeguards, when 
applied, would mainly target China, which in 1993 had the largest 
share--47.5 percent--of textile imports, the 18 May YOMIURI SHIMBUN 
noted.  Other leading textile importers are Pakistan with 14 percent 
of the market, South Korea with 1O.5 percent, and Taiwan with 5.9 
percent. 

   The 18 May NIKKEI SANGYO noted that MITI will first gather data 
on the actual volume of the targeted textile imports and 
"technically assess" the resulting damage to the domestic industry 
in order to determine when MFA safeguards should be applied.  It 
will also examine any existing regulations concerning the targeted 
imports and "politically assess" the effectiveness of these 
regulations. 

   Once a decision has been made to apply MFA safeguards, they will 
be effective for three years, after which no new measures could be 
applied until a year had passed, according to the 18 May YOMIURI 
SHIMBUN.  During the first year, MITI will strive to maintain 
imports of the targeted textiles at the same level, or slightly 
above the level, of the previous year.  During the second and third 
year it will cap any increases in imports at 6 percent a year.  The 
safeguards will be cancelled if they "did not sufficiently assist 
the domestic industry." 

   The 18 May ASAHI SHIMBUN observed that there is a good chance the 
domestic textile industry can restructure under MFA safeguards.  It 
also asserted that Japan can develop and maintain a foundation for 
textile production and "never have to rely on restricting imports 
again." 

   Other "pluses" of enacting MFA safeguards, the YOMIURI article 
noted, are that the domestic industry would have time to restructure 
and could gradually adjust its employment structures.  The "minuses" 
are that consumers would have to pay higher prices for products and 
that MFA safeguards "run counter to import expansion measures" which 
are currently being promoted to reduce Japan's trade surplus. 

   Textile Industry Welcomes MFA Safeguards as Forward Step -- 
Several textile industry leaders have welcomed the proposal to apply 
MFA safeguards, the 18 May NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI) reported. 
Reiichi Yukimura, chairman of the Japan Chemical Fiber Association, 
stated that it is a "landmark event" that safeguards are even being 
considered.  According to the 18 May Osaka MAINICHI, Minoru Shibata, 
chairman of the Japan Spinners Association, believes safeguards 
should be "expedited." 

   People within the industry do not view the proposed MFA 
safeguards as a "bulldozing measure," the 18 May NIKKEI noted.  The 
19 May NIKKEI SANGYO reported that a team from the Japan Spinners 
Association, which has been studying this issue, noted that the 
United States and Europe have "taken care" of their textile 
industries using MFA safeguards far more than Japan realizes and 
that the MFA is recognized as an international rule "because it has 
so much international support."  According to NIKKEI SANGYO, some 
within the Japanese textile industry are "angry" because the United 
States and Europe have used their "skillful diplomacy" to protect 
their textile industries, while Japan "has not established any 
defenses." 

   MFA Action Doubted Because of Unclear Standards of Procedure -- 
Some within the industry are also dissatisfied because there are no 
clearly  defined procedures for enacting MFA safeguards, according 
to the 18 May Osaka MAINICHI.  In the past, the 18 May ASAHI noted, 
MITI has assumed a position of "not taking any MFA actions," and 
thus, has never defined any implementation rules.  The 18 May NIKKEI 
noted that textile manufacturers question MITI's "earnestness" 
regarding safeguards because the subcommittee recommendations, which 
were expected in March, were delayed until May.  Consequently, MITI 
will not complete its elaboration of implementation rules until 
July.  Manufacturers are also gloomy over prospects for any concrete 
actions because MITI has incorporated "policy assessments" as part 
of the process for determining relevant cases. 

   The response of general trading companies has been mixed, the 18 
May NIKKEI SANGYO noted.  Some companies welcome the MFA safeguards 
because they feel that unless they are enacted, the domestic 
industry will be "hollowed out and there will be no one to do 
business with."  Some trading companies, such as Marubeni, wonder 
why MFA measures have "suddenly appeared, since the MFA will soon be 
abolished globally."  NIKKEI SANGYO also observed that MFA 
safeguards are a "double-edged sword" for textile companies who have 
already shifted production overseas as a survival strategy and are 
now exporting textile products back to Japan. 
   Japanese Firms Expect Continued Exchange Rate Instability -- 
According to an article in the 19 May NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI), 
Japanese "market sources" believed that the U.S. Federal Reserve 
Board's (FRB) announcement of an increase in the official discount 
rate (ODR) from 3.0 to 3.5 percent on 17 May will have a "limited 
upward" effect on the value of the U.S. dollar, and expect the yen 
to remain "high relative to the dollar."  They listed two reasons 
for the limited impact of the ODR increase:  Japanese institutional 
investors, such as life insurance companies, are not investing in 
dollar-denominated assets such as U.S. treasury bonds; and Japanese 
exporters will increase sales of dollars in the next two to three 
months. 

   The 19 May NIKKEI article reported that life insurance companies 
remain "cautious about investing in treasury bonds" because of the 
associated foreign exchange risk.  According to the NIKKEI article, 
Sumitomo Life Insurance was the "only" large institutional investor 
that bought treasury bonds immediately after the FRB's announcement. 
The NIKKEI article noted, however, that Sumitomo Life's action did 
not lead to yen sales and dollar purchases in the foreign exchange 
market, because Sumitomo Life sold dollar futures simultaneously to 
hedge the foreign exchange risk.  A Sumitomo Life fund manager, 
quoted in the NIKKEI article, said that he had to make futures 
contracts to sell dollars because there are "so many uncertain 
factors" surrounding the yen-dollar exchange rate, including the 
outcome of the U.S.-Japan framework talks, and therefore the risk of 
investing in treasury bonds would remain "high." 

   In an article in the 19 May ASAHI SHIMBUN, a fund manager of a 
large life insurance company was also quoted as saying that he did 
not invest in treasury bonds because "the yen-dollar exchange rate 
in the Tokyo market was unaffected by the FRB's announcement."  He 
continued saying that as long as Japan had a large trade surplus, 
the current tendency of the dollar to lose value would remain, and 
so would the risk accompanying investments in treasury bonds. 

   The 19 May NIKKEI article reported that Japanese exporters, 
mainly in the automobile and electronics industries, would probably 
increase sales of dollars in the futures market in next two to three 
months.  Exporters expected that the FRB's decision to raise the ODR 
would lead to a higher dollar and did not commit to futures 
contracts to sell dollars in the next quarter.  Exporting firms have 
thus far sold "only" 2O-3O percent of their dollars in the futures 
market for the July-September period.  Consequently, the article 
noted, exporters have to increase sales of dollars to make up the 
shortfall of yen funds, which will suppress the rise of the dollar 
against the yen. 

   Exporters appear to be content to sell their dollars at about 1O5 
yen per dollar.  For example, a financial officer of Toshiba 
Corporation, an electronics manufacturer, was quoted in the NIKKEI 
article as saying that Toshiba "has to sell" its dollars at around 
105 yen per dollar.  A financial officer of TDK, a magnetic media 
manufacturer, also said that TDK would sell "at least half the 
dollars it planned to sell for the July-September quarter" at the 
105 yen rate.  The company does not expect the dollar to rise 
"substantially" for some time to come.  A financial officer of 
Canon, a camera and electronics manufacturer, was also quoted as 
saying that it would sell dollars at the 105 yen rate, since it 
expected the exchange rate to stay at around the 105 yen level. 

   In the 19 May ASAHI, Keio University Associate Professor Heizo 
Takenaka said that it was "still too early" to tell whether the 
value of the dollar would stabilize.  Takenaka maintained that the 
dollar might remain "unstable" because of "uncertainty over U.S. 
economic fundamentals" and "distrust over the Clinton 
administration's economic policy management as seen in the cases of 
health care reform and ratification of the [GATT] Uruguay Round 
agreement by the Senate, both of which are facing difficulty." 
Takenaka concluded that as long as U.S. concern over inflation 
remains and Japan does not take "decisive measures" to reduce its 
trade surplus, a change in the current trend of a strong yen and a 
weak dollar is "impossible." 

   In another article in the 19 May ASAHI, Yukihiro Harada, director 
of the Research Institute of the Long Term Credit Bank of Japan, 
noted that, although a "dollar crisis" was avoided for the time 
being, the structural pairing of a U.S. fiscal deficit and a 
Japanese trade surplus had not changed.  Harada asserted that in 
order to stabilize the yen-dollar exchange rate, Japan should make 
"substantial" income tax cuts to stimulate domestic demand, and the 
United States should reduce its fiscal deficit.  Harada also 
expected the yen-dollar exchange rate to remain "relatively stable" 
thanks to policy coordination by the G-7 countries, "at least until 
the Naples summit in July."  He noted, however, the possibility of 
the exchange market becoming "turbulent" again after the summit. 

   Financial Issues - FEATURE:  Ashikaga Bank Suspends Dollar 
Remittances to North Korea -- SUMMARY:  Ashikaga Bank's recent 
decision to suspend sending U.S. dollar remittances from other 
Japanese banks to North Korea via U.S. banks will have little effect 
on the total money flow from Japan to North Korea, according to 
Japanese press articles.  Several articles suggested that Ashikaga 
Bank's action was due to "pressure" from the U.S. Government. 

   According to the 19 May evening editions of NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 
(NIKKEI), SANKEI SHIMBUN, YOMIURI SHIMBUN, and the 2O May morning 
edition of ASAHI SHIMBUN, on 19 May Ashikaga Bank, Japan's 27th 
largest bank and the bank most directly involved in money transfers 
to North Korea, announced that in April it had suspended sending 
U.S. dollar remittances to North Korea on behalf of the customers of 
other Japanese banks.  The bank stated that the decision was its own 
and did not result from Ministry of Finance (MOF) pressure.  In 
addition, the bank made it clear that the suspension applies "only 
to dollar remittances from other Japanese banks being sent via U.S. 
banks," and does not affect dollar remittances from its own 
customers, Eurodollar and Deutsche mark remittances via European 
banks, or yen remittances. 

   Suspension Will Have Little Effect on Remittances to North Korea 
-- Financial sources quoted in the 19 May NIKKEI stated that 
Ashikaga Bank's action will have "little effect" on the total money 
flow from Japan to North Korea "because most remittances are made in 
yen."  The 20 May ASAHI also noted that as long as money transfers 
from Japan to North Korea are deemed legal, and the United Nations 
does not formally impose economic sanctions against North Korea, 
remittances from Japan to North Korea are expected to continue. 

   According to the 11 April NIKKEI BUSINESS, about 90 percent of 
remittances from Japan to North Korea are transferred through 
Ashikaga Bank [For further details, see the 20 April 1994 Pacific 
Rim Economic Review, pp 7-9].  The 19 May SANKEI reported that 
Ashikaga Bank has been serving as the main bank for pachinko machine 
manufacturers of Korean descent in Gumma Prefecture, which adjoins 
Tochigi Prefecture, Ashikaga Bank's base.  Because of that 
connection, owners of pachinko machine manufacturing companies who 
are "sympathetic to North Korea" have been using Ashikaga Bank to 
send money to North Korea. 

   Alleged Pressure from MOF, U.S. Government -- Several press 
articles suggested that Ashikaga Bank suspended dollar remittances 
to North Korea via U.S. banks because of MOF and U.S. Government 
"pressure."  For example, the 19 May NIKKEI said that Ashikaga Bank 
had "voluntarily" suspended dollar remittances out of 
"consideration" for the U.S. Government, which has been "irritated" 
by Japanese remittances to North Korea because of the DPRK's 
suspected nuclear weapons program.  The 20 May ASAHI quoted 
financial sources as saying that Ashikaga Bank had suspended dollar 
remittances because it feared "some sort of retaliation" from U.S. 
monetary authorities if the bank continued sending dollar 
remittances to North Korea via U.S. banks.  The 19 May SANKEI also 
claimed that the bank's decision was the "result of U.S. monetary 
authorities tightening up" dollar remittances by third countries to 
North Korea via U.S. banks. 

   According to press articles, the MOF denied exerting any pressure 
or issuing administrative guidance to Ashikaga Bank to suspend 
handling of dollar remittances.  According to the NIKKEI, SANKEI, 
and ASAHI articles, the MOF's International Finance Bureau stated 
that it had taken no action against Ashikaga Bank, and emphasized 
that the decision was Ashikaga Bank's own.  According to the NIKKEI, 
SANKEI, and ASAHI articles, the MOF also stated there is no 
discrimination on the part of the Japanese Government against North 
Korea receiving money transfers. 

   FEATURE:  Favorable Tax Treatment for Pro-North Korea Businesses 
-- SUMMARY:  In a recent magazine article, a prominent Korean 
affairs specialist claimed that if Japan's tax authorities were to 
end preferential tax treatment extended to Korean business owners in 
Japan, and if prefectural governments tightened their audits of 
North Korean-affiliated financial institutions, money transfers from 
Japan to North Korea would be "effectively reduced," even without UN 
economic sanctions. 

   Favorable Tax Treatment -- In an article published in the June 
1994 issue of the monthly THIS IS YOMIURI, Katsumi Sato, editor in 
chief of the journal GENDAI KOREA (Modern Korea)--a monthly 
publication for Korea specialists--asserted that Japan's National 
Tax Administration Agency (NTAA) has given favorable tax treatment 
to Korean business owners belonging to the Korean Federation of 
Commerce and Industry (KFCI), which is an organ of the pro-North 
Korea General Federation of Korean Residents in Japan (Chosen 
Soren).  According to Sato, this favorable treatment is based on an 
agreement on taxation matters signed by the NTAA and KFCI in October 
1976.  According to a booklet entitled "Chosen Soren" published by 
Chosen Soren in February 1991, and cited by Sato, the agreement 
stipulates that: 

--The NTAA will resolve all tax problems concerning KFCI members 
through "negotiations with KFCI." 

--The NTAA recognizes KFCI members' payments of regular membership 
fees to trade and industry organizations as business deductions. 

--The NTAA will "positively resolve" the issue of declaring as tax 
exempt payments by KFCI members to operate Chosen Soren schools. 

--The NTAA recognizes expenses for travel to third countries for 
business activities as business deductions. 

--The NTAA will resolve the tax cases of KFCI members "presently 
contested in court" through negotiations with KFCI. 

   Sato also cited the 14 January 1992 issue of CHOSEN SHOKO SHIMBUN 
(Korea Commerce and Industry Newspaper) as reporting that "in 1991 
the KFCI peacefully resolved tax problems of KFCI members and 
further strengthened our collective bargaining rights with Japan's 
NTAA."  Sato considers NTAA's recognition of KFCI's collective 
bargaining rights as constituting preferential treatment for KFCI 
members, since the NTAA does not recognize the right of Japanese 
citizens to bargain collectively concerning tax matters.  Sato also 
considers the NTAA's method of resolving the tax problems of 
individual businessmen through negotiations with KFCI to be 
favorable treatment, since the NTAA does not permit Japanese 
business owners to negotiate in the same manner. 

   Sato speculated in his article that this favorable tax treatment- 
-at least in part--has enabled North Korean business owners in Japan 
to contribute large amounts of money to North Korea.  According to 
Sato, a number of businessmen make contributions of over 100 million 
yen ($95,000) annually to North Korea.  The largest contribution 
ever made by a Korean individual was 5 billion yen ($47.6 million), 
made at the peak of Japan's bubble economy in 1987.  In 1994, with 
the economy still in recession, one Korean individual contributed 
boring equipment worth 350 million yen ($3.33 million) to North 
Korea.  According to Sato, the amount of money transferred from 
Japan to North Korea in 1990 is estimated at 60 billion yen ($571 
million). 

   'Loose Auditing' of Chosen Soren Credit Associations -- Sato also 
pointed to "loose auditing" of Chogin Credit Associations--which 
serve Chosen Soren members--by prefectural governments as another 
reason for the flow of funds to North Korea.  Sato stated that an 
"enormous" amount of money had been loaned out and left unaccounted 
for by the Chogin Credit Associations.  According to the 30 March 
1993 issue of AERA, a total of 8.2 billion yen ($78 million) had 
been loaned to four Chosen Soren-related firms and one individual by 
Chogin Credit Associations, but had not been repaid [for details, 
see the 21 April 1993 Pacific Rim Economic Review pp 7-9]. 
According to the AERA article, the Chogin Credit Associations serve 
Chosen Soren members and operate in 38 of Japan's 47 prefectures, 
and prefectural governments are responsible for auditing credit 
associations operating within their jurisdictions.  Sato estimated 
the total deposits of Chogin Credit Associations at approximately 
2.37 trillion yen ($22.6 billion). 

   Sato concluded his article by stating that if NTAA canceled the 
1976 agreement with KFCI and applied the same rules to Korean 
business owners as it does to Japanese owners and, if prefectural 
governments tightened their auditing of the Chogin Credit 
Associations, money transfers from Japan to North Korea "would 
effectively be reduced" without the imposition of UN economic 
sanctions against North Korea. 

   FEATURE:  Securities Firms, Banks Show Interest in Mexico -- 
SUMMARY:  With the signing of the NAFTA agreement, Japanese 
securities companies and banks have shown renewed interest in 
setting up or expanding operations in Mexico.  Japan's "big four" 
securities firms are planning to establish representative offices 
there, and at least two Japanese banks will soon receive permission 
to begin operations. 

   Securities Companies Waiting to Open Representative Offices -- 
Deregulation of Mexico's financial markets is progressing in the 
wake of NAFTA, according to the 12 May NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN. 
Japan's "big four" securities companies--Nomura, Nikko, Yamaichi, 
and Daiwa--are waiting for Mexican financial authorities to disclose 
the official policy on foreign securities firms opening 
representative offices in Mexico, which is expected to be announced 
in May.  In the meantime, the four are planning to establish 
representative offices under the auspices of their U.S. 
subsidiaries.  The Mexican Government has already decided its policy 
on full subsidiaries of foreign corporations, as opposed to 
representative offices. 
   However, the securities firms have opted to open representative 
offices because they are less costly and allow the securities 
companies to continue their practice of covering all Mexican 
business from their U.S. offices.  With the opening of the 
representative offices, the big four expect to enhance their 
information collection capabilities, forge stronger links with 
customers, and expand their underwriting businesses.  The companies 
attempted to establish representative offices in Mexico in 1991, but 
were delayed by complications involving NAFTA.  The representative 
offices in Mexico, with the exception of Nomura's office in Sao 
Paulo, Brazil, will be the first established by any of Japan's 
securities companies in South and Central America. 

   Mexico Encouraging Japanese Banks to Establish Branches -- 
Foreign banks had been virtually excluded from the Mexican market, 
with Citibank being the only foreign bank with an authorized branch, 
according to the 5 January NIKKEI KINYU.  [For reporting on Japanese 
banks in Mexico see the 9 February 1994 Pacific Rim Economic Review, 
pp 3-4.]  However, since the implementation of NAFTA, Mexican 
financial authorities, including the deputy secretary of foreign 
commerce, have encouraged Japanese banks to set up bases of 
operations there, according to the 22 April NIKKEI KINYU.  The 
deputy secretary stated that foreign banks with branches in the 
United States would be treated just like U.S. entities under NAFTA 
and strongly urged Japanese banks to set up offices. 

   In March, Mexico's Secretariat of Finance and Public Credit 
explained part of its policy on foreign entities entering Mexico's 
financial markets, according to the 12 March ASAHI SHIMBUN.  In 
April it announced that banks could apply by 31 July for 
authorization to open branches in the latter half of the year, 
according to the 22 April NIKKEI KINYU.  Mexico's ambassador to 
Japan, Sergio Gonzalez Galvez, said two Japanese banks will be among 
those foreign banks Mexico will soon allow to operate there, 
according to a 31 March KYODO News Service report. 

   Two Japanese banks already have reciprocal arrangements with 
Mexican banks, according to the 18 January NIKKEI KINYU.  The Long- 
Term Credit Bank of Japan has a cooperative arrangement with the 
National Foreign Trade Bank of Mexico, which it established in 
November 1993 to assist Japanese companies entering the Mexican 
market, according to the 23 November 1993 NIKKEI.  The Bank of Tokyo 
has a similar arrangement with National Finance Bank (NAFIN), which 
it established in April 1990 and upgraded in late 1993, according to 
the 24 December NIKKEI.  In addition, the Bank of Tokyo conducts 
business with other Mexican banks and commissions them to represent 
the bank in conducting full branch operations, according to the 1 
January NIKKEI. 

   Banks Active in Samurai Bond Market -- The 12 May NIKKEI KTNYU 
article observed that corporate and government demand for funds is 
strong in Mexico, especially for samurai bonds or yen-based bonds 
issued in Japan by nonresidents.  The Mexican Government issued 
samurai bonds in 1993 for the first time in 16 years.  According to 
the 12 May NIKKEI KINYU, Mexico was the leading issuer of samurai 
bonds last year. 

   NAFTA has prompted Fuji Bank to enhance its business with the 
Mexican Government and its affiliated financial institutions in 
anticipation of an increasing Japanese corporate presence in Mexico, 
according to the 15 March NIKKEI KINYU.  Working with its wholly- 
owned U.S. subsidiary, Fuji Capital Markets, Fuji Bank in 1993 
managed the placement of 35 billion yen ($333 million) in samurai 
bonds issued in Japan--10 billion yen ($95 million) for the Mexican 
Government, 10 billion yen ($95 million) for NAFIN, and 15 billion 
yen ($142 million) for the National Foreign Trade Bank of Mexico. 
   For the first time since Mexico experienced its debt crisis in 
1982, Fuji has resumed "what amounts to" long-term financing for 
private Mexican companies, the 21 February NIKKEI reported.  The 
bank has invested in a portion of the $100 million in bonds 
privately placed by a nonferrous metals refining company, which has 
a contract to export silver through Japanese trading companies.  The 
arrangement is essentially a long-term loan collateralized by export 
sales, which are managed by Fuji's wholly-owned U.S. subsidiary, 
Fuji Bank and Trust, the article observed. 

   Daiwa International Trust Bank, a wholly-owned subsidiary of 
Daiwa Securities, was designated to manage samurai bonds issued by 
Mexico's state-run oil company, Mexican Petroleum (PEMEX), according 
to the 15 May NIKKEI.  It will manage the payment of principal and 
interest on some 20 billion yen ($190 million) in samurai bonds to 
be issued in June 1994 and underwritten by Daiwa Securities. 

   The government-affiliated Export-Import Bank of Japan recently 
signed an agreement for an untied loan for a maximum of $200 million 
to NAFIN, according to the 13 April NIKKEI.  The funds will be 
channelled by NAFIN through local financial institutions to Mexican 
companies and applied to the development of pollution-prevention 
facilities.  This is the second loan in Japan's environmental aid 
program to Mexico since 1991.  Chiyoda Corp., an oil refining and 
petrochemical plant engineering firm, won a contract to build two of 
the three facilities PEMEX will build in connection with the 
environmental aid program, according to the 7 April NIKKEI SANGYO. 
The roughly 8 billion yen ($76 million) contract is part of a $900 
million project for improving the environment. 

   In addition, NAFTA has led to the revival of multinational loan 
syndicates in Mexico, the 20 March NIKKEI reported.  The Industrial 
Bank of Japan is the syndicate leader for the $300 million Japanese 
banks offered in short-term trade loans to PEMEX out of a combined 
total of $1.1 billion in loans by both Japanese and U.S. banks.  The 
article observed that Japanese banks are eager to participate in 
future loan syndications. 

   FEATURE:  Norinchukin Striving for Universal Bank Status -- 
SUMMARY:  Norinchukin Bank is on its way to becoming a "universal 
bank," benefitting from its close links to Japan's agricultural 
credit cooperatives and from assistance from the Ministry of Finance 
(MOF), which together with the Ministry of Agriculture, Forestry and 
Fisheries (MAFF) oversee the bank, according to press reporting. 
Norinchukin also received preferential treatment in 1993 concerning 
the interest rate on loans extended to housing loan companies.  Last 
year the bank established Norinchukin Securities and a trust fund 
management subsidiary. 

   Norinchukin or the Central Bank for Agriculture and Forestry, is 
nearing its goal of becoming a universal bank, according to the 14 
March NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN.  A universal bank is a European-style 
bank engaging in the full range of financial services, including 
commercial, trust and investment banking, and the securities 
business.  Operating under the joint auspices of the MOF and MAFF, 
Norinchukin has total assets of 43 trillion yen ($41O billion) and 
serves as the central bank for Japan's agricultural credit 
cooperatives.  These cooperatives have deposits totalling 63 
trillion yen ($6OO billion), more than the nation's largest 
commercial bank, according to the 17 May ASAHI SHIMBUN. 

   'Secret Deal' Favors Norinchukin -- Norinchukin and its 
affiliates recently were reported to have been involved in a 
"secret" agreement between the MOF and MAFF, the 15 May ASAHI 
reported.  A "secret memo" was reportedly exchanged between the 
finance and agriculture ministries in February 1993 regarding the 
reduction of interest rates on loans made by agricultural financial 
institutions affiliated with Norinchukin to seven housing loan 
companies that were experiencing financial difficulties and faced 
restructuring.  (Japanese agricultural financial institutions are 
under the jurisdiction of the MAFF, while Japanese housing loan 
companies are under the jurisdiction of the MOF.)  The agreement 
provided that the Bank of Japan (BOJ) would offer low-interest loans 
to Norinchukin, which would then channel the funds to the 
agricultural financial institutions, ASAHI reported.  In return, the 
agricultural financial institutions would accept a reduction in the 
interest rates receivable from the distressed housing loan companies 
as part of the restructuring plan the MOF was then devising.  [For 
details on the housing loan companies' bad loans, see the 26 January 
1994 Pacific Rim Economic Review, pp 6-8.]  The plan involved the 
remission or reduction of interest rates on loans made to the 
housing lenders by their parent financial institutions, which 
included the agricultural institutions affiliated with Norinchukin. 
While private financial institutions accepted complete remission of 
interest or a reduction to 2.5 percent, the Norinchukin-affiliated 
financial institutions were allowed to maintain a considerably 
higher rate of 4.5 percent.  Nevertheless, because the agricultural 
financial institutions were not amenable to "reductions of any 
sort," the 17 May ASAHI reported, the restructuring plan 
necessitated a promise from the BOJ beforehand for low-interest 
"assistance loans." 

   The agricultural institutions argued that their high loan 
exposure to the housing lenders made interest rate reductions on the 
scale accepted by the private banks unacceptable, the 16 May NIHON 
KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI) reported.  At the time the MOF was planning 
to restructure roughly 6 trillion yen ($57 billion) out of the 14 
trillion yen ($133 billion) in total loans owed by seven of the 
eight housing lenders to Norinchukin and the agricultural financial 
institutions affiliated with it.  As of the September mid-FY93 
accounting period, roughly 60 percent of the housing lenders' 
combined loans receivable were nonperforming and this total was 
expected to increase, according to the 17 May NIKKEI KINYU. 

   MOF Enlists Norinchukin's Help -- The 17 May ASAHI explained the 
reason behind the preferential 4.5 percent interest rate for 
Norinchukin's affiliates.  It was a "pay back" for the assistance 
Norinchukin provided the MOF in 1992 in passing the Financial System 
Reform Bill.  The bill, intended to increase competition in the 
finance industry, had not gone to the Diet for deliberation because 
of opposition party resistance.  Since a related bill would allow 
Norinchukin to establish a securities subsidiary, the MOF enlisted 
Norinchukin--with its considerable influence over Diet members 
representing agricultural interests--to assist in passing the bill, 
ASAHI noted.  Norinchukin's management met politicians in both the 
ruling and opposition parties, while the agricultural cooperatives 
contacted their Diet members to support the bill.  The bill passed, 
and the MOF showed its "appreciation" to Norinchukin by not 
requiring its affiliates to shoulder the severely reduced interest 
rates to the housing lenders required of other banks and by 
arranging low-interest loans from the BOJ. 

   Norinchukin Subsidiaries Show Strong Performance -- Subsequently, 
Norinchukin established Norinchukin Securities, one of only three 
bank securities subsidiaries established in July 1993 after passage 
of the Financial System Reform Law, according to the 11 May NIKKEI 
KINYU.  The subsidiary earned ordinary profits of 200 million ($1.9 
million) for FY93 which ended in March 1994.  Of the five bank 
securities subsidiaries established to date, two posted FY93 losses 
and of the three that made money, only Norinchukin Securities showed 
the "current account surplus" the MOF requires for the three-year- 
period from the inception of operations.  Norinchukin Securities' 
profits were bolstered primarily by commissions on sales of 
investment trust funds to another affiliate in the Norinchukin 
Group, Norinchukin Investment Management Co.  Some 60 percent of the 
corporate and samurai bonds, which are yen-denominated bonds issued 
in Japan by non-residents, underwritten by Norinchukin Securities as 
of March 1994 were purchased by the prefectural-level credit 
divisions of agricultural credit cooperatives and other affiliates 
of Norinchukin, according to the 14 March NIKKEI KINYU. 

   Similarly, Norinchukin Investment Management Co. is the only 
investment trust fund management company of the five established in 
September 1993 that is expected to post profits for FY93, according 
to the 26 April NIKKEI KINYU.  It posted ordinary profits of 30 
billion yen ($285 million), bolstered by commissions on direct sales 
of investment trusts to affiliated institutions, while the four 
subsidiaries established by private commercial banks all posted 
losses of roughly 200 million yen ($1.9 million).  The NIKKEI KINYU 
observed that the private bank subsidiaries losses were expected to 
continue to suffer losses in FY94 and that the gap between their 
profitability and that of Norinchukin Investment would widen.  It 
attributed this widening gap to the support the Norinchukin 
affiliates can offer Norinchukin Investment in the form of stable 
sales.  Some 40 percent of Norinchukin Investment's sales of stock 
and public bond investment trusts were to the prefectural-level 
credit divisions of agricultural credit cooperatives and the other 
agricultural financial institutions, according to the 14 March 
NIKKEI KINYU. 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - CHINA:  Apparel Firms Establish 
Operations in Shanghai, Shandong, Jiangsu -- Japanese business 
newspapers in the past few weeks have carried a number of reports 
concerning Japanese textile companies and clothing manufacturers 
setting up or expanding operations in China.  Three of the largest 
joint venture undertakings are as follows: 

   Mizuno--A leading manufacturer of sporting goods and apparel, 
Mizuno, together with its subsidiary, Hong Kong Mizuno, and the 
Chinese sporting goods merchandising firm, Shanghai Stationery 
Corp., on 1 April established a joint venture company to manufacture 
and export sportswear.  The new company, Shanghai Mizuno Co. Ltd., 
is capitalized at $2 million, with Mizuno and Hong Kong Mizuno 
contributing 90 percent and Shanghai Stationery 1O percent.  The 
joint venture firm will begin building a 2,000-square meter factory 
in Shanghai in June.  Total investment, including real estate, will 
be about 200 million yen ($1.9 million).  Shanghai Mizuno will 
import the materials for ski wear and windbreakers from Japan and 
export the finished product back to Japan.  The company plans to 
produce 150,000 pieces in the first fiscal year and 500,000 by the 
third year.  (Tokyo NIKKEI RYUTSU SHIMBUN 5 May 94 p 10) 

   Gunze--Japan's largest manufacturer of knit underwear, Gunze, 
together with the trading company Mitsui &amp; Co. and the Jinan 
Knitting Factory, have established an underwear manufacturing joint 
venture company in Jinan City, Shandong Province.  The new company, 
Jinan Gunze Fashion Co. Ltd., is capitalized at $1.5 million, with 
Gunze and Jinan Knitting each contributing 46 percent, Mitsui 5 
percent, and the Chinese trading firm Shandong Provincial Textile 
Import Export Company 3 percent.  Jinan Gunze Fashion will begin 
producing children's underwear in July and will gradually expand its 
product line.  The company anticipates sales of about 240 million 
yen ($2.3 million) in three years.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 12 
May 94 p 12) 

   Kaitaku--An apparel manufacturer based in Okayama City, Okayama 
Prefecture, Kaitaku is expanding its presence in China by 
establishing joint venture companies in Suzhou, Jiangsu Province, 
and Qingdao, Shandong Province, and by building a wholly owned 
textile mill in Shanghai.  The Jiangsu joint venture, Suzhou 
Kaitaku, will invest about 30 million yen ($286,000) to buy a local 
mill, which will begin producing pajamas on 25 May.  It will have a 
production capacity of 50,000 garments per month.  The company's 
wholly owned subsidiary, Shanghai Kaitaku, will complete 
construction of a washing and knitting mill as early as December. 
In Qingdao, Kaitaku will convert its Kaitaku Qingdao Office, 
established in 1991, into a joint venture company to produce and 
inspect work clothing. 

   Kaitaku formed its first Chinese joint venture company in 1992 by 
investing 60 percent in Wuxi Kaitaku Fashion Co. Ltd., located in 
Wuxi, Jiangsu Province.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 19 May 94 p 35) 

   CZECH REPUBLIC:  Sakura Bank Signs Cooperation Agreement With 
Czech Banks -- Sakura Bank, one of Japan's 11 commercial banks, has 
signed cooperation agreements with the first and third largest 
commercial banks in the Czech Republic.  According to the 
agreements, the Czech banks will provide Sakura with information 
about Czech industry, while Sakura will introduce Japanese companies 
considering business operations in the Czech Republic to both banks. 
Sakura will also provide the Czech banks with information on the 
economies of Asian countries.  This is the first time a Japanese 
bank has concluded a cooperation agreement with a bank in the Czech 
Republic.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 2O May 94 p 7) 

   INDONESIA:  FEATURE:  Kanebo, Toyobo Building Textile, Garment 
Plants -- SUMMARY:  Kanebo and Toyobo, two of Japan's largest 
textile companies, are building production facilities in Indonesia. 
Kanebo is investing in a large cotton spinning and weaving mill as 
part of its plan to shift all of its cotton textile production to 
Indonesia and China.  Toyobo is, for the first time, investing in an 
overseas garment production plant to strengthen its "end product" 
business. 

   Kanebo, together with its subsidiary, Kanebo Cotton Yarn (KCY), 
are in the process of shifting domestic production of cotton and 
mixed cotton yarn and cloth to Indonesia and China as part of the 
Kanebo Group's restructuring plan, according to the 27 April NIKKEI 
SANGYO SHIMBUN.  The 27 April NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN noted that the 
closure of three KCY spinning and weaving mills in Japan last fall 
left the firm with 106,000 "surplus" spindles, of which 82,000 will 
be shipped to production sites in China and Indonesia.  The 
remaining 24,000 spindles will be eliminated.  Continued losses in 
Kanebo's textile operations lie behind its decision to move cotton 
textile production overseas, according to the 27 April NIHON KEIZAI 
SHIMBUN.  Kanebo's total investment in its Indonesian operations 
will be 4 billion yen ($39 million), NIKKEI SANGYO reported. 

   Indonesian Mill To Ship Cotton Fabric Back to Japan -- "PT Kanebo 
Indonesia Textile Mills," the company's new production facility, is 
being built in Java in the Cikampek City bonded processing zone, 
according to the NIKKEI SANGYO article.  Investment in the project, 
which will begin operations in January 1995, will be $18 million, of 
which Kanebo will contribute 18.23 percent and KCY the remainder. 
The 27 April NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN reported that the president of the 
new company will be a KCY managing director.  NIKKEI SANGYO reported 
that production equipment from two domestic KCY mills closed last 
autumn--its Nagano spinning mill and Saidaiji weaving mill--will be 
shipped to the new Indonesian mill.  The NIKKAN KOGYO article 
specified that 30,000 spindles and 144 weaving machines will be 
shipped to Indonesia from the two closed mills.  The Indonesian 
mill, which will employ 600 people, will spin 2,250 tons of cotton 
and mixed cotton yarn and will produce 10.75 million meters of 
fabric annually, generating yearly sales of 2.5 billion yen ($23.8 
million). 

   When the new mill is completed, all cotton cloth produced will be 
exported to Kanebo's Nagahama dyeing mill in Shiga Prefecture for 
dyeing and final processing, according to NIKKEI SANGYO.  The 
finished fabric, 60 percent of which will be dress shirt cloth, will 
be "reexported" to garment companies in Asia and also sold 
domestically. 

   Joint Venture With Shanghai Cotton Factory -- Kanebo and KCY have 
formed a joint venture company with the Shanghai No. 15 Cotton 
Spinning and Weaving Factory to produce high-quality cotton yarn and 
fabric, according to the 15 April NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN.  The new 
company, "Shanghai Huazhong Spinning and Weaving Ltd.," will be 
established in May with Kanebo and KCY contributing 50 percent and 
the Shanghai company SO percent of the 1.4 billion yen ($13.5 
million) in initial capital. 

   Production equipment will be transferred from KCY's Matsuzaka 
mill in Mie Prefecture--which was closed last year--and from other 
KCY facilities.  The joint venture plant will begin operating in 
July, producing high-quality medium and fine-grade combed cotton 
yarn and dyed yarn at an annual rate of 3,8OO tons of yarn and 1.4 
million meters of woven cloth. 

   Toyobo To Build Joint Venture Clothing Plant in Bandung -- 
Toyobo, Japan's leading textile company, together with two 
subsidiaries and an Indonesian garment company, will build a joint 
venture clothing plant in Bandung, Indonesia, according to the 27 
April NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN.  This is the first overseas clothing 
plant Toyobo has invested in, and it will help the company 
strengthen its "end processing business." 

   The new company, "STG Garment," will be capitalized at $2.5 
million, with Toyobo contributing 30 percent; two of its 
subsidiaries, Shinko Sangyo and Eikogyo, 45 and 5 percent, 
respectively; and Gistex, a Bandung weaving and sewing company, 20 
percent.  Total investment will reach $8 million.  The president of 
the joint venture will be a Shinko Sangyo executive.  The plant will 
make medium-quality white shirts, polo shirts, and jogging suits for 
export to Europe, the United States, and Japan.  The plant, which 
will begin operating at yearend, will employ 550 people and will 
have 265 sewing machines.  All fabric and other materials will be 
produced in Indonesia.  The 27 April NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN added that 
the cotton fabric supplied to the new company will come from 
Toyobo's Indonesian cotton spinning and weaving mill and that the 
new company will turn out 1.2 million garments annually. 

   KAZAKHSTAN:  Mitsubishi Negotiating Oil Pipeline Feasibility 
Study -- Mitsubishi Corp., Japan's largest trading company, is 
negotiating a contract with the Kazakhstan Government concerning a 
feasibility study for the construction of a 1,200 km oil pipeline. 
Mitsubishi expects to receive the contract in early summer.  The 
pipeline, which would cost between $600 million and $1 billion, 
would connect the Tengiz oilfield with refineries in Chimkent, in 
south-central Kazakhstan, and Almaty, the capital.  A pipeline 
already connects refineries in Pavlodar, in northeast Kazakhstan, 
and Chimkent.  (Sendai KAHOKU SHIMPO 5 May 94 p 9) 

   UZBEKISTAN:  Banks Sign Cooperation Agreements With Uzbek 
National Bank -- Sakura Bank, one of Japan's leading commercial 
banks, and Bank of Tokyo, a commercial bank specializing in foreign 
exchange, have signed separate cooperation agreements with the 
National Bank for Foreign Economic Activity of Uzbekistan, according 
to the 19 May NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN.  The two agreements will 
facilitate exchanges of information to promote Japanese investment 
in Uzbekistan.  Sakura and the Bank of Tokyo will introduce Japanese 
trading companies planning to expand into Uzbekistan to the National 
Bank, which in turn will introduce them to potential Uzbek business 
partners. 

   The Uzbek National Bank for Foreign Economic Activity oversees 
all of Uzbekistan's international financial activities as well as 
financing for domestic industrial development, according to the 14 
May ASAHI SHIMBUN.  Currently, Yusuke Matsuzaki, formerly the 
president of a Japanese financial subsidiary in London, serves as a 
senior advisor to the National Bank and is assisting it in locating 
overseas business partners for small to medium sized Uzbek 
businesses. 

   VIETNAM:  Electronics Parts Firm To Triple Production of Coils -- 
Sumida Electric Co., a manufacturer of parts for electronic products 
and communications equipment, plans to triple the number of coils 
used in electronic parts that are manufactured in Vietnam through 
consigned production.  Sumida's coil production in Vietnam will be 
expanded from last year's level of 20 million to 60 million in FY94. 
Last summer Sumida began the consigned production of coils used in 
electronic circuits with a state-owned television plant in Ho Chi 
Minh City, using equipment transferred from a Sumida plant in the 
Philippines.  Sumida wants to increase the ratio of locally procured 
materials, which is now in the 70 percent range, to the 80 percent 
level through cost reductions.  The coils have been shipped to 
audiovisual and communications equipment manufacturers in Europe, 
the United States, and Japan.  Sumida plans to market its expanded 
coil output to "Japanese electronic parts companies operating in 
Europe, the United States, and Asia." 

   Sumida is planning to develop a "strong production base" in 
Vietnam because with the appreciation of the yen, the cost advantage 
of consigned production in Vietnam and China has increased. 
According to Sumida President Shigeyuki Yawata, "production costs 
are roughly the same as in China," although transportation costs are 
higher in Vietnam.  The company will decide by the end of FY94 
whether it will develop its production base by supplying additional 
equipment to the Ho Chi Minh City manufacturer or whether it will 
build its own production plant.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 13 May 
94 p 9) 

   Machine Tools/Robotics - March Machine Tool Orders Declined 6.1 
Percent -- According to statistics compiled by the Japan Machine 
Tool Builders' Association, machine tool orders for March 1994 
declined 6.1 percent compared to March 1993 to 50.92 billion yen 
($484.95 million).  This is the first time in three years that the 
year-on-year decline has been in single digits, it is also the first 
time in 1994 that orders have reached the 50 billion yen level. 

   Domestic orders came to 30.15 billion yen ($287.1 million), down 
16.8 percent from last year, but were up 35.3 percent from February. 
By sector, orders from the automobile industry were about the same 
as last year, electrical machinery industry orders were up over 30 
percent, but orders from the general purpose machinery industry fell 
36.3 percent.  Exports increased 15.6 percent from last year to 
20.78 billion yen ($197.84 million).  Within the industry the 
prevalent view is that "the bottom of the slump occurred between 
October and December last year," but "while inquiries have 
increased, orders have not."  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 12 May 94 
p 13) 

   Semiconductors/Computers/Electronics - NEC To Establish Research 
Center in Germany -- NEC Corp. announced on 19 May that it will 
establish a science and technology research center in Germany, the 
company's first in Europe and its third overseas.  "C&amp;C Research 
Laboratories NEC Europe" will be inaugurated in July as a division 
of NEC Europe at a cost of about 100 million yen ($955,000) for its 
first fiscal year.  The center will be located in the technopark of 
the German Society for Mathematics and Data Processing (GMD) outside 
of Bonn.  Initially, it will employ six researchers, but that number 
will increase to about 20 in the near future. 

   The center will concentrate on research in parallel processing 
algorithms, technological simulations centering on numerical 
processing, and multimedia communications.  In addition, the center 
will have an NEC Cenju-3 massively parallel processing supercomputer 
and will conduct joint research on parallel processing with the GMD. 

   NEC hopes its German center will help the company "enrich" its 
European-based research and development.  The company already has 
research exchange relationships with a number of European 
institutes, including the Swiss National Supercomputer Center, the 
German Aerospace Research Institute, and the French National Data 
Processing and Automation Research Institute in the fields of 
supercomputing, next-generation communications, and artificial 
intelligence.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 20 May 94 p 7) 

   CHINA:  Domestic Developments - FEATURE:  Approaches To 
Transforming State Enterprises Outlined -- SUMMARY:  Recent press 
reports suggest that the government is urging all localities to 
follow the principle of "one plant, one policy" in searching for 
appropriate individual solutions in making China's medium- and 
large-sized state enterprises competitive in the free market within 
three to five years.  Localities are also looking for ways to make 
smaller state-owned enterprises more competitive. 

   According to the 16 March issue of Beijing XIAOFEI SHIBAO, the 
Deputy Director of the State Economic and Trade Commission, Chen 
Qingtai, recently stated that China's 1300 large- and medium-sized 
state enterprises will all be gradually forced into market 
competition within three to five years, with only the fittest 
expected to survive.  In endorsing the guideline of "one plant, one 
policy," Chen noted that, although enterprises gained more autonomy 
since being granted 14 decisionmaking powers, some enterprises still 
require financial and technical infusions while others need to be 
shut down, merged, leased out, auctioned off, or declared bankrupt. 
All localities must formulate their own specific plans to solve 
their problems.  However, final approval on important changes, such 
as the sale of an entire plant, property right transfers, joint 
ventures, and shareholding conversions must be obtained from the 
relevant departments. 

   The 16 March issue of Beijing XIAOFEI SHIBAO gave an example of 
an  approach to transforming state enterprises. In Jiangsu Province, 
an international tender was offered for the contracting of a group 
of large- and medium-sized money-losing state enterprises in 
Nanjing.  Under the tender, foreign contractors will be responsible 
for paying wages, operating expenses, and state and profits taxes, 
and would be required to meet production quotas and to introduce 
advanced management and operational methods.  In return, they will 
be granted full autonomy in production, sales, personnel, finance, 
and materials.  Three Nanjing enterprises with assets valued between 
40 to 100 million yuan have already been contracted by Thai and Hong 
Kong consortia. 

   The 24 March issue of Chongqing GAIGE SHIBAO reported that the 
Shunqing District of Nanchong, Sichuan formulated a plan to 
implement enterprise reform at the end of 1993.  Many Shunqing state 
enterprises are to be transformed into limited companies or 
shareholding cooperatives.  The techniques of contracting out and 
leasing out will also be employed.  Department cadres have been sent 
down to train personnel and assist in actual implementation.  Seven 
out of the 10 selected enterprises have already completed the asset 
evaluation process, and there is a good chance that the target of 
transforming 60 percent of local state enterprises into shareholding 
companies this year will be attained. 

   According to the 14 April issue of Beijing JINGJI CANKAO BAO, the 
municipal government of Fuzhou, Fujian has made impressive progress 
since the second half of 1992.  So far, twenty-eight enterprises 
have been "grafted" to foreign investors either through the 
introduction of joint operations or the transfer of property rights. 
Thirty-eight enterprises have been merged and sixteen enterprises 
have reversed their losses by wholly or partly engaging in "state- 
owned, privately-operated" practices. 

   The 13 April issue of HEBEI RIBAO reports that the "one plant, 
one policy" is also being adopted by Baoding, Hebei to reverse 
enterprise losses.  Because the situation in each plant is 
different, the mayor and party secretary personally led a group of 
experienced cadres to each plant to study and formulate solutions. 
As a result, some plants were divided into smaller ones, some were 
converted into shareholding companies, and some were contracted out. 
Other plants were merged, entered into joint ventures, or had their 
ineffective leaders replaced.  The 11 and 25 April issues of the 
PRC-owned Hong Kong magazine CHING CHI TAO PAO [ECONOMIC REPORTER] 
reported on 21 plants in Baoding that welcome foreign participation. 
Foreigners may choose to invest in capital, technology, marketing, 
or management and will be granted shares. 

   The Shanghai municipal government is using another approach in 
reforming smaller state-owned enterprises.  In a concerted effort to 
more rapidly develop the private sector and to identify new ways to 
reform small state-owned enterprises, the government is for the 
first time this year allowing workers and individuals to buy up 
certain small state, or collective-owned enterprises, according to 
the 16 March issue of Beijing ZHONGGUO FANGZHI BAO.  The city's goal 
for 1994 is to increase the number of private enterprises and 
increase their scale to above that of the average national level. 
Currently, relevant departments are moving quickly to formulate 
regulations on the development of individual and private 
enterprises.  With a few exceptions, all proposals to establish 
individual and private enterprises that meet the state criteria will 
be approved.  The state also encourages individuals with sufficient 
funds to lease out or contract out small state-owned and collective 
enterprises or convert them into shareholding companies.  The local 
government further allows individuals to buy these small "state or 
collective" enterprises and transform them into "private" 
enterprises. 

   According to the 15 April issue of Shanghai WEN HUI BAO, some 202 
workers in a small Shanghai lamp factory paid one million yuan to 
buy their factory.  The paper notes that this is the first time in 
Shanghai's history that a small state-owned enterprise has been 
totally transformed into a privately-owned and privately-run 
shareholding company.  The sale actually benefits both the state and 
the factory, according to the paper.  The state is able to preserve 
the value of state assets and convert stagnant assets into funds 
needed for key construction projects.  Meanwhile, the enterprise is 
enlivened because it now enjoys full autonomy and is free from 
problems associated with being part of the "big rice bowl."  It also 
benefits from clearly defined property rights, a more flexible 
operating mechanism, and a direct relationship between workers and 
profits. 

   Fujian Suspends Unqualified Projects in Development Zones -- 
Fujian Province has suspended 20 unqualified development area 
projects and has recovered 102 square km of land.  The province now 
has 116 plots of land designated as development areas, in which 
there are a total of 1,077 foreign-invested projects, of which 478 
have begun operation or will soon do so.  When all foreign-invested 
projects have been completed, an estimated $1O billion in foreign 
funds will have been introduced.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE O945 
GMT 14 May 94) 

   Guangdong Overfulfills Quota for Selling Treasury Bonds -- 
Guangdong Province has fulfilled ahead of schedule the 1994 quota 
set by the central authorities for selling two-year state treasury 
bonds.  A total of RMB 1.2 billion worth of two-year state treasury 
bonds had been sold throughout the province as of 21 May.  This 
achievement has been possible because the financial, banking, 
propaganda, and other relevant departments have closely cooperated 
with one another, party and government leaders at all levels have 
personally taken the lead in buying state treasury bonds, and the 
cadres and people have responded to the government's call to buy 
state treasury bonds.  (Guangzhou Guangdong People's Radio Network 
1000 GMT 21 May 94 

   Guangdong Suspends Approval of Land Sales for Luxury Projects -- 
Guangdong's State Land Department recently issued a circular 
ordering authorities at all levels to stop providing land for 
building luxury offices, housing, villas, and tourist attractions. 
Foreign-funded real estate projects and low-income housing projects 
will not be affected.  The department pointed out that since the 
state strengthened macroeconomic control, a great deal of land 
allocated for housing construction has been left idle due to a lack 
of funds over the last two years.  It has been reported that housing 
completed throughout the province in the first three months of this 
year is only valued at RMB 9.86 billion, as compared with the 1993 
figure of RMB 53 billion.  (Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO 13 May 94 p 5) 

   Statistics Show Gap in Staff Wages in Shenzhen -- According to a 
report by the Shenzhen Municipal Statistical Bureau of Guangdong 
Province, the uneven development of enterprises in Shenzhen has 
meant that one can find huge wage differences among staff and 
workers.  Among enterprises in the city, the highest per capita 
monthly salary earned by staff and workers is RMB 3,038, while the 
lowest is only RMB 251, lower than the minimum wage level of RMB 285 
set by the municipal labor department.  A total of 54.9 percent of 
Shenzhen's enterprises pay their workers less than the average 
monthly wage level in the city, while 1.9 percent pay their workers 
above the minimum level.  According to wage statistics from 3,561 
independent accounting units in the city, the annual per capita wage 
of staff and workers last year was RMB 8,145 and the monthly per 
capita wage was RMB 679, up 14.3 percent over the year before, after 
taking inflation into account.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 1369 
GMT 20 May 94) 

   Fiber-Optic Cable To Link Hangzhou, Fuzhou, Nanchang -- China's 
longest fiber-optic cable will be laid in East China to ease the 
telecommunications problems there.  The cable will be more than 
4,000 km long and will link Hangzhou in Zhejiang Province, Fuzhou in 
Fujian Province, and Nanchang in Jiangxi Province.  It will cost 
$161 million.  Though the specific figures have not been decided, 
some of the financing will be supplied by the World Bank in the form 
of loans for importing sophisticated equipment.  The Zhejiang 
portion will be 423 km long and will cost $9.6 million.  Foreign 
financing will cover $1.84 million.  The project is scheduled to 
start in October and be completed by the end of next year.  (Beijing 
CHINA DAILY (BUSINESS WEEKLY) 15-21 May 94 p 4) 

   Computer Software Sales Reach RMB 4 Million -- The annual value 
of computer software sales has reached RMB 4 million.  There are 
currently 2,000 enterprises specializing in software technological 
development and production, and more than 800,000 professionals are 
involved in software development.  The China Software Corporation, 
the biggest company in this sector, earns more than RMB 100 million 
annually from its software sales.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 1321 
GMT 18 May 94) 

   Sichuan Becomes Largest Natural Gas Producing Province -- Sichuan 
has become the largest natural gas producing province in China.  The 
province produced 7 billion cubic meters of natural gas last year 
and is predicted to turn out 7.3 billion cubic meters this year, 
accounting for almost half of the total volume in the country. 
Sichuan's gas reserves have been estimated at between 7,000 and 
8,000 billion cubic meters, or 60 percent of the country's total. 
(Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 1114 GMT 23 May 94) 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - Border Trade Slows Between 
Heilongjiang's Harbin City and Russia -- Yang Yidian, director of 
Heilongjiang's Harbin City Foreign Investment Management Bureau, 
told reporters in Hong Kong on 23 May that Harbin's border trade 
with Russia has stagnated and has been on the decline this year. 
Harbin's overall trade was $44O million last year, of which its 
trade with Russia accounted for approximately 33 percent.  Since 
Russia canceled visa exemptions  for Chinese citizens on 15 January 
this year, border trade has dropped significantly.  Yang Yidian 
expects a 10-20 percent increase in the city's overall foreign trade 
for this year, but forecast a 20-30 percent drop in its border trade 
with Russia.  (Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE 1333 GMT 23 May 94) 

   Shandong Province Encourages Foreign Investment in Agriculture -- 
Shandong Province recently introduced measures to encourage foreign 
businessmen to invest in the development of the agricultural sector. 
Foreign businessmen will be encouraged to invest their money to 
transform low- and medium-yield farmlands, to build and improve the 
agricultural infrastructure, and to vigorously develop agricultural 
projects earning foreign exchange.  Businessmen will also be 
encouraged to use foreign funds to import new varieties and 
technology, to develop special, rare, and high-quality products, and 
to improve the technology used in processing, preserving, and 
storing farm and poultry products.  A preferential tariff policy 
will accomodate the import of equipment and other materials needed 
to develop agriculture and earn foreign exchange.  When a foreign 
firm invests $10 million in the development of barren hills and 
lands, a preferential tax policy will be granted according to state 
regulations.  The province will allocate 3 million mu of shallows 
for the utilization of foreign capital to expedite the development 
of aquatic products.  When a foreign firm invests in a saltwater 
breeding project, it will be allowed to process, store, and 
transport produce of the same type and will be given preferential 
tax treatment according to the relevant state regulations.  (Hong 
Kong LIEN HO PAO 12 May 94 p 21) 

   Japanese Investment in Shandong Shows Sharp Increase -- Over the 
past year, Shandong Province has become a key economic and trading 
partner of Japan.  The value of import and export trade with Japan 
in 1993 reached $1.949 billion, an increase of 32.85 percent over 
1992 and accounting for 26.3 percent of the province's total import 
and export value. At the end of 1993, the province had 730 projects 
involving $1.82 billion in Japanese investment.  Some 55 projects, 
involving $1.22 billion, were developed with Japanese government 
loans and 675 projects received direct investment by Japanese 
businessmen.  (Jinan Shandong Radio 2300 GMT 11 May 94) 

   Shandong Signs Cooperation Agreement With ROK Province -- An 
economic team from the ROK's South Kyongsang Province signed a 
cooperation agreement with Shandong's Weihai city to set up an 
industrial park in the Weihai Economic and Technological Development 
Zone.  This park will primarily seek to attract pollution-free, 
high-technology industries cable of earning foreign exchange.  The 
park is designed to occupy a total area of 1.6 square km.  The land- 
use period is contracted at SO years.  (Jinan Shandong Radio 2300 
GMT 18 May 94) 

   Shandong Reports 150 New Joint-Venture Projects With Singapore -- 
Over the past few years, Shandong Province has achieved rapid 
development in economic and trade cooperation with Singapore.  In 
1993 alone, it built 150 new joint-venture projects with Singapore, 
involving foreign capital of $390 million, showing an increase of 
nearly 200 percent over the sum of the previous seven years.  During 
the first quarter of 1994, Singapore invested $1OO million in 
Shandong.  (Jinan Shandong Radio 2300 GMt 14 May 94) 

   Sino-Singaporean Industrial Park To Be Built in Shandong's 
Qingdao -- Singapore's Megaway Group and the Qingdao Economic 
Development Company signed an agreement on 15 May to construct a 
$100 million industrial park in Qingdao's economic development zone 
in Shandong Province.  The park will cover 5 square km along the 
Qingdao bonded zone.  It will import advanced equipment, technology, 
and management systems from Singapore.  The infrastructure of the 
park will cost approximately $100 million.  The first phase of the 
construction, which will cover an area of one square km, will be 
completed in one year.  It is expected that the overall construction 
will be completed in three years.  The Asian Industrial Park 
Development Company was established to supervise the park's 
construction.  (Beijing CHINA DAILY 17 May 94 p 2) 

   Agricultural Bank, Australian Firm Set Up Joint Consulting 
Venture -- The Agricultural Bank of China and the Australian firm 
Hassal &amp; Associates signed an agreement on 18 May to set up a 
consulting and financing joint venture, the Jinhai International 
Business Development and Consulting Company, in Beijing.  The bank's 
Trust and Investment Corporation and the Jinqiao Financial 
Consulting Company will provide 50 percent of the investment. 
According to bank officials, the new venture will offer many small 
Australian companies business opportunities in China.  (Beijing 
CHINA DAILY 19 May 94 p 2) 

   Australia, Guangdong's Zhuhai Cooperate in Building Glass Wool 
Plant -- Zhuhai City's Aquatic Products Supply and Marketing General 
Company and Australia's CSR Investment (Asia) Company Ltd. signed a 
contract in Zhuhai on 17 May to establish the CSR Guangdong (Zhuhai) 
Glass Wool Products Company Ltd., a joint venture which will be 
located in the town of Baiqiao in Doumen County.  The Chinese side 
will supply 40 percent of the investment in the form of land, and 
the Australian side will provide the funds for the remaining 60 
percent.  The $45-million plant, which will use modern equipment, is 
expected to go into operation by the end of 1995, with a production 
capacity of 12,000 tons of glass wool products annually.  When 
completed, the plant will be the largest glass wool products 
producer in China.  (Hong Kong WEN WEI PO 18 May 94 p A6) 

   Philippine Aluminum Group Sets Up Company in Fujian's Xiamen -- 
The International Aluminum (Hong Kong) Limited Company, a subsidiary 
of the Philippines Aluminum Group International Limited Company, 
recently set up the wholly-owned International Aluminum (Xiamen) 
Limited Company in Xiamen, Fujian Province.  The company will build 
a factory in the Xinglin Investment Area for Taiwan businessmen. 
The factory will have a total area of 30,000 square meters, require 
an investment of $8 million, and go into operation in late 1995, 
producing 9,000 tons of various types of aluminum products per year 
for markets in Southeast Asia, Hong Kong, and Macao.  (Beijing 
ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 1024 GMT 21 May 94) 
   Beijing Contracts Construction Projects, Labor Service Abroad -- 
Beijing Municipality has made big strides in undertaking contracted 
projects abroad.  In 1993, it signed contracts worth $500 million, 
concluded business amounting to $150 million, and sent 3,000 
laborers abroad, showing an increase of 28 percent, 36.3 percent, 
and 50 percent respectively over 1992.  In addition to undertaking 
contract projects and labor service in Malaysia, Japan, Hong Kong, 
Singapore, Indonesia, the CIS, the United States, Macao, Thailand, 
Tunisia, and Botswana, Beijing has also developed new business 
partners in the  United Arab Emirates, South Africa, Pakistan, and 
Gabon.  (Beijing BEIJING RIBAO 10 May 94 p 1) 

   Jilin First Quarter Results in Attracting Foreign-Funded 
Enterprises -- As of the first quarter of 1994, Jilin Province had 
registered 2,522 foreign-funded enterprises and introduced $2.76 
billion of foreign investments.  At present, Jilin has 12 joint- 
venture enterprises each with an investment of more than $10 million 
and 31 foreign-funded enterprises each with an investment ranging 
from $5 million to $10 million.  Jilin Petrochemical Company. Ltd., 
a joint-venture enterprise run by the Jilin Chemical Industrial 
Company and the Hong Kong Lianghe Petrochemical Company, Ltd., began 
operation on 28 April.  The company has a total investment of 1.42 
billion Renminbi.  The annual production quota is 35,000 tons of 
acrylic acid, 40,000 tons of epoxy ethane, and 60,000 tons of 
alcoholic ether.  (Changchun JILIN RIBAO 8 May 94 p 1) 

   Hebei Signs Letter of Intent With Brazil -- Hebei Province signed 
a letter of intent on five economic and trade projects with the 
Goias State of Brazil on 16 May.  These projects include the 
establishment of a joint-venture tractor repairing plant in Brazil, 
economic and trade cooperation between Hebei Pharmaceutical Plant 
and a firm in Brazil, the joint processing of textile products in 
Shijiazhuang No.2 Cotton Textile Plant, the establishment of an 
agent in Brazil to promote sales of products from Shijiazhuang Silk 
Plant, and the processing of jeans with supplied materials at Shirun 
Textile Company, Ltd.  (Shijiazhuang HEBEI RIBAO 17 May 94 p 1) 

   CITIC Hong Kong Expands Golf Course in Conghua City -- Despite 
the central government's reported ban on the development of new golf 
courses, CITIC Hong Kong has signed a contract with Guangdong's 
Conghua City to expand a golf course and spa resort there.  The 
project involves an investment of 1 billion yuan.  The Chinese side 
is providing the land and the Hong Kong side is providing the 
capital.  CITIC Hong Kong will have operating rights for 50 years. 
Club members come mainly from Hong Kong, Japan, South Korea, as well 
as from mainland China.  (Hong Kong MING PAO 12 May 94 p B3) 

   New World Group Largest Overseas Investor in Wuhan -- In the last 
two years, Hong Kong's New World Group has invested over 2.3 billion 
yuan in Wuhan to construct an airport, a 17-km airport expressway, 
the Wuhan Chang Jiang Road bridge, mass housing projects, and to 
manage hotels,  transform old industries, and develop real estate 
development. The group has  become the largest foreign investor in 
the city.  New World is the majority shareholder in Wuhan's new 
Tianhe Airport, China's first joint-venture airport, which will 
begin operations next month.  (Hong Kong MING PAO 23 May 94 p B2) 

   Bank of China Hong Kong Invests $470 Million in Shandong -- While 
attending a symposium on new investment trends in Shandong, Huang 
Diyan, director of the Bank of China (BOC) Hong Kong and Macao 
Management Office, said that the BOC Group has invested $470 million 
to finance 200 projects in Shandong in such areas as the energy 
industry, communications, manufacturing, water projects, the 
construction of economic development zones, housing, and tourism. 
(Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO 21 May 94 p 17) 

   Hong Kong Bank Leading Foreign Lender to China -- John Gray, 
chairman of the Hong Kong and Shanghai Banking Corporation (HSBC), 
says that HSBC lending on the Chinese mainland ranks first among 
foreign banks.  At present, HSBC has five branches and four offices 
in China.  It hopes to open more branches in mainland cities and to 
develop its securities and credit card businesses while focusing on 
corporate lending and short-term trade  financing.  Gray said that 
HSBC is ready to help overseas investors do business in China. 
(Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 1204 GMT 17 May 94) 

   CITIC Pacific To Expand Investment in Mainland Power Projects -- 
Hong Kong-listed, mainland-funded CITIC Pacific will expand its 
involvement in energy projects in China in spite of mixed signals 
from Beijing on the rate of return allowed for power projects. 
Larry Yung Chi-kin, chairman of CITIC Pacific, said that electricity 
capacity was desperately needed by China and that the 15 percent cap 
on investment returns was too low.  Yung said that power projects in 
which CITIC Pacific was involved in China had a return of more than 
15 percent.  The group operates power stations in Ligang, Jiangsu, 
and Xinli, Henan, in addition to holding a 25 percent share of a 
power station in Shanghai's Pudong New District.  Mr. Yung also said 
that CITIC Pacific's parent company, CITIC Hong Kong, was 
considering  plans to enter the oil refining business, with 
potential projects in Shandong and the Pearl River Delta.  (Hong 
Kong SOUTH CHINA MORNING (BUSINESS) POST 24 May 94 p 2) 

   Foreign Firms Consider Relocation in Face of Rising Hong Kong 
Costs -- Multinational companies are seriously considering moving 
all but their essential China-related business out of Hong Kong to 
escape soaring commercial and residential rents and rising staff 
costs, according to Mark Bernard, a director of Chesterton Petty 
realtors.   Mr. Bernard said the business community was at "the end 
of its tether" and Chesterton Petty was receiving 40 calls a month 
from corporations moving to Singapore or other regional centers, 
where  rents were at least 50 percent cheaper than Hong Kong.  In 
contrast, six months ago the number of firms seeking to move was one 
or two, he added.  (Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST (PROPERTY 
POST) 18 May 94 p 4) 

   Hong Kong Inflation Falls to 7.7 Percent in April -- Government 
statistics show that slower increases in food prices brought 
inflation down to 7.7 percent in April for an average of 7.4 percent 
for the first four months of the year.  However, concerns persist 
that a tight labor market and limited land supply will continue to 
fuel inflation for the rest of the year.  Anthony Chan, regional 
economist at MeesPierson Securities, said that he did not expect 
inflation to show a significant decrease because "asset  price- 
inflation has an impact on various components of the Consumer Price 
Index" and the tight labor market showed that the economy was close 
to full capacity.  (Hong Kong EASTERN EXPRESS 24 May 94 p 26) 

   Haikou Bonded Area Introduces Preferential Investment Policies -- 
The Haikou bonded area in Hainan has recently introduced six 
preferential policies to encourage investment.  1. Chinese and 
foreign businessmen will be able to invest freely in the bonded area 
and launch construction projects where they have obtained land-use 
rights.  They are also allowed to offer real estate projects in the 
bonded area to other businessmen for investment and to transfer, 
lease, or mortgage their real estate.  2.  Enterprises in the bonded 
area do not have to obtain import-export licenses for their goods 
unless otherwise specified.  Products whose raw materials come from 
other areas and whose value has increased by over 20 percent through 
processing in the bonded area can be exported as the bonded area's 
products. 3.  Building materials, production and management 
equipment, fuel used in production, and a reasonable amount of 
communication equipment imported by enterprises for their own use in 
the bonded area are exempt from customs duty.  4.  Enterprises in 
the bonded area are allowed to engage in foreign trade.  5. 
Insurance and financial firms in the bonded area are allowed to deal 
in foreign exchange and settle their accounts in foreign currencies. 
6.  Businessmen in the bonded area are allowed to come and go 
freely.  (Hong Kong WEN WEI PO 12 May 94 p C3) 

   Fuzhou State-Owned Firms Receive Foreign Capital -- According to 
Fuzhou Vice Mayor Sun Haishan, 53 percent of the city's state-owned 
enterprises receive foreign financing.  The introduction of foreign 
capital is one of the four methods the city is using to reform its 
state-owned enterprise system.  Last year, 28 enterprises signed 
contracts to jointly operate 30 projects requiring a total 
investment of $82 million, of which $25 million was to be 
contributed by foreign partners.  After receiving foreign financing, 
most state-owned enterprises achieved marked improvements.  One 
large state-owned light industrial enterprise, which suffered a 
total loss of RMB 170 million over the last 10 years of operation, 
made a profit of over RMB 1 million in the year in which it received 
foreign capital.  (Hong Kong WEN WEI PO 18 May 94 p B16) 

   Taiwan:  Trade Deficit With Japan Expected To Hit $15 Billion for 
1994 -- Taiwan's trade deficit with Japan has continued to worsen 
and is expected to hit $15 billion this year, according to the Board 
of Foreign Trade.  The boards believes Taiwan's dependence on 
Japanese-produced key component parts prolongs the trade imbalance 
problem.  Last year, the value of Taiwan's imports from Japan 
increased by 6.53 percent from the previous year and accounted for 
30.08 percent of the country's total import value.  (Taipei CHING- 
CHI JIH-PAO 17 May p 13) 

   Some Restrictions on Investment in PRC To Be Lifted --  The 
Industrial Bureau under the Ministry of Economic Affairs has worked 
out a plan to open 633 areas for investment in the PRC.  The 633 
areas include textile products, machinery, farming machinery, 
information products, and automobile and locomotive parts.  In 
addition, Taiwan also plans to permit imports of 60 semi finished 
products, including raw materials and medicine, from the PRC. 
(Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 6 May 94 p 2) 

   Indirect Investment in PRC Continues in First Quarter -- 
According to the Investment Examination Commission under the 
Ministry of Economic Affairs, in the first three months of 1994, the 
government approved 314 indirect investment projects in the PRC by 
Taiwan enterprises, with a total investment amounting to $246 
million.  Since the government lifted the ban on indirect investment 
in the PRC five years ago, some 10,144 projects have been approved, 
with a total investment of $3.836 billion.  The main areas in which 
Taiwan enterprises invest are electronic and electrical products, 
plastic products, food and beverages, precision tools and machinery, 
and basic metal products.  Shanghai remains Taiwan businessmen's 
first choice for investment, followed by Dongwan and Shenzhen in 
Guangdong Province, Tianjin, and Xiamen.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 
8 May 94 p 2) 

   Meeting on Economic Ties With Italy Held in Taipei -- The Sino- 
Italian Joint Committee of Industry and Commerce held its first 
meeting in Taipei on 10 May.  The Taiwan delegation told the Italian 
delegation about Taiwan's policy to turn Taiwan into the operation 
center of the Asia-Pacific region.  The Italian delegation expressed 
the Italian Government's wish to sign an investment protection 
agreement, an agreement on avoidance of dual taxation, and an 
agreement on protection of intellectual property rights with Taiwan. 
The meeting may bring about a breakthrough in Taiwan-Italian 
economic and trade relations.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 11 May 94 p 
9) 
   Registered Investments, Machinery Imports Down in First Quarter 
-- The Council for Economic Planning and Development [CEPD] on 11 
May announced that in the first quarter of this year, the amount of 
investment registered by newly established companies dropped 38 
percent from last year's 256.7 billion NT [New Taiwan] dollars to 
160 billion NT dollars.  Money spent on machinery imports dropped 
1.5 percent from the amount spent last year.  Last year, Taiwan's 
export growth rate was only 4.2 percent, the lowest among the four 
little dragons.  A CEPD official believes that "Taiwan's business 
investment in the PRC and the Southeast Asian region have affected 
the competitive edge of Taiwan exports."  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 
12 May 94 p 2) 

   SOUTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  Government Puts Brakes on Samsung Auto 
Venture -- SUMMARY:  The ROK government, following the 
recommendation of an economic policy think tank and its own 
guidelines on industrial specialization, has "informally" told 
Samsung to shelve its plan to build automobiles, the South Korean 
press reported.  The decision was made despite polls showing public 
support for the venture, and Samsung's conclusion of a favorable 
technology transfer agreement with a Japanese automaker. 
"Knowledgeable sources" say the setback is temporary, and that 
Samsung will be able to carry out its plan within the next few 
years. 

   Samsung's plan to manufacture automobiles was rejected by the ROK 
Government, according to press reports, ending months of speculation 
on the outcome of Samsung's controversial bid.  The government's 
decision followed a finding by the Korea Institute for Industrial 
Economics and Trade (KIET) that Samsung's entry would impact 
negatively on the domestic industry.  The government was also 
concerned over the credibility of its highly publicized industrial 
specialization policy, which limits to three the main fields in 
which a conglomerate can participate, the 1O May MAEIL KYONGJE 
SINMUN (MKS) reported. 

   Samsung's plan to enter the auto industry first surfaced in the 
ROK press on 14 June 1993, when MKS and HANGYORE SINMUN reported 
that the group was "seriously considering" going into automobile 
production, despite a promise made a year earlier to limit its 
involvement to commercial vehicles.  Both newspapers suggested that 
the move would be viewed as a "test case" of the administration's 
policy to limit the expansion of conglomerates.  At the time, 
Samsung had already chosen a factory site, was hiring personnel, and 
was seeking a foreign partner for technical cooperation, the two 
papers noted. 

   On 17 January, MKS reported that the Korea Development Institute 
(KDI), a policy advisory group with close ties to the ROK 
Government, agreed in principle with Samsung's bid to enter the 
passenger car market.  KDI had maintained that increased exports 
would compensate for any inefficiencies brought about by overlapping 
investment and further argued that the government should support the 
domestic auto industry with positive programs and not subject it to 
"unreasonable restrictions."  In its 26 April report, KIET 
acknowledged that Samsung's venture would, over the long run, result 
in greater efficiency and better technology for the ROK auto 
industry, but that the near-term effects would "shock" existing 
automakers and cause a decline in product competitiveness, the 27 
April MKS reported. 

   Specifically, KIET concluded that Samsung's involvement would 
delay the development of unique ROK models, have a negative effect 
on efforts to indigenize technology, raise costs as a result of the 
competition to hire technicians, inflate the price of auto parts, 
and waste investment capital, the newspaper reported.  MKS opined 
that KIET's report was neither a "yes" nor a "no" but rather "seemed 
to imply" Samsung should wait three to four years before 
implementing its plan. 

   Persuaded by KIET's arguments, the ROK Government exercised its 
veto by threatening to deny Samsung a technology import license 
which the Ministry of Trade, Industry, and Energy (MOTIE) issues for 
technology transfers with foreign companies.  According to the 29 
April MKS, Samsung had selected Japan's Nissan Motors for technical 
cooperation because of its willingness to transfer core technology 
which would allow Samsung to compete in the world market.  Mindful 
of MOTIE's priorities, Samsung chose Nissan over Toyota, which was 
also being considered, because the latter imposed export 
restrictions that Nissan was willing to forego.  Another factor was 
Toyota's earlier abrogation of a technology transfer agreement with 
Daewoo for a more lucrative venture in China, which made a lasting 
impression on South Korean officials, MKS noted. 

   According to the 29 April MKS, Samsung sought to lay the 
groundwork for a positive ruling by emphasizing that its agreement 
with Nissan was the "most favorable" it had ever signed with a 
foreign company.  Besides putting no restrictions on where the cars 
could be sold, Nissan authorized Samsung to make engineering changes 
and agreed to sell its best technology, including the VQ engine and 
QT suspension, while offering body and chassis designs free of 
charge.  According to MKS, Samsung planned to manufacture a 2,000cc 
"next generation" car, which Nissan is now developing, and three new 
models which would be jointly developed.  Initial production was 
planned at 50,000 units annually. 

   Notwithstanding these efforts and a Korea Gallup Poll showing 
public support for the project (11 May MKS), the ministry 
"informally" notified Samsung it would deny the transfer request if 
it were submitted, the 10 May MKS stated.  According to a "high 
MOTIE official" cited in the same paper, the government's decision 
was based on KIET's finding that Samsung's entry would harm existing 
manufacturers.  The newspaper also cited a Blue House source who 
claimed that most officials believed Samsung's plan would "destroy" 
the ROK auto industry.  The MOTIE official reportedly said his 
ministry would postpone a formal announcement to give Samsung a 
chance to back out voluntarily. 

   According to the 12 May MKS, Samsung stated it will press ahead 
despite the rejection.  The newspaper quoted a "highly placed 
source" in Samsung's secretariat (the group's executive body 
responsible for overall policy and planning) as saying that "there 
is no change at all in the group's intention to move into the 
passenger car business" and that the firm will use "all necessary 
means" to accomplish this.  The same source added that Samsung 
recognizes that its goals are not entirely consistent with the 
administration's policy on industrial specialization, but that these 
differences can be narrowed.  Samsung reportedly is watching the 
government's moves closely so as to "respond to its particular 
concerns. 

   Citing "knowledgeable sources," the 12 May MKS reported that 
Samsung will delay its technology transfer request "until things 
settle down."  Samsung planners are now marshaling arguments against 
the decision, including an assertion that "it goes against the 
principle of equity" to prohibit a domestic firm from building autos 
when foreign manufacturers are allowed to sell their cars in the 
domestic market.  According to the MOTIE official cited above, the 
government's decision, in any case, may only be "temporary." 
Another "informed source" reportedly stated "it is necessary to keep 
in mind that in 1992 when Samsung got into commercial vehicles they 
were given permission only after a year's delay." 
   The source then "implied indirectly" that Samsung would be 
producing its cars "during the present administration." 

   FEATURE:  Shipbuilders Face Japanese Competition, Foreign Trade 
Pressure -- SUMMARY:  According to recent ROK press reports, 
Japanese shipbuilders are starting a "war" for shipbuilding orders 
in order to once again become the top shipbuilding nation.  At the 
same time, Japan is launching a "counteroffensive" in international 
arenas to try to stop the expansion of ROK shipbuilding facilities. 
The ROK press has reported that South Korea is also coming under 
pressure from other advanced countries with regard to these plans. 
However, some officials connected with the ROK shipbuilding industry 
point out that many of the expansion projects are already too far 
under way to be stopped. 

   On 12 March, 21 top leaders in the South Korean and Japanese 
shipbuilding field met in Tokyo.  According to the 4 May CHUGAN 
MAEGYONG, the two sides had held 15 such meetings since 1982, 
working together and sharing information.  The meeting originally 
was to be held last fall, but was delayed due to internal discord 
among ROK shipbuilders over the issue of expanding shipbuilding 
facilities.  Meeting participants included Song Yong-su, chairman of 
the Korea Shipbuilders Association and of Hanjin Heavy Industries; 
Kim Chong-kuk, chairman of Hyundai Heavy Industries; Yun Yong-sok, 
chairman of Daewoo Shipbuilding and Heavy Machinery; Yi Hae-kyu, 
chairman of Samsung Heavy Industries, Kwon Yong-ha, executive 
director of the Korea Shipbuilders Association; and Goda Shigeru, 
chairman of the Shipbuilders Association of Japan.  CHUGAN MAEGYONG 
noted that the atmosphere at the meeting was very "chilly," and that 
no formal statement was issued at the meeting's end.  The 17 March 
HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN described the meeting as a "defensive and 
offensive battle" over ROK shipbuilders' expansion plans.  During 
the talks, the Japanese side tried to "pry" into the ROK plans, but 
offered no "encouragement," CHUGAN MAEGYONG reported.  The head of 
Japan's Namura Shipbuilding reportedly said that ROK shipbuilders 
should "give up" the shipbuilding "battle."  According to the 
journal, Japan seems "oversensitive" to South Korean plans because 
of ROK shipbuilders' growing competitiveness.  As ROK shipbuilders 
rapidly improve their technological level, the relative superiority 
of Japanese shipbuilders is "notably weakening."  CHUGAN MAEGYONG 
observed that, if South Korea does move ahead with its expansion 
plans, there will be an unavoidable "championship match" between ROK 
and Japanese shipbuilders. 

   HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN noted that Japan is responding to the 
situation by aggressively pursuing new orders abroad and reducing 
costs domestically.  CHUGAN MAEGYONG commented that Japanese 
shipbuilders are starting a "war" for shipbuilding orders in order 
to once again secure the top position.  Japan lost the title to 
South Korea in 1993, after holding it for more than 35 years.  The 
journal reported that the strong yen and high labor costs were 
factors in Japanese shipbuilders' loss of competitiveness. 

   According to HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN, labor costs account for more 
than 20 percent of the cost of a Japanese-built ship.  The daily 
reported that in 1993 Japanese-built ships were priced 10 percent 
higher than ROK-built ships.  CHUGAN MAEGYONG reported that Japanese 
shipbuilders had been "relaxed," because they expected international 
ship prices to increase this year.  However, prices have actually 
fallen.  Thus, in order to erase last year's "deficient" 
performance, Japanese builders are starting a price "offensive." 
HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN noted that Japan has been able to reduce 
production costs somewhat by rationalizing management and has 
recently won orders by offering lower prices.  The paper calculated 
that Japan received orders totalling 1.29 million gross tons in 
January alone, while ROK shipbuilders only received orders totalling 
340,000 gross tons for all of January and February. 

   In addition to cutting costs and fighting for international 
orders, CHUGAN MAEGYONG reported that Japan is launching a 
"counteroffensive," using forums such as research institutes and the 
OECD shipbuilding committee to highlight the "recklessness" of ROK 
shipbuilders' expansion plans.  For example, a report from the 
Nomura Research Institute called South Korea's boom in shipyard 
expansions "a dangerous gamble," warning that it will lead to excess 
capacity in the latter half of the 1990's.  According to the 22 
March HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN, on 21 March, the ROK Ministry of Trade, 
Investment, and Energy (MOTIE) noted that signs of trade friction 
were appearing in the shipbuilding industry, as Japan and the 
European Union opposed ROK shipbuilders' expansions.  The paper said 
that pressure from advanced nations became concentrated during the 
March meeting in Tokyo of ROK and Japanese shipbuilders, as well as 
at a shipbuilding meeting attended by South Korea, Japan, and the 
European Union, on 14 March, and at the OECD shipbuilding committee, 
held in Paris from 14 to 18 March.  According to HANGUK KYONGJE 
SINMUN, at the OECD meeting Japan and the European Union exhibited 
an "uncompromising" attitude by adopting a joint statement opposing 
the ROK expansion.  Even the United States brought up the issue in 
its statement.  The paper concluded that the expansion issue has 
become the largest issue in the international shipbuilding arena. 

   Despite the international pressure against South Korean expansion 
plans, the ROK press has noted that halting the projects would be 
difficult.  Ku Pon-yong, chief of MOTIE's shipbuilding office, 
observed that some industry representatives feel trade pressures 
might "soften" if shipbuilders "regulated themselves" regarding the 
expansion issue.  However, Ku added the expansions already have 
progressed to the point where it would be difficult to avoid 
international trade pressure.  Some industry officials agree that it 
is "too late" to entrust the issue to self-regulation.  CHUGAN 
MAEGYONG explained that expansion work at Hyundai, Samsung, and 
Halla--some of the major ROK ship builders--is already more than 50 
percent completed.  Halting the investment (which amounts to about 
400 billion won ($500 million) per company) would result in enormous 
investment losses for the companies, HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN 
calculated.  In addition, the government would have to assume an 
enormous financial burden, because it would be forced to compensate 
firms for their lost investment. 

   Growth Rate in Crude Oil Imports Slows in First Quarter -- In the 
first quarter of 1994, South Korea imported 150.1 million barrels of 
crude oil, an increase of 1.2 percent over the 148.3 million barrels 
imported in the first quarter of 1993.  This increase is much lower 
than the 10-percent increase seen in the first quarter over the past 
two to three years.  The slower growth rate comes as domestic oil 
consumption declines.  South Korea consumed 109 million barrels of 
oil in January and February, a 6.2-percent increase over the 1O3 
million barrels consumed in the same period in 1993.  By comparison, 
oil consumption in the first two months of 1993 ROK oil consumption 
rose 12.5 percent over the first two months of 1992.  Most of the 
crude oil imported in the first quarter--79.8 percent--came from the 
Middle East, while 15.7 percent came from Southeast Asia, and 4.5 
percent came from North America and Africa.  (Seoul HANGUK KYONGJE 
SINMUN 19 Apr 94 p 9) 

   Automobile Exports to Some International Markets Stalled -- 
Exports of ROK automobiles to China, Turkey, Iran, and Pakistan, 
which totalled more than 100,000 in 1993, have almost halted 
recently.  Some of this seems to be due to reinforced import 
controls in China, an economic crisis in Turkey, and foreign 
currency shortages in Iran.  Last year South Korea exported 22,100 
automobiles to China, but exports have virtually stopped after 
several hundred cars were exported at the beginning of this year. 
Hyundai Motors and Daewoo Motors did not export any cars to China in 
April, while Kia Motors only shipped 23 cars.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE 
SINMUN 21 May 94 p 9) 

   Exports to Russia Increasing -- According to the Korea Trade 
Promotion Corporation [KOTRA], ROK exports to Russia in the first 
four months of 1994 totalled $356 million, a 104.8-percent increase 
over the same period in 1993.  KOTRA expects this year's exports to 
Russia to top the $1-billion mark.  Exports of television sets, 
VCR's, refrigerators, video tapes, telephone exchanges, and refined 
petroleum have already exceeded last year's totals.  (Seoul 
KYONGHYANG SINMUN 26 May 94 p 9) 

   Exports to China Decreasing -- ROK exports to China in April 
showed a year-to-year decrease for the first time in 50 months. 
According to the Ministry of Trade, Industry, and Energy, in April 
the volume of ROK exports to China decreased by 2.3 percent compared 
to April 1993's volume of $54O million.  As of April, year-to-date 
exports to China had increased by 11.7 percent over the same period 
in 1993, much lower than the 94.1-percent increase in 1993.  Steel 
and auto exports also decreased in April.  Steel exports fell due to 
Chinese import controls and to increasing ROK demand.  Auto exports 
fell after the Chinese Government banned the import of automobiles 
through the informal channels which ROK companies had utilized. 
(Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 21 May 94 p 1) 

   Daewoo Securities, Cheil Bank To Invest in Chinese Stock -- 
Daewoo Securities and Cheil Bank, in collaboration with other 
foreign financing institutions and corporations, will invest in the 
Chinese stock market later this year.  A total of 31 institutions- 
-including some from China, Britain, Hong Kong, and Malaysia--will 
take part in the venture and invest $2OO million in the market.  The 
enterprises will meet in Beijing on 29 May to establish the CEIM 
(China Enterprise Investment Management Company) with paid-in 
capital of $25 million.  Daewoo and Cheil will have stakes of 5 
percent ($1.25 million) and 2 percent ($500,000), respectively. 
Chong In-yong, former ROK deputy prime minister and current vice 
president of the Asian Development Bank, will serve as CEIM 
chairman, while Kim Chang-hui, president of Daewoo Securities, 
serves as vice chairman.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 25 May 94 p 
18) 

   Hyundai Completes Offshore Natural Gas Facility -- On 19 May 
Hyundai Heavy Industries completed its offshore natural gas 
production platform in China's Yacheng field.  The facility cost $18 
million.  Beginning in March 1995, Hyundai plans to start building a 
$15-million facility to refine natural gas from the Yacheng area. 
(Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 20 May 94 p 11) 

   Hyundai To Build Steel Container Plant in Qingdao, China -- 
Hyundai Precision &amp; Industry will invest up to $20 million to build 

a steel container plant in Qingdao, China.  The plant, named the 
Hyundai-Qingdao Container Manufacturing Company, will have an annual 
production capacity of 40,000 20-foot equivalent units.  The plant 
will make finished products, as well as supply its own parts. 
Hyundai is collaborating on the plant with Samsung Precision 
Industry, Chinwon Industrial Company, and Taewon Machinery Industry 
Company.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 25 May 94 p 11) 

   Tongyang To Build Steel Tube Plant in Shanghai -- Tongyang Iron 
Pipe Company will build a large-caliber steel pipe plant in 
Shanghai, China.  Tongyang, which currently exports $15 million of 
the tubes to China every year, has decided to build a joint venture 
plant there.  The joint venture plant will have an annual capacity 
of 200,000 tons of large-caliber steel tubes.  Tongyang will invest 
about $50 million in the plant, which will be located in Jinshan 
District, Shanghai.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 14 May 94 p 9) 

   Daewoo To Take Over Three Sudanese Textile Corporations -- Daewoo 
Group will take over three state-run textile corporations in Sudan, 
using funds supported by the Export-Import Bank.  On 17 May, the 
Export-Import Bank approved a 5.5-percent $70-million loan, which 
will mature in eight to 1O years.  The loan will cover much of 
Daewoo's $100 million cost for the projects.  Daewoo will take over 
a cotton spinning plant, a spinning and weaving plant, and a leather 
processing plant.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 19 May 94 p 2) 

   Lucky Metal Advances Into European Market -- Lucky Metal has 
registered its gold bars at the London Bijou Metal Association 
(LBMA), opening the door to the European market for the company. 
After comprehensive testing by the LBMA, Lucky registered its brand 
for trading on the LBMA market.  Lucky Metal produced 32 tons of 
pure gold in 1993 and exported 22 tons to Southeast Asia.  (Seoul 
MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 26 May 94 p 11) 

   Hanguk Pharmaceutical Exports to Chile, Brazil -- Hanguk United 
Pharmaceutical Company recently signed contracts to export pills and 
intravenous pharmaceuticals to Chile and Brazil.  The $2 million 
export contracts cover 17 pharmaceutical items, including anti- 
cancer medicines, antibiotics, and ulcer medicines.  In August, the 
company will ship $600,000 worth of pharmaceuticals to Chile and 
$300,000 to Brazil.  The company is also negotiating shipping dates 
with Argentina and Guatemala.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 23 May 94 
p 20) 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA - INDONESIA:  Prospects For Renewed Economic Ties 
With Iraq -- Indonesian Trade Minister S.B. Joedono and Iraqi 
Foreign Minister Mohammad Sa'id al-Sahhaf recently discussed 
renewing economic ties in anticipation of the lifting of the UN 
embargo on Iraq.  Indonesia's exports to Iraq had reached $83.3 
million in 1990, but amounted to only $500,000 in 1991 and 1992. 
Imports from Iraq also dropped from $177.8 million in 1990 to 
$600,000 in 1991.  Imports rebounded slightly in 1992 reaching $1.1 
million.  Prior to the embargo, Indonesia had exported tea, 
pharmaceuticals, garments, and glass products to Iraq, and imported 
crude oil from Iraq.  (Jakarta BISNIS INDONESIA  20 Apr 94 p 5) 

   Indonesian-Malaysian Consortium Planning Thermal Power Plant -- 
An Indonesian-Malaysian consortium is planning to build a coal-fired 
thermal power plant complex in South Sumatra, Indonesia.  The 
project-- undertaken on a 'build, own, and operate" basis--is a 
joint venture between Bukaka Teknik, a major Indonesian engineering 
firm, Sikap Project Management Systems, a Malaysian firm that builds 
power plants, and Worldwide Holdings, a Malaysian financial and 
hotel conglomerate.  Bukaka will hold a 30 percent stake and Sikap 
and Worldwide will each have 35 percent stakes. This will be the 
first large-scale infrastructure project undertaken by private 
companies from the two countries. 

   The first phase of the project involves the construction of two 
150,000-kw generating plants in Bukit Assam, South Sumatra, at a 
cost of about $340 million.  Construction is scheduled to begin in 
early 1995, and the plants will be in operation in 3 years.  The 
electricity generated will be sold to Indonesia's state-owned 
electricity corporation. 

   In the project's second phase, two additional generating units, 
each with a capacity of 500,000 kw, will be built at another 
location in Sumatra at a cost of $550 million each.  The completion 
target date is the year 2000.  Electricity from these units will be 
transmitted via underwater cable to Java and through cables under 
the Malacca Strait to Malaysia. (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 11 May 
94 p 3) 

   Nation Becomes Third Largest Coal Exporter -- Ambyo Mangunwijaya, 
president of state-owned P.T. Bukit Asam Coal Mining Industry, said 
that Indonesia is now the third largest coal exporter in the world 
after Australia and South Africa.  He said Indonesia's coal 
production has increased sharply over the last four years from 8.7 
million tons in 1989 to 27 million tons in 1993 and that exports 
soared from 2.7 million tons to more than 17 million tons in the 
same period.  He noted that Bukit Asam has doubled its output in 
South Sumatra to 10 million tons a year with an additional 
investment of $340 million. (Jakarta THE JAKARTA POST 6 May 94 p 1) 

   LAOS:  Thai Land Development Venture Division of Profits -- The 
Thai Hemarat Land Development Public Company has entered into a 
joint venture with Laos to develop an industrial estate.  The 
project will cover an area of 960 hectares and require an investment 
of $160 million.  The entire project will be completed in nine to 
ten years.  During the first 25 years, the company will get about 70 
percent of project's profits with the remaining 30 percent going to 
Laos.  From the 26th to the 35th year, the company will get 40 
percent while Laos will take 60 percent; from the 36th to the 45th 
year, the company will get 60 percent, while Laos will take 40 
percent; and from the 46th year on, Laos will take over the entire 
industrial estate.  (Bangkok Voice of Free Asia 1030 GMT 23 May 94) 

   MALAYSIA:  Technology Findings To Be Commercialized -- The 
Malaysian Technology Development Corporation (MTDC) is in the 
process of commercializing the country's 24 latest technological 
discoveries, Science, Technology, and Environment Minister Datuk Law 
Hieng Ding said.  He noted that the MTDC was looking for local and 
international markets.  Among the technological discoveries are 
destruction-free nuclear test equipment and a vaccine for a type of 
chicken disease. Seven technologies had been commercialized over the 
past year, he said.  (Kuala Lumpur BERNAMA 0640 GMT 12 May 94) 

   Japan To Establish Fiber Optic Cable System -- Telekom Malaysia 
has awarded NEC Corp. of Japan a $17O-million contract for a 2,332- 
km submarine fiber optic cable system, scheduled for completion in 
July 1995.  The project will link peninsular Malaysia (Mersing, 
Johor) with Sarawak (Kuching, Mari, Bintulu), Sabah (Kota Kinabalu), 
and Labuan.  Tan Sri Mohd Rashdan Baba, chairman of Telekom, said 
that the system will improve the clarity of voice transmissions and 
reduce distortions in data communication.  Rashdan also said that 
the submarine fiber optic cable system, the first amplification 
system for Southeast Asia, will meet Malaysia's telecommunications 
needs for the next 10 years.  (Kuala Lumpur BERITA HARIAN 22 Apr 94 
p 8) 

   SINGAPORE:  Line To Get Tankers, Container Ships by 1996 -- Eight 
new ships--two tankers and six container ships-- will be delivered 
to Neptune Orient Lines (NOL) over the next three years at a cost of 
$512.5 million, according to NOL chairman Herman Hochstadt.  The new 
ship construction is part of NOL's fleet renewal program to reduce 
the fleet's average ship age to 7.9 years.  The industry average is 
11.6 years.  NOL's fleet, including those on order, totals 64 
vessels with a combined tonnage of 3.3 million deadweight tons.  The 
group now has 26 container ships, seven product and general cargo 
vessels, and 12 crude oil tankers.  (Singapore THE STRAITS TIMES 13 
May 94 p 47) 

   THAILAND:  Exports Increase 19.7 Percent, Overall Economy 
'Satisfactory' -- According to a report on the economy presented to 
the Council of Economic Ministers by the Bank of Thailand (BOT) and 
the National Economic and Social Development Board (NESDB), 
Thailand's overall economic performance remained satisfactory. 
Exports during the first quarter of this increased by 19.7 percent 
compared to the same period last year.  According to the BOT, 
foreign markets--especially the United States and the Asia-Pacific 
region--are major factors accounting for the expansion of exports. 
The NESDB said the inflation rate during the first quarter was 4.8 
percent, compared to 3.3 percent during the same period last year. 
(Bangkok Radio Thailand Network 0000 GMT 24 May 94) 

   Rice Exports, Earnings Increase in First Quarter -- Rice exports 
in the first quarter increased by 19.55 percent in quantity and 56.3 
percent in earnings over the same period last year.  A total of 
1,573,533.3 tons of rice worth $580 million was exported between 
January and April, up from 1,316,175.78 tons worth $371 million last 
year.  Japan has become the major buyer of Thai rice, purchasing a 
total of 758,098 tons since October last year, causing a steady 
increase in domestic prices.  The price increase has affected 
Thailand's exports of low grade rice as buyers of low grade rice 
have turned to countries such as Vietnam.  However, less rice was 
exported in April because of the rising prices.  Only 285,619.76 
tons of rice were exported last month, as compared to 349,076.56 
tons in April 1993.  (Bangkok BANGKOK POST 24 May 94 p 24) 

   VIETNAM:  Draft Labor Law Recognizes Right To Strike -- According 
to Hoang Minh Chuc, vice chairman of the Vietnam General Federation 
of Labor, the draft labor law, which will be presented to the spring 
session of the National Assembly, recognizes workers' right to 
strike, but only when negotiations are deadlocked.  Workers at 
facilities such as hospitals, utilities (water and electricity) and 
enterprises essential for the economy such as oil, gas, and 
communications will not be allowed to strike.  This draft law is the 
result of three years of study of the labor laws of France, Iraq, 
the old Soviet Union, and the Philippines and the labor law under 
the former Vietnamese Emperor Bao Dai.   (Hanoi THOI BAO KINH TE 
VIET NAM 27 April 94 p 3) 

   Economic Courts To Start Operations in July -- Vietnam's economic 
court system will start operations in July 1994.  The courts will 
have two main functions:  to resolve disputes and to declare 
enterprises bankrupt.  The courts will be part of the People's Court 
system and will be established at both the provincial and national 
levels.  The development of the market economy has led to problems 
with enterprises that must be properly managed.  Economic disputes 
were previously handled by a government economic arbitration 
organization.  (Hanoi THOI BAO KINH TE VIET NAM 27 April 1994 p 8) 

   Trends in Japanese Investment, Aid Described -- Trade between 
Japan and Vietnam amounted to $1.45 billion in 1993 accounting for 
23 percent of Vietnam's external trade.  As of the first quarter 
this year, Japan also ranks sixth among foreign investors in 
Vietnam, with 53 projects and some $475 million in registered 
capital.  Japanese investment in Vietnam is expected to increase 
strongly in 1994.  Japanese companies have been negotiating with 
Vietnamese partners on major investment projects in cement, steel 
production, as well as oil, gas, and minerals exploration.  They are 
also investigating investment possibilities in export processing 
zones and industrial parks in Hanoi, Haiphong, Hon Gai, Ho Chi Minh 
City, Dong Nai, and Vung Tau.  Some projects are reportedly worth 
$100-$200 million each.  SAIGON GIAI PHONG commented that economic 
cooperation between the two countries is still low relative to their 
potential. 

   Japan is also the largest source of development assistance to 
Vietnam giving approximately $1 billion, of which $76 million is 
gratis aid and the rest is soft loans.  In fiscal year 1993, 
Japanese development assistance to Vietnam amounted to approximately 
$550 million.  (Ho Chi Minh City SAIGON GIAI PHONG 20 April 94 p 2) 

   Navy Company, Japanese Counterpart Form Joint Venture -- The 
Haiphong navy company Hai Thanh under the Ministry of Defense and 
the Japanese company Kotobuki Holding Ltd. have formed a 40-year 
joint venture to build and operate a five-star hotel in Ho Chi Minh 
City.  Licensed in December 1993, the "Hako" joint venture is 
capitalized at $46.1 million.  The Japanese partner will contribute 
70 percent of the prescribed capital.  (Hanoi QUAN DOI NHAN DAN 18 
Apr 94 p 3) 

   List of BOT Infrastructure Construction Projects -- The 
Vietnamese Government has drawn up a list of twelve infrastructure 
construction projects to be built by private foreign investors under 
its "build, operate and transfer" (BOT) system.  The government's 
goal in designating specific power plants, expressways, and other 
construction as BOT projects is to expand the use of foreign funds 
and accelerate the pace of economic modernization.  The existence of 
the list was revealed by people from "U.S. engineering circles" 
whose participation the government sought. 

   There are four BOT power-generation projects under the 
jurisdiction of the Energy Ministry: a 200-megawatt (mw) Can Tho 
thermal plant on the Mekong River, a 120-mw Kontum hydroelectric 
project in the Central Highlands, a 360-megawatt Ban Mei 
hydroelectric plant outside Hanoi, and a 1,200-mw coal-fired plant 
in Quang Ninh. 

   Highway construction projects are the Ho Chi Minh City 
expressway, the Can Tho bridge on Highway 1, and bridges for 
expressways to be built in Haiphong, Quang Ninh, and Ho Chi Minh 
City.  Three Construction Ministry projects will be selected from 
among plans for waste treatment facilities, waterworks, and other 
projects in Vietnam's largest cities. 

   According to "engineering industry sources," French companies are 
preparing feasibility studies for the Ho Chi Minh City expressway, 
while a Singapore consortium is studying construction of some of the 
bridges.  With the lifting of the U.S. embargo, "the government has 
also presented the list to American firms."  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO 
SHIMBUN 17 May 94 p 2) 

   Hanoi Prison To Be Singaporean Hotel Venture -- Hanoi's Hoa Lo 
Prison will soon be replaced by the Hanoi Tower Center in a 45-year 
joint venture between the Hanoi Civil Construction Company and the 
Singaporean Buron Engineering Company PTE. Ltd.  The joint venture 
is capitalized at $33.2 million.  Prescribed capital is $20.2 
million.  The Vietnamese partner will contribute 24 percent and 
grant the venture land use rights for 45 years.  The Singaporean 
partner will contribute $15.5 million, or 76 percent.  Part of Hoa 
Lo will be preserved as a historic site.  (Hanoi THOI BAO KINH TE 
VIET NAM 2O April 94 p 6) 

   Thai Bank, Conglomerate in Partnership With Agriculture Bank -- A 
memorandum has been signed between the Vietnam Agriculture Bank, 
Thailand's Siam Commercial Bank Ltd. and the Charoen Pokkhaphan 
Group Ltd. establishing a 20-year joint venture bank.   Vina Siam 
Bank has a prescribed capital of $15 million, of which the 
Vietnamese partner will contribute 34 percent and the two Thai 
partners 33 percent each.  Vina Siam Bank intends to serve Thai 
investors, whose presence in Vietnam continues to grow.  (Hanoi THOI 
BAO KINH TE VIET NAM 27 Apr 94 p 4) 

   French Bank Loans to Businesses -- Credit Lyonnais provided loans 
totalling $26 million in the first quarter of this year, with $10 
million more promised.  Also in this period, deposits in the bank's 
two branch offices in Hanoi and Ho Chi Minh City reportedly totalled 
about $19 million.  In 18 months of operations, Credit Lyonnais has 
given mostly short-term loans to hundreds of businesses, joint 
ventures, and individuals, with priority given to those buying farm 
products for export and importing materials for domestic production. 
In the coming period, the bank will extend more loans to projects to 
encourage European investors to come to Vietnam.  (Hanoi VNA 1436 
GMT 16 May 94) 

   52 Foreign Investment Projects in Agriculture Licensed -- Fifty- 
two foreign investment projects in agriculture have been licensed to 
date with a total capital of $114.6 million.  Most of these are 
concentrating on building and modernizing establishments for the 
export of farm products and food processing.  One of the more 
prominent projects is the enlargement of the Lamson Sugar Plant, a 
$50 million joint venture with a British company, which will enable 
the plant to raise its production capacity to 6,000 tons of cane per 
day.  (Hanoi VNA 0615 GMT 17 May 94) 

   Early 1994 Export Index Reported -- The export index for the 
first four months of 1994 reached $940 million, an increase of 17 
percent compared with the corresponding period last year.  It is 
projected that in the second quarter, the average export index will 
reach $300 million a month. (Hanoi Voice of Vietnam 1100 GMT 16 May 
94) 

   Malaysia To Help Build Export Processing Zone -- The State 
Committee for Cooperation and Investment has issued a license for 
the construction of the SRV's sixth export processing zone (EPZ) 
named Noi Bai-Soc Son on the outskirts of Hanoi.  This EPZ will be 
built on 1OO hectares of land by the Hanoi Industrial Construction 
Company and the Renong Group of Malaysia with a total investment of 
$20.4 million.  The Vietnamese side will contribute 30 percent of 
the authorized capital.  The Noi Bai EPZ will specialize in the 
manufacture of high-quality electronic goods. (Hanoi VNA 1450 GMT 13 
May 94) 

   More Foreign Projects Licensed in April -- In April, the State 
Committee for Cooperation and Investment (SCCI) granted licenses to 
20 foreign investment projects with a total capital of $262 million. 
This brings to 90 the number of projects licensed in the first four 
months of this year with a combined capital of $1.6 billion.  The 
most notable projects licensed last month include an oil product 
contract capitalized at $55 million, the Coca Cola-Ngoc Hoi soft 
drinks project at $20 million, the Hue Beer Joint Venture Company at 
$24.3 million, and the Sai Gon Airport joint venture hotel at $24 
million.  The SCCI made it known that 72 more projects with a total 
capital of $1.4 billion are under its consideration.  Half of the 
projects under consideration are medium and big ($10 million or 
more) ones.  Last month the SCCI withdrew licenses from 14 projects. 
As of late April 1994, the number of foreign investment projects in 
operation in Vietnam was around 770.  (Hanoi VNA 1459 GMT 13 May 94) 

   UK Firm To Build Hanoi Trade Center -- A license has been issued 
by the State Commission for Cooperation and Investment for the Hanoi 
Trading Center Company. The company is a joint venture between the 
Hanoi Trading Company and a British company.  The venture will build 
a trade center in Hanoi comprising an international shopping 
complex, office block, residential units, and restaurants.  The 
total capital of the company is $41 million, with $14 million 
authorized.  The Vietnamese side will contribute 30 percent of the 
total capital.  The joint venture will operate for 40 years. (Hanoi 
Voice of Vietnam 2300 GMT 12 May 94) 

   First Quarter Industrial Output Up 12.1 Percent -- Industrial 
output in the first quarter increased 12.1 percent over last year. 
Increases were recorded in the central state-owned sector of 13.7 
percent; in the local state owned-sector of 10.5 percent; and in the 
non-state sector of 9.7 percent.  Most key industries posted a 
higher growth rate than in the first quarter of last year. 
Industries showing higher growth rates included electricity with 9.6 
percent; coal with 4.3 percent; crude oil with 20.8 percent; and 
cement with 15 percent.  The success was mainly due to stable 
prices.  The electricity supply to southern provinces was improved 
and more foreign outlets have been found for products, with new 
orders from the EC, CIS, and some African countries.  However, 
industrial production is still faced with a lack of investment 
capital.  Some sectors lack floating capital due to unsold products 
and contraband goods.  At the end of April 12,000 metric tons of 
paper and 11,600 metric tons of steel were sitting in warehouses. 
(Hanoi VNA O644 GMT 25 May 94) 

   Indian, French Firms To Build $40 Million Cement Plant -- India's 
JK Cement Works, part of the JK Synthetics group, will set up a 
cement plant in Vietnam.  The plant's capacity will be 1,200 metric 
tons per day and will be built in collaboration with France's 
Lafarge Coppee.  The total project cost is $40 million, which will 
be funded by the Asian Development Bank.  Lafarge Coppee and a local 
Vietnamese partner will operate the plant.  JK will ship close to 
$20 million worth of equipment--including most of the machinery and 
instrumentation--from India. In addition, JK will net another $5 
million for providing manpower, castings and pressure parts, which 
will come from local sources.  Work on the project is expected to 
start late this year.  (Delhi THE ECONOMIC TIMES 20 May 94 p 8) 

   Proton To Assemble Cars in SRV -- The Malaysian car manufacturer 
Proton has received approval for the import, assembly, and sales of 
cars in Vietnam.  Proton said that the SRV State Committee for 
Cooperation and Investment [SCCI] approved a joint venture between 
itself, Mitsubishi Corporation, and Mitsubishi Motors Corporation 
(Japan) and a local Vietnamese company, Vietranscimex.  The SCCI 
approved the project at the end of April and registration procedures 
for the company, Vina Star Motors Corporation, are to be completed 
in May.  Operations are scheduled to begin in March 1995.  Proton 
will hold a 25 percent stake--$4 million in legal capital--in Vina 
Star with the remainder equally shared among Mitsubishi Corp., 
Mitsubishi Motors, and Vietranscimex.  The project in Ho Chi Minh 
City will have a total investment value of $5O million.  (Kuala 
Lumpur NEW STRAITS TIMES 14 May 94 p 15) 

EAG/1June1994/ECONF/TECHTF/EAST ASIA GROUP/PF 01/2144z Jun 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23085 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000030194001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   5 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-2JUN94-SYRIA-PEACE 
<H3> <TI>      SYRIA-PEACE PROCESS </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       SYRIA-PEACE PROCESS </PHRASE></F></HT>




<TEXT>
Scoring   "Phased Solutions," Syria Leaves Slight Wiggle Room 

                          SUMMARY 

Syria's blanket rejections of "phased settlements"--a prominent 
theme during Secretary of State Christopher's recent visits--are 
in effect conveying to the Syrian public that Damascus will not 
accept any peace settlement without prior Israeli commitment to 
withdraw fully from the Golan Heights, while leaving open the 
possibility of gradual, reciprocal steps to exchange land for 
peace if full withdrawal is predetermined.  Maintaining slight 
flexibility, Damascus has repeatedly articulated its opposition 
to any "phased settlement" by defining it as precluding total 
withdrawal and has refrained from publicly demanding a specific 
timetable for Israel's return of the Golan. 

                        END  SUMMARY 

Against the background of the Secretary's 29 April-1 May and 15- 
18 May shuttle visits between Syria and Israel, Damascus 
repeatedly stressed its opposition to the notion of a peace 
settlement in stages--a consistent theme in Syrian rhetoric since 
September 1992, when it began negotiating with a Labor government 
in Israel (see box).  For example, reacting to a plethora of 
Israeli media reports on claimed Israeli draft proposals that 
were said to involve phased withdrawal from the Golan in exchange 
for measures to establish peaceful relations, one Damascus radio 
commentary criticized Israel for "talking about testing Syria's 
intentions" over "several years" and warned that "Israel wants to 
drag the Arab parties participating in the peace process into 
partial, phased agreements" (22 April).  Coinciding with the 
Secretary's talks in Damascus on 18 May, the daily Al-Thawrah 
asserted that "since the beginning Syria has been aware of the 
fact that the path of peace does not pass at all through partial 
solutions, phased settlements, or individual deals" (Damascus 
radio, 8 May).  Syria's closely controlled media have continued 
this line since the visits, with a Tishrin editorial on 1 June 
citing Israeli offers of "partial solutions and phased 
settlements" as evidence "that Israel is the party responsible 
for wasting time and for undermining the peace process" (Damascus 
radio). 

 Accordingly, Damascus publicly dismissed the possibility of a 
"Majd al-Shams First" arrangement, rumored by Israeli media as a 
plan by which Israel would withdraw from four Druze villages in 
the Majd al-Shams area of the Golan Heights as an initial step 
toward a full peace settlement (Qol Yisra'el, 29 April).  At the 
end of the Secretary's first series of talks in Damascus, Foreign 
Minister Faruq al-Shar' was quoted by Reuters news agency as 
declaring in response to a question on phased withdrawal that "we 
will not accept peace in stages" (1 May).  Asked about the "Majd 
al-Shams First" idea, he reportedly dismissed it as a "silly 
proposal."  That reaction was echoed in somewhat milder but no 
less derisive terms in Syrian media, which compared "Majd al- 
Shams First" to "Gaza-Jericho First," the Israeli-Palestinian 
agreement that Syria regularly vilifies in its media (for 
example, Al-Ba'th, as reported by Damascus radio, 4 May). 

"Phased Settlement" Means "Partial Withdrawal" 

Nevertheless, Syria has tended in its public statements and media 
commentary to characterize the notion of "phased settlements" in 
such narrow terms as to avoid shutting the door entirely to any 
gradual measures to exchange land for peace.  By consistently 
portraying "phased settlement" as virtually synonymous with 
partial Israeli withdrawal from the Golan Heights, the Syrian 
public line has focused exclusively on the demand for a clear 
Israeli commitment to full withdrawal.  For example: 

-- During the SMEC's visit to the region last October, an 
editorial in the daily Tishrin rejected a phased settlement by 
maintaining that "Israel wants to transform the phased settlement 
into a permanent settlement; that is, it wants to buy time, 
prolong the negotiating process, and manipulate its course to 
keep Arab territories" rather than accept a commitment to full 
withdrawal (Damascus radio, 20 October 1993). 

-- In a joint press conference with visiting Secretary 
Christopher last December, al-Shar' was asked about rumors of a 
U.S. draft proposal involving a four-stage Israeli withdrawal 
from the Golan.  While denying the existence of such a proposal, 
he nonetheless declared that "Syria rejects this proposal," 
explaining that "we in Syria will not accept the achievement of 
the aspired peace in the region unless there is full withdrawal 
from the occupied Syrian Golan" (Damascus TV, 9 December 1993). 

-- Following Secretary Christopher's 1 May talks in Damascus, al- 
Shar' was quoted by Syrian media as asserting that "Syria rejects 
peace in stages with Israel" and that "it insists on total 
withdrawal from the Arab occupied territories as a condition for 
the establishment of peace in the region" (Al-Bath and Al- 
Thawrah, 2 May).  Al-Shar' was subsequently quoted by Damascus 
radio as telling a visiting Swiss official that "the Israeli 
proposals conveyed by Secretary Christopher during his latest 
visit did not help achieve progress because they were based on 
premeditated Israeli intentions not to fully withdraw from the 
territories that were occupied in 1967" (Damascus radio, 19 May). 

Through such rhetoric, Syria, in effect, appears to have limited 
the scope of its public rejection of phased settlements to a 
rejection of any such solution insofar as it precludes or fails 
to guarantee total withdrawal.  The implication was underscored 
in Syrian media coverage of al-Shar's remarks to Reuters on 1 
May.  Omitting his characterization of the "Majd al-Shams First" 
proposal as a "silly idea," the media cited him as addressing the 
proposal by saying simply "that Syria's position is the return of 
the Golan in full" (Al-Ba'th and Al-Thawrah, 2 May). 

Demands on Timetable Vague 

Damascus also has continued to avoid wedding itself before the 
Syrian public to a specific timeframe for Israeli withdrawal from 
the Golan Heights.  In contrast to its consistent calls for 
"immediate" withdrawal of Israeli forces from Lebanon, Syria's 
demands for Israeli withdrawal from the Golan--since the start of 
the current peace talks in October 1991--have almost always 
either avoided the question of a timeframe or referred to it in 
vague terms.  Accordingly, in December 1992, Syrian media made no 
mention of comments at a Washington news conference by Muwaffaq 
al-'Allaf, chief Syrian negotiator in the bilateral talks with 
Israel, in which he appeared to demand an extremely short 
timeframe for Israeli withdrawal (see Note 1). 

(Note 1)   Al-'Allaf had stated in response to a question that an 
acceptable Israeli withdrawal would involve "not phases in terms 
of weeks and months but the necessary thing which is logistically 
needed" (Federal News Service transcript, 17 September 1992). 

Against the background of the Secretary's recent shuttle 
diplomacy, Syrian media stepped up general calls to establish an 
Israeli timetable for withdrawal but continued to avoid specifics 
other than urging that the timeframe be "quick" (for example, 
Damascus radio, 26 and 29 April; Tishrin editorials as reported 
by Damascus radio, 4 and 16 May).  Another editorial in Tishrin 
used still more general wording, insisting merely that Israel 
commit itself to "full withdrawal from the Golan within a 
reasonable and acceptable period of time" (Damascus radio, 15 
May) (see Note 2).  Since the visit, al-Shar' was reported by 
Egypt's official news agency, MENA, to have been asked during a 
visit to Cairo whether Syria could accept an Israeli withdrawal 
from the Golan over a period of three years.  He responded, "We 
will not talk about these details until after Israel agrees to 
the principle of full withdrawal" (MENA, 31 May). 

(Note 2) Syrian delegation spokeswoman Bushra Kanafani used 
similar phrasing two years ago in demanding a timetable for 
Israeli withdrawal, but her comments--conveyed in response to a 
question at a Washington news conference--were not carried by 
Syrian media (Federal News Service, 14 September 1992). 

Implications 

Through its negative public treatment of "phased settlements," 
Damascus continues, in effect, to prepare the Syrian public for 
either a deadlock in the peace process or a peace agreement 
involving no less than an explicit Israeli commitment to full 
withdrawal from the Golan Heights.  Beyond this public bottom 
line, however, Damascus has in effect neither encouraged nor 
discouraged Syrian public perceptions that the government would 
consider reciprocal phased measures toward normalization of ties 
in return for Israeli withdrawal, if the Israelis were to commit 
themselves in advance to an eventual full retreat.  In any event, 
the vagueness of Syrian demands for a withdrawal timetable likely 
reflects the recognition that if such withdrawal is agreed to, it 
will be undertaken in stages over a number of years. 

Box:  No "Phased Settlements": A Staple of Syrian Rhetoric 

Opposition to a "phased settlement" has been a consistent theme 
in Syrian media through much of the current peace process.  For 
example: 

-- In a speech before the United Nations General Assembly in 
September 1992, al-Shar' declared that while "the road to a 
comprehensive and just peace is clear and well known, . . . any 
maneuvers to carry out partial withdrawal or phased steps will 
not bring peace to the region or Israel" (Damascus TV, 28 
September 1992). 

-- Damascus radio asserted in December 1992 that "Syria will 
never go along with partial solutions or phased withdrawals" (16 
December 1992). 

-- At the end of Special Middle East Coordinator (SMEC) Dennis 
Ross' visit to the region last July, a Damascus radio commentary 
claimed that "the problem is still in Israel," which it said 
"insists on a peace by installments and by phased settlements 
aimed, as they say, at testing the Arabs' peaceful intentions" 
(14 July 1993). 

End Box 

(AUTHOR: BROWN.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
NEAR EAST ANALYSIS BRANCH (703) 733-6094.) 

ENEAG/GILLISON/SM 02/1623Z JUN 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23086 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000030294001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   5 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-073--CHINA 
<H3> <TI>      CHINA: MEDIA HIGHLIGHT EFFORT TO BUILD </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       CHINA: MEDIA HIGHLIGHT EFFORT TO BUILD </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
Chinese      media in recent weeks have given increased attention to 
efforts to create a modern national information infrastructure. 
Several meetings have been held to discuss projects to develop an 
"information highway," government officials and industry leaders 
have expressed their views in the press, and a State plan is being 
formulated.  Some individual projects have already been begun or 
completed.  U.S. firms are providing foreign technology, expertise 
and investment capital. 

   The "Three Golden Projects" 

   China's information highway program is part of the "Three Golden 
Projects," a national information infrastructure initiative 
announced last year by the Ministry of Electronics Industry. 
Minister Hu Qili, in a national telephone conference on 2 July 1993, 
said that the domestic electronics industry would concentrate on 
three major projects, titled the Golden Bridge, the Golden Card, and 
the Golden Customs.  The Golden Bridge is a national public 
information network connecting ministry- and provincial-level 
specialized databases, the Golden Card is a payment system for bank 
credit cards, and the Golden Customs is an economic information 
network for foreign trade (CHINA DAILY 3 Jul 93).  The projects are 
aimed at permitting paperless commerce and electronic data 
interchange through government-established information industry 
projects (KEJI RIBAO 4 Mar 94). 

   National Meetings, Media Attention 

   Increased public attention to the Three Golden Projects began in 
early March.  A signed article in the S&amp;T paper KEJI RIBAO, on 4 
March, noted that the government "is paying increasing attention" to 
the development of an indigenous information industry and that 
"Party and government leaders have issued numerous major statements 
on the topic, and officials have begun formulating appropriate 
strategies and plans," such as the Three Golden Projects.  On 12 
March, the same paper reported that it had sponsored a symposium the 
previous day for information highway experts.  It said that 
government, industry, and academic participants had agreed that 
China should accelerate its planning and increase financial support 
for the projects. 

   The Ministry of Posts and Telecommunications (MPT), some 10 days 
later, sponsored a forum in Beijing on "building China's high-speed 
information networks."  According to KEJI RIBAO, academicians from 
the Chinese Academy of Sciences (CAS), professors, senior engineers, 
and high-level managers from the fields of computers, 
communications, and automation offered their proposals for the 
development of information highways.  Officials from the ministry's 
Planning Department and Directorate General of Telecommunications 
spoke on the status and development plans for the national networks. 
The ministry's Science and Technology Committee chairman, Song 
Zhiyuan, announced that China's information highway program will 
consist of two major components-- communications platforms in the 
public sector and application information systems in the government 
and other official sectors (KEJI RIBAO 25 Mar 94). 

   The following month, more details on China's information 
infrastructure plans were laid out by Minister of Posts and 
Telecommunications Wu Jichuan, in an article in RENMIN RIBAO on 13 
April.  Wu stressed that the creation of a nationwide economic 
information network was essential to the establishment of the market 
economy and reported that the Chinese Government had made "an 
important policy decision" to establish such a network.  He reviewed 
the development of the State telecommunication facilities over the 
past 10 years and maintained that the information network could be 
established on this foundation.  Noting that his ministry is 
responsible for building the infrastructure of the country's 
telecommunication networks and providing services to all economic 
sectors, Wu concluded that the ministry should map out a development 
plan and "speed up the building of public telephone networks, 
packet-switching public data networks, digital data networks, and 
mobile telecommunication networks, to provide a highly efficient, 
high-capacity information transmission channel and reliable 
telecommunication platform in support of" the Three Golden Projects 
and other information processing systems. 

   The same day Wu's article was published, KEJI RIBAO reported that 
CAS's Bureau of Technological Science had established an 
interagency, interindustry expert group for "policy and research on 
developing domestic high-speed information networks."  As group 
director, CAS assigned Beijing Posts and Telecommunications 
University optoelectronics authority and CAS academician Professor 
Ye Peida.  Professor Chen Junliang was appointed vice-director (KEJI 
RIBAO 13 Apr 94). 

   In early May, Wu Jichuan was quoted again, in two Chinese news 
agency reports, on his ministry's plans for an information highway. 
The first report, on 5 May, said that Wu had addressed a "recent" 
symposium, attended by senior Chinese officials and information 
experts.  Wu indicated that China is watching the latest 
developments in information highway construction abroad and will 
carry out its own development in a planned and systematic manner. 
He said China will expand the application of computers in digital 
telephone exchanges, accelerate laying of fiber-optic cables, and 
build an internet by developing a network telecommunications 
platform based on the country's public telecommunications network. 
He pointed out that the construction of the information highway will 
require joint efforts by participating departments. 

   The 5 May report reviewed the status of China's 
telecommunications development, reporting that: 

   --China is building 22 national-level fiber-optic cable trunk 
lines, 20 digital microwave trunk lines, and large and medium-sized 
satellite communications ground stations. 

   --The high-capacity digital transmission network connecting the 
nation's major provincial capitals will be completed early in 1995. 

   --First-phase construction of a nationwide digital packet- 
switching network, known as Chinapac, was completed last September. 
At present, the network extends to 267 of China's major cities and 
has started to exchange information with 37 centers in 20 countries. 

   --The first-phase project of the high-speed digital trunk line 
network connecting 21 provinces and municipalities will be put into 
operation this July.  A cellular phone network covers the coastal 
provinces in the Southeast and some central provinces. 

   --China's 700,000 mobile telephones will soon be linked by a 
nationwide network. 

   --China's 7 million radio pagers have made the country one of the 
world's largest paging markets. 

   As another step in the construction of the information 
superhighway, according to the report, China plans to accelerate 
high-tech research in information modernization, especially advanced 
remote sensing, surveying, computers, automation facilities, and 
modern telecommunications technologies (XINHUA 5 May 94). 

   The second news agency report, a week later, quoted Minister Wu 
as saying that, by the end of the century, China will finish 
building a major telecommunications network composed of 16 fiber- 
optic cable trunk lines covering all the provincial capitals and 
connected with international networks.  He also reported that the 
Ninth Five-Year Plan (1996-2000) for telecommunications development 
has been initially drafted and that it gives priority to 
construction of long-distance fiber-optic cables (XINHUA 12 May 94). 

   Other Comment from Government and Industry Officials 

   Other government officials have also been calling attention to 
the importance of building a national information infrastructure 
within the overall Three Golden Projects: 

   --Ji Fusheng, chief engineer in the State Science and Technology 
Commission's Department for Basic Research and High Technology, 
wrote that, up to the year 2020, information technology will remain 
a hot topic and be a key to international competition.  He said 
China is capable of leapfrogging advanced nations in the race 
towards an information highway, but it must be practical and 
realistic, charting out its path according to market demand. 
The State has already taken some steps in the Three Golden Projects, 
such as providing support from the 863 Program (China's high-tech 
research and development program) for research on high-speed 
parallel computing and high-speed communications, but this is only a 
beginning (KEJI RIBAO, 1 Apr 4). 

   --State Information Center Vice-Director Wu Jiapei wrote that 
China's present level in information technology, 30-40 years behind 
that of the United States, must be raised significantly for the 
nation to remain competitive.  He advocated that the Three Golden 
Projects be market-driven, nongovernment investment be encouraged, 
and an entrepreneurial spirit incorporated in the projects.  He 
noted that the government has invested over 20 billion yuan ($2.3 
billion), which went for construction of a dozen-odd major 
information systems, and is investing an additional 50 billion yuan 
($5.75 billion) for construction of information systems at as many 
as 10,000 firms (KEJI RIBAO, 16 Apr 94).  (By comparison, the output 
value of China's entire information services industry in 1991 was 
only a few billion yuan ($250-500 million), compared to $203 billion 
for the entire world; in that year, the percentage of China's GNP 
occupied by information products and services was only one-tenth 
that of the average for all nations (KEJI DAOBAO Feb 94).) 

   Industry leaders have also publicly discussed the need for the 
development of a modern information infrastructure.  For example: 

   --Beijing Guolian S&amp;T Enterprises Ltd. General Manager Zhou Xiwei 

advocated the gradual modernization of existing information systems, 
noting that there should be a plan that would encourage stronger 
firms to take chances on exploratory projects (KEJI RIBAO 4 Mar 94). 
   --The Three Golden Projects were endorsed in articles by Ni 
Guangnan, chief engineer at the Legend Group, one of China's 
foremost computer companies, (ZHONGGUO DIANZI BAO 21 Mar 94) and 
Beijing Huaxun Communications Development Corporation Governor Dai 
Huanzhong (KEJI RIBAO 21 Apr). 

   Details on Specific Projects 

   Since the Three Golden Projects were announced last year, the 
media have provided details on some specific projects, relevant to 
the development of a modern Chinese information infrastructure, that 
have been given priority by MPT. 

   An electronics publication reported that among the critical 
issues in determining the development course of China's fiber-optic 
communications technology in the Eighth Five-Year Plan (1991-1995), 
one of the most important was the inclusion of Synchronous Digital 
Hierarchy (SDH) tasks.  After sufficient investigation, the ministry 
decided to include the following projects: STM-1 (155 megabits/s 
(Mbps) and STM-4 (622 Mbps), as well as digital cross-connect (DXC) 
equipment and 565 Mbps (DS5) fiber-optic cable communications system 
technologies, all of which have been studied and which are to be 
made more utilitarian.  The ministry's Institute Five and Wuhan 
Institute of Posts and Telecommunications have been the leading 
organizations in optical SDH research.  Simultaneously, the State 
863 Program's Optoelectronics Topical Area and a recently formed 
"Communications High Technology" Expert Topical Area have worked 
toward development of STM-16 (2.5 gigabits/s) optical communications 
systems (ZHONGGUO DIANZI BAO, 29 Nov 93). 

   The following month, the same publication described the 22 fiber- 
optic cable trunk lines, later mentioned by Minister Wu, that form a 
national backbone with Beijing as the hub, pointing toward the East, 
West, South, North, and Central China.  The construction plan is as 
follows: 

   --Beijing-to-Northeast: Two fiber-optic cable trunk lines- 
-Beijing-Tianj in-Shenyang-Changchun-Harbin and Beijing-Chengde- 
Fuxin-Baicheng-Qiqihar--and four branch lines have formed a mesh 
network covering the Beijing-Tianjin-Tangshan economically developed 
region and the three Northeast provinces, as well as the eastern 
part of Inner Mongolia. 

   --Beijing-to-Southeast/Seacoast: The Beijing-Tianjin-Nanjing and 
Nanjing Shanghai fiber-optic cable trunk lines are being linked to 
the Shanghai-Fuzhou-Guangzhou fiber-optic cable trunk line forming a 
Southern Seacoast Economic Development Area information network. 

   --Beijing-to-Central China/South: Two Beij ing-Wuhan-Guangzhou 
fiber-optic cable trunk lines--one overhead, one buried--are being 
built and will be interconnected with the Southern Seacoast fiber- 
optic cable trunk line and the Northwest fiber-optic cable trunk 
line into a backbone. 

   --Beijing-to-Northwest/Southwest: Three optical cable trunk 
lines--Beij ing-Hohhot-Yinchuan-Lanzhou, Beijing-Taiyuan-Xian, and 
Xian-Lanzhou--are forming a ring network extending westward to 
Urumqi and eventually farther west to Yining.  The Chengdu- 
Chongqing-Guiyang-Changsha-Nanchang-Fuzhou/Hangzhou fiber-optic 
cable trunk line and the Chengdu-Kunming, Kunming-Nanning, Nanning- 
Guangzhou, and Guangzhou-Haikou fiber-optic cable trunk lines (which 
form a chain that has linked up the Southwest in a large ring) 
together have formed a mesh network covering the Southwest. 

   --Fiber-optic cables spanning South-Central China and the East: 
Wuhan-Chongqing, Xuzhou-Zhengzhou, Zhengzhou-Xian, Xian-Chengdu and 
other fiber-optic cable trunk lines are being built. 

   All of these trunk lines, totaling 32,000 kilometers in length, 
will be completed by the end of 1995, and will be interconnected 
with 20 interprovincial digital microwave trunk lines and 19 
satellite earth stations to form a three-dimensional nationwide 
digital communications trunk line network (ZHONGGUO DIANZI BAO, 6 
Dec 93). 

   According to an article in RENMIN RIBAO, some of these trunk 
lines are part of the Asia-Europe fiber-optic cable project, 
proposed and launched by MPT.  In 1992, the 11 nations along the 
proposed route signed an "Agreement to Construct an Asia-Europe 
Fiber-Optic Cable" and formed the Asia-Europe Fiber-Optic Cable 
Management Commission.  The main cable runs f rom Shanghai through 
China, Kazakhstan, Kyrgyzstan, Uzbekistan, Turkmenistan, Iran, 
Turkey, Ukraine, Poland, and terminates in Frankfurt, Germany, while 
a branch leads to Tajikistan--a total length of 16,000 kilometers. 
Completion of the project and operational date are now set for the 
first quarter of 1996.  Within China, the cable links Shanghai with 
Xian, Lanzhou, Urumqi, and the Kazakhstan border.  So far, the line 
from Xian eastward has been completed, while that from Xian westward 
is scheduled for completion in 1995.  The Asia-Europe fiber-optic 
cable member states are to meet in Germany this June to negotiate 
cable sales and usage by the various countries (RENMIN RIBAO 28 Feb 
94). 

   Recently, information was released on the completion of China's 
first major 565 Mbps (DS5) fiber-optic communications trunk line- 
-Shanghai-to-Nanjing.  This project, undertaken jointly by MPT's 
Design Institute, the Wuhan Institute of Posts and 
Telecommunications Science, and the China Communications 
Construction Corp., is based on an extension of the Shanghai-Wuxi 
DS5 experimental cable, which has passed acceptance tests.  The 
Shanghai-Nanjing cable, almost 400 kilometers in length, has a main 
channel capacity of 15,360 simultaneous voice circuits, with 720 
voice circuits for interdistrict communications (KEJI RIBAO, 18 Apr 
94). 

   The nationwide public digital data services network announced by 
Minister Wu is a crucial element of the Three Golden Projects.  For 
this network, China will import from Canada a model 3600 bandwidth 
management system and from the United States some DACS II-2000 DXC 
equipment.  DXC node computers will be installed in 24 provinces and 
municipalities nationwide.  The main channels of this network are 
scheduled to be completed and operational in July 1994, with full 
project completion by early 1995.  Network users will be provided 
with channels for data/image/videoconference digital transmission 
services at a variety of bit rates up to and including 2 Mbps (DS1), 
and will have transprovincial transmission capabilities via public 
telecommunications networks, packet-switching networks, and local- 
and provincial-level digital data services networks now being built 
(ZHONGGUO DIANZI BAO, 21 Mar 94). 

   Several sources have reported on the development of Chinapac, the 
new national backbone network, consisting of 5,540 ports, which 
covers capital cities of all mainland provinces and autonomous 
regions as well as the municipalities of Beijing, Shanghai, Tianjin, 
and Chongqing, and can be connected with the public telephone 
network to cover all of China's cities and counties.  After five 
months of trial operation, the final form of Chinapac passed the 
joint MPT/Northern Telecom acceptance tests on 5 February 1994.  The 
eventual 20,000 ports--including those in local public data networks 
now being built throughout China and due to start operation by early 
1995--can be connected via fiber-optic, digital microwave, and 
satellite links to international gateways in Beijing, Shanghai, and 
Guangzhou for interconnection with 26 packet-switching public data 
networks in the United States, Japan, France, Germany, the ROK, 
Sweden, Italy, and eight other countries.  This final form of 
Chinapac, consisting of 32 nodes and eight tandem centers with a 
throughput of 6400 packets/s, provides basic services such as 
switched virtual circuit ("virtual call") and permanent virtual 
circuit.  Chinapac also provides specialized services such as 
electronic mailbox, electronic data interchange, videotex, Teletex, 
database searches, fax storage and relay, virtual dedicated 
networking, broadcasting, IBM/SNA (Systems Network Architecture) 
networking, token-ring LAN intelligent bridging, and asynchronous 
datagram interfacing.  Since trial operation commenced on 1 
September 1993, over 500 users and 16 nationwide groups have joined 
Chinapac, which has carried an average monthly load of 31 million 
fields (JISUANJI SHIJIE, 11 Aug 93; CHINA DAILY, 2 Sep 93; ZHONGGUO 
DIANZI BAO, 25 Feb 94). 

   Beijing Guolian S&amp;T Enterprises Ltd. is now developing China's 
first electronic data interchange network.  The network's data 
processing center consists of 50 supermicrocomputers forming a 
parallel distributed information processing system supplying 260,000 
user terminals nationwide with real-time searches.  This network's 
first-phase project--a book/newspaper/magazine data transmission 
service network--is now taking shape.  The network's data input 
center can store 7.5 million Chinese characters daily; it can 
quickly enter abstracts and subject records from Chinese periodicals 
into the network's database for servicing user searches (KEJI RIBAO, 
4 Mar 94). 

   Saishite Electronics Ltd., in Shenzhen, pioneered domestic batch 
production of fiber distributed data interface cards--often called 
the heart of computer "data highways," or high-speed (100 Mbps) 
LANs--beginning in September 1993.  These cards were jointly 
developed by Chinese and U.S. scientists and have been authenticated 
by the Federal Communications Commission (KEJI RIBAO, 5 Jan 94). 

The Shanghai paper WEN HUI BAO reported on the completion of a 
project closely related to the Three Golden Projects--a satellite 
digital transmission network, called a "Space Highway Network" or 
"Information Bridge," based at the Shanghai Stock Exchange.  The 
network was developed, designed, constructed, and put on-line by 
Shanghai Gaozhi S&amp;T Development Company, a Shanghai Caohejing New 
Technologies Development Zone high-tech firm, along with its partner 
Shanghai Xinhua Computer and Electronic Information Company.  It 
provides instantaneous (0.5 s) synchronous transmission of stock and 
economic information from the exchange to over 1000 small satellite 
earth stations nationwide, many of them hundreds or thousands of 
kilometers away.  The network also has been used for newspaper fax 
transmission.  It has been in operation for six months and relies on 
a satellite in geosynchronous orbit to relay information (WEN HUI 
BAO, 4 Apr 94). 

   High-Tech Help from U.S. Firms 

   Chinese media have taken note that the Three Golden Projects are 
receiving equipment, technical assistance and investment capital 
from U.S. high-tech firms, especially 3Com, Motorola, IBM, and AT&amp;T. 


   --XINHUA reported that Eric Benhamou, President of 3Com 
Corporation and Chairman of the American Electronics Association's 
National Information Infrastructure Task Force, announced, at a 28 
April 1994 seminar in China on building information superhighways 
for the next century, that 3Com will shortly set up a representative 
office in Beijing to help develop a pool of networking expertise in 
China (XINHUA 28 Apr 94). 

   --Motorola Corporation will expand its production of pagers in 
China by at least 50 percent this year in order to tap the potential 
of the local market.  There is plenty of room for expansion in this 
market, since China has 400 million city dwellers but only 10 
million pagers.  There are about 3 million Motorola pagers in use in 
China at present; this represents a third of the Chinese pager 
market, with most of the rest going to Japan's NEC and some Chinese 
manufacturers from Guangdong Province (CHINA DAILY, 5 May 94). 

   --Motorola signed a US$125 million contract with Beijing Kaiqi 
Communications Corp. to supply Asia's first 800-MHz all-digital 
trunking communications network.  Kaiqi will import a MIRS (Motorola 
Integrated Radio System) frequency-division multiplexing/time- 
division multiple access (FDM/TDMA) cellular mobile communications 
network, integrating telephone, fax, voice mail, simple information 
services, and computer data transmission.  The network will cover 
Beijing Municipality with a capacity of 100,000 users (ZHONGGUO 
DIANZI BAO, 28 Mar 94). 

   --On 3 May in Beijing, IBM announced it will invest at least $100 
million in the Three Golden Projects.  It will be the first foreign 
company to be involved in the Golden Bridge Project.  The deal comes 
under a Memorandum of Understanding signed on 28 April in the United 
States between IBM and the Ministry of Electronics Industry during 
Chinese Vice Premier Zou Jiahua's visit.  In the first project, IBM 
and Jitong Communications Corp. will set up a Beijing-based joint 
venture to produce networking technologies.  In the first phase, it 
will help design and install regional communications networks and 
link them into a national system.  Under the agreement, IBM will 
establish a wholly-owned software development center in Shanghai to 
develop system and application programs for the domestic and foreign 
markets.  It will also set up three open system networking centers 
in Beijing, Shanghai, and Guangzhou.  In return, China has pledged 
to use IBM's PowerPC platform as one of the major microprocessors in 
planning the country's future (CHINA DAILY, 4 May 94). 

   --On 7 and 8 May, AT&amp;T signed two contracts to supply state-of- 
the-art transmission and other equipment to the Beijing 
Telecommunications Administration.  The deals, totaling more than 
$20 million, will give the city the largest and most sophisticated 
digital transmission network in China.  Under the contracts, AT&amp;T 
will provide fiber-optic transmission equipment operating at SDH's 
STM-16 rate (2.488 gigabits/s) and a set of advanced network 
management and surveillance systems to monitor and manage the 
communications network.  With the equipment, Beijing can offer 
advanced telecommunications services and have the flexibility to 
move forward with new services, according to Beijing officials. 
Zhang Ligui, director general of the Beijing Telecommunications 
Administration, said the signing of the two agreements signifies 
that cooperation between AT&amp;T and Beijing has entered a new stage. 
AT&amp;T currently has nine joint ventures in China (CHINA DAILY, 9 May 

94). 
   (AUTHOR:  THOMAS TORDA.  FOR QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE 
CALL CHIEF, PACIFIC RIM BRANCH AT (703) 733-6346 
GIG/ 1JUN94/TECHTF/TTPF/TID JEG 02/2015Z JUN 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23087 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000030394001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   5 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-02JUN94-JAPAN-U.S. 
<H3> <TI>      Japanese Officials Balk at New Framework Agreement </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Japanese Officials Balk at New Framework Agreement </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                                      Japan's ruling coalition government has recently come under 
attack from elements of the Japanese bureaucracy and the 
opposition Liberal Democratic Party (LDP) for its handling of the 
24 May U.S.-Japanese agreement on resuming the stalled framework 
talks on bilateral trade problems.  Bureaucrats have expressed 
concern that Washington may attempt to turn the objective 
criteria that both sides agreed to use to measure Japan's trade 
performance into numerical targets, and are seeking to narrow the 
definition of these criteria--a stance that could complicate 
upcoming U.S.-Japanese talks.  Judging by media reporting, the 
LDP, for its part, may be planning to exploit this issue to 
weaken the ruling coalition. 
                                     END SUMMARY 
   In the days since the 24 May announcement of the U.S.-Japan 
agreement to restart the framework talks, Japanese bureaucrats 
involved in the trade negotiations and elements of the opposition 
LDP have criticized the government in the Japanese press for its 
handling of the talks that led to the agreement. 
   -- The 28 May Sankei Shimbun, a conservative newspaper whose 
views are often close to those of more conservative elements of 
the LDP, quoted an unidentified government official as expressing 
concern that the government, under political pressure to reach an 
agreement with Washington, may have compromised too much over how 
to define the objective criteria that will be used to measure 
Japan's trade performance.  Warning that Washington might still 
try to turn the criteria into "something similar to numerical 
targets," the official commented that the coalition "might have 
given priority to reopening the trade talks in an attempt to earn 
diplomatic points" to strengthen its weak domes tic political 
position. 
   -- The 28 May issue of Sankei Shimbun reported that another 
official argued that "it is very questionable whether Japan 
should have made such large concessions" on the issue of 
objective criteria.  He predicted that the two sides would 
continue to sharply disagree on the issue in the upcoming talks. 
   --  In addition, the 28 May Sankei Shimbun cited a third 
unidentified official as criticizing the 24 May agreement because 
it "includes only demands on Japan and makes few references to 
what the United States should do" to improve its competitiveness 
in Japan. 
   -- The 27 May Asahi Shimbun quoted unidentified officials as 
complaining that the 24 May agreement was "hasty," "inadequate," 
and "open to misinterpretation by the United States." 
   -- According to the 25 May Nihon Keizai Shimbun, unidentified 
sources in the LDP have also criticized the coalition's handling 
of the trade talks, asserting that the coalition had "only 
narrowly averted the worst situation that could trigger a trade 
war between Japan and the United States."  The paper reported 
that the LDP plans to cite the coalition's poor handling of the 
negotiations surrounding the resumption of the framework talks in 
a no-confidence motion it is considering against the government 
after the Diet passes the 1994 budget. 
   Bureaucracy's Criticism 
   Japanese bureaucrats who have criticized the 24 May agreement 
appear to be planning to work to limit the scope of the objective 
criteria as much as possible during the upcoming negotiations, 
seeking to avoid, wherever possible, any standards that might be 
interpreted  as targets, involve future goals, or affect sectors 
that the government claims are beyond its control.  Yosihiro 
Sakamoto, director general of the Ministry of International Trade 
and Industry's International Trade Policy Bureau, told a press 
conference on 24 May that although Tokyo understood that the 
objective criteria would include "a set of measuring yardsticks," 
they would be used "on a sector-by-sector basis to gauge only how 
Japan has done in the past" (Kyodo, 25 May).  Similarly, an 
unidentified MITI official told Kyodo on 27 May that Japan would 
reject any criteria that it regarded as numerical targets.  The 
official added that Tokyo defines such targets as any 
"quantitative pledges by the government regarding future trade 
performance and trade areas beyond government control."   In 
addition, the 29 May Mainichi Shimbun reported that a senior 
unnamed MITI official stated that Japan would reject anything 
that "comes close to numerical targets" (Mainichi Shimbun, 29 
May).  Other unidentified government sources quoted in the 29 and 
30 May Nihon Keizai Shimbun indicated that Japan would refuse to 
set any future goals, such as pledges to increase the number of 
dealers or outlets selling foreign products. 
   The bureaucracy appears to be particularly concerned about 
limiting the scope of objective criteria in the automobile 
sector.   Officials commenting on the upcoming automobile sector 
talks have used many of the standard arguments marshalled by 
Japanese officials in the past to resist monitoring of Japan's 
import performance in this area.   According to the 27 May Asahi 
Shimbun, a MITI negotiator involved in the framework talks stated 
that Japan would agree to adopting criteria, such as the number 
of dealers handling foreign cars, only if they are used to 
measure current conditions or past performance.  He said Tokyo 
would reject any criteria that involve "future commitments" for 
specific levels of imports.  He also argued, as Japanese 
negotiators have in the past, that the automobile sector was an 
"industrial field run by the private sector" over which the 
government has little control and for which it cannot set 
targets.  The 27 May Nihon Keizai Shimbun reported that Japanese 
negotiators would also refuse to comply with any U.S. demand to 
guarantee targets set voluntarily by Japanese automakers. 
   Ruling Coalition Response 
   The politically weak ruling coalition has attempted to play the 
24 May agreement to its best advantage and head off criticism 
from the bureaucracy and the opposition.  In the days immediately 
following the announcement of the 24 May agreement, for example, 
Foreign Minister Koji Kakizawa sought to portray the agreement in 
the best possible light for the ruling coalition, suggesting that 
the government had averted potential U.S. sanctions and secured 
Washington's agreement to drop demands for numerical targets.  On 
24 May, he reportedly told a news conference that, as part of the 
agreement, the two sides had decided to introduce "qualitative 
and quantitative criteria " to measure imports into Japan and 
"not to use a single criterion to judge" Japan's performance 
(Kyodo, 24 May).  This situation, he said, would avert the 
possibility of Washington imposing sanctions on Japan.  On 25 
May, he reportedly told an opposition member who questioned him 
during a Diet Budget Committee meeting that the "objective 
criteria" to be determined in the upcoming negotiations would not 
be numerical targets (Kyodo, 25 May). 
   MITI Minister Eijiro Hata has also sought to head off criticism 
by signalling that Tokyo would remain firm in rejecting numerical 
targets after U.S. Trade Representative Mickey Kantor was 
reported in the Japanese media as saying that Washington would 
continue to pursue "results-oriented" objectives in the upcoming 
talks (Kyodo, 27 May).  On 27 May, Hata reportedly told a news 
conference that failure to define objective criteria in the 24 
May agreement had left a "source of contention" for the talks. 
He reiterated Japan's longstanding position that it would not 
accept numerical targets (Kyodo, 27 May).  On 31 May, according 
to a Kyodo report the same day, Hata made similar remarks at 
another press conference, asserting that "Japan could not swallow 
any U.S. proposals that would lead to numerical targets."  Hata 
may also have been seeking to signal to Washington that Tokyo 
would remain firm on the issue of numerical targets. 
   Outlook 
   Japanese bureaucrats involved in the trade talks will probably 
make every possible effort to keep the objective criteria adopted 
in various sectors as vague and as limited as possible.  This 
will almost certainly slow progress in the talks, particularly in 
more contentious areas, such as the automobile sector.  Because 
of its weak political position, the ruling coalition will 
probably have problems dealing effectively with the bureaucracy's 
position.  On the one hand, the coalition will probably want to 
avoid pushing the bureaucracy to compromise with the United 
States, for fear that this would provide fuel for critics of the 
government to attack the coalition for giving in to Washington. 
On the other hand, if the talks collapse again or proceed very 
slowly and acrimoniously because of disagreements over objective 
criteria, the coalition could open itself to criticism from the 
LDP for mishandling Japan's relationship with the United States. 
   (AUTHOR:  BOUNDS.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ASIA DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, 703-733-6534.) 
EAG/HEBBEL/SM 02/2105Z JUN 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23088 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000030494001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   5 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-02JUN94-DPRK-UN-IAEA 
<H3> <TI>      Pyongyang Rejects UN Statement on Nuclear Reactor Refueling </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Pyongyang Rejects UN Statement on Nuclear Reactor Refueling </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                              Pyongyang has rejected a UN Security Council presidential 
statement calling for North Korean compliance with International 
Atomic Energy Agency (IAEA) requests concerning the refueling of 
one of its nuclear reactors in Yongbyon.  At the same time, the 
North Koreans are continuing to maintain that they are taking 
measures to preserve the possibility of verifying the 
nondiversion of nuclear fuel.  In rejecting the UN statement, 
Pyongyang also conspicuously failed to call for talks with the 
United States and coupled its rejection of the statement with a 
renewed warning of dire consequences if UN sanctions are imposed 
on North Korea. 

                                  END SUMMARY 

Pyongyang used the authoritative vehicle of a Foreign Ministry 
spokesman's statement to reject as "entirely unjust" a 30 May UN 
Security Council presidential statement calling for the 
acceptance of IAEA requests to segregate selected spent fuel rods 
for future measurement (Pyongyang radio, 1 June).  The statement 
contained no hints that North Korea would stop or even slow down 
the current refueling activities at Yongbyon.  Moreover, 
appearing to underscore Pyongyang's realization of the 
seriousness of the situation, the statement did not even mention 
the possibility for future DPRK-U.S. talks, as its most recent 
pronouncements have done. 

Pyongyang seems to be combining its rejection of the UN statement 
with a renewed threat to withdraw decisively from the Nuclear 
Nonproliferation Treaty (NPT).  Suggesting that this is the case, 
the statement darkly warned that the DPRK will "free itself from 
the restrictions of an unreasonable framework" (l) if the IAEA 
declares that the technical feasibility of ascertaining past 
nondiversion of nuclear material is lost or (2) if the Security 
Council even "threatens" to impose sanctions.  The statement went 
further to intimate that if either of these contingencies were to 
materialize, Pyongyang would resume "peaceful nuclear 
activities"--presumably by starting to reprocess discharged fuel. 

At the same time, the Foreign Ministry spokesman's statement 
claimed that Pyongyang is working to maintain nuclear 
transparency and tried to blame "some officials of the IAEA 
secretariat" and "some [UN] member states" for bringing about the 
current crisis. 

-- Past nondiversion.  Reiterating Pyongyang's past claim that it 
cannot accept IAEA requests for segregating selected fuel rods 
for future measurement, the statement again insisted that North 
Korea's method of storing discharged fuel rods makes their future 
measurement technically feasible.  The statement claimed that 
IAEA representatives had agreed earlier to "seriously study" the 
efficacy of the North Korean method and to "continue 
discussions," but that the IAEA reneged on that agreement by 
referring the matter to the Security Council.  The statement 
justified the "rather fast speed" of the fuel withdrawal 
operation as "necessary" to "test the maximum efficiency" of the 
refueling machine. 

-- Current nondiversion.  The statement claimed that the IAEA had 
confirmed that none of the current batch of fuel rods "had been 
diverted to another purpose" and that the current refueling is 
being conducted under IAEA surveillance, either in the presence 
of agency inspectors or under IAEA-installed cameras. 

Implications     The latest Foreign Ministry spokesman's 
statement reflects Pyongyang's apparent calculation that the IAEA 
and Washington would be reluctant to forego the possibility of 
ensuring future nondiversion of nuclear material--which the 
imposition of economic sanctions could lead to--for the sake of 
determining whether North Korea has diverted nuclear materials in 
the past. 

(AUTHOR:  YIM.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ASIA DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6534.) 
EAG/HEBBEL/LRT 03/2307Z JUN 94 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23089 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000030594001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   5 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
FOUO -- DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS, THE 
FOLLOWING ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS 
FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY--WEST EUROPE 
<H3> <TI>      FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY--FB PSE 94-020--WEST EUROPE </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY--FB PSE 94-020--WEST EUROPE </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
Europe      Economic Review:  WESTERN EUROPE Vol. III, No. 20, 02 June 
1994 

   Notice To Readers:  FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY is a series published by 
FBIS Europe/Latin America Group featuring brief summaries of 
foreign media reports on topical issues, compiled from the most 
recent sources available to FBIS. 
   Europe Economic Review (EER) is a subseries of FOREIGN MEDIA 
SURVEY published by the West and East European Divisions of 
Europe/Lat in America Group with contributions from FBIS overseas 
bureaus.  The EER is intended to supplement coverage of European 
economic issues by the FBIS Daily Report for West and East Europe, 
and other FBIS publications.  Foreign news, feature, and editorial 
reports selected for summary in this publication normally do not 
appear in other FBIS publications. 
   The EER is published in two editions, one for West Europe (also 
including media coverage of Canada and Turkey), and the other for 
East Europe.  Drawing primarily from domestic media sources of these 
countries but also using other foreign media where appropriate, the 
EER focuses on national and regional economic issues, such as 
economic competitiveness, regional economic integration, economic 
reforms and other changes in economic policies, and foreign trade 
and investment. 
   FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY is a U.S. Government publication.  Its 
contents in no way represent the policies, views, or attitudes of 
the U.S. Government.  All comment or analysis contained herein is 
attributable to the cited media source, unless otherwise indicated. 
   TABLE OF CONTENTS 
   EU 
   Study Favors Closer Wage-Productivity Linkage 
   DENMARK 
   Leave Program Facing Uncertain Future 
   FINLAND 
   State Reducing Ownership in Valmet Company 
   FRANCE 
   Comments on OECD Negotiations on Social Clause; France Finds Ally 
in Japan in Shipbuildin; Trade Versus Human Rights Viewed; Japan- 
U.S. Trade Accord Deemed Good for EU; Commentary on Agriculture 
Market Share, GATT Effects; Alphandery Revises Statutes for 
Financial Institutions; Reaction to Federal Reserve Interest Rate 
Hike; Framatome Privatization To Be Delayed; Coface To Retain Public 
Mission; Economic Espionage To Intensify 
   GERMANY 
   Bundesbank Report Rejects Devaluation; ABB Head on Investment in 
Russia 
   GREECE 
   New Minister of Economy Viewed; Delays Seen in Privatizations; 
Trade Unions Losing Ground 
   ITALY 
   Reaction to Federal Reserve Rate Increase; Arguments Against 
Government Economic Program; Talk of EMS Reentry 'Threatens' Exports 
   PORTUGAL 
   Bank of Portugal, Ministry of Finance Conflict 
   SWEDEN 
   Country Seen as Uruguay Round Winner; Study Finds Bottlenecks 
Endangering Recovery; Danger of Brain Drain Cited 
   TURKEY 
   Cetin Discusses BSEC Advantages 
   ECONOMIC BRIEFS 
   France, Greece, Portugal, Turkey 
   EU 
   STUDY FAVORS CLOSER WAGE-PRODUCTIVITY LINKAGE--A study sponsored 
by the European Commission calls for tying wage increases more 
closely to productivity growth as a way to boost employment and 
increase international competitiveness within the constraints of the 
Economic and Monetary Union (EMU) convergence process.  The study, 
carried out by the Institute of the German Economy (IW), advocates a 
long-term shift to wage increases which reflect only productivity 
growth rather than additional, political considerations such as a 
desire to redistribute income.  It specifically rejects a policy of 
short-term wage restraint as inadequate and even advocates holding 
wage increases below the rate of productivity growth "for a certain 
time" to ameliorate the EU's current "situation of structural 
underemployment."  This approach would allow European companies to 
improve their profitability, which would in turn stimulate 
investment and create jobs. 
   According to the study, increased international competitive 
pressures and the constraints of the EMU economic convergence 
process also imply an end to wage increases which exceed the growth 
of productivity.  The study argues that such increases, coupled with 
unfavorable changes in international currency exchange rates, have 
hurt the competitiveness of European firms in relation to their U.S. 
and Japanese counterparts, especially since 1985.  In 1992, for 
example, the unit cost of EU industrial products was almost 14 
percent higher than the unit cost of comparable U.S. and Japanese 
goods.  Meanwhile, as the EMU target dates for the convergence of 
the European economies approach, the tools traditionally used to 
compensate for excessive wage hikes will be increasingly 
unavailable:  monetary policy will have to follow a strict anti- 
inflationary course, fiscal policy will be geared toward budgetary 
consolidation, and currency devaluation will cease to be a 
politically viable option.  (Rick H. x36504) (Duesseldorf 
HANDELSBLATT in German 16 May 94 p 4) 
   DENMARK 
   LEAVE PROGRAM FACING UNCERTAIN FUTURE--Political parties, as well 
as society in general, remain deeply divided over whether a "trial" 
paid-leave program should continue in its present form, be modified, 
or discontinued.  The current Social Democratic Party (SDP)-led 
coalition government launched the initiative last year as a three- 
year experiment to relieve official unemployment.  Parliament will 
have to decide the initiative's future by 1996.  Some 50,000 
individuals have already entered the program and are receiving 
government allowances to withdraw from the labor market for up to 
one year in order to study, care for a child or elderly family 
member, or take a skills-enhancing sabbatical.  With the country 
entering the "unofficial" campaign for a parliamentary election, 
which must be held this fall, the issue is receiving attention in 
party platforms and public discussion. 
   On 8 May, the Radical Liberal Party, a junior party in the 
governing coalition, adopted its official position.  As summarized 
by Copenhagen BERLINGSKE TIDENDE business section reporter Jakob 
Elkjaer on 9 May, that party's ruling council pledged support for 
continuing the program, while indicating it wanted to see some 
changes.  The council came out unequivocally, however, in favor of 
leave for training and education.  It also backed the government's 
plan to ease the burden on the treasury by requiring contributions 
from workers and employers based on the principle of "collective 
insurance." 
   As expected, the Social Democrats greeted this announcement with 
enthusiasm, Elkjaer continued.  Reaffirming her own party's stand, 
SDP Labor Minister Jytte Andersen declared that "the leave 
arrangements should be made permanent.  The success which the 
program has enjoyed shows that people want to become more qualified, 
take care of their children...  This is part of a modern labor 
market policy."  Acknowledging complaints of high costs and 
disincentives to get a job, Andersen said the government planned to 
cut the present education allotment.  The current payment, equaling 
the maximum level of unemployment compensation, would be reduced to 
80 percent of that amount. 
   The Employers Confederation (DA) also used the occasion to 
reiterate its stand.  Elkjaer reported that its director, Jens 
Andersen, stated that the DA opposes continuing leave for child-care 
and sabbaticals, suggesting it puts too great a burden on business. 
While the group supports leave for training and education, it 
opposes universal contributions from employers, asserting that only 
those firms directly benefiting from training or retraining should 
have to pay contributions.  Dansk Industri, the association 
representing heavy industry, also stated cautious approval for 
funding training leaves but adamantly opposes leave for care of the 
elderly and for skill-boosting sabbaticals. 
   The stand taken by the Christian Party, another partner in the 
ruling coalition, was summarized in an article in BERLINGSKE TIDENDE 
on 2 May by Erik Bjorn Moller.  At its just-completed convention, 
that party also announced its support for extending the program. 
The Christian Party denounced the attack on the program by the 
Liberal and Conservative Parties, saying it could not consider 
cooperating with them in the campaign or in a subsequent coalition 
unless they halted their opposition.  The two parties--the largest 
in the nonsocialist camp--immediately rejected this condition. 
(Roger B. x365O8) (Copenhagen BERLINGSKE TIDENDE in Danish 9 May 94 
Section III p 1; 2 May 94 p 1) 
   FINLAND 
   STATE REDUCING OWNERSHIP IN VALMET COMPANY--An article in the 
Helsinki daily HUFVUDSTADSBLADET reported that on 11 May the Finnish 
Government took a large step to reduce state ownership of its 
flagship heavy industrial firm Valmet--the country's largest 
company--by announcing an offering of 7 million shares of the firm's 
stock on domestic and international financial markets.  The 
government further pledged that if buyers demonstrate strong demand 
for the initial offering, it will place up to 1 million of its 
remaining shares on the market.  If the first offering is completely 
sold, the state's ownership share will drop from 73 to 61 percent. 
If both offerings are completely sold, the figure will drop to 59 
percent.  There is some reason for optimism, the article claims, 
judging from the steady upswing on the Helsinki stock market and 
enthusiasm for Finnish shares elsewhere.  The firm will use 
projected stock sale proceeds of about 700 million markkas to 
improve its high debt-equity ratio, which resulted from the collapse 
of the Soviet market and the European recession.  Furthermore,  the 
article notes that, like the Finnish export sector as a whole, 
Valmet has recently experienced a strong recovery in foreign demand 
for its products, most notably papermaking machinery.  One year ago, 
the company's total foreign and domestic orders amounted to 5.4 
billion markkas; they now are worth almost 6.2 billion markkas. 
(Roger B. x365O8) (Helsinki HUFVUDSTADSBLADET in Swedish 12 May 94 p 
10) 
   FRANCE 
   COMMENTS ON OECD NEGOTIATIONS ON SOCIAL CLAUSE--Marc Deger, 
writing in the Paris financial daily LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES, reports 
that in reaction to the ASEAN countries' refusal to introduce a 
"social clause" into international trade agreements, GATT Director 
General Peter Sutherland and Michel Hansenne, director general of 
the permanent secretariat of the International Labor Organization, 
have met "in private" to discuss this issue.  Deger claims rumors 
have circulated according to which the preparatory committee of the 
World Trade Organization (WT0), over which Peter Sutherland 
presides, intends to establish "a negotiating group" on the social 
clause.  However, Deger notes that an unnamed "official source" in 
Paris indicated that such a group would only be useful if it focused 
on the social clause within the context of the current environment. 
On the other hand, this official was cited as saying, "France is 
interested in horizontal discussions so that the social clause can 
be the object of consultations in all negotiating groups." (Dian I. 
x36286) (Paris LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES in French 24 May 94 p 6) 
   FRANCE FINDS ALLY IN JAPAN IN SHIPBUILDING--Philippe Moreau, 
writing in LES ECHOS, notes that French shipbuilders, who reacted 
violently" to the U.S. position on subsidies for the shipbuilding 
industry and felt themselves isolated in their fight against a U. S. 
strategy they deemed the "most protectionist on earth," have found 
an ally in Japan.  Because Japan also has protested the U.S. 
position, the French Government has "suddenly" found a new reason to 
intensify its resistance to the U.S. stance, Moreau claims.  He 
cites Prime Minster Edouard Balladur as saying that the U.S. effort 
to protect its shipbuilding industry is "a step backward in regard 
to the initial objectives of the negotiation and is contrary to 
French interests."  Subsequently Balladur stated that the French 
Government would make diplomatic demarches to the EU requesting the 
latter to reject the U.S. position. 
   However, French shipbuilders fear that the French Government will 
be handed a fait accompli by the European Commission, which is 
sensitive to the fact that Denmark, Germany, and Italy are eager to 
conclude an agreement with the United States.  In that case, French 
shipbuilders will not only ask that a "process of ratification be 
acted on in advance but that national compensatory measures be 
prepared" as well.  The shipbuilders would like to reinstate a 
system of "interest advantages" (bonification d'interet) for 
shipping fleets so that "shipping companies can again buy ships in 
France."  (Dian I. x36286) (Paris LES ECHOS in French 19 May 94 p 7) 
   TRADE VERSUS HUMAN RIGHTS VIEWED--Commenting on President Bill 
Clinton's anticipated decision to renew China's Most Favored Nation 
status, Jean-Francois Revel writes in the Paris weekly LE POINT that 
the position generally adopted by democratic leaders who must choose 
between human rights and trade is usually the result of "blackmail" 
by those countries such as China and Vietnam that abuse human 
rights.  Ravel contends that China "ordered" France to cease trading 
with Taiwan, and China is threatening the United States with 
reprisals if its Most Favored Nation status is revoked.  Neither 
Chinese nor Vietnamese concessions, he writes, comprise a solution, 
since authorities in these countries concede to releasing political 
prisoners only to reincarcerate them later to show that they do not 
bow to foreign pressure. 
   In this ongoing "blackmail," Revel argues, democracies should not 
be reproached for defending their interests but for not defending 
them enough.  While Clinton may "give in" to Ghina's blackmail, it 
is actually China that is in the more vulnerable position of the 
two, exporting $30 billion annually to the United States compared 
with the $8.8 billion it imports. (Rosa N. x36287) (Paris LE POINT 
in French 21 May 94 p 45) 
   JAPAN-U.S. TRADE ACCORD DEEMED GOOD FOR EU--Marc Deger, writing 
in LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES, cites unnamed sources at the European 
Commission as saying that "any U.S.-Japan trade agreement which 
opens the Japanese market is good for Europe."  Deger notes that any 
such agreement should respect the principal of Most Favored Nation, 
the basis for GATT, and any market opening promised to the United 
States by the Japanese should also apply to third parties, such as 
the EU.  Deger also cites Peter Gulford, spokesman for Foreign Trade 
Commissioner Leon Brittan, as having "categorically" stated that 
both the United States and Japan have given the EU assurances that 
they will not face discriminatory measures as a result of an 
agreement.  In mid-May during a visit to Paris, Japan's Prime 
Minister Tsutomu Hata said that "Japan will never accept number 
targets.  Any quantitative goal to reduce Japanese trade surplus in 
relation to the United States would lead to managed trade contrary 
to the principles of GATT.  The fact that the United States 
renounced such number targets is positive for France." 
Additionally, Deger contends that the trade negotiations between the 
United States and Japan augur well for the resolution of issues left 
in suspense by the Uruguay Round, especially the issue of financial 
services.  A Japanese-U.S. agreement on this issue will profit 
France, a major provider  of such services. 
   However, Deger points out that the effect of U.S.-Japanese market 
opening negotiations on EU-Japanese trade is not certain.  On the 
one hand, if there is no agreement and the U.S. market closes its 
doors to Japanese trade, the EU will feel more pressure from 
Japanese imports.  On the other hand, even if the Japanese 
Government opens its market to everyone, it cannot control whose 
imports Japanese businessmen will buy, "probably those of the United 
States," according to unnamed sources in Paris cited by Deger. (Dian 
I. x36286) (Paris LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES in French 25 May 94 p 3) 
   COMMENTARY ON AGRICULTURE MARKET SHARE, GATT EFFECTS--A 
commentary by Nadege Forestier in LE FIGARO states that to maintain 
France's worldwide market share in agriculture despite the 
constraints of GATT, the French Government should consider exporting 
its agriculture "without restitution."  Forestier points out that 
the importance of agriculture exports to France in large measure 
prompted the turmoil over reduced export subsidies under the GATT 
agreement.  However, Forestier counters that in reality, the impact 
of these measures is less than it seems.  According to the 
Agriculture Ministry's "Information Bulletin," the GATT accord only 
directly involves 4 percent of the value of France's agriculture and 
food processing production.  Moreover, only 20 percent of production 
is exported and 70 percent of exports are for EU countries. 
   In Agricultural Minister Jean Puech's view, the GATT accords and 
the lower export subsidies must not impede France from maintaining 
and developing its market share.  To do so, two conditions must be 
met, according to Puech.  First, certain Community rules must be 
changed to be able to produce and export "without restitution and 
without government aid."  Secondly, farmers must be able to work at 
marginal cost."  Forestier explains that this means the cost of 
farming must be paid for by sales of subsidized products in a way 
which would allow supplementary quantities to be produced less 
expensively.  These in turn would be able to be exported outside the 
EU without restitution.  Grain growers, who are mainly involved, 
would not be hostile to this, Puech believes, adding that the 
government will debate this strategy at the beginning of this 
summer.  (Dian I. X36286) (Paris LE FIGARO Le Fig-Eco supplement in 
French 18 May 94 p II) 
   ALPHANDERY REVISES STATUTES FOR FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS--On 25 May 
Economy Minister Edmond Alphandery presented to the Council of 
Ministers a bill to revise several statutes governing financial 
institutions in France.  The bill adheres to a EU directive which 
will come into force in July 1995.  It will require all credit 
establishments in France to provide a "guarantee system."  The 
details of the system will be established by the banking regulatory 
committee, which will set the threshold of guarantee  protection at 
400,000 francs (Fr).  Additionally, in case of the bankruptcy and 
liquidation of a credit establishment, the bill will give full 
authority for management and direction of the failed company to the 
administrator appointed by the Banking Commission in order to avoid 
any conflict between him and the former directors.  The following 
are other provisions of the bill: 
   -- The general directors of the Credit National bank will be 
named by its board rather than the Council of Ministers. 
Additionally, its governing statutes no longer need approval by the 
Council of State. 
   -- Companies will be regulated by a specialized financial 
institution, the Entrepreneurs Office, rather than a suboffice for 
accounting.  Again, the president of the Entrepreneurs Office will 
be selected by its board. 
   -- As part of the reform of the Bank of Deposits and 
Consignments, its director general will be named for a duration of 
five years rather than an unlimited term.  For the current director, 
Philippe Lagayette, his two years as president will be taken into 
count. 
   -- Banking statutes will redefine a mission for the small 
business service, matched with a Fr50O-million share of Small and 
Medium-Sized Business Equipment Credit (CEPME's) company's Fr1- 
billion capital increase.  The bill will also establish a National 
Forecast Office for the stock exchange.  It will also establish a 
central office for savings banks. 
   -- The bill will reinforce protection for insurees and 
depositors.  It intends to establish a mechanism to monitor 
reinsurers and will monitor insurance groups on a consolidated 
basis.  It will also provide reinforced protection for those insured 
under group insurance contracts.  (Dian I. x36286) (Paris LES ECHOS 
in French 26 May 94 p 4) 
   REACTION TO FEDERAL RESERVE INTEREST RATE HIKE--An article in the 
Paris financial daily LES ECHOS on 18 May commented that the 
reversal" in the position of the Clinton administration regarding 
the advisability of raising the U.S. discount rate came as a result 
of the pressure of a very strong correction in the U.S. bond market. 
Previous rate hikes by the Federal Reserve had not stabilized the 
financial markets because of statements by members of the 
administration which pointed out the weak level of inflation or 
minimized the rate of growth, according to the article.  In addition 
to the Clinton administration's "poor understanding of the debt 
market reactions" effect on the dollar, the administration further 
affected the value of the dollar by its attempts to raise the value 
of the yen in order to reduce Japanese trade surpluses.  The 
turnabout by the White House on this issue was "spectacularly" 
confirmed on 17 May by Clinton's main economic adviser, Laura Tyson, 
who indicated in an interview with THE WASHINGTON POST that the 
political situation in Japan could lead to loosening pressure in the 
framework of negotiations on market opening. 
   Clinton's reversal and the Federal Reserve hike should have 
increased the value of the dollar or at least stabilized it.  The 
article explains that this did not happen because the market, 
overheated by a year and a half of a policy which undermined the 
credibility of the Federal Reserve, distrusted the White House's 
recent policy conversion.  Alternatively, the article suggests that 
the markets may have opted primarily for an economic reading of the 
dollar-mark exchange rate course. (Dian I. x36286) (Paris LES ECHOS 
in French 18 May 94 p 28) 
   FRAMATOME PRIVATIZATION TO BE DELAYED--An article in LES ECHOS 
reports that any privatization of the nuclear energy manufacturer 
Framatome through an Alcatel-Alsthom buyout is not likely.  To 
explain, the French Government has given the "pretext" that it wants 
a fuller analysis of the possible social consequences of such a 
buyout.  The article notes that the explanation seems paradoxical 
since Framatome's privatization had been considered almost certain 
after the current government majority fared well in legislative 
elections last year, particularly since the Framatome buout was a 
small operation. 
   Despite the government's explanation, the failure apparently was 
caused by financial considerations.  The government wanted Alcatel- 
Alsthom to acquire 51 percent of Framatome at market prices.  But 
Alcatel-Alsthom President Pierre Suard was reticent to spend any 
more than strictly necessary to purchase Credit Lyonnais and Atomic 
Energy Commission (CEA), which in turn would allow him control of 
Framatome.  Suard's reticence came from his view that Framatome was 
a group with little prospect of increasing its profits in the 
future.  However, there was little disagreement among the 
negotiating parties that the government retain a right of veto over 
Framatome's foreign operations, similar to that exercised within oil 
companies Elf and Total.  With Framatome, this mechanism would apply 
particularly to any exports of nuclear technology to countries 
presenting security risks or converting civilian nuclear 
CAPABILITIES TO MILITARY USE.  (Dian I. x36286) (Paris LES ECHOS in 
French 25 May 94 p 25) 
   COFACE TO RETAIN PUBLIC MISSION--According to Georges Quioc, 
writing in LE FIGARO, France's main export trade credit insurer, 
Coface, will continue to insure government export credits despite 
having become privatized.  To resolve this apparent contradiction, 
the government has just modified the insurance code, published in 
the 15 May "Official Journal," to allow the government to retain 
supervisory rights over Co face management as well as over the 
nomination of its directors.  The modification decree has also 
confirmed the appointment of two government commissioners who will 
sit on Coface's board.  They will attend all board meetings and will 
exercise the right of veto on the nominations of the president and 
director general of COFACE.  (Dian I. x36286) (Paris LE FIGARO Le 
Fig-Eco supplement in French 18 May 94 p VI) 
   ECONOMIC ESPIONAGE TO INTENSIFY--An article in the paris daily 
liberation states that a report by former aerospatiale head henri 
martre on economic espionage indicates this "neglected field" is on 
the verge of "receiving a boost."  Martre, now in charge of the 
general planning commissariat, stressed that this field has become 
an essential lever to help competitiveness and employment."  Except 
for those firms working in sensitive scientific and technical 
industries, French business is not as well equipped to ferret out 
information as its Japanese, U.S., or German competitors. 
   However, Martre stated that economic intelligence--now called 
"technological monitoring"--is gaining ground.  As an example, the 
Society of Competitive Intelligence Professionals (SCIP), an 
affiliate of a U.S. company and an association whose members include 
firms practicing economic intelligence, now has 80 members in 
France.  Among them is the Elf Aquitaine oil company and Syntelabo, 
the pharmaceutical lab of the L'0real group, which in 1989 
established an 18-member office responsible for coordinating 
information collected throughout the world.  This office not only 
scans scientific magazines but garners important information from 
seminars, where researchers are eager to disclose the result of 
their research to prevent colleagues from claiming it for 
themselves.  In addition to their own resources, companies 
interested in economic intelligence often resort to private 
investigative firms, which now number about 15 in France, the most 
important of which is the SCRL (expansion unknown), an affiliate of 
the French Foreign Trade Insurance-Credit Company (Coface) and the 
Edmond de Rothschild financial company.  These companies have 
bankers, chambers of commerce, and lawyers as clients and claim they 
only seek information by legal means.  However, the present trend 
for economic intelligence leans toward so-called "tactical 
information" gathering, which is still in an "embryonic" stage and 
more difficult because it is "more confidential."  Its confidential 
nature may sometimes compel detectives or former intelligence 
operatives seeking it to "use illegal means," the Martre report 
stressed.  (Rosa M. x36287) (Paris LIBERATION in French 24 May 94 p 
10) 
   GERMANY 
   BUNDESBANK REPORT REJECTS DEVALUATION--German industry suffered a 
decline in competitiveness at the beginning of the 1990's but has 
recently improved its performance, according to the Bundesbank's 
latest monthly report.  The Bundesbank attributed this improvement 
to smaller wage increases, progress in fighting inflation and 
changes in currency exchange rates.  In the same report, the 
Bundesbank rejected using interest rate reductions to devalue the 
German mark and gain a relative price advantage over foreign 
competitors.  The bank's view is that the competitiveness of any 
economy ultimately depends on ''fundamental preconditions,'' such as 
an  appropriate" wage policy, a tax policy oriented toward 
competition, and the reduction of regulations and other bureaucratic 
hindrances.  (Rick H. x36504) (Frankfurt/Main FRANKFURTER ALLGEMEINE 
in German 19 May 94 p 16) 
   ABB HEAD ON INVESTMENT IN RUSSIA--Eberhard von Koerber, head of 
German operations for the international conglomerate Asea Brown 
Boveri (ABB), has noted the potential for increased German 
investment in Russia in several sectors, countering a recent 
internal Economics Ministry report which warned against investing in 
Russia because of the economic downturn there.  Von Koerber 
remarked, for example, that major projects were discussed during 
Russian President Boris Yeltsin's recent visit to Germany, which 
included the expansion of a high-quality rail line to Russia, a 
high-speed rail line from St. Petersburg to Moscow, a highway from 
Berlin to Moscow, a new natural gas pipeline from Russia to Germany 
via Belarus and Poland, an expanded telecommunications network, and 
an effort to conserve energy in power plants.  According to a 
separate Bundesbank report, German investment in Russia was 31 
million German marks (DM) in 1993, while Russian investment in 
Germany was DM153 million, a disparity Yeltsin cited as an 
indication of the need for increased German investment.  (Charles W. 
x365O7) (Frankfurt/Main FRANKFURTER ALLGEMEINE in German 16 May 94 p 
15) 
   GREECE 
   NEW MINISTER OF ECONOMY VIEWED--In an article in the 6 May issue 
of I KATHIMERINI, Andonis Karakousis writes that new Minister of 
National Economy Yiannos Papandoniou is a "methodical Europeanist 
with a good team, who is relatively acceptable to the Panhellenic 
Socialist Movement (PASOK) and who maintains good connections with 
the business world."  In addition, Karakousis continued, Papandoniou 
is experienced in public finances and increasingly aware of the need 
to reduce budget deficits by stamping out tax evasion and reducing 
government spending.  Finally, Papandoniou's longtime experience in 
foreign trade is expected to sharpen his interest in developing 
trade and investment with the Balkans and, more generally, East 
European countries. 
   However, Karakousis contended, Papandoniou has some obstacles to 
overcome.  He lacks the clout and power of his predecessor, the late 
Yiorgos Yennimatas, who was PASOK's number two man.  Papanoniou will 
also have to contend with the increasing independence of the 
Ministry of Finance, which will not willingly accept a Papandoniou 
intervention in its policies.  However, Papandoniou has a sense of 
diplomacy and he enjoys good relations with most government 
officials which should make his task easier, Karakousis commented. 
He added that Yennimatas's "old guard" is being replaced by a new 
generation of technocrats with a strong pro-European tilt who will 
show increased sensitivity to the need for economic policy 
stabilization. 
   An article in the 8 May issue of I KATHIMERINI characterizes 
those who entered the National Economy Ministry with Papandoniou as 
technocrats who are between 30 and 40 and hold modern views on the 
functioning of the economy. They include (full first names are 
unknown): 
   -- Y. Kandhalepas, secretary general for international economic 
relations who is expected to assume larger responsibilities. 
   -- I. Stournaras, a Bank of Greece official and member of the 
council of economic experts, who is a specialist in monetary 
affairs. 
   -- I. Tsamourkelis, in charge of plans for the partial 
privatization of the Greek Telecommunications Organization (0TE). 
   -- K. Lambropoulos, a specialist in exports and trade with the 
Balkans. 
   -- St. Avgouleas and I. Geivelis, advisers who are alternate 
directors of the European Union (EU) office in Athens. 
   -- M. Papaioannou, secretary general of the ministry, a holdover 
from the previous administration whose resignation Papandoniou 
rejected to avoid creating the impression he is "purging" 
Yennimatas's aides and changing policy.  (Rosa M. x36287) (Athens I 
KATHIMERINI in Greek 8 May 94 p 46; 6 May 94 p 21) 
   DELAYS SEEN IN PRIVATIZATIONS--According to an article in TO VIMA 
TIS KIRIAKIS, the privatization of government-owned companies is 
turning into an intragovernmental controversy.  Although an 
announcement is expected soon on the sale of 30 percent of the Greek 
Telecommunications Organization (OTE) to the two foreign companies 
chosen by the previous government, other sales are not going as 
well.  In fact, even the sale of small, failing companies will be 
"dangerously delayed."  Moreover, while certain government officials 
are promoting plans for the sale of 10 percent of the Public 
Petroleum Company, others are "dragging their feet" on the 
Skaramangas shipyards' partial privatization, to which the Greek 
Government has already obligated itself to the Community.  In 
addition, the Bank of Greece clashed with the Ministry of Industry 
over its continuing to inject new government capital into debt- 
ridden government-owned companies. (Rosa M. x36287) (Athens TO VIMA 
TIS KIRIAKIS in Greek 15 May 94 p D1) 
   TRADE UNIONS LOSING GROUND--An article in TA NEA reports that 
workers are leaving trade unions in droves, mainly in the private 
sector, confirming the Greeks' disaffection toward trade union 
activity.  According to polls conducted over a number of years, an 
overwhelming majority of the workers believes that trade unions are 
not taking workers' interests to heart and some 86 percent of the 
workers think that trade unions have become too partisan.  Figures 
show that of the 2 million private sector workers, only 350,000 
belong to unions and that in the four-year period between 1989 and 
1992, the number of workers participating in trade union elections 
dropped 14.5 percent.  In contrast, civil service trade unions are 
flourishing, with 85 to 90 percent of public workers unionized and 
most of them participating in trade union elections.  (Rosa M. 
x36287) (Athens TA NEA in Greek 3 May 94 p 51) 
   ITALY 
   REACTION TO FEDERAL RESERVE RATE INCREASE--Washington 
correspondent Ennio Caretto, writing in the Milan daily CORRIERE 
DELLA SERA on 18 May, characterized the Federal Reserve's rate 
increase on 17 Nay as a "knockout punch" and as totally unexpected. 
Caretto wrote that the Federal Reserve  tried to justify its 
"historic change of position"--signalling the end of low-cost money 
in the United States--with the necessity to control inflation and 
strengthen economic expansion.  According to Caretto, President 
Clinton sided with Federal Reserve Chairman Allen Greenspan "but 
only formally."  In doing so, Caretto claimed Clinton was trying to 
keep his policy disagreement with Greenspan from becoming public and 
to dissipate the suspicion that the economy is entering a stagnant 
phase.  However, Caretto added, future events may threaten to dispel 
Clinton's "forced optimism" and expose the disagreement between the 
two, who until now had worked together to reduce the deficit.  Since 
Greenspan has frustrated Clinton's policy of lower interest rates, 
Caretto said, pursuing the opposite strategy and pulling the whole 
system along, Clinton, "finding himself with his back to the wall, 
may decide to get rid of the 'friend/enemy' Greenspan." 
   An article in the Turin daily LA STAMPA on 19 May reported the 
comments of new Treasury Minister Lamberto Dlni and others. 
According to Dini, Italy and other European countries should not be 
concerned about the recent Federal Reserve rate increase because it 
was the right decision to control inflation.  The article pointed 
out that for once industrialists, bankers, and economists are in 
full accord.  Cesare Romiti, Fiat CEO, agrees the decision was 
intended to control inflation, while Mario Sarcinelli, president of 
the Banca Nazionle del Lavoro (BNL), stated that the rate increase 
confirmed the distancing of U.S.'s monetary policy from that of 
European central banks. 
   In Rome's daily LA REPUBBLICA on 18 May, Vincenzo Nigro commented 
that not everything is working out as planned for U.S. monetary 
policy.  Nigro stated that the Federal Reserve and especially the 
Clinton administration have pondered long and hard over the 
necessity of cooling off an inflation that does not yet exist.  Many 
observers, however, have begun to think that Greenspan is "fighting 
a ghost."  If Greenspan sees a ghost, Nigro said, there is not much 
Clinton can do about it, despite the fact it may slow down the 
economic recovery he was hoping would heat up and strengthen by the 
1996 elections.  Since Clinton cannot use government spending to 
stimulate the economy, some people believe the peace between him and 
Greenspan is destined to be brief, Nigro notes.  He concluded, "This 
can only create new problems for the U.S. economy.  It is a vicious 
circle."  For this reason, Clinton and his advisers have let it 
discreetly be known that they do not understand why Greenspan and 
his aides believe interest rate increases are in order. (Anilla B. 
x36283) 
   Arguments Against Government Economic Program--Maurizio 
Valentini, writing in Rome's L'ESPRESSO, points out several reasons 
why Prime Minister Silvio Berlusconi's economic program is doomed to 
failure, since in Valentini's opinion, all of its provisions would 
lead to inflation.  A major aim of the program is to replace 
gradually direct taxes with indirect ones.  Experts at the National 
Institute for the Study of the Economy (ISC0) say such a move would 
cause inflation because each percentage point rise in indirect taxes 
adds that percentage point to the price of consumer goods.  In 
addition, switching from direct to indirect taxes would immediately 
allow the wage earners more money to spend, increasing domestic 
demand, which in turn would risk increasing prices. 
   According to Massimo Russo, head of the European Area of the 
International Monetary Fund, "Italy's major economic risk comes from 
government spending because budgetary maneuvering room to stimulate 
the economy is absolutely nonexistent."  Valentini interprets this 
to mean that the only thing Berlusconi can do is to follow the 
program set out by the governments of his predecessors Giulio Amato 
and Carlo Azeglio Ciampi.  However, Valentini doubts Berlusconi can 
follow such a rigid plan because the last interest rate drop, which 
followed that of the German Bundesbank, will probably be the last 
one for a long time, since higher U.S. interest rates will dictate 
against another such move. 
   According to former Industry Minister Paolo Savona, a possible 
Berlusconi intervention in the country's economy that was not 
strictly tied to improved international competitiveness would only 
increase the national debt, which would give the international 
markets the "umpteenth proof" of Italian unreliability.  Valentini 
stresses how disastrous this would be, after Italy's economic image 
took an upswing in the past two years thanks to the policies of 
Amato and Ciampi.  This improved international image has brought 
foreign capital into the country, alleviating the national debt. 
Reversing those policies now would have the opposite effect: less 
and more expensive capital.  "In other words, Berlusconi cannot work 
an Italian miracle," Valentini concludes, "because the biggest 
miracle, that of restoring confidence in the Italian economy, has 
already been provided by Amato and Ciampi."  (Anilla B. x36283) 
(Rome L'ESPRESSO in Italian 20 May 94 pp 49-51) 
   TALK OF EMS REENTRY 'THREATENS' EXPORTS--According to an article 
by Danilo Taino in Milan's CORRIERE DELLA SERA, recent talk of the 
lira reentering the European Monetary System (EMS) is threatening 
the benefits of an undervalued lira and low inflation.  Since the 
lira left the EMS in September of 1992, a part of the Italian 
economy has been able to export  "massively," with an 
"extraordinary" price flexibility, to half of the world's markets, 
while other European countries are struggling to export anything. 
Although Prime Minister Silvio Berlusconi has said he is in no hurry 
to rejoin the EMS, in a recent radio interview he stated that he was 
thinking about it and that current foreign exchange market 
conditions indicate it would be possible.  Such a statement, Taino 
claims, strikes terror in the hearts of many businessmen and draws 
the interest of speculators. 
   Those who have debated EMS reentry include: 
   -- Mario Monti, dean of the Bocconi University, who thinks the 
lira could reenter on a central parity that would not undervalue it 
and that would stimulate Italy's economic structure to become 
competitive for its own merits and not thanks to favorable exchange 
rates. 
   -- Innocenzo Cipolletta, director of Confindustria, is convinced 
the lira, as it now stands, is compatible with economic and monetary 
convergence with other European countries.  However, before 
reentering the EMS, he believes Italy's interest rates should be in 
line with those of the other member states and not higher, as is now 
the case. 
   -- Bruno Rambaudi, owner of a major machine tool company, said 
that leaving the EMS was the element which allowed Italian industry 
to remain functional during the recession and to launch a recovery. 
He said reentry would be possible if inflation and the cost of money 
were realigned with those of other EMS members, the cost of labor 
remained under control, and the fight against the deficit continued. 
   -- Gabriel Stein, an economist with London's Lombard Street 
Research company, believes reentering the EMS would be foolish and 
finds comfort in the fact that Foreign Minister Antonio Martini is 
anti-EMS.  In Stein's opinion, the friction in the government 
between the National Alliance and the Northern League could bring on 
a crisis at any moment and being in the EMS under these conditions 
could prove to be dangerous.  Besides, Stein questions the need to 
reenter the EMS since the Italian economy is doing well. 
   -- Gilberto Gabrielli, a professor at Bocconi University and 
manager of one of Milan's major securities houses, said that 
Berlusconi's discussion of EMS reentry was more political than 
economic.  Gabrielli said that before talking about the virtues of 
Europe, he would like to see the economic results of the first half 
year.  (Anilla B. x36283) (Milan CORRIERE DELLA SERA in Italian 15 
May 94 p 17) 
   PORTUGAL 
   BANK OF PORTUGAL, MINISTRY OF FINANCE CONFLICT--According to 
Virgilio Azevedo, writing in the 14 May Lisbon weekly EXPRESSO, 
Finance Minister  Eduardo Catroga has improved the "calamitous" 
situation he inherited when he took office in December 1993.  At 
that time, fiscal management was "demoralized and discredited," 
budget deficits had surpassed the most pessimistic forecasts, and 
companies used the recession as a pretext to stop their Social 
Security contributions.  Additionally, convergence with the EU was 
"seriously threatened" by an economic crisis that the former finance 
minister had been "totally unable" to manage which resulted in an 
"open war" between the ministry and the Bank of Portugal over the 
bank's independence in setting monetary policy. 
   Azevedo comments that Catroga's willingness to acknowledge the 
government's responsibility for the recession has earned good will 
and that fiscal reform has increased revenues by 250 million contos 
in the first quarter of this year.  Moreover, interest rates are 
clearly on a downward trend and Catroga is studying various measures 
to strengthen the capital market.  Azevedo contends that the "most 
radical and obvious" solution is for Bank of Portugal Governor 
Miguel Beleza, who has confided to close aides that he will resign 
unless the situation improves, to define clearly his institution's 
independence and reach a consensus with the government. 
   An article in the Lisbon weekly O INDEPENDENTE maintains that 
tensions continue in the Bank of Portugal between Beleza and those 
members of the bank's administrative council appointed by the former 
finance minister.  The article claims that Beleza intends to bring 
the conflict to Prime Minister Anibel Cavaco Silva's arbitration. 
Meanwhile, the bank and the government's forecasts for inflation and 
economic growth do not agree; the bank believes inflation will be 6 
percent by the end of the year and the government forecasts 4 to 5.5 
percent.  Similarly, the Bank of Portugal expects GDP to grow by 1 
percent this year while the government forecasts a 1- to 2-percent 
growth.  (Rosa M. x36187) (Lisbon EXPRESSO in Portuguese 14 May 94 p 
3; Lisbon O INDEPENDENTE in Portuguese 20 May 94 p 7) 
   SWEDEN 
   COUNTRY SEEN AS URUGUAY ROUND WINNER--According to Mikael 
Lindstrom, a member of the Swedish delegation to GATT in Geneva, 
Sweden may be the country that benefits most from the recently 
concluded GATT agreement.  In particular, the steel, 
pharmaceuticals, construction, and furniture industries are favored 
by the accord.  The eight products on which tariffs will be 
completely eliminated (steel, pharmaceuticals, medical equipment, 
construction material, farm machinery, furniture, beer, and liquor) 
are all areas in which Sweden has a comparative advantage.  These 
goods, plus chemicals (where tariffs will be lowered over a 10-year 
period), account for 25 percent of Sweden's industrial exports.  The 
pharmaceuticals industry, in fact, sells 90 percent of its 
production abroad.  Pharmaceuticals exports, which have been hurt by 
competition from cheap imitation drugs, will also benefit from new 
patent and copyright rules.  Lindstrom also believes that the 
Uruguay Round's stricter anti-dumping regulations and new mechanism 
for settling disputes will also "make the situation brighter for 
Swedish steel companies."  The new methods for resolving 
disagreements will make it more difficult for large countries to 
discriminate against smaller ones like Sweden, according to 
Lindstrom.  Truck and stereo manufacturers and the paper industry 
will also benefit from a one-third reduction of tariffs on other 
manufactured goods.  (Wendy S. x365O6) (Stockholm SVENSKA DAGBLADET 
in Swedish 16 Apr 94 p 30) 
   STUDY FINDS BOTTLENECKS ENDANGERING RECOVERY--According to a 
study by the Industry Association (SI), industrial cutbacks made 
during 1990-93 have resulted in bottlenecks which now threaten 
Sweden's ongoing economic recovery.  During the recent recession, 
many Swedish firms, instead of letting machines lie idle, 
disassembled them and sold them abroad, notably to China, Poland and 
the Baltic states.  SI head Magnus Lemmel estimates that Sweden lost 
about 15 percent of its industrial capacity this way.  As a result, 
the percentage of Sweden's GDP contributed by industry has fallen to 
about 18 percent--below the OECD requirement for an industrialized 
country--and imports have risen drastically as production has moved 
overseas.  Industrial investments are now increasing by about 20 
percent, but the SI cautions that it may be too late: Even if this 
rate of investment continues, it will take about a decade to recoup 
the lost capacity.  (Wendy S. x36506) (Stockholm SVENSKA DAGBLADET 
in Swedish 4 May 94 p 27) 
   DANGER OF BRAIN DRAIN CITED--More highly educated Swedes are 
being lured out of the country by higher-paying jobs and a greater 
salary differential in job rankings.  The head of the Industrial 
Research Institute, Gunnar Eliasson, claims that the Swedish wage 
differential is too low and that the tax system equalizes income too 
much.  According to a study by the consulting firm Human Resources 
Services (HRS), a chief executive officer in Sweden makes nine times 
as much as an industrial worker; in the United States and Asia this 
ratio is 25 to 1.  Workers of the new generation, Eliasson points 
out, are more mobile than their predecessors and the European 
Economic Area (EEA) agreement will further internationalize the 
labor market.  Eliasson predicts a crisis if only "1 percent of the 
country's best-educated workers leave."  Anders Tapper of HRS does 
not believe the situation is as serious as Eliasson maintains but 
does foresee a risk "that companies such as Ericsson, Astra, and 
Pharmacia will lose their best researchers."  Tapper also believes 
there could be an immigration into Sweden of less-educated workers 
willing to work for lower wages.  (Wendy x36506) (Stockholm DAGENS 
NYHETER in Swedish 10 May 94 p 33) 
   TURKEY 
   CETIN DISCUSSES BSEC ADVANTAGES--Foreign Affairs Minister Hikmet 
Cetin, in an open letter to Turkey's business community published in 
DUNYA SURVEY, touted the advantages of the Black Sea Economic 
Corporation (BSEC) for Turkish private business.  He noted that 
BSEC, a private corporation established and primarily run by Turkey 
with Turkish personnel, plays an important role in the country's 
foreign policy and stated that the Foreign Ministry was ready to 
cooperate and support any commercial efforts undertaken through the 
BSEC.  Cetin pointed out that the Black Sea region has a market of 
some $300 million with a need for all kinds of goods and with more 
modest needs compared with the higher standards required by Western 
markets.  He also claimed that the region has remarkable 
infrastructure needs, such as harbors, roads, airports, 
communication networks, energy systems, pipelines, dams, housing 
construction, and tourism, providing Turkish companies with a 
variety of business possibilities. (Ender C. x36285) (Istanbul DUNYA 
SURVEY in English Mar 30 94 p 1) 
   ECONOMIC BRIEFS 
   France 
   --Oil company Elf has begun construction on ultramodern refinery 
at Leuna in eastern Germany...recently controversial issue when Elf 
attempted to reduce its commitment; project largest French 
investment in Germany since World War II. (LE FIGARO 26 May 94 p IV) 
   --Leclerc tank manufacturer Giat Industries has again requested 
capital infusion of Fr2 billion from French Government which denied 
previous requests... prospects better now since Giat increased 
productivity 5 percent per year, pursued alliances with UK's Royal 
Ordnance, Germany's Krauss-Maffei, pleasing Defense Ministry. (LE 
FIGARO 25 May 94 p VII) 
   Greece 
   --Prospects for this year's tourism income encouraging with 
arrivals expected to exceed 1993 figures by 10 
percent.. .satisfactory tourism climate reportedly stemming from 
significant problems affecting tourism in Turkey.  (TO VIMA TIS 
KIRIAKIS 8 May p D18) 
   Portugal 
   --New 65-million conto energy program to be launched with EU 
assistance to reduce dependence on oil. .. possible additional 35 
million to be devoted to introduction of natural gas. . .government 
betting on alternative energy sources.  (Lisbon EXPRESSO 14 May 94 p 
1) 
   --Recent EXPRESSO/Euroexpansa0 poll of 170 businessmen shows 
first signs of economic recovery to be clearly emerging. .. 39.8 
percent say economy has improved, 47.2 percent expect continued 
improvement over next three months, 63.9 percent over next 
year... increase demand for Portuguese goods, official launching of 
various EU integrated programs opened new investment opportunities, 
contributing to optimism. (EXPRESSO 7 May 94 p 5) 
   Turkey 
   --State Minister Akyon Dogan, briefing Motherland Party 
deputy chair about IMF talks, stated rise of Prosperity Party, 
Islamic threat in Turkey were reasons for IMF's positive approach to 
Economic Stability Package.  (CUMHURIYET 2 May 94 p 1) 
   --Public Partnership Administration Chairman Tezcan 
Yaramanci stated World Bank's International Finance Corporation 
(IFC) made offer to buy 15 percent of Turkish Airlines...added offer 
being reviewed.  (CUMHURIYET 3 May 94 p 1) 
   --Deputy Undersecretary of Prime Ministry Osman Unsal 
stated bank failures were caused by liquidity problems, not 
imbalance between active, passive investments...Unsal saw no need to 
magnify this, noting banks foreclosed everywhere, including Europe, 
United States. (CUMHURIYET 4 May 94 p 1) 
ELAG/02 JUNE/ECONF/WED CS 03/1658Z JUN 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23090 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000030694001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   5 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-3JUN94-CHINA 
<H3> <TI>      Beijing Sends Mixed Signals on Planning Commission Reform </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Beijing Sends Mixed Signals on Planning Commission Reform </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                             Apparently reflecting mounting pressure on China's reformers to 
moderate the pace of the ambitious new market reforms endorsed by 
the Third Plenum of the 14th Central Committee last fall, recent 
regulations charting a new role for the State Planning Commission 
(SPC) include only modest steps toward limiting the commission to 
broad oversight of the economy and fall far short of the 
reformers' goal of strictly curbing its direct administrative 
authority.  Despite this setback, reformers show no sign of 
having modified their goals and will likely continue to press for 
market-based changes in the planning system. 
                      END SUMMARY 

Although the new State Council regulations, entitled the "Program 
Governing the Disposition of Functions, Establishment of Internal 
Organs, and Size of Staff in the State Planning Commission," do 
not mandate a sharp reduction in SPC administrative powers as 
suggested in the Third Plenum "decision" and leadership 
statements last year, they do indicate the reformers' progress in 
changing the overall role of the commission.  Announced by Xinhua 
on 9 May, the regulations reduce SPC personnel by a third and 
embrace the reformist goal of transforming the commission into a 
mechanism for strategic planning and setting general industrial 
policy.  They call for the SPC to "propose strategic targets and 
major . . . policies" for economic development and to "formulate 
state industrial policies and coordinate and supervise their 
implementation."  The regulations also direct the SPC to provide 
more forecasting, monitoring, and analysis of economic conditions 
and to generate "economic information."  Underscoring the reform 
aspect of the regulations, SPC Vice Minister Gui Shiyong was 
quoted in the English-language China Daily on 30 May as claiming 
that "planning groups have shifted their function to broad 
oversight of the economy" and that the reform "aims to replace 
most administrative controls with economic regulations." 
   Retention of Major Administrative Power 
   However, despite the inclusion of these reforms, the new 
regulations do not appear to significantly limit the SPC's power 
over financial policy, development planning, and capital 
investment decisions as called for by the plenum and an SPC- 
sponsored national planning conference held last December.  In 
particular, they are not consistent with the plenum's goal of 
shifting responsibility for finance policy and state investment 
decisions from the SPC and other planning agencies to state 
enterprises and to a reformed banking system.  In addition, the 
regulations appear to endorse a continued role for the SPC in 
short-term planning. 
   -- Finance Policy.  With the issuance of the new regulations 
Beijing has backed away from previous plans to create 
institutional checks on the SPC's role in financial policy. 
Under the new regulations, the SPC appears to have overall 
authority for financial policy.  According to Xinhua, the 
commission will "coordinate" finances, credit, interest rates, 
prices, tax rates, exchange rates, and other economic "levers" 
(Xinhua, 9 May).  The regulations also called for the SPC to 
retain its strong role in price regulation, directing it to 
"supervise" and "check" prices and keep the general price level 
"under control."  By contrast, the plenum had implicitly endorsed 
important limits on the SPC's monopolistic control over finance, 
calling for a system in which "planning, banking, and public 
finance" are "coordinated" and "mutually check" each other. (16 
November 1993). 
   -- Development Planning.  The regulations also appear to give the 
SPC a larger role in the specifics of development planning than 
did the planning conference.  According to the 9 May Xinhua 
account of the regulations, the SPC is responsible for "long- 
term, intermediate, and annual" plans covering a broad range of 
economic issues.  By contrast, a Xinhua report on last year's 
planning conference stated that the new planning system would 
focus on "medium- and long-term planning as the mainstay" (8 
December 1993). 
   -- Investment Decisionmaking.  Finally, the regulations fall 
short of the sweeping "investment reform" called for by the 
plenum and last year's planning conference, giving the SPC the 
authority to determine the "sources" of capital and where that 
capital should be invested and to include not just large "key" 
state projects in the annual plan but also a variety of other 
projects.  By contrast, the plenum had assigned enterprises and 
new commercial banks a major role in making investment decisions 
in areas not included in large state-funded projects.  In 
addition, while the planning conference had said that the state 
would continue to "indirectly" determine the total volume of 
investment, it had also declared that the market must be given 
"full scope" in regulating investment and that enterprises should 
enjoy "full authority" in making investment decisions (Xinhua, 8 
December 1993).  Moreover, Vice Premier Zou Jiahua, in a speech 
at the conference, had also promoted the "risk-based" investment 
system that had been endorsed at the plenum, which would allow 
market principles to play the primary role in investment and 
credit allocation (Xinhua, 8 December 1993). 
   Reformer Resolve on Investment 
   In an apparent effort to portray the regulations as a temporary 
setback in the investment reform timetable rather than an 
abandonment of the reformers' goals, SPC Vice Minister Gui 
Shiyong, as cited in the 30 May China Daily article, stated that 
the government would "gradually withdraw investments" in local 
projects.  He also insisted that the new investment system "will 
strengthen the responsibility of enterprises as well as banks" in 
both "decisionmaking power and risk responsibility." 
   Leadership Differences 
   Inconsistent media portrayals of the planning reforms suggest 
that the new regulations represent a compromise between backers 
of senior leader Deng Xiaoping's sweeping market-based reform 
agenda and more cautious central leaders and SPC bureaucrats who 
fear destabilizing economic dislocations and loss of power if the 
SPC's control is radically altered.  For example, a 9 May report 
in Zhongguo Xinwen She, Beijing's press agency for overseas 
Chinese, appeared to take a conservative tack, stressing the 
S?C's continuing power in the central government.  Noting the 
SPC's traditional role as the State Council's "general staff 
headquarters," it stated that the SPC "will remain the highest- 
ranking department for the comprehensive management of the 
national economy."  By contrast, Vice Minister Gui, in his 
remarks carried by the 30 May China Daily, appeared intent on 
putting a reformist spin on the SPC's new role.  Although he 
acknowledged that "the existing planning and investment system 
still fails to meet market requirements," he claimed that the new 
regulations "redefine the robe of planning and investment" and 
that "the connotation of the word 'planning' is changing."  Gui 
went on to assert that under the planning reforms "all that the 
market can manage should be . . . managed by the market" and that 
"planning departments should restrict their activities to those 
that the market cannot do or has failed to do well." 
   Implications 
   Faced with continuing inflationary pressures as a result of 
Deng's fast-growth policies, general leadership concern over the 
potential for social unrest, and pressure from conservative 
leaders and planning bureaucrats to moderate the pace of market 
reform, the reformers appear to have backed away from their 
ambitious goals to strictly curb the power of the SPC.  This bow 
to economic and political realities parallels the apparent 
slowdown in the pace of banking, enterprise, and other reforms 
mandated by the plenum last year.  Despite these formidable 
obstacles, Deng's backers show no sign of having modified their 
reform agenda in principle and will likely continue to press for 
market-based changes when conditions are more in their favor. 
   (AUTHOR:  VOSS.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
CHINA ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6097.) 
EAG/HEBBEL/ta 04/0022z jun 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23091 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000030794001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   5 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-073 
<H3> <TI>      PALESTINIANS: WEST BANK-GAZA DEVELOPMENTS #3 </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       PALESTINIANS: WEST BANK-GAZA DEVELOPMENTS #3 </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
This      Foreign Media Note series contains information on 
developments in West Bank-Gaza politics, economics, agriculture, 
education, and health care from the Palestinian press and the London 
expatriate press. 

   On 23 April it was announced that the Palestinian Center for 
Studies and Information has been established in Bethlehem by the 
Palestinian Democratic Union (FIDA).  The center will be 
administered by the following individuals: 

President--Salih Abu-Laban 
Director of Public Relations and Information--Muhammad Shuraym 
Director of Administrative and Financial Affairs--'Atallah Qattush 
Director of Office Affairs--Muhammad Shahhada 
(Jerusalem AL-NAHAR 24 Apr 94) 

   Center for Palestinian Polls Set Up in Bethlehem 

   The Center for Palestinian Public Opinion Polls (CPP) has been 
established in Bethlehem for the purpose of collecting information 
on social, political, and economic issues.  CPP is a non-profit 
institution and will not deal with religious issues.  Its 
headquarters will be in Bethlehem, and other branches may be opened 
elsewhere in the West Bank and Gaza Strip.  Members of the center's 
board of trustees are: 

President-Dr. Nabil Kukali 
Vice President-Dr. Ziyad al-Ashhab 
Chief Administrator-Professor 'Arif al-Ja'bari 
Assistant Administrator-Engineer 'Isam al-Hayik 
Treasurer-Dr. Walid al-Shumuli 
Assistant Treasurer-Dr. 'Tmad Sulayman al-Mukarkir 
Research and Publication Committee Coordinator-Dr. Usamah Shawan 
Public Relations Committee Coordinator-Professor Sulayman Abu-Diyah 
Information Committee Coordinator-Professor 'Isam Muslih 
Meetings Committee Coordinator-Ahmad 'Abidin 

   Other members of the center include Dr. 'Adnan Muslim, Dr. Ilyas 
Ishaq Ibrahim, Professor George 'Awwad, Professor Urayj 'Azmi al- 
Hamuri, and Professor Hanna Muslih.  (Jerusalem AL-QUDS 16 Apr 94; 
Jerusalem THE JERUSALEM TIMES 22 Apr 94) 

   Palestinian Labor Law Prepared by Arab Labor Organization 

   According to an "informed source" at the Arab University, the 
Arab Labor Organization has finished a Palestinian draft labor law 
at the request of Yasir 'Arafat and with the participation of 
Palestinian parties concerned with labor affairs.  The director of 
the Arab Labor Organization, Bakr Mahmud Rasul, said that the draft 
law contains Il chapters on general laws regarding employment, 
individual work contracts, breaks, vacations, wages, womens' work 
arrangements, accidents, settling work disputes, and collective work 
contracts.  Rasul said that he is currently preparing to draft legal 
rules for the Palestinian Trade Union Organization.  (Jerusalem AL- 
QUDS 11 Apr 94) 

   PLO To Attempt to Unify Palestinian Student Movement 

   Hisam Mahmud Khadr, a member of the executive committtee of the 
PLO's General Union of Palestinian Students and a returnee from 
exile, said that the council's primary task now is to move the 
union's main headquarters officially to Jerusalem and temporarily 
open an office in Jericho in order restore organization to 
Palestinian student ranks in the West Bank, Gaza, and abroad.  The 
union intends to unify the various student groups and bring them 
under its supervision by registering students as union members. 
According to Khadr, who is in charge of the union's Arab nation and 
West Bank-Gaza branches, this unification sends the message from the 
Palestinian leadership that the Palestinian student movements are 
"in the vanguard" of the national movement, and that their 
leadership role requires them to forward the national cause.  He 
said that the union's policy is that the West Bank and Gaza are the 
union's central arenas and that only branches exist abroad.  He 
pledged that there would be democratic dialogue between all 
intellectual and political currents, devoid of fighting of any kind. 
(Jerusalem AL-QUDS 12 Apr 94) 

   Supply Shortage Limits Operations at Gaza Hospital 

   Officials at al-Ahli Arab Hospital in Gaza announced on 15 April 
that all non-emergency surgical operations had been halted due to a 
lack of medicine, solutions, and anesthesia.  According to Dr. 
Zakariya al-Agha, a member of the hospital's administrative 
committee, the hospital is only capable of performing emergency 
operations due to these shortages.  He blames on the Israelis' 
closure of the Gaza border for this situation.  Other sources at the 
hospital said that the Israeli authorities have refused to allow a 
hospital vehicle to enter Israel to obtain supplies.  Another 
"informed Palestinian source" said that a health official has 
ordered Gaza hospitals to stop performing all non-emergency 
operations.  (Jerusalem AL-QUDS 16 Apr 94) 

   Cairo Business Conference Draws 60 From West Bank, Gaza 

   An annual business conference in Cairo drew businessmen from Gaza 
and the West Bank for the first time this April.  In past years, 
Palestinian participation in the conference was limited to managers 
from outside the West Bank and Gaza.  The three-day conference, 
entitled "The Arab Company Manager and the Administration of 
Business Affairs," convened on 16 April.  It was opened by Nabil 
Sha'th, who is the chairman of the Gaza-based company "Tim," and 
included over 700 businessmen from the Arab world.  The conference 
was organized by the Company of Arab Specialists and the "Tim" 
company.  (Jerusalem THE JERUSALEM TIMES 22 Apr 94) 

   Joint Egyptian-Palestinian Company To Invest in Gaza, Jericho 

   The Egyptian company "Arab Contractors" is setting up a joint 
Egyptian-Palestinian company called "Arab Contractors-' Uthman Ahmad 
'Uthman and his al-Fara Partners" to undertake construction projects 
in Gaza and Jericho.  A company official said that "Arab 
Contractors" has also opened an office in Abu-Dhabi at the direction 
of Egyptian President Husni Mubarak to order to expand into the Arab 
world and other markets following the signing of the Gatt agreement. 
(London AL-HAYAH 13 May 94) 

   Palestinian Cement Company Registered in Abu Dhabi 
   Palestinian investors in Abu Dhabi announced on 25 April 
registration of a Palestinian cement company in Nabulus with $35 
million in declared capital, of which $10 million is already funded. 
Engineer Muhammad Ghalib 'Arafat, vice president of the board of 
directors of the temporary company and its general director, said 
that "6 million shares valued at $10 million will be sold on a 
subscription basis, and the subscription price will be one quarter 
of the share value, with the balance payable in quarterly 
installments."  He said that Palestinians with Israeli military 
identification may subscribe directly, while other Palestinians and 
Arabs must subscribe via the firm's offshore office in Britain. 

   The company's headquarters will be in Nabulus and the cement 
factory will be built in east Nabulus.  The company's initial board 
of directors includes Dr. Musaddiq Salim Nasif, who subscribed along 
with 20 other founders for a total of 1 million Jordanian dinars. 
Dr. 'Arafat noted that the company has received a permit from Israel 
in accordance with Israeli military law in the territories and that 
it is supported by Yasir 'Arafat and the Palestinian leadership.  He 
added that an American and a Spanish company have begun the required 
land survey to determine the site of the factory.  (London AL-SHARQ 
AL-AWSAT 26 Apr 94) 

   (QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, AFRICA/LEVANT 
BRANCH AT (703) 733-6408) 
ENEAG/03 Jun/ECONF/NEASA Division/ta 04/0042z jun 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23092 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000030894001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   7 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-06JUN94-CHINA-U. S. 
<H3> <TI>      Beijing Welcomes MFN Decision, Sees Little Impact on Ties </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Beijing Welcomes MFN Decision, Sees Little Impact on Ties </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                                            Although welcoming President Clinton's decision renewing China's 
most-favored-nation (MFN) trading status and delinking the annual 
MFN review from the human rights issue, Beijing has been reserved 
in assessing the prospects for Sino-U.S. ties, suggesting that 
the U.S. decision to retain sanctions and Washington's stance on 
human rights remain obstacles to better ties.  While Beijing has 
indicated its willingness to work to improve bilateral relations, 
it has given no indication of flexibility in meeting U.S. 
concerns on human rights and other issues. 
                                     END SUMMARY 
   Following the pattern set during last year's MFN debate, Beijing 
reacted to the President's 26 May decision by issuing an 
authoritative Foreign Ministry statement as well as a lower-level 
statement by a spokesman from the Ministry of Foreign Trade and 
Economic Cooperation.  Although predictably "welcoming" the 
President's decision, the 27 May statements--which were virtually 
identical in content--suggested that the decision would not lead 
to an immediate improvement in Sino-U.S. relations (Xinhua, 27 
May).  Reflecting this reserved appraisal of the prospects for 
bilateral ties, the Foreign Ministry statement said only that the 
decision would create "favorable conditions" for the "further 
strengthening and expansion" of trade and economic ties and for 
the "overall growth" of the relationship.  The statement went on 
to suggest that obstacles remain to improved Sino-U.S. relations, 
describing the President's decision to retain Washington's 
"existing sanctions" against China and what it claimed were 
"unwarranted charges" by the "U.S. side" concerning China's human 
rights situation as "detrimental" to the development of bilateral 
ties. 
   The statement also reaffirmed the Chinese position, frequently 
voiced in PRC media before the MFN renewal decision, that while 
China desires better ties with the United States, the burden for 
improving bilateral relations rests with Washington.  Pointing 
out that a "historic opportunity" now exists to "enhance" Sino- 
U.S. relations, the statement said that Beijing will "continue to 
make major efforts" to achieve this goal and "hopes" that the 
U.S. Government will adopt a "realistic and forward-looking 
stand" and "take concerted action to show its sincerity for 
enhancing relations."  In particular, the statement said the 
relationship will enjoy "smooth and healthy progress" if both 
sides follow China's longstanding prescription for better 
relations and "strictly abide" by the "guidelines and principles" 
of the three Sino-U.S. joint communiques, "enhance mutual trust, 
reduce troubles, develop cooperation, and refrain from 
confrontation." 
   Sparse Leadership Comment 
   Perhaps reflecting some uncertainty over how to respond to the 
shift in the administration's China policy, Chinese leaders, 
unlike last year, have generally refrained from commenting on the 
decision.  For example, meeting with the president of a U.S. 
securities corporation on 2 June, Premier Li Peng, according to a 
Xinhua account of the meeting, made no mention of the decision, 
even though the U.S. visitor reportedly said that his corporation 
was "very pleased" with the renewal of China's MFN status (2 
June).  Vice President Rong Yiren was also restrained in his 
comments on the decision at a meeting with the visitor on 2 June. 
He reportedly said that the decision was "wise" and "in line with 
the fundamental interests" of the two peoples and "beneficial to 
promoting Sino-U.S. trade and improving and developing" bilateral 
relations (Xinhua, 2 June). 
   In keeping with this circumspect approach to the MFN decision, 
PRC central media have given scant attention to the President's 
decision.  On 26 May Xinhua carried a report on the President's 
announcement that day which took note of the U.S. decision to ban 
the import of Chinese weapons and ammunition, the sanctions to be 
retained, as well as the administration's intention to step up 
"economic, cultural, and educational contacts."  In the days 
immediately following the announcement, Xinhua reported 
subsequent remarks by the President explaining his decision and 
as well as accounts of remarks by Asian leaders and U.S. 
businessmen praising the decision.  A 28 May commentary carried 
by Beijing radio's international English-language service to 
Western North America merely reported the President's 
announcement and replayed the PRC Foreign Ministry statement. 
   Vocal Hong Kong Media 
   PRC-owned Hong Kong media, however, have been vocal in portraying 
the decision as a vindication of Chinese foreign policy.  A 27 
May Hsin Wan Pao article, for example, suggested that China's 
"open and above-board approach" as well as its "opposition to 
U.S. pressures" had "forced the 'turn around'" in the 
administration's China policy and "finally solved" the "problem 
concerning trade" between the two countries.  Similarly, a 
"special article" carried by Zhongguo Tongxun She, a PRC- 
affiliated Hong Kong-based press agency, said that the decision 
showed that Washington's previous policy of "using human rights 
to put pressure" on China had "failed," while "China's policy, 
'with good reason, advantages, and restraint,' has gotten the 
upper hand in the present Sino-U.S. diplomatic dispute." 
   The two PRC-owned Hong Kong dailies, Wen Wei Po and Ta Kung Pao, 
took a slightly different tack and discussed the potential impact 
of the decision on Sino-U.S. ties.  A 28 May editorial in Wen Wei 
Po also suggested that the decision represented a vindication of 
China's foreign policy and noted that the President's decision to 
"change his hegemonist policy" and "adopt a long-range view" is 
an action "worth welcoming," predicting that a "comparatively 
pleasing trend is likely to surface in Sino-U.S. relations in the 
second half of the year."  By contrast, Ta Kung Pao, while 
welcoming the decision, suggested that obstacles remain to better 
bilateral ties.  For example, well-placed commentator Shih Chun- 
yu said in his 28 May column that only if the human rights issue, 
which he called a "hindrance to relations," is removed will the 
"development of Sino-U.S. relations embark on a new and easy 
path."  A day later, veteran Ta Kung Pao commentator Kung Yao-wen 
took an even more pessimistic view of Sino-U.S. relations in the 
wake of the decision, asserting that because of continuing 
problems over human rights, trade, Tibet, and Taiwan, it is 
"unlikely that the United States will rapidly improve its ties 
with China." 
   Outlook 
   While viewing the President's decision renewing China's MFN 
status and delinking the annual MFN review from human rights as a 
positive step toward improving bilateral relations, Beijing has 
made it clear that China's position of opposition to U.S. efforts 
to aggressively address China's human rights situation remains 
unchanged.  Moreover, because of continuing concerns about 
domestic stability, Beijing, buoyed by what it sees as the 
success of its hardline foreign policy, may be less likely to 
take a flexible line in addressing other issues of concern to the 
United States in order to improve bilateral ties. 
   (AUTHOR:  HEBBEL.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
CHINA ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6097.) 
   EAG/HEIPLE JEG 06/2043Z JUN 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23093 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000030994001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   8 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
VIENNA PLEASE PASS TO BOSNIA 
WARNING: DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-07JUN94-BOSNIA 
<H3> <TI>      Bosnia-Herzegovina </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Bosnia-Herzegovina </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
Serbs      Claim UNPROFOR Sides with Bosnian Government Army 
                          SUMMARY 
   Potentially undermining the United Nations' role in 
implementation of peace initiatives in Bosnia-Herzegovina, the 
Serbian leadership and regime-controlled  media in recent weeks 
have repeatedly charged that UNPROFOR (United Nations Protective 
Force) has intervened on the side of the Bosnian Government. 
Such accusations represent a substantial escalation of Serbian 
criticism of UN efforts in Bosnia-Herzegovina.  Previously the 
Serbs had for the most part professed acceptance of UNPROFOR's 
role and activity in the Bosnian conflict, even though they 
complained of UN bias toward the Bosnian Government and misuse of 
humanitarian aid efforts as a cover for smuggling arms to 
Government forces. 
                          END SUMMARY 
   The Serbs' accusations that UNPROFOR was actively engaging in 
combat operations against the Bosnian Serb army were first 
observed after NATO aircraft--with UN authorization--bombed 
Serbian positions near Gorazde in April, an operation that 
appeared to profoundly anger both the Bosnian Serb leadership and 
leaders of the so-called Federal Republic of Yugoslavia.  While 
the reports ostensibly originate with the Bosnian Serbs led by 
Radovan Karadzic, media controlled by Serbian Republic President 
Slobodan Milosevic have played a substantial role in 
disseminating the reports.  However, although some Bosnian Serb 
leaders did threaten that NATO aircraft carrying out UN-approved 
air attacks on Serbian military forces would be fired upon, for 
the most part they have not directly called for striking back at 
UNPROFOR ground forces allegedly aiding the Bosnian army.  At the 
same time, the reports could be used as a pretext for beginning 
combat operations against UNPROFOR: 
   -- Belgrade television charged that UNPROFOR troops "joined in" 
with Bosnian government forces during 3 June attacks on Serbian 
positions near Gradacac, a town located along the corridor 
linking Serb-held territory in northeastern and western Bosnia 
(Belgrade TV, 3 June). 
   -- Tanjug reported that the Bosnian Serb army claimed UNPROFOR 
tanks aided "Muslim units" in operations near Tuzla on 27 May 
(Tanjug in Serbo-Croatian, 27 June). 
   -- In a 21 May interview broadcast on Russian television, Bosnian 
Serb army chief General Ratko Mladic alleged that "some" members 
of UNPROFOR "openly side with the Croats or Muslims."  He added, 
however, that "not one" member of UNPROFOR "has been hurt" on the 
territory of the self-proclaimed Republic of Srpska in Bosnia- 
Herzegovina and "this will continue to be the case" (Moscow 
Ostankino TV, 21 May). 
   -- Tanjug reported a statement issued by Bosnian Serb "Chief of 
Staff" General Manojlo Milovanovic accusing an UNPROFOR armored 
unit of joining Bosnian Government forces in an "attack" near 
Tuzla that killed nine Serbs and wounded five.  Tanjug also 
claimed that the Bosnian Serb "main headquarters" had "received 
reports" that the UNPROFOR officers in charge had received 
500,000 DM for supporting the "Muslim infantry" (Tanjug in Serbo- 
Croatian, 1 May). 
   -- A 26 April statement issued by the local command of the 
Bosnian Serb army in the Banja Luka region warned that the Serbs 
would "do everything to protect the lives" of Serb soldiers and 
civilians if members of  UNPROFOR "continued to open fire on 
Serbian positions and settlements" in northern Bosnia (Tanjug in 
English, 26 April).  Mladic's 21 May statements to Russian 
television suggest that he may have countermanded such threats. 
   Earlier Criticism of UN Efforts 
   Previously, Serbian complaints have been aimed at alleged UN bias 
against the Serbs or against misuse of the UN-protected efforts 
to deliver humanitarian aid.  The Serbs have charged that 
humanitarian land convoys and relief flights were merely covers 
for efforts to arm Government forces and have been used as a 
pretext for disrupting aid shipments to the Serbs' foes.  The 
Serbs have recently shelled Tuzla airport to disrupt aid flights, 
contending that Serb observers should have the right to inspect 
all cargoes to ensure that they do not include arms (Sarajevo 
radio, 31 May; Der Spiegel, 18 April).  In another incident, aid 
workers from a private French humanitarian organizations were 
arrested in Sarajevo and accused of smuggling arms (Belgrade TV, 
9 April).  However, although Mladic accused the UN in the early 
months of the conflict of using aid shipments to supply the 
Croats and Muslims, neither he nor other Serb leaders have 
advocated attacking humanitarian supply efforts. 
   (AUTHOR:  NASH.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF 
ANALYST, EUROPE AND LATIN AMERICA GROUP, (703) 733-6120.) 
ELAG/GILISON/PF 07/1448z Jun 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23094 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000031094001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   8 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-07JUN94-NORTH KOREA 
<H3> <TI>      North Korean Nuclear Issue </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       North Korean Nuclear Issue </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                                As North Korea's confrontation with the International Atomic 
Energy Agency (IAEA) and the United States has worsened over the 
last few weeks, South Korean officials and the country's media 
have backed the imposition of sanctions against North Korea.  In 
their public comments, Japanese Government officials have 
continued to take a cautious approach to the sanctions issue, 
while both Beijing and Moscow are continuing to point to the need 
for a negotiated settlement to the DPRK nuclear crisis.  Beijing, 
in keeping with its general foreign policy line, has reiterated 
its opposition to the use of sanctions, while Moscow is 
indicating that the time is not ripe for their imposition. 

                           END SUMMARY 

   Seoul Supports UN Sanctions Against North Korea 

   Responding to the recent escalation of the nuclear crisis brought 
on by Pyongyang's refusal to submit to IAEA inspections, the 
South Korean Government has pressed for sanctions against the 
North.  South Korean President Kim Yong-sam has reportedly 
instructed his prime minister to take "all necessary steps" in 
connection with the UN sanctions against the North (Yonhap, 3 
June).  In his latest pronouncement on the North Korean nuclear 
issue, President Kim was quoted as declaring that "there is no 
other way now but to take sanctions" (Hanguk Ilbo, 6 June). 

   Most major Seoul newspapers--whose reporting is often colored by 
their editorial biases--have seemed to agree with ROK Government 
pronouncements that sanctions are unavoidable. Papers across the 
political spectrum--from the conservative Choson Ilbo and Tong-a 
Ilbo to the moderate Hanguk Ilbo and the left-leaning Hangyore 
Sinmun--all approvingly reported on plans to move the North 
Korean nuclear issue to the UN Security Council for a possible 
sanctions vote (4 June). 

   On the subject of China's and Russia's stance, both Choson Ilbo 
and the government-subsidized Seoul Sinmun noted the need to 
persuade China to go along with a sanctions resolution, while 
Tong-a Ilbo optimistically reported that although Beijing is 
opposed to sanctions in principle, the possibility "cannot be 
ruled out" that it may change its views on the issue.  As for 
Russia's position, while Choson Ilbo simply reported Washington's 
opposition to Russia's proposal for an international meeting on 
the DPRK issue without criticizing Moscow's stand, the 
progovernment Kyonghyang Sinmun urged Moscow to "demonstrate" its 
recent commitment to the Russia-ROK "security partnership" by 
supporting UN sanctions against Pyongyang. 

   Like the conservative and middle-of-the-road papers, the 
antiestablishment Hangyore Sinmun also admitted that sanctions 
against the North "will most likely" be pursued.  It cautioned 
the government only against "uncritically following international 
trends" and called, without elaboration, for South Korea's own 
"countermeasures" to deal with further aggravation of tensions on 
the peninsula (4 June).  However, Hangyore Sinmun subsequently 
expressed doubts about the effectiveness of any sanctions (6 
June).  Thus, the paper said sanctions against Pyongyang will not 
have a decisive effect since foreign trade accounts for only 
about 10 percent of North Korea's economy. 

   Internal "Confusion" 

   Despite the overall consensus between the government and press on 
the sanctions issue, the South Korean government's apparent 
attempts to balance its desire to appear firm against the North 
with its perceived need to ease the public's security concerns is 
reportedly creating some confusion among the population.  For 
example, the probusiness Chungang Ilbo reported that 
"conflicting" signals given by high officials on the overall 
situation on the Korean peninsula are creating "confusion" in 
South Korea (6 June).  It cited an unnamed National Assemblyman 
as pointing out that on the same day President Kim Yong-sam said 
South Korean people "do not have to worry," his prime minister 
"asked the people to strengthen their alert posture" within the 
country.  The paper further quoted the assemblyman as complaining 
about the government's "inadequate" security measures, when, in 
fact, "we are in a state of emergency requiring everybody to don 
a gas mask."  It cited another assemblyman as calling for 
"measures to minimize the [current] internal confusion."  The 
daily had earlier expressed anxiety about the rising tension, 
openly asking the ROK Government whether it has "mapped out" 
measures to protect businesses engaged in North-South trade if 
sanctions are instituted against the North (4 June).  In 
addition, it had cautioned government officials to be "prudent" 
in their remarks. 

   Political Concerns Limit Tokyo's Maneuverability on DPRK 

   The Japanese Government continues to publicly back dialogue and 
negotiation to resolve the crisis over the DPRK's nuclear 
program.  According to the 4 June Nihon Keizai Shimbun, Prime 
Minister Tsutomu Hata told reporters on 3 June that Japan would 
"keep [its] doors constantly open to discussions."  He added that 
the international community is "still not at the stage of 
imposing economic sanctions against the DPRK" and argued that it 
"should not drive the DPRK into a tight corner."  The next day, 
according to a 4 June NHK Television report, he told a news 
conference that the international community 4,needs to do [its] 
best to seek the understanding of North Korea."   Similarly, a 6 
June Kyodo report quoted the coalition's spokesman, Chief Cabinet 
Secretary Hiroshi Kumagai, as telling a news conference that 
Japan's "basic policy" toward North Korea is to seek "resolution 
of the issue through dialogue." 

   Japanese press reporting suggests that, in line with this guarded 
stance, the Japanese Government has formulated a cautious 
strategy to deal with the sanctions issue.  The 4 June Mainichi 
Shimbun quoted Ministry of Foreign Affairs (MOFA) Administrative 
Vice Minister Kunihiko Saito and another unnamed MOFA source as 
saying Japan plans to propose that the UN Security Council take a 
more moderate step, such as issuing a warning to North Korea, 
before it considers sanctions.  Another unnamed senior MOFA 
official told the 3 June Yomiuri Shimbun that the government 
favors such an approach because it is more likely to win the 
support of China, which would, in Tokyo's estimation, probably 
veto a sanctions resolution.  Yet another unnamed MOFA source 
told the 6 June Yomiuri Shimbun that Tokyo might propose an 
embargo on weapons exports to North Korea as an alternative to 
immediate economic sanctions. 

   Political Concerns 

   The major reasons for Tokyo's cautious approach to the DPRK 
nuclear issue are the weakness of the ruling coalition and public 
opposition to sanctions by the two main opposition parties--the 
Social Democratic Party of Japan (SDPJ) and the Liberal 
Democratic Party (LDP)--which together could bring down the 
government with a no-confidence motion in the Diet. 

   The SDPJ, which the ruling coalition still hopes to lure back 
into the government and which has, in the past, had close ties 
with the DPRK, has repeatedly signaled that it will continue to 
oppose economic sanctions against Pyongyang.  In one of the 
party's most recent statements on the issue, SDPJ Secretary 
General Wataru Kubo reportedly told a news conference on 4 June 
that the SDPJ "opposes economic sanctions against North Korea" 
and argued that the United States, Japan, and South Korea "must 
be cautious" about imposing them (NHK Television, 4 June; Yomiuri 
Shimbun, 5 June).  During a 5 June interview on Tokyo's FNN 
Television Network, Kubo also stated that it might be a 
"deviation from current constitutional constraints" for Japan to 
support any economic sanctions that the United States might seek 
to impose outside the framework of the United Nations if that 
body fails to take action against Pyongyang.  In order to promote 
a negotiated settlement to the DPRK nuclear issue, the SDPJ 
reportedly plans to send a delegation to the DPRK on 10 June to 
urge Pyongyang to submit to IAEA inspections (Asahi Shimbun, 4 
June;  Yomiuri Shimbun, 5 June). 

   The LDP, the largest political party in the Japanese Diet, has 
also indicated that it favors continued negotiations with the 
DPRK--possibly in part because it does not want to alienate the 
SDPJ, with whom some LDP members hope to form a coalition 
government if the current ruling coalition loses power. 
According to the 6 June Nihon Keizai Shimbun the LDP President 
Yohei Kono, during a 5 June news conference, stressed the 
importance of dialogue with the DPRK, arguing that "it is 
necessary to exert efforts to make North Korea understand 
correctly the appeals and demands of the international 
community."  Possibly in an effort to weaken the coalition by 
underscoring its inability to deal with the DPRK issue, the LDP 
reportedly is planning to send a delegation to Pyongyang on 14 
June for talks with North Korean Premier Kang Song-san to press 
the DPRK to "clear up suspicions" about its nuclear program 
(Asahi Shimbun, 4 June). 

   The government's sensitivity to the positions of both the SDPJ 
and the LDP was underscored when, according to the 4 June 
Mainichi Shimbun, MOFA Vice Minister Saito met with both SDPJ 
Chairman Tomiichi Murayama and the Chairman of the LDP's Policy 
Research Council, Ryutaro Hashimoto, shortly after he cut short a 
trip to Europe and returned to Tokyo to deal with the DPRK issue. 
Mainichi Shimbun quoted Saito as telling the SDPJ and LDP leaders 
that Japan plans to "buy time" by urging the United Nations to 
consider more moderate steps against North Korea before it 
imposes sanctions. 

   Divisions in Coalition 

   The ruling coalition itself may be divided over how quickly and 
to what extent Japan should publicly move to support sanctions 
against the DPRK.  According to a 3 June Kyodo report, Foreign 
Minister Koji Kakizawa told a Diet Foreign Affairs Committee that 
if the UN Security Council fails to reach an agreement on 
imposing sanctions because of opposition from China, Japan will 
offer "maximum cooperation" with any multilateral punitive 
measures against the DPRK initiated by Washington.  Kakizawa 
reportedly added that Japan would halt cash remittances to North 
Korea from Korean residents in Japan and suspend all trade with 
the DPRK. 

   By contrast, Chief Cabinet Secretary Kumagai, speaking before 
another Diet committee the same day, reportedly restated Japan's 
current official position on the DPRK issue, saying that Tokyo 
will "tenaciously try to persuade North Korea to reach a 
negotiated settlement."  He added that Japan has "no specific 
sanctions in mind" (Kyodo, 3 June).  The 4 June Nihon Keizai 
Shimbun quoted officials close to Prime Minister Hata as saying 
that the prime minister is concerned that some members of the 
cabinet are "increasingly calling for adopting a hardline 
position" against North Korea.  The officials reportedly cited 
Kakizawa's 3 June comments before the Diet Committee as an 
example of such a hardline stance.  They added that Prime 
Minister Hata prefers to take a more moderate approach for 
political reasons, hoping to convince the SDPJ to return to the 
coalition government it left in April. 

   Beijing Calls For Talks, Rejects UN Sanctions 

   Despite Pyongyang's refusal to submit to IAEA inspections, the 
Chinese Government continues to favor a negotiated settlement to 
the DPRK nuclear crisis.  Speaking at a press conference on 2 
June, a PRC Foreign Ministry spokesman reiterated Beijing's 
"unchanged" position favoring the settlement of the dispute 
through "dialogue and consultations" (Xinhua, 2 June).  In an 
apparent reference to recent U.S. calls for sanctions, the 
spokesman went on to say that even though "some difficulties" 
have emerged as a result of the IAEA's recent inspection, the 
"key" to a settlement is for all parties to treat the issue with 
"calmness" and make "positive efforts in order to leave room and 
keep the possibility alive for a proper settlement."  China's 
permanent representative to the United Nations Li Zhaoxing had 
been more explicit in rejecting sanctions in remarks made during 
UN Security Council consultations on 30 May.  According to a 31 
May Xinhua report, Li reiterated the need to settle the dispute 
through negotiations, saying that China "does not endorse any 
action that may exacerbate" the situation. 

   According to the Japanese news agency Kyodo, PRC Foreign Minster 
Qian Qichen has also weighed in on the question of sanctions.  A 
7 June Kyodo report said the Chinese press agency "Xinhua quoted 
Qian" as telling the visiting Maltese Foreign Minister at a 
meeting that day that China believes imposing sanctions is "not a 
good way" to resolve the problem.  Monitored Xinhua reporting has 
not yet been observed to carry Qian's remarks. 

   The PRC-owned Hong Kong daily Hsin Wan Pao on 7 June also 
discussed China's views on the DPRK nuclear crisis.  An article 
by the paper's veteran commentator Yang Chu said Beijing believes 
that there is still time to resolve the issue before sanctions 
are "officially proposed" and that China has to "choose between 
vetoing or abstaining from vetoing a decision."  He concluded 
that China "will not agree" to economic sanctions against the 
DPRK in the UN Security Council.  Moreover, taking note of the 
DPRK's threats of war, he said China "will not dispatch" troops 
and become "involved" in a Korean war.  The second article, 
carried in the paper's "news talk column," also pointed to 
China's desire for a negotiated settlement, noting that Beijing 
is "obviously unwilling" to take a stand on sanctions and "hopes 
for another way of handling" the issue. 

   Previous Views on UN Sanctions 

   Although China has generally opposed the use of sanctions, it did 
vote for the imposition of UN sanctions against Iraq in 1990. 
Explaining Beijing's support for sanctions against Iraq, PRC 
Ambassador to the United Nations Li Daoyu said China believed 
that "state-to-state relations" must be "based" on the five 
principles of peaceful coexistence, that the "norms" governing 
international relations must be maintained, and that resorting to 
force or the threat to use force to violate a country's 
sovereignty and territorial integrity "must be opposed" (Xinhua, 
7 August 1990). 

   Moscow Advocates Talks, Conditionally Supports Sanctions 

   Like China, Russia has stressed the need to resolve the present 
crisis through negotiations.  Speaking at a press conference on 2 
June, Russian President Boris Yeltsin repeated Moscow's call for 
an international conference that would be attended by Russia, 
China, the DPRK, South Korea, the United States, and Japan, 
saying it is the "only way to solve the problem" (Moscow 
Ostankino television).  Moscow had first introduced the idea of 
an international conference on the North Korean nuclear issue in 
late March, claiming that bilateral efforts to resolve the crisis 
had been "inadequate" (ITAR-TASS, 24 March). 

   However, unlike Beijing, Moscow, perhaps because its concern over 
Ukrainian nuclear intentions give Russia a greater stake in 
seeing that the Nuclear Nonproliferation Treaty (NPT) is adhered 
to, has not ruled out the possibility of sanctions.  For example, 
although Yeltsin, at the press conference on 2 June, noted that 
it is "just a bit early" to speak of sanctions, he  went on to 
say that if the DPRK "digs in its heels" and withdraws from the 
NPT, Russia "will be obliged, gradually, of course, to first 
warn" the DPRK and then later, "probably" join with the world 
community and "adopt some kind of sanctions."  Reiterating this 
position on 7 June, Foreign Minister Andrey Kozyrev, according to 
Radio Rossii, told the independent press agency Interfax that the 
"time is not ripe for sanctions," saying that sanctions can only 
be introduced "in stages" after "all other possibilities" have 
been exhausted.  In an apparent reference to a U.S. suggestion 
that Washington, Seoul, and Tokyo might join together and impose 
sanctions against the DPRK, Kozyrev said sanctions should be 
"introduced and lifted by the UN Security Council alone."  A day 
earlier ITAR-TASS had cited an unnamed "high-ranking Foreign 
Ministry official" as saying that Moscow may not "support" 
sanctions if they are not approved by the UN Security Council. 

(AUTHORS:  YIM, BOUNDS, HEBBEL.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, 
PLEASE CALL CHIEF, ASIA DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6534.) 

EAG/HORTON/JF 07/2328Z JUN 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23095 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000031194001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   9 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-8JUN94-EFTA-EU 
<H3> <TI>      Press Favors EU Membership, Downplays Disadvantages </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Press Favors EU Membership, Downplays Disadvantages </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                            In the lead up to referendums on European Union (EU) membership 
in Austria, Finland, Norway, and Sweden, press commentary in all 
four countries has predominantly favored membership, seeing the 
economic and security advantages as greatly outweighing any 
lingering concerns about "joining Europe." 
                     END SUMMARY 
   With a majority of respondents in the four countries telling 
pollsters they feel "uninformed" on the pros and cons of EU 
membership, the predominantly positive press coverage is likely 
to have a significant impact on the relatively large number of 
people who are undecided on the issue.  In some countries the 
media are apparently filling a gap left open by the government. 
While in Sweden and Norway the governments are conducting high 
profile campaigns for membership and there are well-organized, 
well-financed organizations for and against accession, in Austria 
and Finland, apparently weak and divided governments are keeping 
a low profile and there are few non-governmental organizations 
campaigning either way.  The head of the Finnish Foreign 
Ministry's EU information office explained the government's 
dilemma to a Danish newspaper:  "If the government begins to 
campaign, the population will believe they are manipulating, and 
the psychological climate in Finland is such that people will 
react the opposite.  We are instead trying to be neutral" 
(Berlingske Tidende, 28-29 March).  In much the same way, polls 
in Austria show that 60 percent of the population would reject a 
recommendation on how to vote from the political parties (Profil, 
18 April), and polls published in the two major dailies, Der 
Standard (18 April) and Die Presse (5 May), indicate that the 
media, rather than parties or politicians, are the most trusted 
source of information on EU membership, with the government's 
campaign lagging significantly behind. 
   Emphasizing the Positive 
   Regardless of the different strategies of their governments in 
supporting EU membership, the coverage of the EU accession 
agreements in the major newspapers and magazines of the four 
countries has been predominantly positive. 
   Norway.   In this country, where the populace is most split on 
the question of membership, the larger dailies have editorialized 
extensively in favor.  Even the newspaper of the Labor Party, 
which is divided over the issue, declared in an editorial that 
"we have long thought that Norway should join the European Union" 
(Arbeiderbladet, 18 March). 
   Austria.  Typifying the Viennese press, Die Presse admitted that 
"this newspaper has never made a secret out of the fact that we 
are for Austria's entry into the EU" (5 May). 
   Finland.  Most Finnish dailies have strongly advocated EU 
membership.  For example, a Finnish research institute study on 
attitudes in the press toward the EU concluded that the country's 
leading daily Helsingin Sanomat had been "an active promoter" of 
membership, publishing almost exclusively pro-EU editorials 
(Hufvudstadsbladet, 28 April). 
   Sweden.  The Swedish press, which had been skeptical about 
membership, became more enthusiastic after the country reached 
what the media considered an advantageous agreement with the EU. 
Buoyed by the excitement of the Swedish hockey team's gold medal 
at the Olympics the day before the agreement, the Swedish press 
portrayed the conclusion of the accession agreement as a similar 
triumph--a cartoon even showed a Swedish player blasting the puck 
past the EU goalie (Svenska Dagbladet, 5 March).  Although it had 
scoffed at the triviality of some of the issues during the 
negotiations--publishing headlines on bear hunting and "EC 
Adapted Toothpaste"--the Swedish press gave high marks to the 
agreement ultimately reached.  In a "report card" on the 
negotiation results, for example, one paper gave the accord two 
nines, a seven, and an eight (out of a possible ten points) on 
the four issues the paper considered most important (two 
environmental standards issues, regional policy, and 
agriculture); overall, the agreement received 78 out of 100 
points (Dagens Nyheter, 3 March). 
   Common Themes 
   The press in the four countries has emphasized three broad themes 
in arguing for membership.  Most often cited has been the need to 
join forces to solve cross-border problems such as environmental 
pollution, immigration, and organized crime.  European 
integration has been defined as being first and foremost "how 
member states together attempt to find common solutions to common 
problems" (Svenska Dagbladet, 3 March).  An Austrian daily made a 
similar case:  "With the new Union regulations, we can surely 
react more effectively than only on the national level to trans- 
border problems . . . [such as] immigration and the fight against 
organized crime" (Die Presse, 3 March).  The supranational 
management of the ecology is also often mentioned as a sound 
argument for joining, especially in environmentally conscious 
Norway.  The most widely read daily, Aftenposten, sounded the 
environment theme repeatedly, as in a 20 April headline: 
"Environmental Goals Dependent on Membership in EU."  A third 
argument commonly cited is the boon to the economy and a 
reduction in prices paid by consumers; the press in all the 
countries has published forecasts predicting economic growth and 
lower food prices after membership. 
   Different Emphasis 
   In several cases the press has made its case for membership by 
attacking the soundness of arguments used by EU opponents.  In 
Sweden and Norway, where there is a strong but not well defined 
nostalgia for a unique Scandinavian society of the past, the 
debate has centered on the whether this heritage must be 
abandoned in joining Europe.  Most press commentaries have 
concentrated on attacking EU opponents for failing to realize 
that Scandinavia cannot remain isolated in the new European order 
and for not presenting a realistic alternative to membership. 
   --Swedish commentators have argued that Sweden must be involved 
in shaping the future of Europe and have challenged EU opponents 
for not "saying what they are for" (Svenska Dagbladet, 9 March). 
Svenska Dagbladet's leading commentator on the EU, Rolf 
Gustavsson, wrote that "not even an overwhelming no victory could 
make it possible to return to the old agenda" (Svenska Dagbladet, 
3 March). 
   --Norwegian commentary has adopted a very similar tone, pointing 
out that these nostalgic dreams are unrealistic.  Aftenposten 
wrote on 28 April that "a no to membership in the EU is not a yes 
to continuing everything as before.  A new situation for Norway 
is arising..."  The same paper warned on 17 March that "Norway 
cannot create its own alternative world." 
   In Finland and Austria, where the concept of joining Europe is 
not as controversial, most of the opposition has coma from 
special interest groups, primarily farmers, who have attacked 
specific provisions of the accession agreements.  Commentaries 
have, therefore, focused on defending the specifics of the 
agreements rather than presenting any comprehensive vision of the 
future. 
   --Most Finnish newspapers have recognized the need to join the EU 
and praised the accession agreement.  On 2 March Helsingin 
Sanomat called the accord "the most important success of our 
foreign policy since World War II," and expressed regret that the 
government was so fearful of opposition from farmers that it did 
not hail it as well.  Several editorials warned that farmers, who 
comprise less than 10 percent of the population, should not be 
allowed to become an "insurmountable obstacle" to something so 
important to the country (Demari, 3 March). 
   --Immediately after the conclusion of Austria's agreement, most 
commentary hailed the government's achievements in the 
negotiations, rebuffing claims by opposition parties that the 
negotiators caved in to EU demands.  Foreign Minister Alois Mock, 
who headed the delegation, was proclaimed "a dogged negotiator" 
and "Mock the hero" upon his return to Vienna (Der Standard, 2,3 
March).  Die Presse (12 April) found the criticism that the 
negotiators "raised the white flag," to be "mean and 
underhanded."  In a reference to the farmers' complaints about 
the agreed levels of agricultural subsidies, Der Standard said on 
3 April that the agreement "benefited the whole," despite "small- 
minded egoism."  Another commentary criticized lobbying groups 
for pushing their costly demands "at the expense of others" (Der 
Standard, 29 April). 
   The Neutrality Debate 
   While neutrality has played an important role in the histories of 
Sweden, Austria, and Finland, only in Sweden has the debate over 
EU membership focused on the preservation of neutrality as a 
central issue. 
   Sweden.  The Swedish press has focused on the future of 
neutrality to a much greater extent than have the media of other 
countries.  Political leaders in Sweden have conducted an open 
debate in the press--in the form of guest commentary and 
statements to reporters--on the merits of moving away from the 
traditional policy and on what EU membership will mean for 
neutrality.  The government has declared neutrality "outdated" 
and expressed its desire to fully participate in a common EU 
foreign and security policy (Dagens Nyheter 15 Oct 93).  The 
Social Democratic opposition also has also endorsed Sweden's 
participation in a common foreign and security policy, but has 
criticized the government's abandonment of neutrality.  Svenska 
Dagbladet has published a series of articles examining the future 
of neutrality.  Most commentaries have concluded that "what best 
serves peace and security is a deepened and expanded economic and 
political cooperation which includes all of Europe" (Idag, 21 
March).  It is, therefore, "an advantage for us to join a West 
European defense community." (Dagens Nyheter, 15 April). 
   Finland.   By contrast, there has been little debate about 
neutrality in the Finnish press, perhaps because neutrality has 
traditionally been a thorny issue for the country.  The 
government, probably still wary of provoking a Russian reaction, 
stated in an official report that neutrality would not be 
affected by EU membership because Finland was joining the Union 
"politically but not militarily."  Nonetheless, the government 
report was apparently alluding to security matters when it argued 
that Finland could expect "commitment and solidarity" from the 
other EU members (Suomen Kuvalehti, 11 March).  The Chief of the 
Armed Forces recently declared that EU membership would not mean 
any changes to defense policy (Hufvudstadsbladet, 11 March), and 
the press has largely confined itself to discussing the economic 
issues of membership, such as agricultural subsidies.  Some 
editorials have pointed out that "continued focusing on 
agriculture distracts attention from the essential questions of 
EU membership" (Helsingin Sanomat, 8 March), and regrets have 
been expressed that "we do not dare debate the core issues" such 
as security (Hufvudstadsbladet, 31 March).  One commentary 
wondered if the government's agricultural support package is "in 
the first place a decoy. .. to avoid discussion relating to 
security policy and new directions of geopolitics" (Pohjalainen, 
6 March). 
   Austria.   Similarly, there is little open debate in Austria on 
redefining its neutrality--a product of Cold War stalemate- 
-despite the fact that it too is surrounded by neighbors whose 
stability is uncertain.  Because the government has declared that 
it intends to retain neutrality after EU membership, Chancellor 
Franz Vranitzky and President Thomas Klestil have proclaimed 
neutrality a non-issue.  In reality, according to the weekly 
Profil (16 May), a debate is taking place behind the scenes about 
redefining neutrality, and the government is trying to keep it 
that way at least until after the referendum.  The magazine's 
assertion that "any discussion of neutrality is taboo" is 
reflected in the silence of the press on this question.  With 
some apparent exasperation, the 2 May Die Presse, asserting that 
such discussions are premature, declared "Austria needs this 
discussion [on neutrality] at this time like a hole in the head." 
The commentary expressed the assurance that neutrality can be 
retained inside the EU, claiming that to remain outside would 
actually reduce Austria's room for maneuver because it would be 
isolated. 
   BOX:  Upcoming Referendums on EU Membership 
   In March, all four EU applicant countries--Austria, Finland, 
Norway, and Sweden--concluded accession agreements in hopes of 
officially joining the Union at the beginning of 1995.  All will 
now hold referendums on membership: Austria on 12 June, Finland 
on 16 October, Sweden on 13 November, and Norway on 28 November. 
Austria's will be binding, while the Nordics' are.legally non- 
binding, although the governments are unlikely to reject the 
popular will.  Polls show a close vote in all countries, with the 
yes side leading in Finland and Austria and the no side on top in 
Norway and Sweden. There is, however, a large group of 
"undecideds" in each country. 
   END BOX 
   (AUTHOR:  SCHWENK.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF 
ANALYST, EUROPE AND LATIN AMERICA GROUP (7O3)-733-612O.) 
ELAG/GILISON/ta 08/2259z jun 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23096 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000031294001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   9 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-08JUN94-Ukraine 
<H3> <TI>                          SUMMARY </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>                           SUMMARY </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
In      the wake of their victory in the March-April Supreme Soviet 
election, Communists and their leftist allies have taken control 
of the new legislature, greatly diminishing the influence of the 
Government establishment, the socalled "party of power" led by 
President Leonid Kravchuk and Supreme Soviet Chairman Ivan 
Plyushch.  Although Kravchuk and Plyushch joined forces with the 
nationalists to prevent the leftists from gaining control of 
parliament, they failed in their efforts to put together a strong 
enough coalition to block the election of Socialist-Communist 
candidate Oleksandr Moroz as Supreme Soviet chairman.  As the 
June presidential election approaches, the nationalists have 
decided to back Kravchuk or Plyushch rather than to run their own 
candidate.  With seven candidates in the race there will probably 
be a runoff.  If they make the runoff, Kravchuk or Plyushch would 
still face a strong challenge from leftists, who are united 
behind Moroz, and from former Premier Leonid Kuchma, who has 
strong support in east Ukraine and leads in the early polls. 
                       END SUMMARY 
   Communists and Allies Take Control of New Parliament 
   The new parliament has been harder for Kravchuk and Plyushch to 
influence because it contains fewer deputies linked to the 
government than the old parliament did and far more deputies 
affiliated with parties, particularly the leftist parties.  Even 
though the government establishment had drawn up the election law 
to discourage parties and aid the election of nonparty candidates 
representing or favored by the government, the majority of 
Supreme Soviet members elected in the 27 March-1O April 
parliamentary elections, 169 of the 338 seats filled, according 
to election officials (UNIAR, 13 April), and as many as 242 
(according to the 28 April Narodna Armiya), are linked to 
parties.  The Communist Party (CPU) won by far the most seats- 
-86--and, with its allies, the 14 Socialists (SPU) and 18 Peasant 
Party (SelPU), forms a leftist bloc of over one-third of the 
Supreme Soviet.  Rukh won only 20, 26, or 30 seats (depending on 
which source is doing the counting), and other nationalists did 
worse, while non-nationalist democrats--including the 
Interregional Bloc for Reforms (MBR) of Kuchma and former Supreme 
Soviet Deputy Chairman Volodymyr Hrynyov--also won few seats. 
   In the face of the CPU victory, the Kravchuk-Plyushch forces took 
steps to attempt to retain control of the Supreme Soviet against 
the leftist challenge.  Incumbent Chairman Plyushch, whose 
prospects for reelection as chairman appeared dim anyhow (Post- 
Postup, 22-28 April), announced he would not run for reelection 
because he was running for president (Kyivska Pravda, 26 April), 
and First Deputy Chairman of the old Supreme Soviet Vasyl 
Durdynets, viewed by many as most likely to become new Supreme 
Soviet chairman (Za Vilnu Ukrainu, 20 May), took over leadership 
of the establishment forces in parliament.  Durdynets led the 
group of oblast and party representatives that conducted the 
preparatory work for organizing the new Supreme Soviet during 
April and early May (Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 12 May) and initiated 
the founding of a new "Center" group of deputies (Holos Ukrainy, 
11 May), aimed at uniting deputies of what he called a 
"constructive centrist orientation" (Holos Ukrainy, 26 April). 
At a 6 May meeting, the group elected Durdynets its "coordinator" 
and claimed to have registered 59 members (Holos Ukrainy, 11 
May).  The Center is composed largely of government officials, 
although the leader of the DemPU (Democratic Party of Ukraine)- 
-the party closest to the government--is also a member (See Box 
One). 
   As factions began organizing in the new Supreme Soviet (See Box 
Two), the centrist bloc formed by the "party of power" reached 
out to form an alliance with Rukh and other democratic factions. 
Durdynets' Center at a 6 May meeting appealed to other factions 
to create a bloc of centrists entitled "For Accord and Joint 
Work" (Holos Ukrainy, 11 May) and at a 10 May meeting appealed to 
other factions to create a "bloc of centrist orientation" (Kiev 
radio, 11 May).  Rukh Chairman Vyacheslav Chornovil also favored 
creation of a mechanism for working with the Center and other 
factions to counter the left (Molod Ukrainy, 13 May) and on 10 
May announced that leaders of the Center, Rukh, Derzhavnist 
(Statehood), and Za Reformy Dlya Narodu (For Reforms for the 
People) factions had agreed to form a "centrist bloc" (Kiev 
radio, 10 May).  On 17 May the Center, "Reforms," Rukh, Yednist 
(Unity), and Derzhavnist factions, and some Agrarians and MDF- 
Center met and formed a bloc aimed at countering leftists and 
"becoming the parliamentary majority" (Post-Postup, 19-25 May). 
Derzhavnist leader Mykola Porovskyy contended that if 
Derzhavnist, Rukh, Reforms, DemPU, and Center got together, they 
could form a bloc of 130-140 (Kyivska Pravda, 24 May). 
   Election of Chairman 
   The centrist bloc at its 17 May meeting agreed to unite behind 
Durdynets in the election of a new Supreme Soviet chairman (Post- 
Postup, 19-25 May), but when the election was held by secret 
ballot on 18 May they failed to come up with enough votes to 
block the election of a leftist.  The CPU, SPU, and Agrarians 
united behind SPU Chairman Moroz, while the MBR nominated 
nonparty Kharkiv historian Oleksandr Karpov (Silski Visti, 19 
May; 20 May), and the ultranationalistic UNA-UNSO backed nonparty 
Ternopil teacher Yuriy Tyma (Silski Visti, 19 May, 20 May). 
Moroz managed to attract just enough to win on the first ballot- 
-171, (See Note 1) while Durdynets got 103, Karpov 14, and Tyma 9 
(Kiev radio, 18 May).  Elected largely by CPU votes and with his 
own SPU only able to contribute 14 votes, Moroz is largely 
beholden to the CPU and will probably have to bow to the CPU's 
wishes on most occasions. 
   (Note 1) The number of votes needed to win was reduced from 170 
to 169 when the Supreme Soviet invalidated the election of 
Hrynyov and Odesa deputy Pavlo Kudyukin because their opponents 
in the runoffs had withdrawn leaving them unopposed (ITAR-TASS, 
12 May).  Their exclusion reduced. the membership from 338 to 336. 
   The election of Moroz as chairman apparently stunned many of his 
opponents, who immediately began accusing each other of selling 
out to the leftists.  Moroz was able to garner a considerable 
number of votes beyond the roughly 120-145 of the CPU, SPU, and 
Agrarians, apparently attracting independents and even some 
supposed Durdynets supporters.  Nationalists, who had apparently 
calculated that Moroz could not attract enough votes for a 
majority on the first ballot and had expected a chance to 
eventually push through a compromise candidate, began speculating 
that some Center deputies had swung to Moroz in return for 
promises of jobs (Za Vilnu Ukrainu, 20 May).  Even though Moroz's 
election, by putting the Supreine Soviet in the hands of the 
leftists, would appear to be a setback for Kravchuk, Chornovil 
and some of his colleagues immediately after the election charged 
that Kravchuk himself had engineered Moroz's election in order to 
destroy his rival Plyushch as a presidential candidate. 
Chornovil argued that Moroz's victory was mainly a victory for 
Kravchuk since Moroz would now drop out of the presidential race 
to retain the post of head of parliament (in fact, Moroz did not 
drop out) and Plyushch would be weakened as a rival to Kravchuk 
presumably because Durdynets' defeat deprives Plyushch of his 
base as Supreme Soviet leader (Nezavisimost, 20 May; Silski 
Visti, 20 May).  Environmental Minister Kostenko, a Rukh leader, 
also categorized the Moroz election as a Kravchuk maneuver, 
alleging that the Center, "supposedly set up to support V. 
Durdynets, secretly voted for A. Moroz" in order to weaken 
Plyushch's presidential campaign (Nezavisimost, 20 May).  Later, 
democrats assailed Yednist, which had joined the Durdynets bloc, 
for acting as a "Trojan horse" and helping elect Moroz 
(Nezavisimost, 27 May) and accused leftists of favoring Yednist 
in distribution of Supreme Soviet Presidium seats (UNIAN, 31 
May). 
   Election of Deputy Chairmen 
   The election of deputy chairmen of the Supreme Soviet further 
enhanced the dominance of leftists and easterners over the 
establishment and nationalists.  The Center proposed Durdynets 
for first deputy chairman to "halt the diktat of leftwing forces" 
(UNIAN, 20 May), but Moroz declared Durdynets had no chance of 
election and proposed Agrarian leader Oleksandr Tkachenko for 
deputy chairman (UNIAN, 19 May).  CPU First Secretary Petro 
Symonenko also backed Tkachenko.  Upset by the prospect of 
another leftist being elected, Rukh, Reforms, Derzhavnist, and 
some Center deputies called a boycott, refusing to register as 
present and thereby temporarily preventing a quorum and blocking 
the scheduled election of a deputy chairman on 19 and 20 May 
(UNIAN, 19 May; Demokratychna Ukraina, 21 May; Silski Visti, 24 
May).  Moroz eventually offered a compromise to centrists: 
Durdynets as first deputy chairman and Tkachenko as deputy 
chairman.  But this was voted down by the Supreme Soviet on 24-25 
May when it voted on several such combinations and gave the 
largest vote to a team of two leftists--Tkachenko and Vice 
President of the Ukrainian-Siberian Investment Corporation Oleh 
Dyomin. (See Note 2)  They received 181 votes, compared to only 
92 for a Durdynets-Tkachenko combination (Vecherniy Kiev, 26 
May).  Furious democrats felt cheated (Silski Visti, 27 May), and 
Chornovil called the election of Tkachenko and Dyomin a 
"communist coup carried out under Oleksandr Moroz's leadership" 
and accused the Yednist faction of joining the CPU-SPU-SelPU bloc 
in carrying out this "coup" (Nezavisimost, 27 May). 
   (Note 2) Dyomin was long a CPU leader but recently has been a 
businessman and a defender of Kharkiv regional interests and the 
Russian language (Khreshchatyk, 1 June).  He was Kharkiv CPU 
secretary until the party was banned in 1991, after which he says 
he was unemployed for a while (Khreshchatyk, 1 June).  He ran for 
the Supreme Soviet as a nonparty candidate but had links to 
Kuchma's MBR (Silski Visti, 26 May; Molod Ukrainy, 27 May) and 
spent heavily to defeat a CPU candidate in the runoff 
(Khreshchatyk, 1 June). 
   Leftists further extended their control over the leadership of 
the Supreme Soviet by dominating the allocation of seats in the 
Presidium and committee chairmanships, prompting sharp complaints 
from democrats.  Leaders of Derzhavnist, Reforms, Rukh, and the 
Center claimed that Agrarians and Yednist (which apparently 
joined the leftists) had each received an extra seat in the 
Presidium, while Reforms and Derzhavnist received only one seat 
apiece, instead of the two they are entitled to (UNIAN, 31 May). 
When the Supreme Soviet on 31 May approved the naming of 22 
committee chairmen, the CPU got 6, Agrarians 3, Yednist 2, while 
the Center got 4, MDF-Center 2, and Rukh, Derzhavnist, Reforms, 
and SPU one each, and the foreign affairs committee went to a 
Communist, defense to a Socialist, economic policy to Yednist, 
budget to the MDF-Center, and finance to an Agrarian (UNIAR, 31 
May).  Leaders of Rukh and Reforms prQtested some of the choices 
(UNIAN, 31 May), and Rukh's Ivan Zayets complained that 
Communists were taking over the main committees (UNIAR, 30 May). 
Rukh tried to boycott again in protest, but, according to 
Chornovil, "the Center betrayed us" and only 99 joined the 
boycott (Vybir News Agency, 3 June). 
   Kuchma's Role 
   While Kuchma and his faction did not clearly ally with the 
leftists, they lined up openly against Kravchuk, the Center, and 
the nationalists.  Kuchma openly rejected Durdynets (UNIAN, 6 
May), although he probably did not vote for Moroz.  The MDF- 
Center nominated Karpov for chairman (Silski Visti, 19 May, 20 
May), and the 20 May Ukraina Moloda said that Karpov got the 
Kuchma-Hrynyov votes.  Karpov in fact was listed as one of the 
leaders of the MDF-Center in the official list of factions 
(UNIAR, 27 May) and therefore probably received its votes. 
Although probably not voting for Moroz, Kuchma did have kind 
words for him after the election, saying that Moroz is becoming 
more moderate and does not make "excessively leftist" statements 
(Nezavisimost, 20 May).  Kuchma did not participate in the 
democrats' 19 May boycott protesting Moroz's nomination of 
Tkachenko for first deputy chairman (judging by a 21 May 
Demokratychna Ukraina list of those registering and not 
registering).  When the Supreme Soviet deputy chairmen were 
elected, an apparent associate of Kuchma's faction, Dyomin, won 
the No. 3 post in the parliament's leadership. 
   Moreover, the Kuchma camp and the nationalists have been 
attacking each other vigorously.  Chornovil recently declared 
Kuchma's MBR "our biggest enemy" (Nezavisimost, 22 April) and 
said that the MBR is a bigger threat to Ukrainian statehood than 
the leftists because the demands of Kuchma's supporters "threaten 
our independence" (Holos Ukrainy, 11 May).  Even though it was 
leftists' leadership and votes that apparently caused the Supreme 
Soviet to declare Hrynyov's election invalid, Kuchuma and Hrynyov 
blamed the nationalists for Hrynyov's exclusion.  At a press 
conference after the Supreme Soviet vote, Kuchma and Hrynyov 
accused the nationalist democrats of tricking the "less 
experienced communists" into this decision, which they apparently 
felt was aimed at weakening support for Kuchma as the 
presidential race began (Silski Visti, 17 May).  Hrynyov 
especially blamed former Rukh leader Holovatiy for raising the 
credentials case (Za Vilnu Ukrainu, 18 May). 
   In fact, it appears that the leftists had played the main role in 
Hrynyov's exclusion.  Nezavisimaya Gazeta said that it was the 
CPU and SPU that had voted to unseat Hrynyov (29 May) and that 
Moroz had acted "in a partisan manner" against Hrynyov and 
Kudyukin during the Supreme Soviet discussion of their cases (21 
May).  Moroz had presided when the credentials of seven deputies 
came under discussion and he proposed separate votes on each 
case; CPU leader Symonenko presided during the vote and also 
insisted on separate votes.  Although most of the cases involved 
alleged violations of the same rule involved in Hrynyov's 
exclusion, the separate votes resulted in declaring the election 
of some deputies valid but that of Hrynyov and Kudyukin invalid 
(Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 14 May), apparently on partisan bases.  The 
Supreme Soviet voted 178 to 95 against Hrynyov (Vysokyy Zamok, 14 
May).  According to the 19-25 May Post-Postup, Communists and 
nationalists united to vote to unseat Hrynyov because one side 
disliked his pro-capitalist views and the other his pro-Russian 
views.  Kuchma said he angrily walked out of the Supreme Soviet 
after it voted to unseat Hrynyov (Kievskiye Novosti, 20 May). 
   Crowded Field Likely To Force Runoffs in Presidential Race 
   The establishment and nationalists continue to work together as 
the presidential election set for 26 June approaches, both in the 
attempt to postpone the election and in opposing Kuchma and 
Moroz.  Kravchuk, who at first said he would not run for 
reelection (ITAR-TASS, 25 April), has urged postponing the 
election (Demokratychna Ukraina, 29 April) but eventually filed 
as a candidate.  His call to postpone the election won support 
from most nationalists--Rukh and Christian Democrats (ITAR-TASS, 
25 April), the URP (Molod Ukrainy, 26 April), and DemPU (Ratusha, 
26 April).  A petition signed by 122 Supreme Soviet members 
(including Chornovil, according to the 18 May Za Vilnu Ukrainu) 
called for postponement (Molod Ukrainy, 13 May), but Plyushch 
(Pravda Ukrainy, 5 April), SPU Chairman Moroz (Interfax, 29 
April; ITAR-TASS, 1 May), CPU First Secretary Symonenko 
(Interfax, 6 May), Kuchma and Hrynyov (Vysokyy Zamok, 14 May), 
and even ultranationalist Ukrainian Conservative Republican Party 
Chairman Khmara (Interfax, 12 May) announced opposition to 
postponement.  It would take a two-thirds vote of the total 
membership of the new Supreme Soviet (300 out of 450) to change a 
decision by the previous Supreme Soviet (Molod Ukrainy, 13 May). 
Such an action is virtually impossible, especially with only 336 
members seated in the Supreme Soviet at present.  When Kravchuk 
formally asked the Supreme Soviet to postpone the election, it 
turned him down on 2 June, with 201 voting to go ahead with the 
election (UNIAN, 2 June). 
   Since a majority of votes cast is needed to win the presidential 
election, the current field of seven candidates will probably 
splinter the votes and force a runoff.  While Kravchuk, Plyushch, 
Kuchma, Moroz, director of the Center for Market Reforms 
Volodymyr Lanovyy, President of the "Ukrainian Financial Group" 
Valeriy Babych, and Education Minister Petro Talanchuk are all 
registered candidates (Kiev radio, 26 May), the contest appears 
likely to boil down to Kuchma and Moroz competing for eastern and 
communist-conservative votes and Kravchuk and Plyushch competing 
for western-central and nationalist votes.  Among minor 
candidates, Lanovyy is an outspoken economic reformer who was 
fired by Kravchuk as deputy premier and minister of the economy 
in mid-1992.  Although a New Ukraine leader in the past and now 
listed as nonparty, he was backed by Rukh in his successful 
campaign for election to the Supreme Soviet in Kiev.  Babych 
heads the Yednist faction which has apparently left the Center- 
nationalist bloc of parties formed just before the opening of the 
Supreme Soviet session and joined the leftists, but an analysis 
of candidates in the 26 May Demokratychna Ukraina contended that 
Babych has long been pro-Kravchuk and will be helpful to Kravchuk 
in debating economic policy against Kuchma and Lanovyy. 
   Kravchuk and Plyushch 
   The pro-Russian stance of of Kuchma and Moroz and their apparent 
strength have frightened nationalists into rallying behind 
Kravchuk and Plyushch.  Rukh, after doing poorly in the 
parliamentary election, decided that there was no prospect for 
electing Chornovil or any other nationalist as president. 
Chornovil declared that nomination of a Rukh candidate would only 
help Kuchma and Moroz (ITAR-TASS, 18 April).  With Chornovil 
declining to run, the west has no one to support except Kravchuk 
and Plyushch.  In collecting signatures to qualify for the 
presidential ballot, Kravchuk led all candidates in Lviv, getting 
51,748, while Plyushch (backed by many Rukh leaders) got 20,669, 
and Kuchma and Moroz got few (Nezavisimost, 25 May). 
   As between Kravchuk and Plyushch, Plyushch appears weaker, 
especially after losing his base as Supreme Soviet chairman. 
Kuchma earlier had said that Plyushch had the best chance to 
become president because as Supreme Soviet chairman he was 
"holding all power in Ukraine"  (Interfax, 26 April).  Despite 
losing the chairmanship, Plyushch still has a base in the 
relatively conservative agrarian lobby of kolkhoz and sovkhoz 
leaders, according to Nezavisimost editor Vladimir Kuleba 
(Nezavisimost, 29 April).  Moreover, he has won support among 
some nationalists disillusioned with Kravchuk's inaction. 
Democratic bloc leader Levko Lukyanenko, although usually pro- 
Kravchuk, has declared his preference for Plyushch over Kravchuk, 
calling the president too "indecisive" (Samostiyna Ukraina, 1-7 
May) and arguing that Plyushch would better protect the state (Za 
Vilnu Ukrainu, 13 May).  Stories are circulating that Chornovil 
also prefers Plyushch as the standardbearer against Kuchma and 
Moroz, but he denied this and insisted he was not taking sides 
between Kravchuk and Plyushch (UNIAR, 21 April; Nezavisimost, 22 
April).  At a 30 May press conference he said that "personally I 
will vote for Lanovyy" (Robitnycha Hazeta, 1 June).  Unable to 
choose between Kravchuk, Plyushch, and Lanovyy, Rukh's leadership 
on 6 June decided not to back any of the candidates in the first 
round (UNIAR, 6 June). 
   Moroz 
   Moroz has not dropped out of the presidential race following his 
election as Supreme Soviet chairman and in fact has reaffirmed 
his intention to continue his presidential bid (UNIAN, Interfax, 
23 May; Silski Visti, 26 May).  His position was strengthened by 
the decision of CPU First Secretary Symonenko to drop out of the 
race (ITAR-TASS, 1 May) and endorse him (Interfax, 6 May), 
forming a united left behind the Socialist leader.  Given the 
leftists' striking strength in the Supreme Soviet election, Moroz 
will probably run a strong race. 
   Kuchma 
   Kuchma, however, may be the biggest threat to Kravchuk and 
Plyushch, even though his MBR won few seats in the Supreme 
Soviet.  Recent polls have usually shown him running ahead of 
others.  A nationwide poll of 1,200 people in April showed that 
18 percent favor Kuchma, while 11 percent back Kravchuk and 10 
percent Chornovil (Interfax, 30 April).  He has strength in his 
home base of Dnipropetrovsk, where he was elected to the Supreme 
Soviet with 90 percent of the vote (Post-Inform, 28 March).  His 
popularity in the south was reflected in a recent Odesa poll that 
showed 18 percent for Kuchma versus only 6 percent for Kravchuk 
(Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 16 April).  Kravchuk himself at a 2 June 
meeting categorized Kuchma as his main rival in the election 
(Interfax, 3 June; Izvestiya, 4 June). 
   Prospects 
   Supreme Soviet maneuvering and the presidential race are shaping 
up as a struggle between Kravchuk, Plyushch, nationalists, and 
democrats against the more pro-Russian Kuchma, Moroz, and the 
CPU--the present establishment versus the "outsiders" from the 
east and leftist camp.  After the first round of the presidential 
election, Kravchuk will probably emerge as the standardbearer for 
Ukrainian nationalists against Kuchma, who is backed by the 
populous east and south, making the election more of a referendum 
on whether or not to draw closer to Russia, rather than on 
economic or political reform.  With the strong CPU showing in the 
Supreme Soviet election and leftists taking control of 
parliament, a victory by Kuchma or Moroz in the presidential race 
would put the east in control and swing Ukraine away from the 
nationalist course it has followed since independence, a change 
likely to cause further tension between Ukraine's east and west 
regions. 
   Box One 
              Members of Durdynets' Center 
   The Center is largely a collection of of government officials, 
who comprise over half of the 27 Center members listed in the 5 
May Uryadovyy Kuryer.  Several Supreme Soviet officials, DemPU 
Chairman Volodymyr Yavorivskyy, New Wave leader Ihor Yukhnovskyy, 
and one Rukh member (Myroslav Horbatyuk) also belong.  Only two 
government ministers elected to the Supreme Soviet did not join- 
-Environmental Minister Yuriy Kostenko (a Rukh candidate) and 
Agriculture Minister Yuriy Karasyk (a nonparty candidate but 
probably close to the agrarians).  No pro-Kravchuk URP (Ukrainian 
Republican Party) members apparently joined, much less any 
leftists, Kuchma backers, New Ukraine, ultranationalists, or 
well-known Rukh leaders.  The following members of the Center 
were identified in the 5 May Uryadovyy Kuryer or 24 May Holos 
Ukrainy: 
       Oleksandr Bandurka--MVD chief for Kharkiv oblast, no party 
    Volodymyr Bortnik--chairman of an agricultural equipment 
company, no party 
    Anton Buteyko--director of Kravchuk's Service of 
Administration, no party 
    Volodymyr Butkevich--head of department of international law 
at Kiev State University, no party 
    Valeriy Cherep--chairman of the old Supreme Soviet Commission 
on Questions of Construction, Architecture and Housing and 
Communal Economy, no party 
    Anatoliy Dron--chairman of the State Committee for Housing 
and Communal Economy, no party 
    Vasyl Durdynets--first deputy chairman of the old Supreme 
Soviet 
    Anatoliy Holubchenko--industry minister, no party 
    Myroslav Horbatyuk--engineer at institute, Rukh 
    Viktor Kalnyk--deputy minister of economy, no party 
    Olymp Klympush--transport minister, no party 
    Valeriy Kolomoytsev--director of a small enterprise, no party 
    Mykhaylo Kovalko--chairman of State Committee for Oil and 
Gas, no party 
    Vasyl Kostytskyy--department head at juridical faculty of 
Pricarpathian University, no party 
    Mykhaylo Kostytskyy--dean of juridical faculty at Lviv State 
University, no party 
    Valentyn Landyk--deputy premier, nonparty 
    Kostyantyn Piskunovskyy--director of Ukrainian Oil Products 
Association, no party 
    Vadym Plotkin--director of an industrial enterprise, no party 
    Ivan Plyushch--chairman of the old Supreme Soviet, no party 
    Volodymyr Pylypchuk--Chairman of the old Supreme Soviet 
Commission for Questions of Economic Reform and Managment of 
Economy, listed as nonparty in Uryadovyy Kuryer, but elected as a 
democratic bloc candidate, one of Rukh's main economists in past 
    Petro Sheyko--president's representative in a rayon in 
Chernihiv, no party 
    Roman Shpek--economy minister, no party 
    Yuriy Spizhenko--health minister, no party 
    Mykola Surhay--chairman of the State Committee for the Coal 
Industry, no party 
    Viktor Suslov--adviser to the premier, listed as nonparty in 
Uryadovyy Kuryer, but later listed as Agrarian when named 
chairman of the finance commission (UNIAR, 31 May) 
    Serhiy Ustych--deputy head of. Zakarpatsk 0blast State 
Administration, no party 
    Volodymyr Yavorivskyy--Chairman of old Supreme Soviet 
Commission on Questions of Chernobyl Disaster, DemPU chairman 
Ihor Yukhnovskyy--member of old Supreme Soviet Presidium, 
former First deputy premier, listed as no party by Uryadovyy 
Kuryer but ran on New Wave ticket in Lviv 
    Mykola Zhulynskyy--deputy premier, no party 
    Yukhym Zvyahilskyy--acting premier, no party 
End Box One 
   Box Two 
                   Factions in the New Supreme Soviet 
   When the Supreme Soviet opened in mid-May, it decided after 
considerable debate that 25 members would be required to register 
as an official faction with the right of representation in the 
Supreme Soviet's Presidium and other advantages (Nezavisimaya 
Gazeta, 20 May; Post-Postup, 19-25 May).  This forced small 
groups such as the URP, DemPU, and MDF-Center to consider 
combining with others to meet this requirement (Za Vilnu Ukrainu, 
18 May).  As the eclectic membership of the factions 
demonstrates, deputies elected on a party ticket sometimes did 
not join their parties' Supreme Soviet factions and factions 
sometimes took names other than that of the parties they are 
based on.  In an effort to discourage separatism, the rules 
adopted by the parliament banned factions formed on regional 
bases, a move angering some southern and Donbass deputies who 
wanted to form regional blocs (Robitnycha Hazeta, 13 May). 
   Leftists:   The CPU formed the biggest faction, named "For Social 
Justice and People's Power" (Post-Postup, 19-25 May) and 
initially including 95 members (Silski Visti, 19 May).  Since 
only 86 deputies were elected on the CPU ticket, this indicates 
that some non-CPU deputies have joined up with the victorious 
faction.  The CPU had so many members that it reportedly sent 11 
to join the SPU's 14 to help the SPU reach the 25 minimum 
(Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 20 May).  SelPU formed an "Agrarians of 
Ukraine" faction consisting of 37 members (Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 
20 May), with former Agriculture Minister Oleksandr Tkachenko as 
its organizer (Post-Postup, 22-28 April). 
   Nationalist Democrats:  Nationalist democrats decided not to 
revive the umbrella Narodna Rada group that had united most 
nationalists and democrats in the old Supreme Soviet.  Narodna 
Rada Chairman Ivan Zayets argued for renewing the coalition, but 
Chornovil preferred to create a mechanism for working with the 
Center and other factions to counter the left (Molod Ukrainy, 13 
May) and also argued that having several reform factions would be 
better than just one because each would have a representative in 
the Supreme Soviet Presidium (Za Vilnu Ukrainu, 18 May).  Rukh 
formed a faction of 32, including members of the Christian 
Democratic Party and DemPU, but not the URP (Ukrainian Weekly, 1 
May).  A Derzhavnist (Statehood) faction was formed by the URP's 
9 elected members, according to its leader Mykola Porovskyy 
(Kyivska Pravda, 24 May), but has only reached 16 members 
(according to the 19-25 May Post-Postup) or 19 members (according 
to the 12 May Interfax).  A "Faction of Reforms" was formed by 
representatives of Lviv's New Wave and former Rukh leader Serhiy 
Holovatiy (Za Vilnu Ukrainu, 18 May).*  According to another 
account, "Reforms" was formed by rival economic reformers 
Volodymyr Lanovyy and Viktor Pynzenyk, and joined by Holovatiy, 
PDVU (Party of Democratic Revival of Ukraine) leader Taras 
Stetskiv, Union of Officers of Ukraine leader Hryhoriy 
Omelchenko, and some KUN (Congress of Ukrainian Nationalists) 
members, and Serhiy Sobolev became its "coordinator" (Post- 
Postup, 19-25 May).  Molod Ukrainy on 13 May reported that 
Lanovyy had formed a faction of entrepreneurs. 
   *Holovatiy was excluded from Rukh's leadership by Chornovil at 
Rukh's mid-April congress (Za Vilnu Ukrainu, 21 April). 
   Non-Nationalistic Democrats:  The Interregional Bloc for Reform 
(MBR) led by Kuchma and Hrynyov formed a faction also calling 
itself the "Center"-- the "Interregional Deputies Faction (MDF)- 
Center" (Vecherniy Kiev, 28 April).  At a 5 May meeting of this 
group, Kuchma announced that he would not support Durdynets for 
chairmanship of the Supreme Soviet, and the faction decided to 
put off a decision until MBR Co-Chairman Hrynyov decided whether 
to run for this post (UNIAN, 6 May).  The group is small, 
although various numbers have been cited for its size.  Hrynyov 
in a 11 May Holos Ukrainy interview said it had 21 members, 
Vecherniy Kiev on 28 April said 21, Vysokyy Zamok on 14 May said 
20, UNIAN on 20 April said 26, but Chornovil claimed it is less 
than 12 (Holos Ukrainy, 11 May). 
   A group of industrialists formed Yednist (Unity) under the 
nonparty deputy Valeriy Babych, president of the "Ukrainian 
Financial Group" (Post-Postup, 19-25 May) and appeared to play a 
devious role in the struggle between the Center and the leftists. 
Although they joined the Center-nationalist bloc formed to back 
Durdynets (Post-Postup, 19-25 May), Yednist members may have 
actually voted for the leftist candidates for Supreme Soviet 
chairman and deputy chairmen.  Rukh on 25 May declared that 
Yednist had joined the CPU-SPU-Agrarian bloc (Vecherniy Kiev, 27 
May) and bitterly assailed it for helping lead a "communist coup" 
(Nezavisimost, 27 May); a 27 May Nezavisimost account called 
Yednist a "Trojan horse" that helped elect Socialist Oleksandr 
Moroz chairman; and democrats complained that Yednist had been 
shown special favor by the newly-elected leftist leadership, 
receiving one more seat in the Presidium than it was entitled to 
(UNIAN, 31 May). 
   Rightists:  Ultranationalists--Stepan Khmara's Ukrainian 
Conservative Republican Party, the Ukrainian National Assembly 
(UNA), and KUN--won too few seats to quality for a 25-member 
faction, even assuming they could agree to work together (Post- 
Postup, 19-25 May).  KUN, which had managed to elect 6 or 8 
members,** announced that it would form its own faction of 16 
(Kievskiye Vedomosti, 11 May). 
   **See the Trends of 20 April 1994, page 18. 
   The figures for the size of various factions announced by the 
Supreme Soviet leadership have been going up and down.  On 17 May 
Moroz announced that the CPU faction had 95 members, the Center 
31, Rukh 27, and Yednist 27 (Interfax report in Krymskaya Pravda, 
19 May).  On 26 May he declared that the CPU faction had 87 
members, the Center 43, Agrarians 33, Yednist 27, Reforms 26, 
Derzhavnist 26, and Socialists 25, while 41 were independents 
(Interfax, 26 May).  This time he did not mention Rukh.  On 27 
May the Supreme Soviet Secretariat listed factions as of that 
day:  Communists for Social Justice and Democracy 86, Center 38, 
Agrarians 33, Rukh 27, Reforms 27, "Interregional Deputies Group" 
27, Derzhavnist 26, Yednist 26, Socialists 25 (UNIAR, 27 May). 
   End Box Two 
   (AUTHOR:  HAHN.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ANALYSIS BRANCH, RUSSIA DIVISION, (703) 733-6070.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH/ta 08/2312z jun 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23097 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000031394001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   9 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-DPRK-U.S.-IAEA 
<H3> <TI>      Pyongyang Claims U.S. Bad Faith, Hardens Nuclear Stance </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Pyongyang Claims U.S. Bad Faith, Hardens Nuclear Stance </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                               Accusing Washington of bad faith, Pyongyang has hardened its 
stance on the nuclear issue and is heightening the crisis over 
its refusal to stop removing spent fuel rods from its 5-megawatt 
nuclear reactor.  With the possibility of UN sanctions looming 
larger, Pyongyang may be wavering on the issue of convening a 
multinational conference to deal with the North Korean nuclear 
issue as proposed by Moscow. 
                         END SUMMARY 
   Pyongyang is moving to deter renewed demands for special 
inspections of two suspected nuclear waste sites as a way of 
shedding light on possible diversion of nuclear materials.  To 
this end, a 7 June Foreign Ministry spokesman's statement 
attempted to refute U.S. Assistant Secretary of State Robert 
Gallucci's recent "allegation" that Pyongyang has destroyed the 
possibility of the future measurement of the fuel rods in 
defiance of the International Atomic Energy Agency (IAEA) 
(Pyongyang radio, 8 June).  Calling Assistant Secretary 
Gallucci's comments an "alarming assertion," the statement 
contended that the United States hopes to "invent a pretext" for 
a special inspection of the two waste sites--sites that the 
statement, as usual, depicted as "military."  It declared 
provocatively that Washington should not "even dream" of having 
"our military sites" inspected. 
   Purporting to demonstrate Washington's bad faith, the spokesman's 
statement reported that there had been a series of "contacts" 
between North Korea and the United States over the question of 
the reactor refueling, during which, it said, a document 
explaining the North Korean method of preserving the "technical 
feasibility" of future measurement of fuel rods had been passed 
to the United States.  The U.S. side, the statement claimed, 
promised a response after "sincerely studying" the document, and 
even allegedly stated that high-level bilateral talks could be 
resumed, provided that the technical feasibility of future 
measurement is preserved.  However, the statement went on to say 
that without giving the promised response, Washington 
"unilaterally declared" that the technical feasibility of 
measurement had been lost--a declaration, according to the 
statement, that was timed to coincide with an IAEA report to the 
UN Security Council. 
   Indicating that Pyongyang has dropped any pretense that it might 
take a more accommodating stance, the statement claimed that this 
"surprise" move by the United States has destroyed "the last 
chance for seeking a compromise."  Again threatening to pull out 
of the Nuclear Nonproliferation Treaty (NPT), it pointedly drew a 
parallel between the current crisis and the situation in March 
1993, when North Korea announced that it was pulling out of the 
NPT.  The statement added a militant tone to the threat, claiming 
that while Pyongyang still supports resolution of the issue 
through "dialogue and negotiation," the "entire people and the 
entire army" will "counter" any attempt to force "special 
inspections" or "sanctions" on North Korea. 
   Letter to IAEA     In a parallel move, Pak Yong-nam, head of 
North Korea's General Department of Atomic Energy, has rebuffed 
an IAEA call for special inspection of the two suspected waste 
sites.  In a 6 June letter to the IAEA, Pak alleged that the 
agency is claiming that, with the loss of the technical 
feasibility of measuring fuel rods, it is "indispensable" that 
"two ordinary military sites" be subjected to IAEA special 
inspection to verify nondiversion of nuclear material (KCNA, 7 
June).  This, Pak contended, shows that the IAEA "continues to 
join the United States" in "hostile" attempts to open "ordinary" 
military sites to outside inspection.  Pak went on to reiterate 
Pyongyang's earlier, thinly-veiled threat to resume nuclear fuel 
reprocessing activities if the IAEA refers the North Korean 
nuclear issue to the UN Security Council. 
   War Talk     These amplifications of the DPRK's uncompromising 
position have been accompanied by a heightening of Pyongyang's 
war rhetoric.  Clearly seeking to unsettle Seoul, Pyongyang radio 
on 6 June carried a belligerent statement by the Committee for 
the Peaceful Reunification of the Fatherland, a quasi-official 
organ the North often uses to map out its position on inter- 
Korean issues.  Warning against South Kdrean support for UN 
sanctions, the statement declared, "Sanctions are war, period, 
and there is no mercy in a war."  This phrase seemed to raise by 
a notch the harshness of Pyongyang's now standard statement 
equating sanctions to "a declaration of war," a formulation that 
first surfaced in March 1993 as part of Pyongyang's original 
declaration of its intention to withdraw from the NPT (Pyongyang 
radio, 12 March 1993). 
   Russian Proposal     With the specter of UN sanctions looming 
larger, tentative signs have been emerging that Pyongyang may be 
reconsidering its opposition to a Russian proposal for an 
international conference on the nuclear issue, possibly as a 
fallback position to avoid sanctions.  In a 1 April Foreign 
Ministry spokesman's statement (KCNA), Pyongyang had politely, 
but firmly, rejected Moscow's proposal for an eight-party 
conference (with both Koreas, the United States, Japan, China, 
Russia, the United Nations, and the IAEA).  That statement had 
reiterated Pyongyang's assertion that the North Korean nuclear 
issue should be resolved bilaterally between Pyongyang and 
Washington and suggested that Moscow could exert its influence on 
Washington to be more forthcoming.  However, following North 
Korean Vice Foreign Minister Yi In-kyu's recent visit to Moscow, 
a Foreign Ministry spokesman noted, without comment, that during 
the visit, the Russians, while "expressing understanding" of 
Pyongyang's preference of DPRK-U.S. talks, had again proposed 
"multi-party talks" on the nuclear issue (KCNA, 5, 30 May).  The 
Russians were more upbeat in describing North Korean reaction to 
their plan, claiming that Pyongyang had "expressed a positive 
attitude" on the Russian proposal (Moscow Interfax, 19 May). 
Indicating that Moscow still considers its proposal alive, the 
Russians reportedly pushed their proposal again during ROK 
President Kim Yong-sam's recent visit to Moscow (ITAR-Tass, 8 
June.) 
   Implications     Pyongyang is clearly trying to place the blame 
for the latest escalation of the crisis on Washington's alleged 
decision to go public with its position on the fuel rod issue 
before communicating the new position to North Korea through 
private channels.  Pyongyang's apparent wavering on the Russian 
proposal, despite its consistent preference for bilateral 
negotiations with Washington, suggests that the North Korean 
leadership may realize that a UN Security Council sanctions 
resolution is a real possibility. 
   (AUTHOR:  YIM.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ASIA DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6534.) 
EAG/HEBBEL/ta 08/2319z jun 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23098 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000031494001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   10 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-074-SO. KOREA 
<H3> <TI>      SOUTH KOREA:  'Multipurpose' Reconnaissance Satellite Program </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       SOUTH KOREA:  'Multipurpose' Reconnaissance Satellite Program </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Moves   Forward 

   SUMMARY:  South Korea's indigenous reconnaissance satellite 
program has been approved by the country's Science and Technology 
Council, according to recent ROK press reports.  Billed as 
"multipurpose," the spacecraft will use a high-resolution device to 
return images of the Korean Peninsula and surrounding areas and 
carry other equipment designed for mobile communications and 
"scientific experiments."  The medium-sized satellite will be 
launched in 1998 by an indigenous booster developed through the 
"Korean Scientific Rocket" (KSR) program, or by a Hyundai rocket 
made with Russian technology. 
   The 18 May CHUGAN MAEGYONG reported that South Korea's plan to 
build an "indigenous multipurpose satellite for practical use" was 
approved on 9 May by the Combined Science and Technology Council, 
clearing the way for work to begin at once.  The Seoul magazine 
stated that unlike the "Rose of Sharon" communications satellite 
scheduled to be launched in 1995 which has little local content and 
a strictly defined function, the present project is aimed at 
producing an "indigenous" spacecraft with "multiple purposes." 
These reportedly include "monitoring the oceans, scientific 
experiments, and experimental satellite communications."  The 
satellite's "high-resolution cameras" will return imagery of crop 
failures, floods, forest fires, and other disasters and keep track 
of oil spills and changes in fishing areas, the magazine said. 
Development will be completed in 1997 in preparation for a March 
1998 launch. 
   According to CHUGAN MAEGYONG, the satellite will weigh between 
350 and 500 kg, have a hexagonal shape that measures 1.2 meters both 
in diameter and in height, and follow a "low earth orbit" at an 
altitude of 400-800 km for a service life of three to five years. 
The 16 April MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN, CHUGAN MAEGYONG's parent 
publication, provided similar figures but gave the weight as 300-500 
kg and added that the payload will include two systems:  one "for 
monitoring the Korean Peninsula and surrounding oceans," and another 
"for scientific experiments to measure ozone and for space science 
observations."  MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN reported that the project has a 
budget of 165 billion won ($206 million).  The 18 April CHONJA 
SINMUN, an electronics trade journal, noted that 141.5 billion won 
($176.9 million) of that amount will be paid by government and 23.5 
billion won ($29.8 million) will be contributed by private industry. 
   Citing "knowledgeable sources," CHONJA SINMUN stated that the 
"struggle" between the ROK's Ministry of Science and Technology 
(MOST) and Ministry of Trade, Industry, and Energy (MOTIE) for 
control over the country's satellite program has been settled "for 
the time being" by putting space development on an "interagency 
footing."  More specifically, MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN reported that 
MOST will be given the "leading role," assisted by MOTIE and "other 
government agencies," which CHUGAN MAEGYONG identified as South 
Korea's Economic Planning Board, the Ministry of Communications, and 
several institutes, including the Korea Aerospace Research Institute 
(KARI), Korea Advanced Institute of Science and Technology's (KAIST) 
Earth Satellite Center, the Electronics and Telecommunications 
Research Institute, and the Korea Electronic Parts Combined Research 
Center.  According to CHONJA SINMUN, friction between KAIST (which 
directed the "Our Star" program) and KARI (which has overall control 
of the "Rose of Sharon" project) was resolved in the latter's favor 
and KARI is now the "single focus" within the Science Ministry for 
satellite development.  CHUGAN MAEGYONG noted similarly that KARI 
will "take charge" of coordinating research. 
   According to MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN, MOST will handle overall 
design, develop the payload systems, and design and operate a ground 
control station; it will also apportion jobs between government 
agencies.  MOTIE will design the satellite bus and its components. 
MKS reported that "in order for South Korea to indigenize its own 
particular form of multipurpose satellite and parts," the bus will 
be divided into five systems, including "electronics and attitude 
control," and "assigned to selected companies and agencies for 
concentrated development."  Some 60 percent of the satellite bus 
will be indigenous. 
   South Korea's "multipurpose satellite" was first mentioned in the 
ROK press on 13 March 1993, when HANGUK ILBO reported that an 
indigenous satellite would be developed to redress a "major concern 
about being dependent on large foreign corporations."  The paper 
listed South Korea's Ministry of Defense among those agencies 
involved in the project (see FBIS Foreign Media Note FB PN 93-464 
dated 22 Dec 93).  Other press reporting, including an article in 
the October 1993 KUKBANG KWA KISUL written by a KAIST employee, 
listed "military applications" as a chief purpose of the program and 
drew parallels between this and the experimental "Our Star" 
satellites, which were launched in 1992 and 1993 into near-polar 
orbits.  KUKBANG KWA KISUL described the more sensitive of Our Star 
II's two imaging systems as a charge coupled device with a 12-degree 
aperture and resolution of 200 meters.  CHUGAN MAEGYONG stated that 
the new multipurpose satellite will have electronic imaging 
equipment with a resolution of 20 meters, a ten-fold improvement. 
   Press reports also indicate the multipurpose satellite may be 
orbited by an indigenous booster.  An article in the 8 October 1993 
HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN stated that South Korean satellites "beginning 
about the year 2000" will be launched by an "indigenous three-stage 
rocket that is under development," a probable reference to KARI's 
KSR program, which is budgeted through 1998.  An article in the 9 
May MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN reported that the Hyundai Group may also 
build a space-capable rocket with Russian technology through its 
subsidiary Hyundai Technology Development Corporation.  MAEIL 
KYONGJE SINMUN explained that Hyundai, which has a joint venture 
agreement with the Russian firm Yakovlev to build airplanes, "in the 
long term" will also be involved in aerospace development including 
a "launch vehicle for earth satellites." 
   (Author:  Hannas.  Questions and/or comments, please call Chief, 
Southeast Asia/Korea Branch at (703) 733-6522. 
EAG/9JUN94/MILF/TNDF/ASIA DIVISION CS 09/1443z jun 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23099 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000031594001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   10 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-9JUN94-China-UK-HK 
<H3> <TI>      China-UK-Hong Kong </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       China-UK-Hong Kong </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
Beijing      Warns Hong Kong on Political Dissidents 

                      SUMMARY 

   Reflecting apparent Chinese leadership's sensitivity to the 
potentially destabilizing influence on China of anti-Beijing 
dissident activity in Hong Kong, a highly unusual editorial in 
the PRC-owned Hong Kong daily Wen Wei Po suggested that Beijing 
may be reconsidering its longstanding pledge to preserve Hong 
Kong's capitalist system after the transition to Chinese rule in 
1997. 

                      END SUMMARY 

   Signs that Beijing may be rethinking its policy of "one country, 
two systems"--a concept associated with senior leader Deng 
Xiaoping which calls for the retention of a capitalist economy in 
Hong Kong for 50 years after the transition--came in a caustic 
editorial carried by Wen Wei Po on 30 May.  The editorial warned 
that this policy is "feasible" only if dissidents do not use Hong 
Kong as a "bridgehead" to "interfere with, subvert, or sabotage" 
China's socialist system.  It went on to assert that the 
implementation of the principle will "suffer" if "one system" 
tries to "bring down" the other.  The editorial also implicitly 
associated this harsh message with the current Beijing 
leadership, selectively quoting from a "well-known speech" on 
Hong Kong policy delivered by party chief Jiang Zemin after 
China's suppression of the 1989 Tiananmen prodemocracy movement. 
The editorial referred to Jiang's use of the metaphor of "well 
water not mixing with river water"--a warning against extending 
Hong Kong's capitalism to the mainland--but did not mention his 
assurances that "one country, two systems" would prevail. 
   The editorial's harsh warning flies in the face of repeated 
assurances by Chinese leaders that capitalism will prevail in 
Hong Kong after 1997.  In a major policy speech as recently as 6 
May, Lu Ping, the State Council's Director of Hong Kong and Macao 
Affairs, reaffirmed China's pledge to retain Hong Kong as a 
capitalist "bridge" to the West even as he warned against 
"movements" that "disrupt the Chinese economy" and efforts by 
"Hong Kong people" to "exert pressure on the Chinese Government" 
(Xinhua, 6 May).  The "one country, two systems" concept, he 
said, is "truly China's longterm policy" and is "guaranteed by 
law."  In an apparent effort to portray Lu's speech as consistent 
with its own hardline theme, the Wen Wei Po editorial highlighted 
Lu's warning that Hong Kong is not a "political city" that can 
"influence the mainland politically" and his references to Hong 
Kong's "economic value" as the basis of Beijing's policy.  It did 
not, however, mention Lu's references to Hong Kong as a bridge to 
the West. 
   The editorial's harsh rhetoric on Hong Kong may have been 
prompted by anti-PRC dissident activity in Hong Kong in the runup 
to the 4 June anniversary of Tiananmen and by fears that Hong 
Kong authorities will tolerate such activity in the future. 
Reflecting these concerns, the editorial was particularly 
critical of the Hong Kong Government's widely reported decision 
to allow exiled labor activist Han Dongfang to remain in Hong 
Kong, complaining that Han intended to "organize a solidarity 
trade union" and make "trouble out of nothing."  It also 
expressed concern about efforts by other prominent dissidents in 
the United States to "follow in the footsteps of Han Dongfang" 
and return to Hong Kong to "put on a 'show' first" before moving 
on into the mainland via the springboard of Hong Kong to "make 
trouble." 
   While clearly meant as a warning to Hong Kong authorities, the 
editorial was also critical of U.S. support for the dissidents. 
It claimed that Han's "anti-China activities" were being funded 
by "none other than the AFL-CIO."  It also purported to see a 
U.S. hand behind the desire by other dissidents to make Hong Kong 
their base of operations, saying that "one foreign country" has 
provided political asylum for this "batch of so-called 
'prodemocracy activists'" and that their "bosses" are now 
"telling" them to return to the mainland to carry out "subversive 
activities." 
(AUTHOR: SIMON. QUESTIONS AND/OR C0MMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
CHINA ANALYSIS TEAM (703) 733-6097.) 
EAG/HEBBEL CS 09/1714z jun 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23100 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000031694001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   10 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-075 
<H3> <TI>      PALESTINIAN AFFAIRS:  FIRST TV TEST RUN </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       PALESTINIAN AFFAIRS:  FIRST TV TEST RUN </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
The      Palestinian Television Network aired its first test broadcast 
from Jericho on 6 June and reportedly intends to televise Yasir 
'Arafat's arrival later this month.  The trial broadcast, which 
featured the Palestinian Broadcasting Corporation (PBC) logo 
accompanied by its name and a Palestinian flag, was reported by 
Sanaa Voice of Palestine as well as Jordanian and Israeli radio on 7 
June.  An AFP report from the same day said that transmission of the 
broadcast, which covered only Jericho, was weak, and attributed this 
in part to Jericho's location well below sea level.  The head of 
PBC, Radwan Abu-'Ayyash, told Radio Jordan that he hopes that the 
television transmissions will soon cover the entire West Bank and 
Gaza Strip.  He added that Palestinian radio will begin 
broadcasting four to eight hours per day to Jericho and Gaza by late 
June. 

   The Palestinian test broadcast was made from a Jericho hotel 
which has been turned into a press center in preparation for 
'Arafat's visit, and which will continue to operate as a permanent 
broadcasting center, according to the AFP report.  PBC head Abu- 
'Ayyash stated: "Our plan was to have a main studio in Ramallah, 
connected with one in Gaza and one in Jericho.  Because we have no 
other choice, we will transmit from Jericho, although it is terrible 
from such a low area. "  He said that two French-made boosting 
towers will be placed on a nearby mountain and highway.  Technicians 
have promised that transmissions to the rest of the West Bank and 
Gaza Strip will be ready within a week. 

   AFP quotes Abu-'Ayyash as saying that the primary obstacle to 
Palestinian broadcasting is a lack of funds.  He said that $55 
million is needed to establish a permanent radio and TV broadcasting 
center.  Most of this has been promised by the European Union, he 
noted, but "the money is locked up in Brussels" and has yet to 
arrive.  The test broadcast was made from a temporary mobile 
transmission station, according to Abu-'Ayyash, because the 
Palestinian authority has not yet received equipment promised by 
donors.  A dispute with Israel over the location of the broadcasting 
center has also caused delays.  On 5 June, Abu-'Ayyash told AFP that 
Israel had informed the Palestinian authority that they must set up 
their broadcasting facilities in Jericho.  The PBC had intended to 
set up their studios in Ramallah, where a pre-1967 transmitter and 
radio masts are being renovated.  "Now we cannot have the studios in 
Ramallah," said Abu-Ayyash. "The town is not part of the autonomous 
areas." 

   (QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, AFRICA/LEVANT 
BRANCH AT (703) 733-6408) 
ENEAG/09 Jun/POLCHF/TTPF/NEASA Division/SDJ 09/2042Z JUN 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23101 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000031794001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   10 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-09JUN94-JAPAN-U.S. 
<H3> <TI>      Divisions, Infighting Hinder Tokyo's Deregulation Efforts </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Divisions, Infighting Hinder Tokyo's Deregulation Efforts </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                                Divisions within the Japanese business community, disagreements 
among members of the various government panels charged with 
examining deregulation, and infighting among key government 
ministries appear to be hindering the Japanese Government's 
efforts to draw up a package of measures to deregulate the 
Japanese economy.  These problems, together with opposition to 
some of the deregulation efforts by bureaucrats in a number of 
ministries, may limit the scope of the package that Tokyo will 
ultimately be able to compile. 
                         END SUMMARY 
   The Japanese Government's plans to deregulate the Japanese 
economy appear to be encountering resistance not only from the 
Japanese bureaucracy but also from elements of several other 
groups that are playing important roles in the government's 
efforts to pull together a package of deregulation measures.  For 
example, Japan's business community appears to be sharply divided 
over some of the proposals for deregulation.  Many larger 
companies and the business organizations that represent them 
appear to support deregulation in general because they believe it 
will help them recover from the current recession.  The 
Federation of Economic Organizations of Japan (Keidanren), 
Japan's largest business organization, reportedly presented a 
196-point proposal for deregulation to Prime Minister Tsutomu 
Hata on 13 May (Kyodo, 13 May) and its chairman, Shoichiro 
Toyoda, urged Hata to support thorough-going deregulation at a 
meeting on 30 May (Nihon Keizai Shimbun, 30 May).  Another group 
representing many large corporations, the Japan Association of 
Corporate Executives (Keizai Doyukai) has also lobbied for 
deregulation with various senior government officials, and, 
according to a 13 May Kyodo report, its chairman, Masaru Hayami, 
recently told Prime Minister Hata that deregulation was "vital" 
to Japan's economic recovery from its current recession (Kyodo, 
13 May). 
   By contrast, small and medium-sized companies appear to be 
worried that some deregulation proposals may hurt their 
competitiveness.  One of the major concerns of these smaller 
companies seems to be a proposal to relax the Large-Scale Retail 
Store Law that restricts the conditions under which larger 
retailers can do business.  According to the 26 May Nihon Keizai 
Shimbun, the Japan Chamber of Commerce and Industry and three 
organizations representing small and medium companies issued a 
joint statement on 25 May opposing any further easing of the 
Large-Scale Retail Store Law.  On 7 June, representatives of four 
small-business organizations, led by the Japan Chamber of 
Commerce and Industry's chairman, Kosaku Inaba, reportedly 
presented a petition arguing against further relaxation of the 
law to Prime Minister Tsutomu Hata (Kyodo, 7 June). 
   The opposition of small and medium-sized businesses to a number 
of the deregulation proposals currently under consideration may 
play into the hands of bureaucrats who are resisting some of the 
same proposals.  The Ministry of International Trade and Industry 
(MITI), for example, appears to share the smaller companies' 
reservations about easing the Large-Scale Retail Store Law.  The 
28 May Yomiuri Shimbun reported that MITI did not include 
relaxation of the law on a list of recommendations for 
deregulation it recently compiled as part of the government's 
efforts to assemble a package of deregulation proposals. 
   The opposition of smaller companies may also limit the business 
community's leverage on the deregulation issue by preventing it 
from presenting a united front to the government.  For example, 
the Five-Man Committee on Administrative Reform--a group 
consisting of the leaders of five major economic organizations 
which has played a major role in pushing for deregulation--has 
been unable to convene a meeting recently because of disagreement 
within the business community over such issues as the Large-Scale 
Retail Store Law, according to the 26 May Nihon Keizai Shimbun. 
The paper quoted an unnamed Keidanren official as saying that 
Keidanren wanted to call a meeting to discuss ways to counter 
bureaucratic resistance to deregulation, but some organizations 
representing smaller businesses objected, fearing that 
deregulation may harm their interests. 
   Divisions in Reform Panels 
   Apparent divisions over the scope and pace of deregulation in the 
panels charged with drawing up deregulation proposals constitute 
another obstacle to the government's deregulation effort.  For 
example, according to the 27 May Asahi Shimbun, the panel on 
information and telecommunications under the Prime Minister's 
Administrative Reform Promotion Council--a body charged with 
drawing up the government's deregulation proposals--has been 
unable to agree on the scope of deregulation in the 
telecommunications sector.  The paper reported that some members 
of the panel favor immediate removal of as many regulations 
governing the telecommunications business as possible, arguing 
that the government should not restrict competition in the 
sector.  Other members, however, reportedly want to limit 
deregulation in the sector because they see it as a "public 
service" field to which access should be strictly controlled. 
   Ministerial Infighting 
   Infighting among government ministries also appears to be 
hindering deregulation efforts.  Japanese press reporting has 
suggested that some ministries are trying limit deregulation in 
their areas of responsibility, while pushing for greater 
deregulation in areas within the jurisdiction of other 
ministries.  For example, the 28 May Yomiuri Shimbun quoted an 
unnamed official in the Ministry of Agriculture, Forestry and 
Fisheries as accusing MITI of "interfering in the affairs of 
other ministries and agencies and leaving its own affairs 
untouched by deregulation."  According to the paper, the official 
claimed that MITI recently angered a number of other ministries 
by compiling an ambitious list of recommendations for 
deregulation which reportedly encompassed only regulations under 
the jurisdiction of other ministries and none under MITI's.   The 
official also alleged that the list included proposals to change 
the current procedures for licensing liquor sales, which are 
under the jurisdiction of the Ministry of Finance, but did not 
included changes in regulations like the Large-Scale Retail Store 
Law, which is under MITI's jurisdiction. 
   Outlook 
   The weak ruling coalition government may have trouble countering 
opposition to deregulation because it appears to be coming from a 
number of different quarters.  Resistance from bureaucrats and 
infighting within the bureaucracy are likely to slow progress on 
compiling the deregulation package and dilute some of the bolder 
measures.  The panels charged with drawing up proposals may be 
unable to come up with clear recommendations or may be forced to 
drop or water down those on which they cannot agree.  While the 
Japanese business community could put pressure on the bureaucracy 
and the panels to come up with more wide-ranging proposals, its 
impact will probably be limited because of its own internal 
divisions and the opposition of small and medium-sized companies 
to some aspects of deregulation. 
   (AUTHOR:  BOUNDS.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ASIA DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703)-733-6534.) 
EAG/HEBBEL/GSP 09/2253z JUN 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23102 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000031894001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   11 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-10JUN94-UKRAINE 
<H3> <TI>      Crimea Takes Steps To Weaken Ties to Ukraine </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Crimea Takes Steps To Weaken Ties to Ukraine </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                               The newly-elected Crimean Supreme Soviet has taken steps to give 
the autonomous republic of Krym (Crimea) greater independence 
from Ukraine, spurring the Ukrainian Government to reassert its 
authority over the autonomous republic.  By an overwhelming 
majority, the Crimean parliament on 20 May voted to restore 
Krym's canceled 1992 constitution that appeared to give Krym even 
more autonomy.  Despite the apparent wide support for this move 
in Krym, serious splits have developed among pro-independence 
forces on the Crimean side which may weaken their ability to 
pursue a strong policy toward Kiev. 
                          END SUMMARY 
   The 27 March-10 April Crimean parliamentary elections produced a 
strongly pro-independence Supreme Soviet, eager to carry out a 
program of restoring the 6 May 1992 Crimean Constitution (See 
Note 1) that calls for a bilateral treaty to govern relations 
between Ukraine and Krym, entitles Crimeans to dual citizenship 
in Ukraine and Russia, and allows the establishment of a separate 
Crimean internal security force (Radio Rossii, 20 May), but, in a 
concession to Kiev, affirms that Krym is part of Ukraine (Kiev 
Ukrayinske Radio, 20 May).  Within days of the opening of the 
recent Supreme Soviet session, newly-elected speaker Sergey 
Tsekov and his pro-Russian colleagues began moves toward 
independence.  Tsekov told journalists in a 15 May press 
conference that the majority Russia Bloc would carry out its 
program and restore the 1992 constitution (Krymskiye Izvestiya, 
17 May; Segodnya, 17 May).  On 20 May, despite Crimean President 
Yuriy Meshkov's urging postponement (ITAR-TASS, 19 May), 69 of 73 
deputies present voted to restore the 1992 constitution, with 
only the two Communist Party of Krym (KPK) members voting against 
and the Crimean Tatar faction refusing to participate (Ostankino 
TV, 20 May; Krymskaya Pravda, 21 May). 
   (Note 1)  The Crimean Supreme Soviet first adopted this 
constitution in May 1992 but under pressure from Kiev annulled it 
a few days later. 
   Likewise attempting to strengthen Krym's position vis-a-vis 
Ukraine and strengthen his own hand as well, Crimean President 
Yuriy Meshkov had unilaterally decreed on 11 April the removal of 
heads of the Crimean police ministries and the appointment of his 
own pro-Russian loyalists.  He named Volodymyr Lepikhov, deputy 
head of his presidential administration, as chairman of the 
Security Service and Major General Valery Kuznetsov, his 
presidential adviser on military issues, as acting internal 
affairs minister (UNIAN, 12 April). 
   Ukraine Reacts 
   The Ukrainian Government clearly interpreted these moves as 
initial steps toward secession from Ukraine and acted to reassert 
its authority over Krym.  Ukrainian President Leonid Kravchuk 
convened a session of the Ukrainian National Security Council on 
18 May, reportedly to discuss the situation (UNIAN, 19 May; Holos 
Ukrainy, 20 May).  Following the session, Kravchuk drafted 
decrees abrogating autonomy provisions governing the Crimean 
Internal Affairs and Justice Ministries and the Crimean Security 
Service, thereby subordinating them directly to their Ukrainian 
counterparts (Interfax, ITAR-TASS, 19 May; Holos Ukrainy, 25 May) 
and sent Ukrainian First Deputy Internal Affairs Minister 
Valentyn Nedryhaylo (see box) to take over the Crimean Internal 
Affairs Ministry (UNIAR, 19 May).  The same day, Kravchuk issued 
a public statement condemning the Crimean Supreme Soviet's 
preparations to restore the 1992 constitution--a document he said 
contravenes the Ukrainian Constitution"--as an effort "to create 
a basis for Krym's secession from Ukraine. "  He promised to take 
"all necessary measures" to "guarantee Ukraine's territorial 
integrity" (Kiev Radio, 18 May). 
   After the Crimean Supreme Soviet nevertheless went ahead and 
voted to restore the constitution, the Ukrainian Supreme Council 
immediately adopted a resolution annulling the constitution, 
calling Krym's action a "step toward . . . leaving the 
composition of Ukraine, which violates the territorial integrity 
of Ukraine and its state sovereignty" (See Note 2).  The 
resolution gave the Crimean Supreme Soviet 10 days to bring 
Krym's constitution "in line" with the constitution and laws of 
Ukraine (Kiev World Service, 21 May). 
   (Note 2)    By contrast, the Crimean Supreme Soviet has argued 
repeatedly that "not a single article of the Crimean Constitution 
violates the territorial integrity of Ukraine or leads to the 
review of the current state border" (Interfax, 21 May; Krymskaya 
Pravda, 24 May). 
   Mutual Deescalation 
   During the critical period after 20 May, both sides appeared 
concerned to avoid forcing the situation to a crisis.  Ukrainian 
and Crimean delegations met on 24 May and agreed to form a 
working group to negotiate constitutional, as well as economic, 
juridical, and security issues (ITAR-TASS, UNIAR, 24 May; ITAR- 
TASS, 2 June).  On 3 June Ukrainian and Crimean delegates agreed 
to create a joint working group, tasked with advancing proposals 
by 15 June to bring Crimean laws into conformity with the 
Ukrainian Constitution (Interfax, 3 June; Molod Ukrainy, 7 June). 
The Crimean parliament also reportedly decided to form an 
additional working group to address economic issues in greater 
detail (Interfax, 7 June), and requested the participation of 
Ukrainian economists Volodymyr Lanovyy and Viktor Pynzenyk in 
this group (UNIAN, 7 June). 
   Although the Crimean Supreme Soviet took no remedial action on 
the constitution issue, the Ukrainian Supreme Council let its 
deadline expire without additional threats.  The Council adopted 
a resolution reportedly merely reiterating that it considered 
Krym's constitution "secessionist" and "illegal," but not 
mandating any Ukrainian countermoves (AFP, 1 June). 
   Kravchuk likewise continued to condemn Crimean actions but made 
proposals apparently aimed at giving Krym a face-saving exit from 
the impasse.  In a 1 June address to the Ukrainian Supreme 
Council, Kravchuk reportedly described the Crimean leadership's 
actions as "destructive" to Ukraine's sovereignty and emphasized 
that resolution of the Crimean situation was "a matter of peace 
on the European continent" (UNIAN, 1 June).  He proposed a draft 
resolution that would form a panel of 10 president- and 
parliament-appointed judges--a Ukrainian "Constitutional Court" 
(ITAR-TASS, 1 June)--to review the legality of Krym's restoration 
of the 1992 constitution (AFP, 1 June).  According to the 1 June 
UNIAN report, the court would have "decision-making powers" and 
would also be asked to "advise" the Crimean Supreme Soviet to 
reconsider bringing its constitution in line with the 
constitution and laws of Ukraine.  Apparently attempting to 
further sweeten the proposal for Krym, Kravchuk also reportedly 
said in the address that he was "prepared" to consider a new 
power-sharing arrangement with Krym (AFP, 1 June). 
   Rifts Within the Russia Bloc 
   Although he is strongly pro-independence, Meshkov appears more 
moderate than many of the Russia Bloc legislators, and he has met 
difficulty in trying to rein them in.  In spite of the Ukrainian- 
Crimean working group's efforts at reconciliation, a number of 
pro-Russian Crimean Supreme Soviet deputies reportedly withheld 
approval of the 3 June Ukrainian-Crimean settlement, asserting 
that the final document should include more decisive references 
to Krym as an independent republic (Interfax, 7 June).  On 19 May 
ITAR-TASS reported that Meshkov had repeatedly called on Crimean 
legislators "not to raise the temperature" and demanded that the 
Supreme Soviet postpone its scheduled 19 May-vote on restoring 
the constitution.  The Supreme Soviet complied but only postponed 
the vote until the next day.  On 19 May Meshkov also reportedly 
proposed the formation of a government commission to go to Kiev 
for negotiations in the disputed policy areas (UNIAN, 19 May), 
but the parliament voted against the proposal (ITAR-TASS, 19 
May). 
   Meshkov and the Crimean Supreme Soviet also appear to be at odds 
over other issues not related to Krym's status in Ukraine.  On 26 
May the legislature turned down Meshkov's request for decree 
power and rejected his nominees to the Crimean cabinet (See Note 
3).  Only 29 of 94 deputies supported him (Molod Ukrainy, 31 
May), indicating that almost half of his own Russia Bloc--in 
addition to the KPK and the Crimean Tatars--voted against him 
(Segodnya, 28 May).  Parliament turned down another Meshkov 
request to strengthen presidential powers on 2 June, with 51 
voting against him (Interfax, 2 June).  Crimean Premier Yevgeniy 
Saburov, a Meshkov supporter, reportedly stated explicitly that a 
situation is developing in Crimea similar to the September- 
October 1993 Moscow situation and that "in the near future" the 
Crimean parliament deputies will try to "kick out" Meshkov (Radio 
Rossii, 31 May). 
   (Note 3)    According to Nezavisimaya Gazeta (4 June), a main 
factor in the Supreme Soviet's rejection of Meshkov's nominees 
was that many were brought in from Moscow, irritating the Russia 
Bloc which expected its own members to get the posts. 
   Meshkov's popularity appears to be sinking among the public as 
well as among legislators.  A 16 May poll in Simferopol showed 
only 30 percent supporting Meshkov, as compared to the 73 percent 
that voted for him in January (Molod Ukrainy, 31 May). 
   The Russia Bloc its elf appears divided, and the divisions 
jeopardize the bloc's narrow control in the Supreme Soviet. 
Although it won a striking victory in the parliamentary 
elections--gaining 54 of the 94 seats filled (ITAR-TASS, 11 
April)--the Russia Bloc's hold on the Supreme Soviet is 
nevertheless not very firm.  When the Crimean Supreme Soviet 
opened on 11 May and factions formed, only 47 of the 54 Russia 
Bloc deputies joined the "Rossiya" faction (Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 
13 May).  The Russia Bloc was able to elect one of its leaders as 
Supreme Soviet speaker--but just barely.  President Meshkov 
proposed his successor as chairman of the Republican Movement of 
Krym (Republican Party), Sergey Tsekov, for Supreme Soviet 
speaker, and Tsekov won with a bare majority, 48 to 45, out of 93 
voting (Holos Ukrainy, 12 May).  Three others from the Russia 
Bloc also ran, but Tsekov holds the most extreme position of the 
three, calling for the entire Black Sea Fleet to be Russia's, for 
restoring the 1992 Crimean Constitution, for Krym to gradually 
join Russia, for no additional rights to be given to the Tatars, 
and even for Ukraine to rejoin Russia.  His main rival for 
speaker, Vladimir Klyuchnikov, is more moderate, favoring 
additional rights for the Tatars and expressing doubts about Krym 
joining Russia (Holos Ukrainy, 12 May). 
   The election of deputy speakers also exposed internal differences 
in the Russia Bloc.  Tsekov proposed Russia Bloc leaders Aleksey 
Melnikov (deputy head of Republican Party of Krym Movement) and 
Viktor Mezhak (head of People's Party of Krym), but some members 
of the bloc voted against Melnikov, and he was defeated, 
receiving only 44 votes.  In retaliation, others voted against 
Mezhak, defeating him also.  Tsekov managed to get the bloc back 
together and elect both Melnikov (52 votes) and Mezhak (61 votes) 
(Krymskaya Pravda, 12 May; UNIAN, 11 May).  Dissension in the 
Russia Bloc has reached such a point that several deputies have 
said they will quit the bloc (Molod Ukrainy, 31 May; Izvestiya, 
28 May).  According to a 9 June Post-Inform report, the Crimean 
Supreme Soviet's 7 June plenary discussion of the 3 June 
Ukrainian-Crimean settlement confirmed the Russia Bloc's division 
into at least two factions:  the "Rossiya" faction approved the 3 
June settlement, but the "Respublika" faction (10 deputies) 
termed the settlement "treacherous." 
   In addition, Meshkov has apparently largely lost administrative 
and budgetary control over his police ministries, and at least 
one of the organizations has declared that it will obey orders 
only from Kiev.  The staff of the Crimean Security Service, 
apparently under Kravchuk appointee Kolomytsev, met and adopted a 
message declaring it would obey Kravchuk's orders, not the 
Crimean Government's (Krymskaya Pravda, 27 May).  Although the 
organizational structure of internal affairs in Krym is still 
unclear, at a joint press conference with Nedryhaylo on 24 May 
Kuznetsov reportedly made a plea for Kiev to fund the Internal 
Affairs Ministry in Krym (Interfax, 25 May). 
   Outlook 
   The Crimean and Ukrainian leaderships appear to be backing off 
from the collision course on which they embarked in mid-May. 
Splits between Meshkov and the Crimean legislature and among the 
Russia Bloc deputies themselves appear likely to further weaken 
the unity of the Crimean side, hindering efforts to counter 
Kiev's strong but measured reaction to Crimean moves to assert 
greater independence. 
   ***BEGIN BOX 1*** 
      Allegations of a Ukrainian Military "Coup" in Krym 
   In his 18 May presidential decrees Kravchuk reappointed Ivan 
Kolomytsev as chief of the Main Directorate of the Ukrainian 
Security Service in Krym and Colonel Valery Chernyshov as chief 
of the Main Directorate of Internal Affairs in Krym in place of 
Meshkov's appointees and reportedly gave them direct control of 
all property, armaments, and means of transport of the now 
abolished Crimean Security Service and Internal Affairs Ministry 
(ITAR-TASS, 19 May).  According to news reports, Ukrainian First 
Deputy Internal Affairs Minister Valentyn Nedryhaylo arrived in 
S,,imferopol unannounced at about 0300 on 19 May, accompanied by 15 
special forces [spetsnaz] troops," and at the Crimean Internal 
Affairs Ministry building he reportedly read Kravchuk's decree 
dismissing the leadership of the ministry and subordinating the 
ministry to the Ukrainian president (UNIAN, UNIAR, 19 May; 
Krymskaya Pravda, 20 May). 
   In an emotional speech to the Crimean Supreme Soviet, Acting 
Internal Affairs Minister Kuznetsov presented Ukraine's actions 
as a virtual invasion.  Following Nedryhaylo's appearance at the 
ministry, Kuznetsov went to the 19 May morning session of the 
Crimean parliament and President Meshkov--who was addressing the 
session--interrupted his own speech and immediately gave 
Kuznetsov the floor.  Kuznetsov declared to the parliament that a 
"military coup" was under way and was quoted as saying that 
Nedryhaylo and special forces had "secretly arrived" in 
Simferopol and made a "surprise attempt to seize" the Crimean 
Internal Affairs Ministry building, but the attempt had been 
barred by the "resolute actions" of the Crimean militia (UNIAN, 
19 May).  Kuznetsov said he persuaded Nedryhaylo to leave the 
ministry during the night but Nedryhaylo came back the next 
morning and announced Kravchuk's decree subordinating the 
ministry directly to Kiev's ministry and naming new heads 
(Krymskaya Pravda, 21 May).  Kuznetsov asked the Crimean Supreme 
Soviet to quickly approve his own appointment as internal affairs 
minister (UNIAN, 19 May) and it voted by a majority of 73 to do 
so (Krymskaya Pravda, 20 May). 
   ***END BOX 1*** 
   (AUTHOR:  NERO, HAHN.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL 
CHIEF, RUSSIAN ANALYSIS BRANCH, (703) 733-6070.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH/PF 10/1645z Jun 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23103 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000031994001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   11 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-10JUN94-CHINA-DPRK 
<H3> <TI>      Chinese Leaders Reiterate Opposition to Sanctions </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Chinese Leaders Reiterate Opposition to Sanctions </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Chinese      Communist Party General Secretary and President Jiang 
Zemin and Politburo member and PRC Foreign Minister Qian Qichen 
have affirmed Beijing's opposition to the imposition of sanctions 
against North Korea in China's most authoritative statements on 
the sanctions issue to date.  Reflecting China's longstanding 
position on the DPRK nuclear issue, Jiang, according to a 10 June 
Xinhua account of his interview with Japan's NHK television the 
same day, told NHK commentator Hatsuhisa Takashima that China 
"does not approve of sanctions."  Sanctions, he warned, "do not 
help" the situation and can only "escalate" it and lead to 
"consequences which none of the parties is willing to see." 
Calling for "all parties concerned" to take "active measures to 
avoid intensifying the crisis," Jiang said that China believes 
that "dialogue and consultations" are the only "effective way" to 
resolve the problem.  On 8 June, Qian delivered the same message 
to the visiting Maltese foreign minister (Xinhua, 8 June), a 
message' he repeated on the 9th in talks with the South Korean 
foreign minister (Xinhua, 9 June). 
   (AUTHOR:  HEBBEL.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ASIA DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6069.) 
EAG/HORTON/PF 10/1921z Jun 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23104 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000032094001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   14 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-13JUN94-DPRK-IAEA 
<H3> <TI>      Pyongyang Declares Withdrawal from IAEA, Warns on Sanctions </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Pyongyang Declares Withdrawal from IAEA, Warns on Sanctions </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
In      a phased response to international moves toward the imposition 
of UN sanctions on North Korea, Pyongyang has declared that it 
"will immediately" withdraw from the International Atomic Energy 
Agency (IAEA), but, apparently, not from the Nuclear 
Nonproliferation Treaty (NPT) (KCNA, 13 June).  Depicting the 
withdrawal as a response to the IAEA Board of Governors' 10 June 
resolution suspending technical assistance to the DPRK and 
demanding the opening of two suspected nuclear waste sites that 
Pyongyang insists are "military sites," a 13 June Foreign 
Ministry spokesman's statement declared that Pyongyang will 
"hereafter" not be bound by the agency's "rules and resolutions." 
It also declared that IAEA inspectors now in North Korea "will 
have nothing to do any further"--a formulation that seems to fall 
short of announcing their immediate expulsion. 

   The statement indicated that, despite its pullout from the IAEA, 
Pyongyang does not, so far, consider itself to have withdrawn 
from the NPT.  However, it said that no further nuclear 
inspections will be allowed until "it has been decided whether we 
return to the NPT or completely withdraw from it," an implicit 
threat to ratchet up the crisis further at some future date.  In 
addition, the statement implied that Pyongyang is ready to use 
other means to further deepen the current crisis, reaffirming 
Pyongyang's position of equating UN sanctions to a declaration of 
war, an action, the statement said, Pyongyang would counter with 
"expanded self-defense measures."  The statement also ominously 
claimed without elaboration that Pyongyang "can" expand 
"international cooperation" in "the realm of nuclear activities"- 
-possibly a threat to cooperate with other states of 
proliferation concern. 

(AUTHOR:  YIM.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ASIA DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6534.) 
EAG/HEBBEL/SDJ 13/1951Z JUN 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23105 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000032194001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   14 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-076-EUROPE/INTERNATIONAL 
<H3> <TI>      EUROPE/INTERNATIONAL HIGH-TECH INDUSTRY HIGHLIGHTS </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       EUROPE/INTERNATIONAL HIGH-TECH INDUSTRY HIGHLIGHTS </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
Table      of Contents 

   FEATURE: 
European Microelectronics Firms Produce Profits, New Products 

   POLICY ISSUES 
German Industrialists View Research Policy 
Netherlands Trails in Technology 

   CORPORATE STRATEGIES 
Philips Invests in France 
Alcatel Moves to Enhance its Competitive Stance 
Akebono Brake to Build R&amp;D Center in France 

   SPECIAL PUBLICATIONS 
   EUROPEAN MICROELECTRONICS FIRMS PRODUCE PROFITS, NEW PRODUCTS 

   The European microelectronics industry, long saddled with red ink 
and the image of an "eternal loser," has returned to profitability 
and is making headway in promising new markets, according to 
WIRTSCHAFTSWOCHE (6 May 94). 

   All four of Europe's biggest microelectronics firms--Philips of 
the Netherlands, the French-Italian firm SGS-Thomson, and the German 
companies Siemens and Temic--show a trend toward profitability. 
Philips made a profit in 1993, as did SGS-Thomson and Temic.  The 
microelectronics department of Siemens will become profitable this 
year, according to department head Juergen Knorr. 

   These companies are also investing in new facilities.  SGS- 
Thomson recently opened a modern factory near Grenoble that produces 
semiconductors with structures of 0.5 micron, and will soon be 
producing 0.35 micron structures.  In late May 1994, Temic will open 
a new factory in Heilbronn to produce components for infrared data 
communications.  Siemens' factory for memory chips in Regensburg has 
become so successful that it is being expanded, and Siemens is 
building a new plant in Dresden, primarily to produce primarily 
DRAMs (Dynamic Random Access Memories). 

   European microelectronics firms and research institutes are also 
developing new technologies and positioning themselves for emerging 
markets.  Recently the Heinrich Hertz Institute for Communication 
Technology in Berlin developed a method of combining lasers and 
photodiodes with electronic chips in one component.  This device can 
transform optical signals into electric signals, or electric signals 
into optical ones.  This development drew worldwide attention. 

   Siemens has achieved an almost 70-percent market share in high- 
frequency components for mobile radios.  The company is forming a 
strategic alliance with the Finnish firm Nokia, which is number two 
in the world in the end equipment area. 
   Another growing market is automobile electronics, which "is one 
of the strengths of the Europeans," according to Carl Muehlner, 
business manager of Dataquest GmbH.  For example, the German company 
Bosch has developed a Controller Area Network (CAN), a data network 
which can unite all electric and electronic devices in a car. 
Mercedes-Benz already uses this system in its luxury cars. 

   Other markets of the future with significant European 
participation are chip cards and multimedia.  The problem area 
remains computers, but SGS-Thomson has established a new department 
in order to enter the microprocessor market in the near future. 
(Duesseldorf WIRTSCHAFTSWOCHE in German 6 May 94) (BC) 

   POLICY ISSUES 

   German Industrialists View Research Policy--During a German 
Ministry for Research and Technology closed conference on innovation 
policy in May 1994, Tyll Necker, president of the Federal 
Association of German Industry (BDI), called for cost reductions and 
deregulation, as well as tax subsidies for industrial research.  He 
complained of the high costs of labor and taxes in Germany. 
Research Minister Paul Krueger admitted that Germany is a land of 
high costs, but pointed out such advantages as a well-educated 
workforce, central location, excellent infrastructure, advanced 
research facilities, and productive work culture. 

   Necker stated that in comparison with other industrialized 
countries, Germany's labor costs are 25 percent higher, additional 
personnel costs are 40 percent higher, and company taxes are 30 
percent higher.  German companies reacted by making cost reductions 
and by introducing lean management and lean production, which also 
affected research negatively.  However, the tight financial 
situation gave these firms no choice, according to Necker.  He said 
that the BDI would urge the reintroduction of indirect support for 
research from the government. 

   Necker also urged reforms in European patent law, saying that the 
costs are too high, especially for small and medium-sized companies. 
He called for deregulation of the research institutes.  The state 
should provide good conditions for research, but allow companies to 
manage their own technology policies without intervention, he said. 

   According to Necker, Germany is still a leading technology 
country with a good mix of branches of industry.  However, German 
companies trail their most important competitors in certain high 
technology fields such as microelectronics and information 
technology, he said. (Duesseldorf HANDELSBLATT 26 May 94 p 6) BC 

   Netherlands Trails in Technology--A report by the Merit Research 
Bureau for the Dutch Ministry of Foreign Affairs stated that Dutch 
companies are cutting R&amp;D spending with the result that the 
Netherlands is trailing its competitors in most fields of 
technology.  While government R&amp;D spending appears to be reasonably 

high, much of it is for nontechnical subjects, and the number of 
students studying science is dropping, according to the report, 
which was issued in April 1994.  Research spending by companies, as 
a percentage of GNP, is also dropping.  Even in high-tech sectors 
such as aerospace and computers, Dutch companies spend less on R&amp;D 
than their foreign competitors.  The Merit report recommends fiscal 
measures to stimulate R&amp;D, more scientific research by universities, 

and closer ties between technical institutes and industry. 
(Amsterdam HET FINANCIELE DAGBLAD 21 Apr 94) BC 

   CORPORATE STRATEGIES 

   Philips Investment in France--In an effort to regain predominance 
within the European semiconductor industry, Philips is investing 500 
million francs ($89 million) in a subsidiary in Caen, France, in 
order to double the company's total integrated circuit (IC) 
production capacity over the next three years.  The Caen plant will 
be equipped with an additional line for producing O.7-micron- 
technology ICs.  The submicron CMOS (complementary metal-oxide 
semiconductor) circuits will be manufactured on 150-millimeter 
silicon wafers.  The operation will boost the number of employees at 
the plant (now 830) by 200. In 1993 the plant produced 300 million 
chips and exported 90 percent of them. (Paris L'USINE NOUVELLE 24 
Mar 94) IM 

   Alcatel Moves to Enhance its Competitive Stance--Alcatel, the 
French telecommunications giant, recently made two strategic moves 
to enhance its market position.  It created Alcatel Optronics, a 
specialized subsidiary, and it decided to participate in the 
Globalstar satellite communication system. 

   Alcatel, which has long been involved in optoelectronics at its 
research center in Marcoussis and at its German subsidiary SEL, 
recently set up Alcatel Optronics in Nozay, France with 250 
employees, 250 million francs ($44 million) in sales and a planned 
20-percent sales increase in 1994. The new operation will be 
responsible for all the group's optoelectronics developments and 
marketing.  Alcatel Optronics will manufacture active components 
such as lasers and photodetectors, an activity which had been 
divided between Marcoussis and SEL's German site. SEL will 
concentrate on passive devices such as multiplexers, and the Lannion 
plant will assemble and test products for underwater use.  Alcatel 
Optronics will be able to respond to the present needs of its 
telecommunications branches as well as to the future demands for 
switching of Alcatel Bell and Alcatel-CIT. 

   Alcatel reacted to the emerging large-scale alliances in 
telecommunications, such as the Iridium project and Teledesic, by 
joining the Globalstar satellite communication project.  The company 
hopes to gain a good competitive position at the beginning of the 
21st century  especially in America, where these ventures have 
already begun to take shape.  Globalstar will offer worldwide voice 
communication, data transmission, telecopying and position fixing 
services through stationary or mobile terminals.  The system is 
planned to start operation in 1998 and a decade later is projected 
to have 10 million subscribers. Alcatel's contribution to 
Globalstar's costs over a four-year period will be to 45 percent. 
Ventures like this are not new to Alcatel; in 1991 the company 
joined Italy's Alenia, acquiring 49 percent of the Loral Corporation 
subsidiary Space Systems, and set up a joint venture with 
California-based ()ualcomm in 1990 in satellite position reporting 
services (EutelTracs).  (Paris L'USINE NOUVELLE 31 Mar 94 pp 26, 27) 
IM 

   Akebono Brake to Build R&amp;D Center in France--In 1995, Akebono 
Brake, Japan's largest automobile brake manufacturer, will open an 
R&amp;D center near Paris that will employ about six engineers.  Work 
there will be concentrated on developing new friction type materials 
and prototypes. Once installed in Europe, the Japanese firm intends 
to establish relations with Peugeot and Renault.  Above all, it aims 
at enlarging its customer base, which in Europe consists only of the 
United Kingdom.  At present, most of the company's production goes 
to Mitsubishi, Nissan, and Toyota.  It had a revenue of 106 billion 
yen ($1 billion) in 1993, and a net profit of 489 million yen ($5 
million).  Akebono is owned by companies including Toyota (15.4 
percent), Nissan (15.6 percent), Germany's Bosch (13.8 percent), 
Isuzu (5.1 percent), and  Mitsubishi (1.5 percent).  Suzuki will 
presumably also become an owner. (Paris L'USINE NOUVELLE 31 Mar 94) 
IM 
   SPECIAL PUBLICATIONS 

   Copies of the annual reports listed below are available upon 
request for a period of six months from the date of this Foreign 
Media Note from  Cathy Grant at (703) 482-4182. 

GEC Alsthom 1992-1993 Annual Report in English, 32 pages. 
Siemens 1993 Annual Report in English, 61 pages. 
Smith Industries 1992 Annual Report in English, 44 pages. 
Smith Industries 1993 Annual Report in English, 52 pages. 
Thomson 1992 Annual Report in English, 62 pages. 

(AUTHOR:  BRYAN COX.  FOR QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL 
CHIEF, EUROPE BRANCH AT (703) 733-6337.) 
GIG/ 13JUNE94/ECONF/TID/SDJ 13/1955Z JUN 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23106 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000032294001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   14 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-077 
<H3> <TI>      RUSSIA:  FEDERAL ASSEMBLY CHRONOLOGY, NO. 1 </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       RUSSIA:  FEDERAL ASSEMBLY CHRONOLOGY, NO. 1 </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
The      following is the first in a series topically listing major 
decisions, discussions, and actions made by or taken on behalf of 
the Russian State Duma and Federation Council during the period late 
April thru May 1994.  Specific textual material on listings is 
available in the 1994 editions of the FBIS Daily Report (DR) 
"Central Eurasia."  The DR citation with page numbers is provided at 
the end of each entry.  A list of abbreviations and their expansions 
follows the chronology.  Items that have been entered under more 
than one topic heading are marked with an asterisk (*).  Any 
questions or comments should be directed to the Chief, Russia 
Analysis Branch at (703) 733-6070. 

   FOREIGN POLICY AND ARMS CONTROL 

   U.S. and Europe 

   13 May 94 - Duma adopts on first reading law codraf ted by 
Vladimir Isakov on unilateral lifting of sanctions against 
Yugoslavia (16 May 94, 10; 23 May 94, 11) 

   17 May 94 - Council Committee on International Affairs expresses 
concern over U.S. Senate lifting embargo against Bosnia (18 May 94, 
37) 

   CIS 

   25 Apr 94 - Council's Shumeyko signs "On the Results of the 
Fourth Plenary Session of the CIS Interparliamentary Assembly" (19 
May 94, 43) 

   18 May 94 - Belarusian presidential candidate Lukashenko 
addresses Duma on unification of Russia, Belarus, Ukraine (18 May 
94, 38) 

   20 May 94 - Duma Committees on International Affairs, Security, 
and on Defense report on the situation in Crimea (23 May 94, 40) 

   25 May 94 - Duma adopts proposal warning Kiev and Simferopol 
against hasty decisions on Crimea (26 May 94, 10) 

   General 

   27 May 94 - Duma passes on first reading Law on International 
Treaties of the Russian Federation (31 May 94, 40) 

   MILITARY AND SECURITY ISSUES 

   03 May 94 - Duma Committees on Security and on Legislation begin 
discussions on law "On the State of Emergency" (04 May 94, 18) 

   *19 May 94 - Duma Committee on Defense discusses "On the 1994 
Federal Budget" with a spotlight on enhancing the defense budget (23 
May 94, 39) 

   24 May 94 - Col. Gen. Kolesnikov, Chief of Russian Federation 
Armed Forces General Staff, in a closed session addresses Duma 
Committee on Defense on the proliferation of armed formations (25 
May 94, 26) 

   *25 May 94 - Duma Committee on Economic Policy favors increasing 
military expenditure in 1994 (25 May 94, 31) 

   26 May 94 - Duma sets up special commission to investigate report 
by a deputy from city of Tver accusing OMON policemen of "committing 
outrage" (27 May 94, 35) 

   POLITICAL AND LEGAL ISSUES 

   Executive Branch Relations 

   18 May 94 - Duma moves to invite presidential parliamentary 
representative Yakovlev and Shumeyko to a future session discussing 
reasons for dismissal of three deputy general prosecutors (18 May 
94, 37) 

   19 May 94 - At the proposal of Deputy Nevzorov, Duma instructs 
Committee on Security to study Yeltsin's dismissal of three deputy 
general prosecutors (19 May 94, 43) 

   26 May 94 - Duma by an "overwhelming majority" votes down 
Baburin's move for a vote of confidence in the government (27 May 
94, 34) 

   Internal Legislative Issues 

   11 May 94 - At plenary session the Duma rejects Baburin's attempt 
to censure Rybkin (11 May 94, 20) 

   11 May 94 - Council approves composition of its delegations to 
international parliamentary organizations (11 May 94, 20) 

   28 Apr 94 - Council supports Yeltsin's Assembly address 
particularly with respect to policies on civic peace, the setting up 
of joint constitutional commission and joint working group to 
coordinate and increase effectiveness of legislative activity (29 
Apr 94, 26; 02 May 94, 34) 

   Political Parties and Political Life 

   25 May 94 - Duma instructs Credentials Commission to look into 
media reports on the use of election funds from foreign sources (25 
May 94, 32) 

   Judicial and Legal Reform 

   26 Apr 94 - Rybkin signs law "On the State Duma Commission for 
the Investigation of Human Rights Violations Against Suspects and 
Persons Under Indictment Held in Russian Federation Ministry of 
Internal Affairs Investigation and Temporary Detention Centers" (16 
May 94, 35) 

   11 May 94 - Duma adopts on first reading draft law on 
Constitutional Court (11 May 94, 19) 

   13 May 94 - Duma adopts on first reading bills on corruption 
control and on amendments/addenda to the Criminal/Procedural Code 
(16 May 94, 32) 

   25 May 94 - Duma instructs Credentials Commission to look into 
report that the referendum on adoption of new Russian Constitution 
did not meet the legal minimum voter turnout (25 May 94, 32) 

   25 May 94 - Duma adopts revised law "On the Procedure for the 
Publication and Enactment of Federal Constitutional Laws, Federal 
Laws, and Acts of Chambers of the Federal Assembly" (31 May 94, 41) 

   26 May 94 - Duma fails to approve any of the five Constitutional 
Court candidates nominated by factions for Yeltsin's approval (27 
May 94, 35) 

   *26 May 94 - Duma approves on first reading first part of Civil 
Code designed to regulate civil and economic relations during the 
country's transition to a market economy; CPRF, Agrarian Party 
object to provisions on private land ownership (27 May 94, 35; 31 
May 94, 41) 

   ECONOMIC POLICY 

   26 May 94 - Duma failed to support CPRF proposal to debate 
Yeltsin's package of six economic decrees as "unconstitutional" 
(vote:  only 167 in favor) (27 May 94, 33) 

   27 May 94 - CPRF repeated demand to open debate on Yeltsin's 
economic package fell 36 votes short (31 May 94, 39) 

   Budget and Taxes 

   27 Apr 94 - Duma Committee for Economic Policy rejects draft 
federal budget (02 May 94, 35) 

   05 May 94 - Duma Committee for Budget's subcommittee on currency 
regulation draws up law "0n the Maximum Amount of Foreign Borrowing 
by the Russian Federation and the Maximum Amount of Credits To Be 
Granted by It to Foreign States in 1994" (06 May 94, 28) 

   10 May 94 - Duma Committee on Budgets, Taxation, Banks, and 
Finance fails to muster a quorum needed for discussion of budget (11 
May 94, 20) 

   11 May 94 - Duma adopts on first reading draft law on federal 
budget (vote:  237-77, 12 abstentions) (12 May 94, 34; Rossiyskaya 
Gazeta, 07 Jun 94) 

   11 May 94 - Duma adopts two laws, one setting maximum volume of 
foreign loans received by the state and the other limiting loans 
granted by Russia to other states (12 May 94, 35) 

   *19 May 94 - Duma Committee on Defense discusses "On the 1994 
Federal Budget" with a spotlight on enhancing the defense budget (23 
May 94, 39) 

   *25 May 94 - Duma Committee on Economic Policy favors increasing 
military expenditure in 1994 (25 May 94, 31) 

   27 May 94 - Duma Committee on Budget, Taxes, Bank, Finance 
rejects proposal for increase in expenditures in draft 1994 budget 
(27 May 94, 35) 

   27 May 94 - Because of work load the Duma Committee on Budget, 
Taxes, Bank, Finance was unable to adequately prepare for a 
discussion of budget in the Duma and postponed it until 8 June (27 
May 94, 36; 31 May 94, 40) 
   27 May 94 - Duma Committee on Budget, Taxes, Bank, Finance sets 
forth various budget recommendations:  cut outlay on foreign 
economic activities, increase defense spending, special allocation 
of agro-industrial funds (31 May 94, 39) 

   31 May 94 - Council approves law limiting foreign borrowing and 
credits granted to foreign countries approved by Duma on 11 May (02 
Jun 94, 33) 

   Privatization and Bankruptcy Issues 

   *26 May 94 - Duma approves on first reading first part of Civil 
Code designed to regulate civil and economic relations during the 
country's transition to a market economy; CPRF, Agrarian Party 
object to provisions on private land ownership (27 May 94, 35; 31 
May 94, 41) 

   Agriculture 

   27 Apr 94 - Council's Shumeyko signs decree "On Conducting 
Agrarian Reform in the Russian Federation and Reviving and 
Developing Agro-Industrial Production Through the Year 2000" (09 May 
94, 34) 

   RUSSIAN REGIONAL ISSUES 

   24 May 94 - Duma holds hearings on consistency of regional 
constitutions and charters with the Russian Federation Constitution 
(24 May 94, 36; 25 May 94, 32) 

   26 May 94 - Duma adopts a resolution "On the Emergency Situation 
Linked with the Transportation of Oil Products and Food to the 
Country's Far Northern Regions in 1994" 

   MEDIA ISSUES 

   12 May 94 - Duma Committee on Information Policy, Communication 
considered amendments to the Law on Coverage of Government 
Authorities' Activity by State-Owned Mass Media (16 May 94, 31) 

   18 May 94 - Duma declined to support LDPR demand to suspend 
Russian Television Network's "Details" announcer Nikolay Svanidze 
(19 May 94, 43) 

   20 May 94 - Duma LDPR members walked out as a protest against 
Svanidze decision (23 May 94, 40) 

   20 May 94 - Duma debates creation of a legislative television and 
radio broadcasting company (23 May 94, 40) 

   25 May 94 - Duma LDPR members return and claim they will not 
register or take part in voting because, according to leader 
Zhirinovskiy, no measures were taken to address original protest on 
Svanidze decision (25 May 94, 32) 

   27 May 94 - Duma adopts proposal to create a legislative 
television, radio service with a specific programming schedule 
(vote:  265-62) (27 May 94, 28; 31 May 94, 39) 

CIS - Commonwealth of Independent States 
CPRF - Communist Party of Russian Federation 
LDPR - Liberal Democratic Party of Russia 

   (AUTHOR: ELDRIDGE.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ANALYSIS BRANCH AT (703) 733-6070) 
ENEAG/13 Jun/TACF/POLCHF/MILFI/ECONF/Russia Division/CB 13/2331z Jun 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23107 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000032394001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   16 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-15JUN94-UKRAINE 
<H3> <TI>      Kuchma's Presidential Candidacy Divides Ukrainians </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Kuchma's Presidential Candidacy Divides Ukrainians </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                                      As Ukraine approaches its 26 June presidential election, 
candidate Leonid Kuchma, with his clear pro-Russian 
identification, stands out as a frontrunner in many polls, but 
his candidacy sharply divides Ukrainians by region.  Although 
Kuchma's program of economic change is vague--leaving it unclear 
if he would push economic reform or just defend industrialists' 
interests if elected--his themes of drawing closer to Russia and 
giving the Russian language a more or less equal status to 
Ukrainian evoke considerable enthusiasm in Krym (Crimea), 
Donetsk, Odesa, and other oblasts of the south and east, while 
antagonizing the west and Ukrainian nationalists.  His stance on 
Krym is still ambiguous, and with only a week or so left before 
the election it is still unclear if he will soften his pro- 
Russian image significantly during the campaign to lessen west 
Ukrainian hostility to him. 
                                     END SUMMARY 
   Kuchma's stands favoring closer economic ties to Russia, raising 
the status of the Russian language, and giving up control of the 
Black Sea Fleet in return for Russian oil strike popular chords 
in the east and south and reinforce his support there.  In May he 
stressed that Ukrainians depend 90 percent on Russia and should 
rent the Black Sea Fleet to Russia to get money for oil (Za Vilnu 
Ukrainu, 31 May).  On 2 June he bragged of signing the 1993 
Russian-Ukrainian-Belarusian statement calling for an economic 
union in order to "have common prices and eliminate customs 
barriers" (Za Vilnu Ukrainu, 4 June) and complained that 
"Ukrainian media accused me of pro-Russian sentiments" (UNIAN, 3 
June).  He also said that the whole Black Sea Fleet, a "decrepit 
fleet" not needed by Ukraine, should be leased to Russia to get 
money to buy oil (Interfax, 3 June). 
   Kuchma's pro-Russian positions have kept him on the defensive 
during his rare campaign visits to the west.  In Lviv he was 
questioned about his "pro-Russian sentiments" and insisted he 
backed only economic union with Russia but "under no 
circumstances, political union" (Vysokyy Zamok, 12 April).  In 
Ternopil on 7 June he denied accusations that he wants political 
union with Russia and a return to the ruble zone, stating that 
restoring the ruble zone would "lead to loss of sovereignty" 
(UNIAN, 8 June). 
   Hostile media are suggesting that Kuchma is shifting his 
positions to fight off the accusations of being too pro-Russian. 
Molod Ukrainy on 31 May contended that he has stopped advocating 
federalism, acknowledging that it might lead to "26 Crimeas," and 
that he has changed from supporting to opposing return to the 
ruble zone.  The article argued that his statements were "enough 
to baffle those present about who the real Kuchma is and who is 
the politician calculating how to get as many votes as possible 
in the election."  Reporter Vyacheslav Pikhovshek argued in a 9 
June Vybir News Agency item that Kuchma is now trying to play 
down his pro-Russian stance and has held talks with Rukh leaders, 
promising Rukh some key government posts if he is elected with 
their backing. 
   Krym 
   Although insisting that Krym should remain part of Ukraine, 
Kuchma's statements opposing Ukrainianization and arguing that 
more should be done for Krym please the Russophone population in 
Krym, who probably expect to find more sympathy in Kiev if he is 
elected.  When the Crimean Supreme Soviet precipitated the latest 
Crimean-Ukrainian crisis by moving to restore its 1992 
constitution calling for treaty relations with Ukraine, Kuchma 
tried to take the middle ground, insisting that Krym remain in 
Ukraine but expressing sympathy with Crimean demands and blaming 
Kiev leaders for the crisis.  While defending Ukraine's 
territorial integrity and criticizing the Crimean Supreme Soviet 
for restoring the old constitution "without preliminary talks 
with Kiev," he argued that a treaty between Krym and Ukraine is 
"the only way to settle the conflict," insisted that use of force 
"should be fully excluded," and blamed the crisis on intrigues by 
"some Ukrainian political forces" and--apparently referring to 
Kravchuk--those who want an excuse to postpone the presidential 
election (Interfax in Krymskya Pravda, 28 May).  Declaring that 
Ukraine's economic decline and distress are the basic causes for 
pro-independence agitation in Krym, he argued that the solution 
is to give Krym special status within Ukraine to speed up its 
economic development (UNIAR, 1 June).  On 1 June he proposed in 
the Ukrainian Supreme Soviet to grant Krym the status of a free 
economic zone (Interfax, 1 June).  In Odesa on 2 June he said 
"Crimeans must be given greater freedom within Ukraine" (UNIAN, 3 
June).  Moloda Halychyna on 7 June quoted Kuchma as saying that 
"the essence of the Crimean issue lies in the economy and not in 
politics" and that Krym's agitation is a result of Ukrainian 
economic collapse. 
   To counter Kuchma's strong appeal in Krym the Kravchuk forces 
recently asserted that his actions as premier during 1992-93 had 
seriously damaged Krym.  A 13 April Ukrainian cabinet statement 
blaming Kuchma's actions as premier for Ukraine's present 
economic decline in particular accused him of damaging Krym's 
wine industry by raising taxes on Crimean wine while lowering 
import duties on foreign wine and blocking development of 
leaseholding, which it said had become popular in Krym (Kiev 
radio, 13 April). 
   Kuchma's Numerical Advantage 
   Although polling organizations in Ukraine have not yet 
established a track record of accuracy, their polls clearly 
indicate that Kuchma is by far the most popular candidate in the 
east and south, the areas where his Interregional Bloc for 
Reforms (MBR) won Supreme Soviet seats during the March-April 
parliamentary elections.  A 18-23 May poll of small samples in 
ten cities showed Kuchma well ahead in the three eastern and 
three southern cities included in the poll (see box).  A 23-28 
May poll by the International Institute of Sociology of 1,004 
people in all 25 oblasts showed Kuchma outpolling President 
Leonid Kravchuk 34 percent to 12 percent in the east, 37 percent 
to 22 percent in the south, and 35 percent to 26 percent even in 
the central oblasts, while Kravchuk led Kuchma 40 percent to 3 
percent in the west (Molod Ukrainy, 1O June).  A June poll showed 
Kuchma leading in Mykolaiv with 23 percent to 19 percent for 
Kravchuk and 10 percent for Socialist-Communist candidate 
Oleksandr Moroz (Vecherniy Kiev, 9 June).  Of all candidates 
collecting signatures in Mykolaiv to become candidates for 
president, Kuchma got the most (8,380), followed by Moroz 
(5,746), Education Minister Petro Talanchuk with 4,963, and 
Kravchuk with 4,011 (UNIAN, 13 May). 
   Even with no support in the west, Kuchma has an advantage in that 
his strongholds in the east and south hold close to half of 
Ukraine's voters.  Absolute vote totals by oblasts for the 
December 1991 presidential race and independence vote were not 
published, but one can get a sense of the proportions of voting 
strength of various regions by examining the allocation of 
Supreme Soviet seats, which are distributed on the basis of 
population.  The east and south hold 220 of the 450 seats (152 in 
the east, 68 in the south)--46 percent.  The west's seven 
oblasts, where nationalists and Kravchuk are strongest, have only 
82 of the 450 seats--just 18 percent.  Kiev city, which tends to 
vote for nationalists also, has 23 seats, which if added to the 
west raises the total for nationalistic areas to 105, or 23 
percent.  The main hope for Kravchuk and the nationalists is to 
run strong in the many central oblasts, which have 125 seats- 
-about 28 percent of the total. 
   Polls for Ukraine overall usually show Kuchma ahead or close 
behind Kravchuk.  A nationwide poll of 1,200 people in April 
showed 18 percent backing Kuchma, with Kravchuk second at 11 
percent (Interfax, 30 April).  The 23-28 May poll showed 27 
percent for Kravchuk nationwide, 20 percent for Kuchma, 11 
percent for Moroz, 6 percent for reform economist Volodymyr 
Lanovyy, and 4 percent for former Supreme Soviet Chairman Ivan 
Plyushch (Kyivskaya Pravda, 7 June; Demokratychna Ukraina, 9 
June).  Asked whom they would vote for in a Kravchuk-Kuchma 
runoff, 37 percent of the respondents chose Kravchuk and 32 
percent Kuchma, while 17 percent said they would vote against 
both. 
   Outlook 
   With Kravchuk's popularity falling as his government takes 
virtually no action to counter the continuing deterioration of 
Ukraine's economy, Kuchma, one of Kravchuk's harshest critics, 
has become a spokesman for the disaffected east and south and one 
of the most likely to do well in the presidential race.  Although 
he may have softened some of his divisive stands, it still is not 
clear if he will try to reach out to the west Ukraine and 
nationalists during the remaining days of the campaign or choose 
to try to win over their determined opposition, and thus 
exacerbate Ukraine's regional divisions. 
   BEGIN BOX 
   Mid-May Presidential Poll in Ten Cities 
   A poll of 100-120 respondents in each of ten cities taken by the 
BOB [expansion unknown] Sociological Center during 18-23 May 
showed Kuchma leading in six cities, Kravchuk in only three, 
while economic reformer Volodymyr Lanovyy led in Kiev (Post- 
Postup, 26 May-2 June, and 3-9 June). 

                Kuchma   Kravchuk   Moroz  Plyushch  Lanovyy 
   East 
   Donetsk       40%        15%      13%     8%        7% 
Kharkiv       30%         4%      14%     0        12% 
Zaporizhzhya  15%         5%       2%     1%        3% 
   South 
   Mykolaiv      26%        22%      12%    10%        6% 
Odesa         29%        10%      10%     5%       19% 
Sevastopol    38%         3%       3%      0        3% 
   West 
   Lviv           7%        50%       3%     5%        8% 
Uzhhorod      17%        22%       7%     5%        4% 
   Center 
   Kiev          21%        16%       8%     9%       23% 
Poltava       15%        26%       3%     7%       23% 


   A 22-27 April survey by the same organization in Kiev, Lviv, 
Donetsk, Odesa, and Kharkiv published in the 29 April-6 May Post- 
Postup showed roughly similar results, although at that time 
Kravchuk led in Kiev with 19 percent to Kuchma's 18 percent and 
Lanovyy's 14 percent; Lviv respondents gave Kravchuk 36 percent, 
economic reformer Viktor Pynzenyk (who has since withdrawn) 30 
percent, Plyushch 16 percent, and Lanovyy 12 percent, and Kharkiv 
respondents gave Kuchma 26 percent, Kravchuk 22 percent, Plyushch 
11 percent, Lanovyy 9 percent, and Moroz 5 percent. 
END BOX 
(AUTHOR:  HAHN.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
RUSSIA ANALYSIS BRANCH, (703) 733-6070.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH JEG 15/1916Z JUN 94 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23108 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000032494001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   17 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-15JUN94-EGYPT 
<H3> <TI>      Taking their lead from the government, Egyptian state-owned media </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Taking their lead from the government, Egyptian state-owned media </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
have   undertaken a sweeping campaign against the Muslim 
Brotherhood (MB) evidently intended to win popular support for a 
continuing, but thus-far limited, crackdown against the group. 
Those liberal commentators and secular opposition parties who 
normally champion human rights have been relatively silent and 
evidently ambivalent on the crackdown, and the MB itself has been 
consciously restrained in an effort to avoid provoking further 
measures against it.  Although Cairo does not seem inclined for 
now to risk radicalizing the MB and its supporters with an all- 
out crackdown, it does appear inclined to find some means to oust 
the MB from leadership of the Lawyers' Syndicate--whose clash 
with police in May over the death in detention of an Islamist 
lawyer triggered the current crackdown. 


   Government, Media Curry Support for Moves Against Brotherhood 

Since police on 17 May forcefully broke up an attempt by 
demonstrators at the Lawyers Syndicate to march toward a nearby 
presidential palace to protest the death in detention of Islamist 
lawyer 'Abd-al-Harith Madani (Al-Akhbar, 18 May) (See Note 1), 
authorities have conducted a series of arrests and interrogations 
of known and alleged MB officials with the evident aim of 
intimidating the organization and tying them in the public eye to 
the widely rejected violent Islamic militants.  Although the 
government has consistently sought to keep the legally banned but 
generally tolerated MB off balance with periodic arrests of 
alleged members, the recent crackdown is striking because 
prominent MB officials have been targeted and anti-Brotherhood 
moves are taking place on several fronts simultaneously. 

--Two MB members of the Lawyers Syndicate Board of Directors, 
including the syndicate's treasurer--prominent Brotherhood figure 
Mukhtar Nuh--were among the lawyers arrested after the 17 May 
demonstration (MENA, 18 May).  They evidently remain in detention 
(MENA, 15 June). 

--On 29 May, authorities detained 10 MB figures, including 
Ibrahim al-Gharab Sharaf--described by the Socialist Labor Party 
(SLP) biweeky and MB mouthpiece as MB General Guide Hamid Abu-al- 
Nasr's personal secretary and by Al-Ahram as a member of the 
Guidance Bureau, the organization's top leadership.  Interior 
Minister Hasan al-Alfi announced that those detained were accused 
of "membership in an organization that seeks to disrupt the rule 
of law and influence the authorities, and possession of cassette 
recordings and printed materials calling for stirring up hatred 
of the regime" (Al-Ahram, 5 June).  The arrests were linked to 
the "Salsabil case" (Mena, 8 June; Al-Wafd, 1 June), which 
developed from a February 1992 security raid on the Salsabil 
computer company, an alleged MB front.  Officials have claimed 
that the Salsabil office contained computer diskettes and 
documents providing massive evidence of the MB's "extremist 
activities" (MENA, 14 March 1992). 

--MB General Guide Abu-al-Nasr was summoned for at least two 
sessions of questioning about leaflets bearing his signature that 
"advocated views and terms opposed to the regime"' (MENA, 5 June, 
6 June).  After Egyptian media published reports of his denials 
during the interrogation of any wrongdoing by him or his 
organization (MENA, 6 June), the government banned further media 
coverage of his questioning or the Salsabil case (MENA, 8 June). 

--Authorities recently prevented Shaykh Muhammad al-Ghazali, an 
Islamist preacher who has at times assisted government propaganda 
efforts against extremism but has a strong following among the MB 
and other Islamists and publishes a regular column in Al-Sha'b, from 
delivering an annual outdoor sermon on the occasion of the 'Id al- 
Adha holiday, marking the pilgrimage to Mecca.  (Al-Sha'b, 27 May). 
Suggesting government concern over how the public would view the 
act, al-Alfi subsequently received al-Ghazali in an evidently 
conciliatory meeting that was publicized in the media with no 
details of their conversation (MENA, 29 May). 

(Note 1) Interior Minister Hasan al-Alfi has sought to counter 
charges that Madani died as a result of torture by claiming that 
the lawyer died prior to interrogation from an acute asthma 
attack.  Moreover, he has stressed that Madani had been using his 
work as a cover for active collusion with the Islamic militants 
(MENA, 21 May). 
Criminalizing the MB 

President Mubarak, who has tended to be relatively restrained in 
his public references to the Brotherhood, helped lay the 
groundwork for the crackdown with statements that were unusually 
harsh in tone and content.  Suggesting the government may have 
anticipated the 17 May clash, Mubarak had attacked the group in 
an interview with the German weekly Der Spiegel that appeared the 
day before the clash.  According to Egyptian media, Mubarak told 
the magazine that the Brotherhood ""stands behind . . . and 
finances most of the activities of the terrorist groups in Egypt" 
(MENA 16 May) (See Note 2).  Earlier, in an attempt to justify 
the MB's exclusion from a planned "national dialogue" putatively 
including all "legitimate" political forces, Mubarak used a Labor 
Day speech to score the Brotherhood implicitly by asserting: 
"Dialogue is not meant to open back doors for illegitimate powers 
that mix religion with political activity to put themselves above 
the law, antagonize and fight the multiparty system until they 
monopolize the national arena, and pounce on the chance to rule, 
kill democracy, and let one view and one line of thinking do away 
with every thinker who dares oppose or discuss" (Cairo radio, 28 
April) (See Note 3). 

(Note 2) The text of the speech as published in Der Spiegel 
quoted him as charging the Brotherhood more vaguely with being 
"behind most of the activities of the religious troublemakers." 

(Note 3) Although Mubarak's public offensive against the 
Brotherhood may have been made with an eye to justifying concrete 
measures against the group, an earlier statement by Interior 
Minister Hasan al-Alfi suggests that the current crackdown was 
hastily undertaken.  Responding to a question at a 13 April press 
conference, al-Alfi seemingly absolved the organization of 
support for terrorism by distinguishing between the MB as "a 
propagator of religion only" and the Islamic militants as "the 
terrorist groups" (MENA, 13 April). 

   The Interior Ministry has backed up the security campaign with 
statements portraying the Brotherhood as an illegal organization, 
with at least some members engaged in violence.  In the most 
striking example, al-Alfi claimed in an interview with the 
Egyptian newspaper Al-Akhbar Al-Yawm that "The MB is an illegal 
organization, and the appearance of those belonging to it on the 
stage [during the protests over Madani's death] confirms that 
they have a role in terrorism." (21 May).  Subsequently, however, 
he appeared somewhat less sweeping in his claims, saying in 
response to a question at a conference of Egyptian and French 
businessmen that "certain acts and facts indicate that some MB 
members," including "more than 100 people," had "committed acts 
punishable by law" (MENA, 14 June). 

Anti-MB Media Campaign 

   Responding to the official signals conveyed through the arrests 
and interrogations of MB officials and the statements by Mubarak 
and al-Alfi--in addition to probable direct official 
encouragement to the semi-independent government-owned press--the 
media last month launched the most vigorous campaign against the 
Muslim Brotherhood observed in recent years (See Note 4). 
Reports, exposes, and editorial commentary have sought to tarnish 
the reputation of the group as a whole, in some cases accusing it 
implicitly or explicitly of ties to violence.  The rhetoric has 
included the consistent prefacing of references to the 
Brotherhood with adjectives indicating its illegal status. 
Among the most noteworthy illustrations of this media campaign: 

--The weekly news magazine Al-Musawwar has been publishing a 
sensationalist cover series on the transcripts of 14 documents 
alleged to have been seized from Salsabil and portrayed by the 
magazine as confirming allegations that the Brotherhood has a 
secret organization and international structure and is committed 
to overthrowing the regime (3 and 11 June).  The magazine also 
published photographs of parts of the documents, which Chief 
Editor Makram Muhammad Ahmad claimed the magazine's staff had 
been studying for six months (27 May).  The documents, as 
presented by Al-Musawwar, contain, inter alia: discussion of the 
importance of establishing an MB presence in the professional 
syndicates, student unions, and ""other establishments'"--claimed 
by the magazine to mean the police and military--on a local, 
national, and international level; a stress on the importance of 
establishing a ""balance between secrecy and publicity"" so as to 
elude the authorities while still enabling the building of 
grassroots support; guidance on dealing with security forces- 
-including the handling of interrogations and recommendations for 
the establishment of a liaison committee to win supporters among 
the authorities and monitor their intentions toward the group; 
and a complete breakdown of the structure of the various offices 
of the organization down to the governorate level and including 
names of MB officials nationwide.  The first part of the series 
was a heavily editorialized summary of the transcripts portraying 
them as proof that the Brotherhood's aims and means are 
subversive and illegitimate. 

--Chief editors of virtually all the main state-owned 
publications, as well as some commentators with close ties to the 
government broadened their criticism of the Lawyers Syndicate's 
handling of the Madani death by directly attacking the MB.  For 
example: Ibrahim Nafi', chief editor of the authoritative daily 
Al-Ahram, claimed that the "exploitation" of Madani's death by 
"one of the legally banned political groups" "illustrates the 
relationship between this dissolved group and other terrorist 
groups" (20 May); a column in Al-Ahram by writer Tharwat Abazah, 
deputy speaker of the parliament's nominal upper chamber, the 
Consultative Council, was entitled "the Armed Brothers," a play 
on the Arabic words for the Muslim Brothers.  Abazah claimed that 
the "Muslim Brothers, who are not Muslim  . . . , are the leaders 
of terrorism" (30 May). 

(Note 4) The media campaign against the Brotherhood, however, 
appears to be ebbing at least for now, amid the absence of any 
further developments in the Lawyers Syndicate, the ban on 
coverage of current legal cases against MB figures, and the lack 
of a strong Brotherhood reaction.  Of the major state-owned 
publications, only Al-Musawwar has continued to give prominence 
to the subject. 

Campaign to Oust MB From Syndicates 

   Supporting indications that the government will use the syndicate 
incidents as a pretext to move against MB control of the Lawyers 
syndicate--and possibly other syndicates--most of the recent 
media rhetoric has targeted specifically the MB role in the 
lawyers association (See Note 5).  Articles and commentaries have 
sought to tarnish the Brotherhood's reputation by highlighting 
allegations that the syndicate's MB-dominated board of directors 
has grossly misused its authority and syndicate funds in an 
effort to turn the professional union into a political arm of the 
Brotherhood.  For example, lengthy reports in Al-Ahram and Al- 
Musawwar accused the syndicate board, which Al-Musawwar 
repeatedly called "the Board of Brothers," of issuing the union's 
quota of permits to attend the annual pilgrimage to Mecca on the 
basis of MB affiliation; charged that the MB officials had 
tampered with the lists of union members in an effort to ensure 
the success of MB candidates in syndicate elections; and claimed 
that massive syndicate funds have been diverted to the radical 
Palestinian group Hamas and other MB causes, including exclusive 
MB Ramadan banquets and the recent protest activities (Al-Ahram, 
22 May; Al-Musawwar, 27 May).  Accordingly, Al-Musawwar's Makram 
Muhammad Ahmad asked if the lawyers, "after all that has happened 
can leave their syndicate under the full control of one trend 
that exploits" its facilities and ""its stature for the service of 
its goals." 

(Note 5) Even prior to the syndicate incidents there were 
indications that the government would seek new legislation aimed 
at the MB in the syndicates following the repeated postponement 
of various syndicate elections evidently because of officials' 
fears that MB candidates would fare well.  Parliament was 
reportedly already considering changes to a 1993 law that 
prescribes the appointment of a temporary board of directors for 
any syndicate failing to draw at least a third of its members to 
internal elections--changes that would address, inter alia, 
alleged MB tampering with election lists.  Since 17 May, at least 
one bill to reorganize the Lawyers Syndicate has reportedly been 
forwarded to the People's Assembly, leading to further 
speculation that the government will soon dissolve the current 
syndicate board (for example, Rose Al-Yusuf, 6 June; Al-Ahali, 8 
June). 


   Liberals, Leftists Largely Quiet, Ambivalent on Crackdown 

Those secular mainstream and opposition writers who are often 
critical of the government's handling of human rights and 
political liberties issues have been relatively silent on the 
current crackdown against the Muslim Brotherhood--including 
government efforts to portray the organization as a terrorist 
group and the arrests and interrogations of prominent MB members 
following protests over the death in detention of Islamist lawyer 
'Abd-al-Harith Madani.  These writers' low profile on the issue 
reflects wariness of--in some cases hostility to--the Islamists, 
despite evident ambivalence over the government's measures to 
counter them. 

--The most prominent liberal mainstream writers have not thus far 
been observed to address Cairo's recent measures against the MB. 
They include Mustafa Amin--a veteran journalist and daily columnist 
for Al-Akhbar, who writes almost weekly criticizing moves against 
democratic liberties and urging greater democracy and political 
pluralism--and Al-Ahram's independent-minded Managing Editor 
Salamah Ahmad Salamah--who, despite his position, has often 
criticized official strategy against the Islamists and had scored 
the government in a 14 May column for its handling of the Madani 
case. 

--There has been virtually no monitored authoritative reaction 
explicitly addressing the anti-MB crackdown from the liberal, 
centrist al-Wafd party, the Nasirites, or the leftist National 
Progressive Unionist Grouping (NPUG)--all of which, despite 
philosophical antipathy toward the Brotherhood, have periodically 
collaborated with it (See Note 1).  Several comments from the 
NPUG have all but openly supported the crackdown.  The English 
language weekly edition of Al-Ahram quoted NPUG Secretary-General 
Rif'at al-Sa'id--who has consistently been vocal in his distrust 
of the MB--as claiming that "the government has tolerated the 
Brotherhood for years because it considered it harmless, but was 
waking up to its 'danger'" (2-8 June).  In another interview with 
Al-Wafd, al-Sa'id was quoted as calling the MB an illegitimate 
organization, pointing to MB Deputy Guide Mustafa Mashhur as 
historically "one of the most prominent MB planners of violence" 
(1 June). 

   (Note 1) For example, leaders of all three parties joined with 
the MB and other groups in a statement setting out their position 
on the "national dialogue" called for by Mubarak last November 
(Al-Wafd, 7 December). 

Even coverage of the breakup of the 17 May demonstration over 
Madani's death and of related arrests was somewhat mixed, despite 
expressed concern over the human rights implications of the 
Madani case and even involvement by the three main secular 
opposition parties in syndicate activities organized to 
protest Madani's death (Al-Ahram Weekly, 12-18 May).  For 
example: 

--Al-Wafd featured a commentary by Chief Editor Jamal Badawi that 
criticized the government for mishandling the lawyers' protests 
and the Madani affair in general (19 May)--a line echoed by some 
columnists.  At the same time, the paper featured an article on 
the 23d that blamed the protesters and the authorities equally 
for the confrontation. 

--The NPUG weekly Al-Ahali's only monitored authoritative 
commentary following the confrontation was a column by Chief 
Editor Lutfi Wakid expressing concern over reports that Madani 
had confided knowledge to an independent parliamentary deputy of 
a foreign conspiracy to sustain the current violence between 
Islamic militants and the government (18 May).  Although one Al- 
Ahali columnist criticized the syndicate arrests (25 May), 
another offered justification, in effect, for the government's 
decision to put down the demonstration by force (1 June).  The 
latter column, by Mustafa Siyam, echoed government charges that 
Madani was working with the terrorist groups and attacked the 
Lawyers Syndicate for taking up the cause of someone "arrested 
for his political activity and not for his pure professional 
work."  He claimed that the would-be street marchers may well 
have included supporters of the Islamic militants who would have 
engaged in destruction of public property and thus presented a 
threat to public order.  The column attacked the role of 
Islamists in the syndicate, referring to them as "the Muslim 
Brothers and other terrorists." 

Ambivalence Over Crackdown's Cost 

At the same time, some from the secular mainstream and opposition 
have balanced their clear wariness of the MB with expressions of 
concern that the government's wideranging measures to counter the 
Islamists in general will come at too great a cost in political 
liberties and perhaps fuel sympathy for the Islamists: 

--Illustrating the ambivalence in these circles, leftist writer 
'Abd-al-Sattar al-Tawilah followed up implicit criticism of the 
crackdown in Al-Wafd with another commentary in Rose Al-Yusuf 
that appeared to applaud it--a reflection as well of the 
differing editorial slants of the two publications involved.  The 
first commentary observed that '"most of the intellectuals and 
supporters of democracy found themselves, in spite of themselves, 
in one trench with the lawyers," because the issues with which 
they were dealing--human rights, torture, etc.--were so important 
(24 May).  Referring to the "execution of Madani," al-Tawilah 
claimed "it is not true that the political Islamist trend must be 
treated with a heavy hand," adding that "the policy of heavy- 
handedness must be used carefully and [only] in cases of extreme 
necessity."  Commenting a week later in Rose Al-Yusuf on the 
syndicate incidents, al-Tawilah asserted that his magazine had 
warned "a number of times" in "the past two years" against the 
danger of "those so-called moderates" whose position on the 
Islamic militants "is considered in the final analysis collusion 
with and approval of terrorism."  He claimed that the Muslim 
Brothers "see in the extremist trend an extension of themselves 
and their mission" (30 May). 

--While avoiding comment on the crackdown against the 
Brotherhood, Al-Wafd Chief Editor Jamal Badawi addressed 
government efforts to restrict Islamists' activities in general 
by strongly criticizing the recent barring of Shaykh Muhammad al- 
Ghazali from delivering an annual outdoor sermon during the 'Id 
al-Adha holiday, saying that the ban appeared to be official 
vengeance for al-Ghazali's controversial court testimony last 
spring in which he claimed there was no known punishment in Islam 
for those who take the law in their own hands by killing 
apostates (24 May).  He claimed that "the government's behavior 
demonstrates its weakness and lack of confidence in dialogue" (See 
Note 2) 

--Al-Wafd and other commentators have criticized another element 
of the government's campaign to minimize the influence of 
Islamists--its pushing of previously unpublicized legislation 
through parliament on 30 May to replace the elections of 
university deans by the faculties with their appointment by the 
university presidents (Al-Akhbar, 31 May).  The measure followed 
widely criticized legislation passed last April replacing the 
election of village mayors with their appointment by the Interior 
Ministry.  Numerous Al-Wafd columns criticized the most recent 
legislation.  For example, Al-Wafd party official Nu'man Jum'ah 
called it "an aggression against democracy and the professors." 
Al-Akhbar columnist Mustafa Amin called the measure "a new strike 
against democracy," adding that "if this strange trend continues 
it will lead to the day when the deputies of the People's 
Assembly are appointed rather than elected" (1 June). 

(Note 2)  Badawi's reference to "dialogue" clearly connoted the 
"national dialogue," which at this point had yet to convene.  Al- 
Wafd withdrew from the committee subsequently formed to prepare 
for the dialogue after its first session, claiming the 
government's had formed the committee unilaterally and stacked it 
with ruling party officials (MENA, 1 June). 

Concern Over Syndicate Legislation 

Consistent with the ambivalence of the secular oppositionists, 
the principal secular parties have been relatively reserved in 
responding to widespread media indications of pending legislation 
to reconstitute the Lawyers Syndicate so as to diminish the MB 
role.  Al-Wafd, for example, has avoided the vocal campaign that 
preceded parliamentary consideration of the syndicates law of 
1993 (Al-Wafd, 21 November and 3 December 1992).  At the same 
time, there have been scattered appeals against any new 
legislation on the syndicates.  For example: 

--'Abd-al-Salam Rizq, a leftist member of the Lawyers Syndicate 
board of directors, warned in an Al-Ahali article that dissolving 
the current board, whether under a longstanding emergency law or 
through new legislation, would be "inappropriate," as it would 
"lead to extremely serious results" (8 June).  Subsequently, 
however, he appeared to focus solely on the need to avoid using 
the emergency law to dissolve the syndicate's board, saying that 
it would increase sympathy with the Islamists, who would be 
viewed as "martyrs of the emergency law."  Finally, he declared 
that "whoever seeks to dissolve" the board "must resort to the 
law without resorting to power or the use of dissolution options, 
even if the government has accumulated justifications for 
settling accounts with the Muslim Brotherhood." 

--A column on the "Syndicates" page of Al-Wafd expressed 
opposition to any new change in the law governing the Lawyers 
Syndicate or other attempts to dissolve the current board.  The 
page's editor claimed that "despite my differences with the 
members of the board, this campaign [against the syndicate 
board], which evidently goes back to instructions from on high, 
has produced opposite results," explaining that "the ordinary 
citizen sympathizes with the board and with the lawyers."  "If 
there is a decision to dissolve the board and change the law," he 
maintained, "the current board will be returned overwhelmingly'" 
(30 May). 

--In his Rose Al-Yusuf column accusing the Brotherhood of 
collusion with the extremists, Tawilah asserted that "'the 
shrinking of control by the Islamist trend in the professional 
syndicates must take place by way of political activation of all 
the other forces in those syndicates and not by way of new laws." 


   Defensive But Restrained, MB Seeks to Wait Out the Pressure 

While vociferously rebutting recent government allegations 
against it, the Muslim Brotherhood has made a point of 
demonstrating restraint in an evident effort to deprive 
authorities of any pretext to escalate the current crackdown. 

--Shortly after the 17 May arrest of demonstraters at the Lawyers 
Syndicate protesting the death in detention of Islamist lawyer 
'Abd-al-Harith Madani, An MB statement in Al-Sha'b--biweekly 
organ of the Socialist Labor Party and MB mouthpiece--sought to 
counter allegations that the group is committed to violence.  The 
statement repeated longstanding claims that the Brotherhood's 
""program for teaching the ways of God the Almighty and religion 
is a peaceful program,"' that the organization "has taken part in 
all aspects of life within the framework of the constitution and 
laws in force" and that it "is not and will not be a group 
advocating sedition and trouble and will not be the cause of 
revolution or clashes."  While asserting that future upheavals 
may occur because of "the absence of a response to the demands of 
the people," the "disregard for man's basic rights" and the lack 
of guarantees against election fraud, the statement was striking 
for its defensive tone (Al-Sha'b, 20 May). 

--MB Deputy General Guide Mustafa Mashhur used the MB's regular 
column in Al-Sha'b on 7 June to urge Muslim Brothers to exercise 
self-restraint in reacting to the government's offensive against 
the organization.  Proclaiming that "we carry out our activities 
with moderation and through the state's institutions," he urged 
MB followers "not to be provoked into an action that conflicts 
with the teachings of your God," adding that "the strong ones do 
not react emotionally but control themselves when they are 
angry." 

--Mashhur has gone so far as to claim, according to the English 
language weekly edition of Al-Ahram, that his organization "will 
not be involved in any escalation" of the confrontation with the 
government, "even if the government steps up its measures" (2-8 
June). 

Brotherhood officials have also used the secular opposition 
press and the relatively independent Rose Al-Yusuf--which often 
interview the Islamists regardless of their antipathy toward them-- 
to counter government charges that the organization supports 
violence and is otherwise engaged in illegal activities. 
In the past couple of weeks, the Nasirite weekly Al-'Arabi 
interviewed Abu-al-Nasr, while the centrist Liberal Al-Wafd and 
Rose Al-Yusuf carried interviews with Mashhur, and Al-Wafd 
carried an interview with MB spokesman Ma'mun al-Hudaybi, all of 
whom seized the proffered opportunity to defend the organization 
(Al-'Arabi and Rose Al-Yusuf, 30 May; Al-Wafd, 1 June, 25 May, 
respectively). 

Lawyers Syndicate Cautious 

Like the Brotherhood in general, the MB-dominated Lawyers 
syndicate board has been relatively low-key in its response to the 
arrests and continued detention of lawyers--including two MB 
officials on the syndicate board--that followed the security 
forces' breakup of the 17 May demonstration.  Al-'Arabi reported 
on 30 May that the Lawyers Syndicate had called on all its 
branches to hold meetings to discuss the situation following the 
abortive 17 May demonstration, but the syndicate has not been 
nearly as forceful as it was in its response to the announcement 
of Madani's death, which promptly triggered a 10 May protest at 
the syndicate and a 15 May lawyers' strike, as well as the 17 May 
demonstration (Al-Ahram Weekly 12-18 May). 

Moreover, Lawyers Syndicate Secretary-General Sayf-al-Islam Hasan 
al-Banna--a prominent MB official--has evidently sought to 
dissociate the Brotherhood from the more radical Islamist 
lawyers, who were accused of attacking security forces with rocks 
and bottles at the 17 May demonstration.  According to Al- 
Musawwar on 27 May, al-Banna met at at his request with 
Parliamentary speaker Fathi Surur in an evident attempt to fend 
off possible legislation to oust the Brotherhood from the Lawyers 
Syndicate through new legislation.  Al-Banna was cited by Al- 
Musawwar as saying that he had expressed disapproval of the 
slogans and signs carried by some of the more radical lawyers at 
the 17 May rally, over which he said the syndicate's board had 
"completely lost control."  The report quoted al-Banna as saying 
he intended to submit his own draft legislation to change the 
current law governing the Lawyers Syndicate but gave no details. 

Implications 

   The government probably has a combination of motives for 
initiating the current campaign against the Brotherhood, 
including an interest in diverting attention from the Madani case 
and justifying the Brotherhood's exclusion from the "national 
dialogue."  More important in the long term is the government's 
likely concern over growing MB assertiveness in recent months and 
wary anticipation of an MB attempt to enter candidates in 
parliamentary elections expected in late 1995 after the MB 
boycotted them in 1990.  Even if Cairo ultimately permits MB 
participation, a clampdown on the syndicates would deprive it of 
what has become an important political forum, and continued 
pressure from security authorities may force the organization 
into a lower profile election campaign. 

For now at least, the government appears inclined to keep up 
pressure on the Brotherhood while avoiding an all-out crackdown 
that could alienate many Egyptians, as it probes further measures 
to marginalize the organization through new legislation.  The 
apparent ebbing of the media campaign, together with al-Alfi's 
limiting of his most recent terrorism allegations to "some 
members of the MB"--presumably those arrested over the past two 
years in the Salsabil case--seems to point against any imminent 
sweeping move against the group as a whole.  In addition, the 
evident reconciliation meeting between Interior Minister al-Alfi 
and Shaykh al-Ghazali highlights apparent official wariness of 
offending large numbers of Egyptians who sympathize with the 
Islamist agenda.  At the same time, however, the current media 
campaign is preparing the public for any further moves that the 
government may ultimately adopt. 

The liberal mainstream and secular opposition parties' relatively 
tepid response thus far to the government crackdown against the 
Brotherhood suggests that expected legislative measures aimed at 
marginalizing the organization in the syndicates may not meet a 
tremendous or universal outpouring of indignation.  At the same 
time--given its longstanding emphasis on political pluralism and 
liberties--the Wafd will likely express a degree of opposition 
that may grow and find broad company in the liberal mainstream if 
the current campaign against the Islamists is significantly 
escalated or broadened. 

The Muslim Brotherhood, for its part, appears intent on patiently 
waiting out the current storm to see whether or not it will 
produce a markedly new political environment demanding new 
strategies and tactics.  If the environment is changed to the 
point where the MB can no longer function effectively, at least 
some elements of the organization will certainly turn to more 
radical activities. 

(AUTHOR: BROWN.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
NEAR EAST ANALYSIS BRANCH (703) 733-6094.)LRT 16/0559Z jun 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23109 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000032594001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   17 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-15JUN94-CUBA 
<H3> <TI>      Havana Cracks Down on Flagrant Black Marketeers </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Havana Cracks Down on Flagrant Black Marketeers </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                                 In an apparent attempt to keep petty theft at state enterprises 
from mushrooming into large scale criminal activity, the Castro 
regime has launched a crackdown on high-living profiteers who are 
selling large quantities of stolen state merchandise on the black 
market.  At the same time, Havana has hinted also concerned that 
these newly affluent black marketeers could emerge as an economic 
elite that would pose a political danger to the regime. 

                            END SUMMARY 

   The "nationwide" crackdown on "illegal enrichment"--authorized in 
the recently-enacted "decree-law number 149"--involves raids 
against suspected black market profiteers and permanent 
confiscation of "goods and [monetary] assets" subsequently 
determined by the state to have been obtained directly or 
indirectly through "theft, speculation, embezzlement, [or] black 
market activities" (Radio Rebelde Network, 5 May).  Havana does 
not appear to be targeting the average Cuban who buys and sells 
on the black market out of necessity, but rather individuals 
whose involvement in the black market has led to ostentatious 
affluence.  Thus, while Radio Rebelde on 6 June noted that the 
"main goal" of the crackdown is "not" to make each citizen "prove 
the legitimate origins" of goods in his possession, it defined 
the goal the next day as rooting out those individuals "who enjoy 
a lifestyle that exceeds their [usual] income."  Media reporting 
on raids carried out thus far reinforce this message.  For 
example, the target of one raid was a workshop "manager" whose 
official salary was 167 pesos a month, but who had four boats and 
a truck in his possession.  Another raid was directed at a 
"citizen" possessing four trucks, two cars, a rice mill, a 
welding workshop, six houses and over 35,000 pesos in cash (Radio 
Rebelde, 7 June). (See Note 1) 
   (Note 1) As of 6 June, security forces had conducted raids 
against 222 presumed profiteers found in possession of "180 cars, 
83 motorbikes, 48 trucks, 24 tractors, 108 houses and over 3.5 
million pesos" (Radio Rebelde, 6 June).  Radio Rebelde on 27 May 
also reported the seizure of a total of 500 farm animals from a 
group of 28 Havana residents. 

   Setting the Stage 

   Havana's campaign against profiteers follows frequent media 
discussion in recent months of Cuba's longtime problem with theft 
of state supplies which from all appearances has become more 
serious as black market activity has expanded. (See Box 1) 
Indicating that virtually all Cubans now rely on the black market 
to some degree to meet their needs for food, journalists on the 
Radio Rebelde's 23 March "Straight-Talk" program noted that, if 
"the truth be told," Cubans "frequently have no choice but to 
access" the black market because "as everyone knows, the official 
market does not meet all the basic needs of the Cuban family 
nowadays." (See Box 2) The journalists stressed that the 
population should "clearly understand that merchandise 
circulating in the underground economy" comes largely from 
"theft" from "state companies or stores."  A subsequent "Straight 
Talk" program emphasized that the long-accepted concept of 
"missing inventory"--which traditionally condoned theft for 
personal use or to "solve [inventory] problems for a buddy at 
another enterprise"--is now "fostering criminal activity" (Radio 
Rebelde, 6 April).  As a case in point, Radio Progreso on 25 
April said that "corrupt" warehouse inspectors and others in 
management positions steal from the state now for "the sole 
purpose of enriching themselves" on the black market. 

   Political Threat 

   Havana's repression of affluent black marketeers also provides 
the regime with an opportunity to take action against an 
incipient economic elite as a potential rival of the Communist 
Party of Cuba.  In fact, the Cuban media have hinted that the 
Castro regime sees a political threat in the profiteers' 
independent power base.  For example, the "Straight Talk" program 
on 5 May reported that "macetas"--the pejorative term used by the 
regime to describe Cubans who get rich buying and selling stolen 
state merchandise--set themselves apart from socialist society, 
not only by enjoying a "lavish lifestyle," but also by building a 
network of "collaborators" and using personal "bodyguards" (Radio 
Rebelde).  The 11 May "Straight Talk" program concluded that 
these profiteers--who "live differently and think differently" 
from others in socialist society--are "almost becoming a social 
class" with its own distinct ideology. 

   Outlook 

   By cracking down on flagrant profiteering on the black market, 
Havana is evidently hoping that it will be able to rein in forces 
that the regime itself set loose when it implemented liberalizing 
measures last year.  Having permitted limited market-oriented 
measures in the cause of economic survival, the regime must now 
also guard against the demoralizing effects of those who flaunt 
their success in using the market conditions to gain affluence at 
the state's expense.  Given the regime's diminished capacity to 
maintain the traditional communist economy, a high-publicity 
campaign against flagrant profiteers is probably the best 
available means of keeping illegal activities in check. 
   At the same time, the regime's oft-stated intention to make 
economic changes in a gradual and carefully controlled way 
suggests that Havana is not unprepared for unforeseen problems. 
Speaking on Havana's economic agenda--including the campaign 
against profiteers--at last month's National Assembly meeting, 
Finance Minister Jose Luis Rodriguez reiterated the regime's 
intention to proceed with due care, declaring that new measures 
will be implemented as a "gradual process" that will require 
"adjustments or changes" along the way (Tele Rebelde, 1 May). 

   (BOX 1) 

   The Expanding Black Market 

   Havana's efforts to stem the flow of state merchandise to the 
black market notwithstanding, other policies promoted by the 
regime seem to have fostered black market activity.  In 
particular, two market-oriented measures implemented last year to 
ease shortages of basic consumer goods and services seem to have 
created new opportunities for black marketeers: 
   -- The legalization of self-employment in the service sector- 
-which amounted to an endorsement of underground economic 
activity--has apparently made it easier for Cubans to camouflage 
the sale of state merchandise on the black market where goods 
fetch a higher price than they would in the state's price- 
controlled stores.  Given that the regime apparently never 
specified where self-employed workers could obtain supplies- 
-beyond suggesting that they "use leftover materials" (Radio 
Rebelde, 15 October 1993)--many now seem to rely on theft from 
the state.  One radio reporter noted that in Havana 
"unscrupulous" people charging "astronomical prices" for stolen 
foodstuffs manage "to mix" in with authorized street peddlers 
selling "homemade" goods (Radio Rebelde, 7 January 1994). 
Likewise, Radio Rebelde reported on 5 May that local officials- 
-meeting with several Politburo members--reached the conclusion 
that legally self-employed "craftsmen" were using fuel and other 
raw materials "of dubious [i.e., state] origin." 
   -- The lifting of restrictions against holding dollars, which has 
presumably led to an increase in disbursements from abroad, has 
undoubtedly promoted activity on the dollar-based black market. 
Remarks made by Cuban President Fidel Castro last December at the 
National Assembly session certainly suggest that this is the 
case.  According to Castro, "all the money [i.e., dollars] coming 
into the country today . . . becomes a source for the black 
market" (Havana TV, 30 December 1993). 

   (BOX 2) 

   Return of the Farmers Free Markets? 

   Cuba's private farmers--who, according to a 31 May report from 
the official Mexican news service NOTIMEX, supply 35 percent of 
Cuba's produce--may be unofficially reinventing the farmers' free 
markets which Castro closed down in 1986 on the grounds that they 
promoted excessive profitmaking.  Recent media reporting suggests 
that private farmers are all but disregarding their obligation to 
sell a set quota of produce to the state in favor of more 
lucrative arrangements on the illicit private markets.  Havana 
Radio Reloj on 31 May reported that Agriculture Minister Alfredo 
Jordan "demanded that farmers fulfill their food delivery 
commitments," noting that this year some farmers "have not 
delivered a single quintal of farm products" to the state. 
Suggesting that farmers are forsaking the low fixed prices that 
the state pays in exchange for higher private market prices, the 
labor union paper Trabajadores charged that some farmers are 
"trying to get rich" (Mexico City NOTIMEX, 31 May). 

   (AUTHOR:  ROLLINS.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF 
ANALYST, EUROPE/LATIN AMERICA GROUP, (703) 733-6120.) 
ELAG/GILISON/LRT 15/0126Z JUN 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23110 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000032794001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   17 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
(DUE TO COPYRIGHT OF OTHER RESTRICTIONS, THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT CONSUMERS. 
IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND BENAVIOR AND IS 
ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER U.S. GOVERNMENT 
COMPONENTS) 
FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-078 
<H3> <TI>      MAGHREB PRESS REVIEW No. 6 </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       MAGHREB PRESS REVIEW No. 6 </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
This      press review series focuses on economic, social, and 
demographic issues in the Maghreb countries of Algeria, Libya, 
Morocco, and Tunisia.  The hard copy version of this Foreign Media 
Note contains 1 cartoon with captions. 

   REGIONAL ISSUES 

   Press Agencies on Computerization Plans 

   Maghreb press agency officials met on 8-9 May to develop 
recommendations for inter-agency projects, which will be finalized 
by their respective general managers in June.  The agencies involved 
were APS (Algeria), TAP (Tunisia), MAP (Morocco), JANA (Libya), and 
AMI (Mauritania).  The group agreed on a joint strategy to develop a 
common software system for news dissemination, purchase equipment, 
and rent a satellite broadcasting channel.  The French service AFP 
has collaborated with both TAP and MAP in past computerization 
efforts, while the Italian agency ANSA has assisted APS.  (Rabat MAP 
11 May 94) 

   ALGERIA 

   SONATRACH on Research, Operations Plans 

   According to Algiers daily EL WATAN, an unnamed SONATRACH 
official told the ARAB OIL AND GAS JOURNAL that 40 percent of the 
company's drilling operations in Algeria are done by foreign 
operators.  In the coming year, SONATRACH expects to have 55 
drilling projects, including 25 joint ventures, and anticipates a 
total of 100 bore wells by the year 2000.  Some 66 percent of 
explorations in the first quarter of 1994 were successful, compared 
to 57 percent in 1993, and 66 percent for 1992.  SONATRACH estimates 
that another 1.2 billion tons of equivalent petroleum (TEP) may be 
found in the promising region of the Eastern Sahara.  According to 
SONATRACH director Mr. Bouhafs, the company expects to market 500 
million TEP over the next five years. 

   At a SONATRACH conference on 18-20 April, company officials 
discussed planning issues through the year 2000.  Two roundtable 
discussions were held on "the absence of a viable research and 
development policy" that affects project implementation.  Some 800 
people attended the conference which included displays on oil 
recovery, development of the gas industry, engineering, research and 
development, and environmental issues.  (Algiers EL WATAN 15-16 Apr 
94; Algiers LIBERTE 21 Apr 94) 
   Development Projects in Annaba Detailed 

   Electricity 

   Several Sonelgaz and Kahrif electricity projects have been 
completed, including a 30-km network linking Berrahal, Ain-Berda, 
and Chetaibi districts, and an 80-km network in Annaba province, 
which completes the 1992/1993 electricity plan.  (Algiers LIBERTE 21 
Apr 94) 

   Transportation 

   Four local businesses will undertake a road improvement plan for 
Annaba, including includes the repair of 38 km of national roads, 
and resurfacing of 13 provincial roads and 44 km of access roads in 
rural areas.  The Annaba Public Works Administration will also build 
a road link between Highways 16 and 21, connecting Guelma to Souk- 
Ahras, and will continue work on the Annaba International Airport 
road. (Algiers LIBERTE 22-23 Apr 94) 

   Telecommunications 

   Minister of Post and Telecommunications Tahar Allan has announced 
new telephone and postal projects, including an 8000-line central 
switch for Annaba, 200 lines for Sidi-Ammar, a D2-PAC data packet 
switching center, and a fiber optic cable link for 2,000 circuits 
linking Drean, El Hadjar, and Sidi Amar.  The most significant 
project will connect Annaba to the Algiers-Constantine 
telecommunications line, which will be completed by August and will 
also link Souk-Ahras, Guelma, and El Tarf via a digital radio relay. 
Other projects include a commercial agency for telecommunications, a 
postal sorting center, seven new post offices, 500 telephone lines 
for Seraidi-Chetaibi and Berrahal, and a radio telephone relay. 
Two-thirds of Annaba's 54,000 telephone lines are said to be already 
in use.  (Algiers EL WATAN 23 Apr 94) 

   Kuwaiti Loan for Beni Haroun Dam 

   The Arab Fund for Economic and Social Development (FADES) granted 
a 6-million Kuwaiti dinar loan (approximately 121 million Algerian 
dinars) to finance the Beni Haroun dam.  The loan will be repaid 
over 22 years at 4.5 percent interest, with a six-year grace period. 
The loan was signed by Economy Minister Benachenou and FADES 
representative Abdellatif Youcef Ahmed.  Kuwait's total contribution 
to Algerian development projects is approximately 117.12 million 
Kuwaiti dinars (no time period specified).  The development of the 
Beni Haroun dam, with a capacity of 588 million cubic meters, is 
expected to cover drinking water and electricity needs, as well as 
stimulate regional agricultural development.  (Algiers LIBERTE 15-16 
Apr 94) 

   Employment Statistics Detailed 

   Algerian National Employment Agency (ANEM) statistics indicated 
that in the fourth quarter of 1993, some 36,537 persons sought work 
and 10,030 were hired.  According to ANEM statistics, one jobseeker 
in four was hired, and 46.32 percent of those seeking work were 
between the ages of 16 and 25.  (Algiers LIBERTE 15-16 Apr 94) 

   Restrictions on Import of Luxury Goods 

   The Ministry of Economy has suspending the importation of "luxury 
goods," including meats, cheese, fruit, chocolate, beverages, 
perfumes, cosmetics, and textiles.  The import of agricultural and 
hydraulic equipment, as well as machine tools, will also be 
suspended.  In addition, new import taxes will be levied on 
household appliances, "non-strategic" construction materials, and 
industrial products.  According to a ministry official, the 
suspension was prompted by the economic stabilization program 
supported by the International Monetary Fund and will be in effect 
for one year.  (Algiers EL WATAN 3, 8 May 94) 

   SAFEX International Computer Fair 

   The International Salon for Communication, Computerization, and 
Administration (SAFEX) organized an international computer fair from 
16-20 April to encourage networking among computer professionals, to 
help companies find new clients, and to familiarize customers with 
computer training programs and new technology advances.  New stand- 
alone computers, laptops, data management systems, multimedia, 
invertors, and multilingual dictionaries were on exhibit.  Some 26 
businesses participated, including representatives from the General 
Directorate of Customs Bureau, (DGDN) and the National Radio 
Broadcast Agency (ENRS).  (Algiers LE MATIN 18 Apr 94; Algiers 
LIBERTE 21 Apr 94) 

   Statistics on Oran Business Community 

   According to 1992-1993 statistics, 79 businesses in Oran Province 
employing approximately 19,237 workers are undergoing a "difficult 
period," with 32 firms unable to pay salaries for their 16,142 
employees.  Regional work inspectors attributed the problem to a lag 
in supplying basic materials, delays in recovering claims, slow 
replacement of outdated equipment, and lack of access to bank loans. 
As a result, companies have reallocated personnel, put employees on 
administrative leave, shortened the work day, and reduced staff.  A 
province-level financial rehabilitation committee will review 44 
cases. (Algiers LIBERTE 15-16 Apr 94) 

   Port Restructuring Suspended 

   The Algiers Port Enterprise has suspended restructuring plans 
begun in 1989 after a threat by port workers to strike if the plans 
were implemented.  Management sources denied that the project 
involved modifying the enterprise's statutes, changing its legal 
form of ownership, or reducing its activities.  Moreover, the 
planned reorganization would not have lowered the number of 
employees or port revenues, but would have improved the port's 
profitability.  Earlier union demands had included a 1994 salary 
increase, access to 1993 financial records, as well as implementing 
more career planning, converting contract employees to staff, and 
recruiting children of current employees.  (Algiers EL WATAN 11 May 
94) 

   Grain Purchase Announced 

   On 9 April the Algerian Interprofessional Office of Grains 
announced a purchase of 251,000 metric tons of soft wheat, to be 
delivered between 16 May and 30 June.  The purchase is the second 
under the 1993/94 import schedule: in January Algeria purchased and 
imported 350,000 metric tons.  The Algerian-French grain protocol 
will allow Algeria to purchase some 1.2 million tons with guaranteed 
credits from Coface.  (Algiers EL WATAN 11 Apr 94) 

   Argentine Businessmen Visit Algiers 

   An Argentine business delegation visited Algiers recently to meet 
with representatives from the Algerian public and private sectors. 
The visit was sponsored by the Argentine-Arab Chamber of Commerce 
and the Embassy of Argentina in Algiers.  Julio Yazbeck Jozami, head 
of the delegation, expressed optimism about the future growth of 
commercial ties between the two countries.  (Algiers LIBERTE 22-23 
Apr 94) 

   Garbage Removal Problem Described 

   Public awareness campaigns are being organized by city refuse 
authorities to deal with mounting trash disposal problems in 
Algiers.  City authorities stated that public participation is 
essential due to inability of available equipment to deal with 1,6OO 
tons of trash daily.  An article in LIBERTE described Algiers as "a 
trash heap" where "from Bab El-Oued to Bourouba, including El- 
Harrach and Bachdjarah, you see children playing on mountains of 
refuse, to the benefit of rats and other germs."  Algiers province 
has leased 100 trucks to facilitate weekend trash removal.  (Algiers 
LIBERTE 22-23 Apr 94) 

   Air Algeria Opens New Routes 

   Air Algeria has inaugurated new air routes serving Amman, 
Sharjah, Alicante, and Istanbul.  The Algiers-Amman-Sharjah route 
reinforces its Arab network that consists of nine capitals and major 
cities with 21 direct weekly flights.  Company officials stated that 
the new routes would expand Air Algeria's international network and 
would allow it to enter new markets.  (Algiers EL WATAN 19 Apr 94) 

   Bank Director Named 

   Mr. Malek, former chief of staff for Mr. Redha Malek, was named 
to the post of director general of the Local Development Bank (BDL). 
Mr. Malek had served as BDL's deputy director general prior to his 
cabinet assignment under Redha Malek. (Algiers EL WATAN 24 Apr 94) 

   LIBYA 

   Libya Considers Selling Bank Shares 

   According to 'Abdallah al-Sa'udi, executive president of the Arab 
Bank Corporation, Libya may sell its corporation shares to protect 
the interests of the corporation in view of the U.N. embargo against 
Libya.  In a press interview following the 3 April meeting of the 
corporation's general assembly in Manamah, al-Sa'udi noted that 
Libya was concerned that proceeds from the sale of its shares would 
be frozen.  (Libya owns 25 percent of the corporation's capital.) 
At the meeting, the corporation's general assembly also approved a 
shareholder distribution of 35 cents per share.  (London AL-SHARQ 
AL-AWSAT 4 Apr 94) 

   (QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, AFRICA/LEVANT 
BRANCH AT (703) 733-6408) 
ENEAG/16 Jun/ECONF/NEASA Division/PF 16/2055z Jun 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23111 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000032894001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   17 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS16JUN94-HUNGARY 
<H3> <TI>      MSZP Faces Internal Conflicts Over Economic Reform </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       MSZP Faces Internal Conflicts Over Economic Reform </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
S                              U M  M A RY 

   The Hungarian Socialist Party (MSZP), which won an absolute 
majority in the May parliamentary election, is facing major 
internal conflicts over economic reform between the party's 
liberal wing and representatives of the powerful Hungarian trade 
union organization. 

                           END SUMMARY 

   Although the MSZP, the successor of the communist party's 
reformist wing, condemns the outgoing right-of-center governing 
coalition--led by the Hungarian Democratic Forum (MDF)--as inept 
and misguided, it emphasizes that the new government will not 
depart from the MDF's basic goals of creating a market economy 
and seeking integration with Western Europe.  Saying that it is 
"difficult to understand" why his communist past should make 
anyone doubt his "conversion" to reformist economic views, Gyula 
Horn, the MSZP's chairman and its nominee for prime minister, 
declared "firmly" after the election in the French daily Le 
Figaro (2 June) that the MSZP's "intention" is "to set up a 
market economy."  Similarly, MSZP deputy chairman Imre Szekeres 
has stressed that the law on privatizing state property "must be 
implemented" and that his party views privatization as a "means 
for attracting capital, creating employment, and renewing 
technology" (Hungarian Television, 24 May). 

   Social Market Economy    The MSZP's acceptance of market forces 
is qualified, however.  Not a simple market economy, but a 
"social market economy' is the MSZP's goal, Horn has said 
repeatedly (Kossuth Radio Budapest, 16 May; Hungarian Television, 
25 May; MTI, 30 May).  The qualification "social"--which the 
outgoing MDF government also used at the beginning of its tenure, 
and then dropped--highlights the MSZP's commitment to cushioning 
the social impact of economic reform.  Providing such a cushion 
will require considerable government intervention through an 
"overall government program," whose "goal," Horn emphasized in an 
interview to the trade union daily Nepszava (24 May), will be 
"creating workplaces," since it is "not enough to stimulate the 
enterprises" to create them.  Although he stressed that the MSZP 
does not want "any kind of restoration, for example, 
renationalization," Horn has suggested that his party will to 
some extent resort to the centralized management of resources, 
saying that social problems can be alleviated by a "much fairer 
distribution system" (Kossuth Radio Budapest, 16 May). 
Similarly, while repeatedly voicing a commitment to further 
privatization, Horn has stressed that the process will be put 
under parliamentary control in order to "prevent corruption" and 
that his government will not "deliver Hungary to uncontrolled 
commercialism" (Le Figaro, 2 June). 

   Conflicting Trends     Horn's apparent ambivalence toward 
economic reform appears to reflect conflicting trends in his 
party.  As an editorial in the daily Magyar Hirlap (2 June) 
noted, a recent Hungarian Gallup poll indicated that a majority 
of the MSZP's voters "do not like capitalism, are not in favor of 
private property, and prefer a caring state," making it likely 
that they will put pressure on MSZP deputies--70 percent of whom 
won their seats in districts rather than through regional or 
national party lists--to resist painful reforms.  Thus, the 
party's reformist leaders are operating under constraints and 
Horn is apparently heading for a centrist position, "balancing" 
between the pro- and anti-reformers.  Each wing is led by a 
prominent member of the MSZP leadership. 

   Bekesi's reform wing.  The MSZP's most prominent economic expert, 
parliamentary deputy Laszlo Bekesi--considered a strong candidate 
for finance minister--has unequivocally expressed support for 
economic reform.  In contrast to Horn's call for a fairer 
distribution system, Bekesi has criticized the outgoing 
government precisely for having an economic policy that has been 
"characterized" by excessive "distribution" since last year. 
Instead of redistributing wealth, the government should 
"concentrate on creating the prerequisites for income production" 
even if it is "painful for the whole society," he insisted. 
Banks must be privatized "as soon as possible" and the increase 
in the budget deficit "must be stopped" by cutting 50 billion 
forints ($500 million) from the supplementary budget right away, 
Bekesi said (Figyelo, 19 May).  Social welfare benefits should be 
based "on needs, rather than fairness," and benefits should 
compensate for only half of the "4 or 5 percent reduction" in 
real incomes and purchasing power that will result from reform, 
he asserted (Nepszabadsag, 29 April).  Calling for a coalition 
with the liberal Alliance of Free Democrats (SZDSZ), Bekesi said 
that he would "not accept a ministerial post in a one-party 
government" because "if the MSZP governs on its own, it will have 
to yield to powerful trade union demands," causing 
"overdistribution" (Magyar Hirlap, 3 June). 

   Nagy's trade union wing.  While National Federation of Hungarian 
Trade Unions chairman Sandor Nagy has nominally accepted the 
MSZP's economic program, which is a modified version of Bekesi's 
plan, he clearly opposes radical reform.  Nagy--who was second on 
the MSZP's national election list, after Horn and just before 
Bekesi--stresses that he has not given a "blank check to the 
future government" and that implementation of the economic 
program must "naturally" be linked to employment and welfare 
measures remedying "the most serious social problems."  Directly 
contradicting Bekesi's view that only half of the reduction in 
real incomes should be made up through benefits, Nagy demanded 
"full compensation."  Moreover, indicating that he is against 
letting market forces dictate privatization and employment, Nagy 
insisted that buyers who "guarantee an employment level" should 
be given "preference" and that trade union representatives should 
be "present at privatization decisions" (Figyelo, 19 May). 
Although he has given lukewarm approval to an MSZP-SZDSZ 
coalition and to Bekesi's participation in the government 
(Nepszabadsag, 2 June), Nagy has stressed that it will "lead to 
many senseless conflicts" between the government and trade unions 
if the SZDSZ's liberal economic program--which is close to 
Bekesi's views--is implemented (Nepszava, 27 May). 
   Foreign Trade     In contrast to the disagreement on domestic 
economic policy, there appears to be wide agreement in the MSZP 
that the new government must abandon the outgoing government's 
policy of focusing almost entirely on Western markets.  Since the 
Western markets available to Hungary are "rather limited," Horn 
stressed after the election, the market for its agricultural and 
food industry products must "primarily be Eastern Europe," even 
if it means creating "barter trade, product for product." 
Although this is "not the most modern form" of trade, Horn 
conceded, Hungary must resort to it since "we have to stay alive, 
and what is more, we have to progress."  This turn toward the 
East "does not mean weakening Hungary's relations with the 
Western countries in the least," Horn insisted (Kossuth Radio 
Budapest, 30 May).  Apparently in full agreement on this point 
with Horn--and presumably with Nagy, who is unlikely to oppose 
any trade that would increase employment--Bekesi has stressed 
that a "return to the Eastern Markets is unavoidable" and that 
Hungary must "exploit barter possibilities" in the region 
(Figyelo, 19 May). 

   Implications     Although Horn has displayed considerable 
ambivalence toward specific aspects of domestic economic reform, 
his desire to bring the SZDSZ into the government--which would 
greatly strengthen the MSZP's "liberals," who, according to him, 
are a "negligible minority" in the party (Nepszava, 24 May)- 
-indicates that he considers at least some aspects of reform to 
be necessary and is therefore trying to counterbalance the 
powerful anti-reform elements represented by the trade unions. 
If the SZDSZ joins the government and Bekesi becomes finance 
minister, it is highly likely that there will be bitter struggles 
within the coalition--and within the MSZP itself--between 
reformers who are willing to risk considerable social 
dissatisfaction for long-term economic gains and anti-reformers 
such as Sandor Nagy, who are concerned mainly with meeting the 
immediate social and economic needs of their constituents.  It 
remains to be seen whether Horn will be able to strike a balance 
between the two trends, maintaining a centrist position. 

(AUTHOR: BARCZAY.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
CENTRAL EUROPE BRANCH, (703) 733-6462.) 

ELAG/GILISON/JF 16/2307Z JUN 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23112 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000032994001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   17 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
FOUO -- DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS, THE 
FOLLOWING ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS 
FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY--WEST EUROPE 
<H3> <TI>      FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY--FB PSE 94-021--WEST EUROPE </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY--FB PSE 94-021--WEST EUROPE </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
Europe      Economic Review:  WESTERN EUROPE Vol. III, No. 021, 16 
June 1994 

   Notice To Readers:  FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY is a series published by 
FBIS Europe/Latin America Group featuring brief summaries of foreign 
media reports on topical issues, compiled from the most recent 
sources available to FBIS. 

   West Europe Economic Review (WEER) is a subseries of FOREIGN 
MEDIA SURVEY published by the West Europe Division of Europe/Latin 
America Group with contributions from FBIS overseas bureaus.  The 
WEER is intended to supplement coverage of European economic issues 
by the FBIS Daily Report for West and East Europe, and other FBIS 
publications.  Foreign news, feature, and editorial reports selected 
for summary in this publication normally do not appear in other FBIS 
publications. 

   The WEER focuses on national and regional economic issues, such 
as economic competitiveness, regional economic integration, economic 
reforms and other changes in economic policies, and foreign trade 
and investment. 

   FOREIGN MEDIA SURVEY is a U.S. Government publication.  Its 
contents in no way represent the policies, views, or attitudes of 
the U.S. Government.  All comment or analysis contained herein is 
attributable to the cited media source, unless otherwise indicated. 

   TABLE OF CONTENTS 

   FEATURES: 

   France, Spain--Media Reaction to Recent Scandals 
   France: Schneider Affair 'Alarms' Business Community 
   Spain:  Key Economic Figures Take a Fall 

   EU 
   Eco-Fin Agrees on Rules for Financial Services 
   Car Manufacturers Form New Research Group 

   FRANCE 
   Editorial on Clinton, Bentsen, Kantor 
   Sapin Supports Deficit Reduction First 
   COB Justifies Sanction Power 

   GERMANY 
   Expert Explains Lagging German Investments in Asia 
   Environmental Technology Industry Flourishing 
   Foundation Promotes Ecological Innovation 

   ITALY 
   Bank of Italy Governor on Economy 
   Treasury Minister on Economic Plans 

   SWEDEN 
   Firms More Optimistic Than EU Counterparts 

   TURKEY 
   Military Controls Large Sector of Economy 
   Prescription for EU Entry Given 
   Private Sector Reacts to Austerity 

   ECONOMIC BRIEFS 

   EU, France, Turkey 

   FEATURES 

   France, Spain: Media Reaction to Recent Scandals 
   France: Schneider Affair 'Alarms' Business Community 

   French media reaction to the arrest in Belgium for fraud and 
embezzlement of Didier Pinau-Valencienne,  internationally well- 
known chairman of the Schneider engineering group, has been 
extensive, much of it indicating alarm over Belgian treatment of 
such a highly-placed French businessman.  Press reporting has tried 
to unravel the complicated business operations which led to the 
arrest and has supported the view that the penal code which went 
into effect in March will require much more accountability from 
company directors than before.  An article in the Paris financial 
daily LES ECHOS criticized Belgium for the "unjustifiable" 
jailing of such a respected figure over what in the past would have 
been deemed minor events easily resolved in court.  An article in 
the Paris daily LIBERATION questioned Belgium's motives, noting 
there had been a long history of Belgian resentment against French 
business aggressiveness in that country. 

   The Event 

   An article in the 8 June issue of the Paris daily LIBERATION was 
typical of media attempts at explaining Pinau-Valencienne's arrest. 
It claimed that the events that led to the arrest began in 1992 when 
Schneider decided to reorganize one of its Belgian subsidiaries, the 
Cofibel group.  Backed by France's Elf oil company, Schneider 
offered to buy controlling interest in two of the group's companies, 
the Cofibel holding company and Cofimines.  Several Belgian minority 
shareholders objected to the price offered by Schneider for the 
shares and accused Schneider of having juggled its accounts and 
hidden some operations.  These shareholders lodged a complaint, 
which was settled in 1993.  However, the Belgian courts decided to 
pursue their own investigation and at the end of May called Pineau- 
Valencienne to Brussels and-- "surprising everyone"--arrested him. 
They also arrested Italian businessman Valentino Foti, founder of 
the Sirix Intervitrum glassworks company.  The two were charged with 
conducting  "financial operations which significantly reduced 
the assets of Belgian companies" to the detriment of minority 
shareholders.  According to the charges, the Schneider group 
benefitted, "under suspect conditions, from important liquid assets 
to the prejudice of Belgian subsidiaries" on the order of some 3 
billion Belgian francs (BFr).  Moreover, the investigation also 
involves "offshore affiliates" belonging to the Cofibel and 
Cofimines companies which according to the Belgian court "remain 
hidden, as much from shareholders as from regulatory authorities." 
The dividends from these affiliates, domiciled in tax havens, have 
evaporated," the court claimed, "to the tune of BFr1.8 
billion." 

   Support and Motives 

   In the 30 May issue of LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES, an article notes the 
widespread support Pinau-Valencienne has received from the business 
community.  While this support comes from a wide variety of top 
French businesses, according to a 2 June article in the same daily, 
it also includes backing from Schneider's U.S. subsidiary, the 
Square D company, and from U.S. companies on which Pinau-Valencienne 
is a board member: Bankers Trust, Equitable Insurance Company, and 
Whirlpool. 

   The article also claims that the scandal in part is the result of 
often strained business relationships between Belgium and France. 
It observes that Belgians often sees the French as "arrogant," 
especially when they want to buy Belgian companies, such as when the 
Accor group bought Belgium's Wagon-Lits and Suez bought Societe 
Generale de Belgique.  Belgians fear they are losing their 
industries' "crown jewels" to the French and have been particularly 
"attentive" recently to French initiatives in their country, 
according to the article. 

   With the Schneider affair, old wounds have opened, according to 
the article's "Belgian sources."  They claim that Belgium has not 
forgotten that Schneider was originally a Belgian company, the 
remnants of the Empain business empire which made its name in the 
Belgian Congo before it became independent.  These sources add that 
the intervention of Prime Minister Edouard Balladur--according to 
Italian Television broadcasts, Balladur contacted Belgian Prime 
Minister Jean-Luc Dehaene about the affair--exacerbated Belgian 
irritation with France, so much so that Belgian Justice Minister 
Melchior Wathelet found it necessary to announce that in Belgium's 
system politics did not intervene, no matter what the case before 
it. 

   Swiss Connection 

   An article in the 10 June LE FIGARO reports remarks by Luc 
Jacquier, head of Cofibel and Cofimines's Swiss company Finamines, 
who confirmed to Swiss and French journalists that Finamines was 
indeed a "caisse noire" or secret holding."  Finamines, the article 
notes, was created during the 1960's to manage the Empain group's 
mineral resources after the Congo became independent.  According to 
Jaquier, Finamines's Panamanian holdings, Mitraco and Tramico, had 
been hidden from tax authorities as well as from shareholders of 
Cofibel and Cofimines.  He pointed out that Pinau-Valencienne may 
not have been aware of these two companies and that in any case had 
not personally profited from them.  Jaquier claimed these 
companies were the responsibility of the late Jean Verdoot, former 
head of Schneider's Belgian companies, and that it was he who signed 
the payment orders and he who organized the companies. 

   Released from jail on his own recognizance on 7 June, Pinau- 
Valencienne responded to Jacquier's statements in the 11, 12 June 
issue of LIBERATION.  He explained that the company in Switzerland 
had been established for the sole purpose of protecting Belgian 
expatriots.  He also declared that Schneider had never received, 
either directly or indirectly, any money from offshore affiliates, 
"other than through the Belgian companies Cofibel and Cofimines." 
The article points out, however, that in the first instance, Pinau- 
Valencienne did not explain why the Swiss company still existed 30 
years after the Congo became independent and, in the second, his 
affirmation of innocence in receiving offshore money was "curious" 
since it is precisely the point of the court case against Schneider 
that fraudulent capital movements were processed through Cofimines 
and Cofibel. 

   Media Explanations 

   Most Paris financial dailies tried to unravel the complicated 
facts behind the arrest of Pinau-Valencienne, a clear example of 
which appeared in an article in the 8 June issue of LIBERATION.  The 
article noted that the charge of defrauding Belgian shareholders 
revolves around the "common" practice of group affiliates buying 
shares of other companies in the group to provide fresh capital to 
the parent company.  The parent company is required to buy back the 
shares at a later date at the same price.  However, in December 
1990, during one of these operations, Schneider sold its Belgian 
affiliates 4 percent of it Arbed subsidiary, which Schneider 
should have then rebought later for the same price, or BFr3,900 per 
share.  In the meantime, the shares had dropped in value to BFr2,000 
per share but depreciation was never accounted for in Cofimines's 
balance sheet.  When minority shareholders asked for explanations 
about the lack of accounting for depreciation, they discovered that 
not only had the depreciation not been allocated to Cofimines's 
accounts but that Schneider did not adhere to the requirement to buy 
Arbed back from Cofimines for the original BFr3,900 per share. 
Schneider instead undervalued the Arbed shares by BFr580 million at 
the time of the repurchase. 

   The article also confirms the Belgian courts statement about 
Schneider owning offshore companies.  Schneider's organizational 
chart currently shows several offshore companies based in Bermuda or 
Panama, such as Mitraco, Tramico, Itrec, and SHL.  The most 
"mysterious" of these companies, according to the article, is 
Tramico, based in Panama.  Appearing for the first time in 
Schneider's charts in the mid-1980's, it is officially only 49 
percent owned by Schneider, which has never revealed the ownership 
of the remaining 51 percent.  As a minority owner, Schneider 
does not have to publish, nor consolidate, Tramico's accounts.  The 
article claims that Tramico was the "black hole" in the Cofibel- 
Schneider galaxy: it bought shares in other companies, resold them 
some years later, loaned money, and received money.  Schneider sold 
Tramico in October 1992, just before offering to buy a majority 
share in Cofibel and Cofimines.  Other companies may also have been 
"hidden," the article points out, noting the Belgian court's Swiss 
investigation. 

   Rumors surrounding the scandal that Schneider is involved in 
money laundering, according to the article, stem from the fact that 
one of Cofibel's affiliates was Valentino Foti's Italian-Swiss 
company Fimo, which in 1991 Italy and the U.S. Drug Enforcement 
Agency discovered was laundering money for the Sicilian mafia.  Foti 
is still being held in Belgium and the Italian courts are 
investigating his part in the scandal. 

   Commentary on Director Responsibility, New Penal Code 

   Articles and editorials in the Paris financial dailies have also 
focused on the repercussions the arrest has made in the business 
community, especially the "alarm" it has evoked over the criminal 
responsibility of the directors of large conglomerates for what 
occurs on their watch.  Assistant director of editing, Didier 
Pourquery, writing in the 31 May issue of LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES, 
claims the scandal will pose "in clear and worrisome terms" the 
question of director responsibility.  Usually, this responsibility 
is that of a director to his board or to his shareholders.  But 
today, such responsibility has another sense, a legal responsibility 
for the activities of the companies over which he presides. In 
France, a director is responsible before the courts for business, 
social, stock exchange, and other regulations affecting the normal 
life of a company.  Additionally, he is also criminally responsible 
under common law for everything that happens in his group, Pourquery 
continues.  It is this last responsibility which must now be giving 
the heads of numerous groups a "fit of dizziness." 

   On 9 June, deputy director of editing, Francois Roche, writes in 
the same daily that the scandal will also open debate on how 
companies are organized and managed.  He contends that Schneider is 
not atypical of those groups composed of multiple companies, some 
all over the world, which were put together in the 1980's when 
maximum leveraging was sought for financing purposes.  The utility 
of such organizational structures has been questioned during the 
last few years and many companies have started to simplify their 
financial and legal structures to better concentrate financial 
resources.  According to Roche, this is exactly what Pinau- 
Valencienne was trying to do. 

   However, the debate is also over control, Roche contends.  He 
points out other examples where control procedures over important 
financial decisions have not worked, such as in cases involving 
Paribas, Ciments Francais, or with Pechiney in its aluminum 
operations.  At a time when "each pencil and eraser" must be 
accounted for in a budget, these capital movements often involve 
hundreds of millions of francs.  The problem is thorny, Roche 
states, because it calls for the head of a company to control the 
acts of subordinates and partners sometimes near but often far 
away.  Roche concludes that this scandal is of such a magnitude that 
it certainly justifies new regulations being imposed on large 
groups. 

   Deputy director of editing of LES ECHOS, Nicolas Beytout, 
contends that jailing the director of a holding company for the 
adventures or misadventures of one of its subsidiaries is 
unjustifiable.  He observes that the image of French companies will 
suffer because of the scandal and that they will have to adopt a new 
code of conduct, unfortunately similar to what U.S. companies have 
followed for years.  The United States, Beytout claims, is a 
paradise for lawyers and lawsuits, for a "nitpicking" judiciary, and 
"obsessional exploitation" of a whole slew of legalities which 
little by little have been imposed on the business community.  He 
adds that this U.S.-style "drift" is dangerous.  It obligates 
companies to pay inordinate attention to the weakest and most 
dispersed consumer or minority shareholder.  Pineau-Valencienne, who 
was one of the symbols in the beginning of the 1980's of a divorce 
between business and politics, and at the beginning of the 1990's a 
symbol of the new international dimensions of French business, could 
well be the symbol today of an "eruption" of judges in the daily 
life of companies, Beytout concludes. 

   An article by Nathalie Hamou in LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES on 31 May 
states that the new Penal Code, which replaced the Napoleonic Code 
of 1810, introduced a major innovation into French law--that of the 
criminal responsibility of legal entities.  Companies can in the 
future, like individuals, be charged by the judicial system for 
their actions.  This new obligation on the part of companies has not 
gone unnoticed by company directors.  Hamou reports that the 
Confederation of French Employers (CNPF) drew attention to the 
uncertainties in the new Penal Code a few weeks ago.  The CNPF fears 
that it will reverse the "recent" trend of decriminalizing business- 
related issues and lead to "repression."  The motives of the 
legislators who wrote the Penal Code were to share the criminal 
charges between the company and its directors.  However, the system 
is flawed, the CNPF pointed out, since only the criminal 
responsibility of the directors could be engaged in cases of 
violations because it was "impossible" to "get at" individual 
companies. (Dian I. 733-6286) 

   Spain:  Key Economic Figures Take a Fall 

   During the last two months the Spanish press has followed closely 
a series of corruption scandals involving key figures--some of whom 
are major economic decisionmakers--in Prime Minister Felipe 
Gonzalez's Socialist government.  Among them: 

   -- Former Civil Guard director general Luis Roldan was accused of 
embezzling millions of dollars and has been a fugitive since April 
29. 

   -- Former Interior Minister Antoni Asuncion accepted full 
responsibility for allowing Roldan to escape and resigned. 

   -- Former governor of the Bank of Spain Mariano Rubio was 
arrested and sent to jail for tax evasion and insider trading. 

   -- Rubio's financial adviser and former chairman of the Madrid 
stock exchange Manuel de la Concha was also arrested and jailed on 
tax fraud charges. 

   -- Former Agriculture Minister Vicente Albero presented his 
resignation over tax irregularities and connections with the office 
of Manuel de la Concha. 

   -- Former Finance Minister and parliamentary spokesman leader 
Carlos Solchaga and former Interior Minister Jose Luis Corcuera were 
forced to relinquish their parliamentary seats because of their 
connections with the Rubio and Roldan cases respectively. 

   Economic Implications 

   According to recent press accounts the corruption scandals will 
not have long-lasting effects on the economy.  Although there is 
speculation in the media that Gonzalez may not finish out his term 
as prime minister (ABC 5 May) and reporting that People's Party (PP) 
Chairman Jose Maria Aznar has repeatedly called for his resignation 
(El PAIS 6-7 May), a recent article in the 15 May issue of LA 
VANGUARDIA by Juan Tapia and Enric Tintore disputes this.  Tapia and 
Tintore cite Finance Minister Pedro Solbes as noting, "the danger of 
political instability has been completely surmounted, and the 
financial markets are behaving well again."  Asked if foreign 
investment into Spain would be curtailed due to the political 
uncertainty in Spain, Solbes replied that investments by large 
companies are planned well in advance and therefore would not be 
altered by the crisis.  He believed that investments by small and 
medium-sized companies might be delayed but remarked that the 
government had "accepted its political responsibilities" regarding 
the corruption cases and he hoped that "no further problems" would 
arise.  IMF Director General Michel Camdessus echoed Solbes's views 
in an earlier report published in an 11 May article in LA VANGUARDIA 
by Manuel Estape.  In this article, Camdessus stated his belief that 
the atmosphere of corruption would not affect Spain's economic 
recovery.  He noted that this atmosphere "cannot delay investment 
decisions amply justified by the macroeconomic prospects and the 
growth potential" of the Spanish economy.  (Carolina H. 733-6288) 
(Barcelona LA VANGUARDIA in Spanish 10 May 94 p 17; 15 May 94 pp 80- 
81; 11 May 94 p 55) 

   Cartoons Lambast Government 

   (The hard copy version of the WEST EUROPE ECONOMIC REVIEW 
includes several cartoons from the Spanish press critical of the 
major figures involved in the scandal.) 

   EU 

   ECO-FIN AGREES ON RULES FOR FINANCIAL SERVICES--An article in LES 
ECHOS reports that the EU's Eco-Fin Council, which met on 7 June, 
has found a joint Community position on reinforcing the capacity of 
EU authorities to regulate financial service companies.  A result of 
the International Bank of Commerce and Credit (BCCI) scandal which 
caused the EU to review its regulatory practices, the directive Eco- 
Fin will submit to the EU Parliament is called the "Post-BCCI" 
directive and will complete the systems already put in place by 
other EU directives aimed at financial services. 

   The new directive will add a supplemental condition to the others 
in order for a financial company to be approved in other member 
countries.  The directive stipulates that when a financial company 
belongs to a group, the group's structure should be sufficiently 
transparent to allow adequate oversight of the company on an 
individual basis.  The directive also stipulates that credit and 
insurance companies have their headquarters in the same member state 
in which they are legally incorporated.  Additionally, the directive 
fleshes out the list of organizations with which the authorities can 
exchange confidential information and expands auditors' obligations 
to notify authorities when they come across any irregularities in 
monitoring financial companies.  (Dian I. 733-6286) (Paris LES ECHOS 
in French 8 Jun 94 p 22) 

   CAR MANUFACTURERS FORM NEW RESEARCH GROUP--The Association of 
European Automobile Manufacturers (ACEA) recently formed the 
European Council for Automotive Research and Development (EUCARD) to 
administer common research programs and act as a lobbying group in 
Brussels.  According to an article in the Paris daily LE MONDE, the 
group has agreed on a common research program worth about 12 billion 
francs (Fr); 40 percent of the financing will be requested from the 
European Commission within the framework of the Fourth Common 
Research and Development Program.  The article states that this 
organization is the European response to the American USCar group 
which receives large government subsidies.  EUCARD will focus on 
research on environmentally clean cars, improved safety devices, and 
manufacturing methods.  (Ruth H. 733-6284) (Paris LE MONDE in French 
1 Jun 94 p 21) 

   FRANCE 

   EDITORIAL ON CLINTON, BENTSEN, KANTOR--Deputy director of editing 
for  the Paris business daily LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES, Pascal Aubert, 
writes that President Bill Clinton's visit to Paris on 7 June held 
no important messages and typified an administration which was 
"deficient in diplomatic action."  Aubert characterized Clinton's 
speech before the National Assembly as a "warm account" but 
basically "banal" and U.S. diplomatic discourse as "singularly 
impoverished and unclear." 

   However, Aubert points out that where Clinton may appear 
"fluctuating and indecisive" in foreign affairs, his activism on the 
economic and trade front is not.  Clinton excels in this arena, 
according to Aubert, and the strong U.S. presence in Paris during 
his visit coincided with a familiar U.S. double offensive against 
the high interest rate levels in Europe and Japan's deficiency in 
contributing to world economic recovery.  "Through persistence," 
Treasury Secretary LLoyd Bentsen and U.S. Trade Representative 
Mickey Kantor have acquired a reputation of effectiveness that 
Clinton should envy, Aubert continues, adding that this is so 
despite the fact that Germany's Bundesbank "does what it wants when 
it can" and the Japanese Government "does what it can when it 
wants." (Dian I. 733-6286) (Paris LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES in French 8 
Jun 94 P 40) 

   SAPIN SUPPORTS DEFICIT REDUCTION FIRST--Dominique Seux reports 
that Bank of France Monetary Policy Committee member, Michel Sapin, 
wants France's deficit reduced before proceeding with efforts to 
reduce the cost of labor or reduce income taxes.  Although Prime 
Minister Edouard Balladur has announced that he intends to reduce 
the deficit to around Fr275 billion next year, Sapin apparently 
wants him to reduce it even further.  In making his views public 
following the government's announcement it would take in about Fr12 
billion more this year than initially expected, Sapin has added his 
voice to the debate over how these supplemental funds should be 
used.  Budget Minister Nicolas Sarkozy has already suggested that 
these surplus funds be used to reduce labor costs rather than lower 
income taxes, and Prime Minister Edouard Balladur has indicated that 
he wanted to do both at the same time.  Sapin's position, however, 
is in line with that of Bank of France Governor Jean-Claude Trichet 
who has sounded the alarm over the French budget deficit--Fr315.6 
billion in 1993, Fr301.4 billion expected for 1994.  Seux claims 
Sapin also was reacting to the increase in long term interest rates, 
which reflect the financial markets' concern over the deficit. 

   However, the French Government for now is thinking of using the 
extra revenue to finance some Fr20 billion in new expenses not 
initially forecast, to privatize a state-owned company in the fall, 
and to cover capital increases for Air France and Bull.  To reassure 
the financial markets, the government has for several weeks repeated 
that there will not be an increase in the deficit this year and 
defends part of the new expenses, which will be used to stimulate 
jobs, as the cost to fight unemployment.  Nonetheless, the 
government cannot avoid the debate over how to use funds which are 
expected as economic growth continues.  Despite Balladur's assurance 
that the deficit will not increase, the debt service will, Seux 
contends, and will limit what can be accomplished in other areas. 
This is all the more true since long-term interest rates have 
increased.  (Dian I. 733-6286) (Paris LES ECHOS in French 7 Jun 94 p 
2) 

   COB JUSTIFIES SANCTION POWER--The Stock Exchange Commission 
(COB), which has recently been criticized for its selective use of 
sanctions against companies' stock operations, has issued a report 
defending its powers, claiming they have been proven effective, 
reports an article in LES ECHOS.  In its last monthly bulletin, the 
COB stated that four years after direct sanction powers were given 
to the organization, there have been 15 cases where sanctions have 
been applied.  The COB noted that when the market was deregulated 
and opened to competition, the COB filled a void in policing market 
operations.  At the time, the COB did not have the authority to do 
so nor did professional organizations.  Although there was a penal 
code for such matters, litigation was very rare and courts were 
slow to decide on the often media-hyped affairs which needed fast 
decisions.  In any event, the report argued, the legitimacy of COB 
sanctions exists in legal precedence, such as those practiced by the 
Competition Council and the High Council on Audiovisual. 

   Although the COB is satisfied with its new sanction power, it 
admits that it must use it cautiously.  In one of the cases annuled 
by the courts, the textile company VEV affair, the terms of the 
communique which announced the opening of a sanction procedure had 
been judged as having influenced  the presumption of innocence.  The 
COB report questions, however, how such announcements can be done at 
all in a society more and more under the influence of the media. 
Answering such a question is all the more urgent for the COB, which 
has a mission to protect savings and investment information, 
according to COB head Pierre Fleuriot. (Dian I. 733-8286) (Paris LES 
ECHOS in French 8 Jun 94 p 21) 

   GERMANY 

   EXPERT EXPLAINS LAGGING GERMAN INVESTMENTS IN ASIA--In an 
interview with the DEUTSCHES ALLGEMEINES SONNTAGSBLATT, Oskar 
Weggel, the head of the Hamburg Institute for Asian Studies, asserts 
that Germany has "slept through" recent economic developments in 
Asia.   According to Weggel, Germany frequently lags behind such 
countries as the Netherlands in investments in the region.  As an 
example, he cites the country's failure to take advantage of 
Vietnam's ties to the former East Germany to get in on the ground 
floor of Vietnam's rapid development. 

   Weggel attributes Germany's disinterest in Asia to the country's 
"macabre Eurocentrism," noting that the entire German economy is 
oriented toward Europe and North America, and to German arrogance, 
or the notion that everything must be done according to German 
tradition.  Weggel says German firms often ask where the treaties 
are for the extensive Chinese trading network, because they expect 
there to be an equivalent of the EU treaties of Rome and Maastricht. 
In fact, Weggel asserts, informal contacts are much more important 
in Asia:  "Capital means personal trust, the main work is personal 
relations."  Building up a relationship takes time, and German firms 
are often very short-sighted and unwilling to invest in something 
that will not pay off immediately. 

   In addition, Weggel argues, medium-sized German companies cannot 
break into the Asian market because they are afraid of competition 
and reluctant to band together.  He cites the example of a meeting 
of the Eastern Committee of the German Economy, where firms are 
requested to ask questions before the lecture begins but everyone 
waits to do it privately afterward because they are afraid the 
competition will hear.  While acknowledging that German companies 
receive less help from their government than their French or 
Austrian counterparts do, Weggel asserts that the government cannot 
be relied upon as a "cure."  (Wendy S. 733-6506) (Hamburg DEUTSCHES 
ALLGEMEINES SONNTAGSBLATT in German 27 May 94 p 4) 

   ENVIRONMENTAL TECHNOLOGY INDUSTRY FLOURISHING--The German 
environmental technology industry is flourishing, according to an 
article in the 18 May FRANKFURTER RUNDSCHAU.  The National 
Association of the German Waste Disposal Industry (BDE) estimates 
that the industry's total sales increased last year by 10 percent to 
about 75-80 billion German marks (DM), with an additional 10-percent 
growth in sales and employment expected this year.  Some 680,000 
workers are currently employed in the industry, a number the German 
Institute for Economic Research (DIW) estimates will increase to 1.1 
million by the year 2000.  The BDE believes the industry would grow 
even faster if the German Government would pursue a "more rigid" 
environmental policy.  The industry expects, for example, that a 
further boost to growth would result from a proposed  manufacturing 
recycling law which would require manufacturers to take back and 
recycle their products. 

   Large companies from outside the environmental technology sector 
have discovered this growth and moved to acquire small and medium- 
sized companies in the industry, creating a problematic 
concentration of business power.  The IFO economic research 
institute has already warned of "cartel-like structures" in the 
field.  Large, well-funded electrical utility companies have been 
especially active investors and about half of all industry sales now 
benefit these "energy giants," with around 1,000 small and medium- 
sized companies dividing up the rest.  Environmental industry 
experts expect the degree of consolidation in the sector to increase 
even further.  (Joel S. 733-6503) (Frankfurt/Main FRANKFURTER 
RUNDSCHAU in German 18 May 94 p 12) 

   FOUNDATION PROMOTES ECOLOGICAL INNOVATION--Since 1991, the German 
Federal Foundation for the Environment has provided more the DM500 
million in funding for around 900 ecological projects, an article in 
DIE WELT reports.  Founded on the initiative of Finance Minister 
Theo Waigel, the foundation promotes the creativity of small and 
medium-sized companies in finding practical solutions to 
environmental problems, provides an impetus for ecological 
innovation, and reduces the initial risks for companies adopting 
ecologically friendly production technologies.  In addition, the 
foundation lends support in the areas of environmental technology, 
research, and education through its provision of ecological 
information and consulting services.  About 70 percent of the 
projects the foundation has funded are in the new laender.  Among 
them is the Dresden Ecology Center, where environmental experts from 
business and government meet to exchange experiences and explore new 
avenues of transferring know-how.  In Magdeburg, the foundation is 
supporting a project which, for the first time, will produce teflon 
fibers by means of a fluidized solids technique, without the use of 
heavy metals.  The fibers are a versatile asbestos substitute. 
(Joel S. 733-6503) (Hamburg DIE WELT in German 18 May 94 p WR4) 

   ITALY 

   BANK OF ITALY GOVERNOR ON ECONOMY--At an annual board meeting on 
31 May, Bank of Italy Governor Antonio Fazio issued the following 
observations and warnings: 

   Tax rates: Reducing tax rates would only increase the deficit and 
the national debt.  At 44 percent of GDP, the Italian tax rate is 
not out of line with those of other EU countries and is in fact 
lower than in some.  Other than for interest rates and pensions, 
social spending is not out of line when compared internationally. 

   Social welfare: The total projected present value of future 
social welfare obligations for the present population is 2.4 times 
GDP.  Unless corrective measures are instituted, the yearly cost of 
social welfare will soon grow more rapidly than national income. 
Privatizing national insurance is not feasible and would require 
setting aside capital "equal to half of the national assets" for 
current obligations alone.  Instead, benefits should be gradually 
limited and a partial private system should be introduced.  Doing so 
would require adequate tax revenues.  Pension funds should be 
encouraged because they will make available massive amounts of 
capital and will redistribute family assets towards long-term 
financial investments. 

   Domestic consumption: Encouraging economic recovery by 
stimulating domestic consumption would require changes in budget 
policy.  At the same time, interest rates would have to increase to 
keep prices down. 

   Increased investments: Economic recovery should be the result of 
increased investments.  Currently investment seems to be increasing 
but not enough to make up for the 11-percent drop in 1993. 

   Government procurement contracts: Suspending the Merloni law, 
which instituted tight controls on government contracts that brought 
public works to a standstill, was necessary to get public works 
moving again after a 16-percent drop in employment and investment in 
1993.  However, government contracting should be carried out in 
total "transparency and correctness." 

   Tax evasion: Fighting tax evasion is an indirect way of favoring 
investments and employment.  It would lower the tax burden on those 
who do pay their taxes.  To fight tax evasion, controls and 
collection should be made more efficient. 

   Bank losses: Bank losses primarily due to uncollectible loans are 
destined to grow.  To help address the problem, the banking 
oversight committee has examined four projects for the partial 
conversion of loans into stocks. However, banks can vaunt the 60 
trillion lire which they have loaned to companies being 
restructured. 

   Undervalued lira: The lira is still undervalued, although not as 
much as in the second half of 1993, when in real terms the lira was 
depreciated even compared to 1987." (Anilla B. 733-6283) (Rome LA 
REPUBBLICA in Italian 1 Jun 94 p 3) 

   TREASURY MINISTER ON ECONOMIC PLANS--In an interview given to 
INTERNATIONAL HERALD TRIBUNE correspondent Alan Friedman, newly 
appointed Treasury Minister Lamberto Dini discussed the new 
government's plan for economic recovery.  Below is the description 
of the plan and further details provided by Dini: 

   Employment: Reduce the cost of workers' benefits for employers 
who hire.  Extend this benefit to three years.  Establish tax 
incentives to help companies create new jobs and investments. 
Simplify the tax system and reduce the kinds of taxes imposed, which 
now number 200. 

   The government is currently examining three additional 
initiatives to stimulate employment: accelerate depreciation of new 
plants and equipment, reimburse taxes tied to investments, and 
exempt from income tax any profits reinvested by companies. 

   Dini stated that new revenues could be generated to pay for such 
stimulative measures by raising the value-added tax (VAT) on certain 
consumer products and by a general pardon for real estate tax 
evaders.  Most importantly, he added, creating new jobs will 
increase revenue through the taxes paid by the newly employed. 

   Privatizations: "Privatize almost everything" to reduce the 
government's excessive presence in the economy. 

   Dini stated that he would like to speed up privatization and 
believed the government could earn 80 trillion lire from the sales. 
The first state companies to be sold off will be the National 
Electric Power Board (ENEL) and the Telephone Finance Company 
(STET).  Many companies belonging to the Institute for Industrial 
Reconstruction (IRI) will also be privatized, among which 
Finmeccanica and Ilva.  Dini said the government's objective is to 
get out of companies such as IRI altogether and also give up 
companies belonging to the National Hydrocarbons Company (ENI), such 
as Agip, Snam, and Snamprogetti. 

   Asked what he thought about the debate over public companies, 
Dini replied that in the case of STET and ENEL, which provide public 
services, the government will try to keep a "golden share" to 
maintain some control.  For other companies, the type of 
privatization will be decided on a case by case basis.  For some, 
the British public company model will be used; for others, a hard 
core of institutional investors will be created; others will be sold 
outright to both foreign and national investors.  "There is no one 
absolute model," Dini said, however, efforts must be made to prevent 
a public monopoly from becoming a private one. 

   Public debt: Dini confirmed that in 1994 the national debt will 
reach the expected amount of 159 trillion lire.  Since Italy intends 
to go ahead with full integration into the EU, the national debt 
will have to be reduced.  Dini expects the deficit will begin to 
"stabilize" by 1995 and the trend reversed by approximately 9 
percent of GDP. 

   Lira and the EMS: Dini believes the lira is undervalued but that 
this is helpful for international trade.  He would not give a date 
for the lira's reentry into the European Monetary System (EMS) but 
doubted it would be this year. 

   EU economy, interest rates: Dini stated he believed Europe was in 
the middle of a slow economic recovery and could stand lower 
interest rates without risking inflation.  However, he said, Italian 
interest rate policies must be "very prudent" to avoid high long- 
term interest rates that would hinder investments.  Dini noted, 
however, that in a global economy, EU rates also depend on U.S. 
rates. (Anilla B. 733-6283) (Milan PANORAMA in Italian 28 May 94 pp 
212-214) 

   SWEDEN 

   FIRMS MORE OPTIMISTIC THAN EU COUNTERPARTS--According to a survey 
of small and medium-sized firms by the Grant Thornton International 
accounting firm and its Swedish partner, Lindebergs, Swedish 
companies are more optimistic about the future than their EU 
counterparts.  Some 35 percent of the Swedish firms surveyed said 
they would probably hire new workers this year, while only 15 
percent thought they would reduce their staffs.  The difference, 20 
percent, tops the corresponding figures for the EU countries.  In 
fact, in most EU countries, more firms planned to lay off workers 
than hire them.  Swedish companies are also more optimistic than EU 
firms in their expectations for profits, exports, sales, and 
advertising and marketing.  In addition, only 14 percent of Swedish 
firms thought they would have long-term financing problems while, 
for example, 31 percent of German companies predicted such 
difficulties.  Anders Meyer of Lindebergs attributes the Swedish 
optimism to the fact that Swedish firms are starting out at a lower 
point after the recession. Meyer believes that the initial optimism 
will have worn off by next year.  (Wendy S. 733-6506) (Stockholm 
DAGENS NYHETER in Swedish 10 May p 37) 

   TURKEY 

   MILITARY CONTROLS LARGE SECTOR OF ECONOMY--The Turkish Army Aid 
Association (OYAK), which functions somewhat like a military credit 
union, controls a large sector of the country's economy, according 
to an article in WIRTSCHAFTSWOCHE.  OYAK was founded after the 1960 
military coup as an officers' treasury that would provide its 
members with loans at favorable rates, pay contributions to the 
state pension plan, aid injured veterans, and run vacation homes. 
Today the organization has 80,000 members, with 10 percent of all 
officers' and noncommissioned officers' pay going to OYAK.  The 
association owns 25 companies, among which are a French Renault 
production facility in Turkey, three Turkish automobile 
manufacturers, six cement factories, several construction firms and 
food companies, and the Sigorta insurance company.  It is currently 
cooperating with the French company Elf Aquitaine on building a 
network of some 45 gas stations. OYAK, whose sales have been 
estimated at DM8.5 billion per year, was one of the few Turkish 
conglomerates to earn a profit last year; it is exempt from most 
state taxes and fees.  Although Prime Minister Tansu Ciller has 
promised extensive privatizations of state-owned companies, no 
politician would dare touch OYAK's "empire."  OYAK also shields its 
members from daily Turkish life:  officers live in OYAK subsidized 
apartments, shop at OYAK discount stores, and vacation at OYAK 
vacation villages.  (Wendy S. 733-6506) (Duesseldorf 
WIRTSCHAFTSWOCHE in German 20 May 94 pp 35-6) 

   PRESCRIPTION FOR EU ENTRY GIVEN--Sedat Alaoglu, director of the 
Economic Development Foundation (EDF), in an interview in the 
Istanbul daily NOKTA, discussed an EDF report entitled "Effects of 
the European Union on the Turkish Economy: Measures, Proposals," 
agreeing with the report's findings that there were concrete 
measures Turkey could take to prepare for EU accession.  Listed in 
the report are the following suggestions: 

   -- The state should decrease its involvement in the economy. 

   -- The underground economy must be absorbed into the legitimate 
economy. 

   -- Tax revenues have to be increased by decreasing the tax rate 
and broadening the tax base. 

   -- The government should support investment activity on a par 
with foreign competition. 

   -- Foreign trade and investment must be fostered. 

   -- Consensus and stability in the work-force market must be 
achieved. 

   -- Interest rates must be brought down to the EU median. 

   -- The cost of energy has to be brought down to the EU median. 

   -- Greater importance has to be given to education. 

   -- Economic laws and regulations must be coordinated with those 
of the EU. 

   -- An economic and social council has to be established. (Ender 
C. 733-6285) (Istanbul NOKTA in Turkish 3-9 Apr 94 p 32) 

   PRIVATE SECTOR REACTS TO AUSTERITY--According to an article in 
DUNYA which discusses the government's austerity program, the 
private sector is "leaning" toward production cuts and layoffs as a 
way to survive the current economic crisis with minimal losses.  The 
article indicates that private companies have to do so because of 
decreased sales and higher interest rates.  Beyond production 
cutbacks and layoffs, companies have taken the following measures: 

   -- Scrutinized what they import because of the instability in the 
foreign exchange markets. 

   -- Begun to pursue new export markets. 

   -- Large companies are closing down their unproductive 
subsidiaries. 

   -- Minimized inventories and offered incentives for cash 
purchases. 

   -- Ended long-term payment plans, asking that daily payments be 
made. 

   In addition, another article on the same page listed specific 
austerity measures taken by some of Turkey's leading corporations: 

   -- KOC Holding: The company will avoid excessive debt, pursue 
export markets, withdraw from activity outside its main business. 

   -- Mavi Kablo: It cut back its production by 20 percent, lowered 
its inventory to a minimum, payed off bank loans to avoid nondaily 
expenses, stopped investing, adopted a three month budget, and 
expedited payments. 

   -- Kavala: The company will downsize, cut expenses, and pursue 
exports. 

   -- Kale Porselen: It has cut all its credit ties with banks, sold 
TL12 billion of its capital to the public, laid off 50 employees, 
closed down two of its electroporcelain ovens, and is pursuing 
exports. 

   -- Alarko Holding: It is waiting to see how effective the 
government's economic package will be.  It is considering stopping 
investment if there is a snag in its implementation.  (Ender C. 733- 
6285) (Istanbul DUNYA in Turkish 12 Apr 94 p 1) 

   ECONOMIC BRIEFS 

   EU 

   --EU Commission declared French Government's proposed Fr20- 
billion Air France capital infusion qualifies as "state aid," not in 
conformity with EU regulations. . .government must present 
counterarguments, supplementary information within 30 days. .. 
capitalization needed for company's survival after recent 
restructuring, labor problems. (Paris LE MONDE 8 Jun 94 p 24) 

   --Article comments United States intends, with help of Asian, 
Pacific countries, to assert its control over OECD.. .nomination of 
new secretary general believed first stage in strategy. .. confusion 
reigns in EU camp where no one can agree on common candidate, 
according to article. (Paris LES ECHOS 7 Jun 94 p 6) 

   France 

   --French Aerospace Industry Group (GIFAS) has once again asked 
government for support to compete with United States. . .asked EU to 
"buy European," "more importantly" wants U.S. "Buy American" law 
suppressed. (LE FIGARO Le Fig-Eco supplement 27 May 94 p IV) 

   Turkey 

   --Prime Minister Tansu Ciller's forecast of 48-percent inflation 
rate by year end, based on State Planning Commission (DPT) figures, 
proved wrong. .. DPT did not take into consideration dollar value 
increase, lack of confidence, bank failures.. .DPT now claims 
inflation will be 94 percent, with inflation 110.1 percent, dollar 
at 38,000 lira. (CUMHURIYET 9 May 94 p 1) 

   --Despite instabilities in economy, foreign companies continue to 
invest in Turkey. . .France's cement giant Vicat, already part owner 
of Konya Cement company, has bought 20 percent of Bastas Cement 
Factory in Ankara for $20 million. . .France's Lafarge cement 
company opened Turkish subsidiary under name of Agrega, bought 50 
percent of major cement company Yibitas, reportedly for $60-70 
million. (DUNYA 10 May 94 p 1) 

ELAG/16 JUN/ECONF/WED/JF 17/0105Z JUN 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23113 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000033094001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   18 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-17JUN94-JAPAN-DPRK 
<H3> <TI>      Tokyo Remains Cautious, Divided Over Sanctions </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Tokyo Remains Cautious, Divided Over Sanctions </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                                            The Japanese Government continues to favor a cautious approach to 
imposing sanctions against North Korea, preferring to resolve the 
DPRK issue through negotiations if possible and to invoke 
sanctions only gradually and in stages if negotiations fail. 
However, some leaders of the ruling coalition and some government 
officials appear to be arguing for a more forceful stance.  There 
have also been signs in the Japanese press that the coalition is 
trying to build a consensus around the necessity of supporting 
sanctions, but its weak political position and opposition to 
sanctions from the Social Democratic Party of Japan are 
continuing to hinder this effort. 
                                     END SUMMARY 
   In their public statements on the DPRK nuclear issue over the 
last week, Japanese Government leaders have continued to advocate 
caution in imposing sanctions against Pyongyang for its failure 
To allow full-scale inspection of its nuclear facilities by the 
International Atomic Energy Agency (IAEA).  They have also 
remained vague about what steps Japan would take to support any 
sanctions imposed by the United Nations. 
   -- On 14 June, in comments on North Korea's withdrawal from the 
IAEA to the Diet Upper House Budget Committee, Prime Minister 
Tsutomu Hata stated that Japan would continue to try to persuade 
Pyongyang to agree to a negotiated settlement.  "We still have 
hopes," he said in portions of his remarks broadcast on NHK 
Television, "that they will open their doors to the international 
community as soon as possible to eliminate suspicions about their 
development of nuclear weapons." 
   -- The same day, Kyodo reported that Hata told President Clinton 
during a telephone conversation that Japan would "take 
responsible action within the bounds of our constitution" if the 
United Nations voted sanctions against North Korea.  Hata and 
other senior Japanese officials have been publicly reiterating 
this vague and cautious formulation of Tokyo's position for a 
number of months. 
   -- On 15 June, after a meeting with Prime Minister Hata on the 
draft resolution on sanctions against North Korea that the United 
States plans to submit to the UN Security Council, Chief Cabinet 
Hiroshi Kumagai summarized the Japanese Government's position on 
sanctions, stating that "Japan has been extremely cautious about 
sanctions against North Korea.  Japan has maintained that 
sanctions should not simply be a punishment for North Korea, but 
should encourage North Korea to return to the starting point" 
(Nihon Keizai Shimbun, 16 June). 
   --  During talks in Seoul on 11 June, Foreign Minister Koji 
Kakizawa and his ROK counterpart Han Sung-chu agreed that any 
sanctions should be "gradual," according to a Kyodo report the 
same day.  Kyodo also quoted Kakizawa as telling Han that Japan 
"will make the utmost efforts within its Constitution" to support 
any UN sanctions. 
   Domestic, Foreign Policy Concerns 
   Tokyo's caution is the result, in part, of several domestic and 
foreign policy concerns.  Tokyo apparently believes that China is 
unlikely to support a UN resolution imposing sanctions against 
the DPRK, and that sanctions would be ineffective without support 
from China.  In its July issue, the influential journal Bungei 
Shunju published what it said was a top secret government report 
on the DPRK situation prepared last November by an unidentified 
government agency.  Examining the possible impact of sanctions 
against Pyongyang, the report argued that "if the DPRK can 
acquire vital goods such as oil and food from China . . . 
economic sanctions cannot be expected to yield results."  It 
concluded from this that "as long as China does not go along with 
economic sanctions and show a cooperative response, economic 
sanctions may be less effective."  Foreign Minister Koji Kakizawa 
reportedly told the Budget Committee of the Lower House of the 
Diet on 3 June that the Security Council might not be able to 
reach agreement on sanctions because China was likely to oppose 
them. 
   In addition, the government appears to be worried that Koreans 
living in Japan would provoke unrest and possibly engage in acts 
of terrorism if Tokyo supports sanctions against Pyongyang.  The 
top secret document published in the July Bungei Shunju described 
at length the types of actions that the Chosen Soren (North 
Korean Residents Association of Japan) might take if sanctions 
were imposed.  These ranged from "furious protest activities at 
Japanese Government organizations, UN agencies in Japan and the 
U.S. Embassy;"  attacks on people in these installations; and 
damage or destruction of property at these or "related 
facilities" to "violent counterattacks" in reaction to criticism 
of the DPRK and the Chosen Soren by the Japanese media and right- 
wing organizations. 
   Divisions Within Government 
   As tension with Pyongyang has increased, some officials within 
the coalition and within the government appear to be arguing that 
Japan should take a stronger position on the issue of sanctions 
to preserve its relationship with the United States and its 
credibility in the international community.  During an interview 
on Tokyo's FNN Television Network on 11 June,  Ichiro Ozawa, 
Secretary General of the Shinseito, the largest and most 
influential party in the ruling coalition, said that although the 
international community should initially try to resolve the DPRK 
nuclear issue through "dialogue," if this failed, "we will have 
to take a firm stand."  He added that while sanctions should be 
implemented "step by step," it was "very important" that Japan 
take "action in the preliminary stages," even before sanctions 
are imposed, to gradually discontinue monetary remittances and 
trade with the DPRK.  He argued that Japan would "lose the trust 
of the international community" if it failed to do so.  He also 
asserted that the Japanese Constitution would not prevent Japan 
from either stopping remittances to the DPRK--which he described 
as "a matter of domestic economic policy" that "has nothing to do 
with provisions in the Constitution limiting Japanese 
participation in overseas military activities"-- or supporting UN 
sanctions against the DPRK. 
   There also continues to be considerable support for a stronger 
Japanese posture toward sanctions within the Ministry of Foreign 
Affairs (MOFA).  A senior MOFA official told the 15 June Mainichi 
Shimbun that although Japan has been advocating that sanctions be 
imposed gradually, "this does not mean Japan wants to hinder the 
efforts of the international community."  Similarly, the 15 June 
Nihon Keizai Shimbun quoted another senior MOFA official as 
arguing that Japan "has no option other than to sincerely carry 
out what the United Nations decides."  The same day, Yomiuri 
Shimbun reported that a mid-level MOFA official described 
sanctions as "unavoidable."  On the question of whether Japan 
could support sanctions within the framework of its current laws, 
unidentified MOFA sources told the 10 June Yomiuri Shimbun that 
there is no legal obstacle to Tokyo's taking steps to enforce 
sanctions as soon as they are imposed. 
   Continued Divisions over Remittances 
   The issue of stopping remittances to North Korea by Koreans 
living in Japan remains a highly charged issue, however, and the 
Japanese Government appears to remain sharply divided over the 
extent to which Japan could comply, particularly in the absence 
of a UN resolution imposing sanctions against the DPRK.  Parts of 
the Foreign Ministry and the Prime Minister's office seem to be 
arguing that Japan would have no problem complying with a UN 
decision to cut off remittances. 
   -- On 11 June, Saneto Uchiyama, Deputy Director of the Cabinet 
Information Research Office's Second Foreign Affairs Division, 
reportedly told Kyodo that the Japanese Government could "block 
6O or 7O percent" of the annual remittances from Japan to North 
Korea just by more closely monitoring tax returns of pro- 
Pyongyang businessmen in Japan and could take steps to prevent 
these businessmen from sending remittances through third 
countries. 
   -- The 15 June Nihon Keizai Shimbun reported that MOFA officials, 
upset by U.S. press reports that Japan was reluctant to support 
sanctions, stated that Japan would have no problem halting 
remittances. 
   -- According to the 16 June morning edition of the same paper, an 
unidentified MOFA source refuted the argument--made by Japanese 
opponents of sanctions--that cutting off the remittances through 
Japan would be ineffective because many of them go through banks 
in third countries.  The source reportedly stated that if the 
United Nations votes to adopt sanctions, third nations would have 
to stop remittances also. "All nations involved are obliged to 
comply" with the sanctions, he was quoted as saying. 
   Within the powerful Ministry of Finance (MOF), however, 
opposition to cutting off remittances in the absence of a UN 
resolution remains strong.  The 15 June Nihon Keizai Shimbun 
reported that MOF recently sent a senior official to Washington 
to inform the Treasury Department that it would be "difficult to 
completely halt remittances under current laws."  Similarly, the 
16 June editions of both Nihon Keizai Shimbun and Mainichi 
Shimbun quoted an unidentified government source as stating that 
it would be "difficult" to stop the remittances under Japan's 
current Foreign Exchange Management Law without a UN resolution. 
Perhaps because of sensitivity to and disagreement over halting 
remittances within the government, Kyodo killed within hours of 
its release a report quoting the Cabinet Information Research 
Office's Saneto Uchiyama as stating that Tokyo could bloc large 
portions of the remittances.  The news service initially asked 
its customers to hold the story because it contained "some 
information to be checked" and later announced the retraction by 
saying only that "under the circumstances, we have to retract the 
story." 
   Consensus-Building 
   The Japanese Government may be taking steps to forge a consensus 
in favor of sanctions and prepare the Japanese public for their 
implementation.  For example, on 14 June, the Justice, Finance, 
International Trade and Industry, and Transport ministers all 
testified before the Upper House Budget Committee that the 
government was studying a number of specific measures that it 
plans to take if sanctions are imposed.  According to a 14 June 
NHK television report, these include bans on travel and 
remittances, restrictions on trade, and surveillance of ships. 
On 16 June, unidentified "well-placed" government sources sought 
to play down the impact that the imposition of sanctions would 
have on Japan, telling Kyodo, Japan's largest news agency, that 
in their first phases, sanctions would have only a "minimal 
effect on Japan," causing mainly the curtailment of limited 
cultural exchanges and travel between Japan and North Korea.  The 
15 June Mainichi Shimbun carried a similar report stating that 
sanctions would have little effect on Japanese industry because 
of the limited scope of Japan's trade with North Korea.  (The 
report noted that mushrooms were the major product air freighted 
to Japan from North Korea). 
   Political Tensions 
   Despite the support for sanctions among some politicians and 
officials and despite the government's apparent efforts to build 
consensus, the fundamental obstacle to Japan's full support of 
sanctions, especially in the absence of a UN resolution, remains 
the opposition to sanctions by the Social Democratic Party of 
Japan (SDPJ), one of the key opposition parties, and the weak 
political position of the minority ruling coalition.  Over the 
past week, the SDPJ has continued to indicate that it will oppose 
any effort to impose sanctions against the DPRK.  According to 
the 14 June Nihon Keizai Shimbun, an SDPJ delegation that 
recently visited North Korea to discuss the nuclear issue with 
North Korean officials told Hwang Chang-yop, secretary of the 
Central Committee of the Korean Workers Party that the issue 
should be resolved "through dialogue."  Upon the delegation's 
return to Japan, its leader, Kazo Watanabe, Director of the 
SDPJ's General Affairs Bureau, told the Japanese press that the 
SDPJ will oppose the imposition of sanctions against Pyongyang 
(Kyodo, 16 June.) 
   Outlook 
   The minority ruling coalition will probably find it politically 
easier to gain support for sanctions in Japan, especially from 
the SDPJ, if the United Nations votes to impose sanctions against 
North Korea.  If the United Nations does not vote in favor of 
sanctions because of opposition from China, the coalition, 
whatever its own policy proclivities, will have difficulty 
winning SDPJ support for sanctions.   If the coalition were to 
take steps to support and enforce sanctions without SDPJ support, 
it would be vulnerable to a no-confidence motion from the SDPJ at 
a time when there are moves within both the SDPJ and the largest 
opposition party, the Liberal Democratic Party, to bring down the 
coalition. 
   (AUTHOR:  BOUNDS.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ASIA DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703)-733-6534.) 
EAG/HEBBEL/CB 17/2356z Jun 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23114 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000032694001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   20 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY-FBPSP 94-12-ASIA 
<H3> <TI>      PACIFIC RIM ECONOMIC REVIEW -- 15 JUNE 1994 </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       PACIFIC RIM ECONOMIC REVIEW -- 15 JUNE 1994 </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
Table      of Contents 

   JAPAN:  Auto Industry - Nippondenso To Manufacture Auto Parts in 
Mexico; Mitsubishi Group, Reynolds To Market Aluminum Auto Parts in 
Japan 

   Economic Trends - Economic Council To Take Up Foreign Trade 
Policy Issues; Japan's Overseas Direct Investment Up 5.5 Percent in 
FY93 

   Financial Issues - FEATURE:  Banks Begin Netting Operations With 
Foreign Banks; Foreign Securities Firms To Underwrite Government- 
Backed Bonds; 
   Foreign Trade and Investment - CENTRAL ASIAN REPUBLICS:  Central 
Asian Economic Committees Launched 

   CHINA:  Omron To Set Up Cash Register Production Joint Venture; 
Toray To Build Polyester Production Base in Jiangsu; Taoka Chemical 
Forms Synthetic Dye Joint Venture in Tianjin; KDK To Establish 
Electrode Foil Production Operations in Guangdong 

   VIETNAM:  Itochu-Isuzu Joint Venture To Assemble Small Trucks; 
Construction Companies Open Offices in Hanoi 

   Glass Industry - MITI Denies Report of Tariff Cuts, Prepares for 
Glass Talks; Asahi Glass To Raise Price of Sheet Glass Despite Weak 
Demand 

   Nonferrous Metals - Showa Denko To Withdraw From Titanium 
Refining, Sales 

   CHINA:  Domestic Developments - Survey Shows Shareholding 
Effective in Reforming Enterprise; Article Examines Obstacles To 
Developing Machine-Building Industry; Bleak Outlook for Textile 
Exports in 1994; Pudong Plans 100,000-Ton Shipyard 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - Singapore Investing in 
International Facilities for Yantai City; First Yen-Denominated 
Floating Rate Notes Issued; Thai Group to Build Industrial Park in 
Henan's Luohe; Guangdong Trade Delegates Hold Trade Talks in Paris; 
Fujian Signs Contracts for Nine Foreign Projects; Quanzhou, Fujian 
Attracts $1 Billion of Foreign Investment; Fujian's Sanduao Attracts 
Foreign Investment; Shantou Cooperates With Singapore in Building 
Rolling Mill; Pudong Processing Zone Attracts High-Tech 
Multinational Corporations; Dalian Seeks 2 Billion Yuan for Dalian- 
Yantai Railway Ferry; Jiangxi Sets Up Investment Zone for Taiwan 
Businesses; Yunnan Seeks Foreign Partners To Build Kunming-Bangkok 
Railway; Xinjiang Airlines To Open International Routes; Hong Kong's 
CITIC Real Estate Investment in Fuzhou; Hong Kong Company Involved 
in Fujian Infrastructure Development; Some 100,000 Hong Kong Firms 
Said Operating in Mainland China; Hong Kong's Shougang Concord 
Acquires 51 Percent of Hebei Plate Mill; Hong Kong Economic 
Interaction With Mainland Viewed 

   Taiwan:  Restrictions on Fruit Imports Lifted, Tariffs Cut; 
Exports Up 1.5 Percent, Imports 2.2 Percent in Second Quarter; 
Market Share of Imported Light Industry Products Exceeds 50 Percent; 
Government To Increase Incentives for Selected Overseas Investments; 
State Enterprises May Register Patent Rights in PRC; Economic Growth 
Expected to Fall Short of 1994 Target 

   NORTH KOREA:  Government Official Discusses Plans To Boost 
Foreign Trade 

   SOUTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  Coal Companies, Conglomerates Eye Korea 
Gas Privatization; FEATURE:  'Non-Official' Groups Plan New 
Corporate State Relationship; FEATURE:  Hyundai Developing Rocket 
With Russian Technology; FEATURE:  Samsung Introduces Third- 
Generation Electric Car; Iljin Advertisement Touts Group's 
Technological 'Achievements'; ROK Government To Subsidize 
Engineering Technology; Daewoo Producing High-Tech Carbon Material 
for Aerospace; Brazing Furnace, Other 'Dual-Use' Products 
Indigenized; ROK To Increase LNG Carrier Fleet to 10 Vessels by 
2006; Halla Group, U.S. Firm To Build LNG Base in South Cholla; 
Patent Office To Promote Environmental Technologies; Patent Office 
To Set up New Offices Promoting Inventions, Patents; Taerim Receives 
Order for Gas Processing Facilities From India; POSCO Takes Over 
Japanese Steel Materials Plant; Hyundai Begins Pipeline Project in 
Vietnam; Development Bank Offers Loan to China To Build Thermal 
Power Plant; Gold Star Electric Cable Exports Combines to China; 
Samsung To Participate in Russian Telecommunications Projects 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA - INDONESIA:  Coal Production Figures, Volume of 
Deposits Reported 

   MALAYSIA:  Leader Universal Holdings Begins PRC Joint Venture; 
Bank Consortium To Fund $1.2-Billion Sarawak LNG Project; 
Electricity Corporation Awards Contract to PRC Group 

   PHILIPPINES:  Manila To Get Telecommunications Tower 

   THAILAND:  Japanese Firm Wins Natural Gas Separator Construction 
Contract; ROK, Japanese Firms To Build Steel Plant in Thailand; 
Japanese Firm Approved for Vehicle-Part Production 

   VIETNAM:  FEATURE:  Investors Conferences, Foreign Investment 
Policies Reported; Premier Issues Directive To Raise Revenues, 
Balance Budget; Thanh Hoa, Taiwanese Companies Form Joint Venture; 
Japanese Banks Trailing Others in Vietnam Investment; Mitsui 
Importing LPG, Ammonia to Vietnam; Australian, U.S. Firms Plan Power 
Plant-Factory Complex; Joint Venture Firm Plans To Install 200,000 
Telephone Circuits; Northern Telecom To Provide Telephone Equipment; 
Export-Import Value Rises to $3.3 Billion; Authorities Withdraw 131 
Investment Licenses; Construction Boom Keeps Demand, Price of Cement 
High; Hanoi Issues New Treasury Bills, Bonds 

   (Pacific Rim Economic Review FBPSP 94-12) 

   JAPAN:  Auto Industry - Nippondenso To Manufacture Auto Parts in 
Mexico -- Nippondenso Co., a major auto parts manufacturer 
affiliated with Toyota Motor Corp., is looking to produce automobile 
parts in Mexico by 1998 and is currently organizing a survey team to 
determine the timing and location for such a move and what parts to 
produce.  With the passage of NAFTA, a number of Japanese automakers 
and auto parts makers are taking steps to develop operations in 
Mexico.  Nippondenso, however, is not responding to Japanese firms, 
but to specific requests made by the U.S. "Big Three" automakers. 
Consequently, Nippondenso's decision to move beyond the confines of 
its keiretsu affiliation will likely influence other Japanese parts 
makers. 

   Nippondenso sold over 80 billion yen ($762 million) in parts, 
which includes exports from Japan, to U.S. automakers in FY93. 
Chrysler Corp., the largest single purchaser, "strongly requested" 
that Nippondenso set up operations in Mexico.  General Motors and 
Ford Motor also made requests to the company, since they are 
expanding auto production in Mexico and would like to use parts made 
locally.  Nippondenso currently has seven production bases in the 
United States, but none supply parts to Mexico. 

   Once established in Mexico, Nippondenso also expects to sell 
parts to Japanese automakers, including Nissan Motor Co., which has 
been assembling cars in Mexico since 1966.  Honda Motor Co. recently 
announced its intention to produce autos in Mexico by the end of 
1995.  Toyota is also "investigating" whether to begin assembly 
operations there.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 2 Jun 94 p 12) 

   Mitsubishi Group, Reynolds To Market Aluminum Auto Parts in Japan 
-- Mitsubishi Aluminum Co., Mitsubishi Materials Corp., Mitsubishi 
Corp., and U.S. aluminum maker Reynolds Metals have established an 
aluminum auto parts sales company in Japan.  The new company, M.R. 
Auto Products, is capitalized at 10 million yen ($95,250), of which 
Reynolds contributed 30 percent, Mitsubishi Aluminum 50 percent, and 
Mitsubishi Materials and Mitsubishi Corp. 10 percent each. It will 
be responsible for selling to Japanese automakers pressed aluminum 
parts developed by Mitsubishi Aluminum and Reynolds to meet the 
growing demand for lighter auto parts.  The company will market 
mostly imported parts made by Reynolds, but the joint venture is 
considering coproduction of more advanced materials such as 
automobile "space-frames. 

   The Mitsubishi Group and Reynolds reached an agreement in March 
1992 to conduct joint research into pressed aluminum parts with an 
emphasis on lowering automobile weight.  In December 1992 they 
signed a general contract and have been exchanging technicians ever 
since. 

   Due to "rising environmental restrictions," demand for 
lightweight auto parts is increasing.  Consequently, a number of 
international joint ventures have been formed to capitalize on this 
trend.  In June 1992, Kobe Steel and Alcoa Corp. established 50/50 
joint venture subsidiaries in both Japan and the United States.  In 
May 1993, Furukawa Electric Co., the U.S. firm Kaiser, and Itochu 
Corp. set up a joint venture sales firm to sell Kaiser's forged 
products in Japan.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 1 Jun 94 p 11) 

   Economic Trends - Economic Council To Take Up Foreign Trade 
Policy Issues -- The Economic Council, an advisory organ to the 
prime minister which has previously focused on domestic economic 
issues, for the first time in July will begin discussions on foreign 
trade policy issues concerning the United States and Europe. 
According to the Economic Planning Agency, which serves as the 
council's secretariat, the council will study the process of U.S. 
antidumping actions because of the many trade issues associated with 
such actions.  In addition, the council will examine the tendency of 
the United States to file antidumping charges "without much thought" 
and will pinpoint problems related to antidumping determinations 
made by the U.S. Government.  It will then make recommendations to 
the Japanese Government on how to approach the U.S. Government with 
requests to change its system and practices.  The council will also 
critically examine European issues related to tariffs and the low 
labor costs of the poorer countries in Europe.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI 
SHIMBUN 29 May 94 p 3) 

   Japan's Overseas Direct Investment Up 5.5 Percent in FY93 -- On 3 
June the Ministry of Finance (MOF) announced that Japan's overseas 
direct investment in FY93 amounted to approximately $36 billion, a 
5.5 percent increase from FY92, according to the 4 June NIHON KEIZAI 
SHIMBUN (NIKKEI).  This was the first increase in investment since 
FY89, when Japan recorded its highest level of investment, $67.5 
billion.  The MOF attributed the increase to the trend of Japanese 
manufacturers shifting production bases to Asia because of the 
appreciation of the yen.  The MOF's International Finance Bureau 
expects this tendency to continue in the future, because production 
costs in Japan are expected to continue rising. 

   NIKKEI broke down Japan's overseas direct investment by region as 
follows: 

Asia--Total direct investment in Asia amounted to $6.6 billion, a 
3.3 percent increase.  Of that total, investment in China and Hong 
Kong increased 58 percent and 68.4 percent, respectively.  Japanese 
manufacturers invested a total of $1.64 billion in China and Hong 
Kong, 2.2 times the amount invested in FY92.  Direct investment in 
Thailand and Indonesia decreased. 

North America--Investment in North America amounted to $15.3 
billion, a 4.9 percent increase.  By country, investment in the 
United States increased 6.6 percent to $14.7 billion, while 
investment in Canada decreased 25.4 percent to $562 million. 
According to the MOF, this slow growth tendency will probably 
continue, since Japanese companies are planning no additional large- 
scale investment in North America, even though the U.S. economy is 
recovering. 

Europe--Investment in Europe amounted to $7.9 billion, a 12.4 
percent increase.  This was primarily due to the large increase in 
investment by financial and insurance companies. 

   NIKKEI also gave an industry-by-industry breakdown of Japan's 
overseas direct investment.  Investment by the manufacturing 
industry increased 10.7 percent to $11.1 billion.  Within the 
manufacturing industry, while the food processing and electrical 
machinery industries greatly increased their overseas direct 
investment, the chemical and transportation machinery industries 
reduced theirs.  Investment by the nonmanufacturing industry 
amounted to $24.6 billion, a 3.8 percent increase.  Within the 
service sector, the financial and insurance industries increased 
their direct investment "by a large margin" in order to reorganize 
their overseas bases and support their foreign subsidiaries. 
Investment by other service industries, however, decreased by 45.7 
percent, due primarily to a lack of funds. 

   The NIKKEI article also reported that foreign direct investment 
in Japan decreased by 24.6 percent to $3.1 billion.  Reasons for the 
decrease include the relatively high investment costs associated 
with the yen's appreciation and Japan's slow economic recovery.  The 
KYODO NEWS SERVICE on 3 June reported that a large decrease--77.2 
percent--has been noted in foreign investment in the financial and 
insurance industries. 

   Financial Issues - FEATURE:  Banks Begin Netting Operations With 
Foreign Banks -- SUMMARY:  "Netting," the practice of offsetting 
credit and debit balances arising from foreign exchange 
transactions, is taking hold in Japan, according to press reports. 
Several Japanese banks have signed agreements with U.S. banks to 
engage in "bilateral netting," while "multilateral netting" with 
European banks may occur in the future. 

   In December 1993, the Federation of Bankers Associations of Japan 
requested that the Ministry of Finance (MOF) authorize netting, 
arguing that Japanese banks will be unable to compete 
internationally with banks that are allowed to net, according to the 
24 December NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN.  Netting can improve a bank's 
capital-to-asset ratio because assets can be reduced by offsetting 
them against liabilities while reducing the bank's credit risk, 
according to the 9 March NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI).  In this way 
netting makes satisfying Bank for International Settlements capital 
requirements easier.  In addition, a change in U.S. accounting law 
that requires banks to establish formal netting agreements with 
their netting counterparts led U.S. banks to ask the Japanese to 
enter into such agreements, according to the 28 December NIKKEI 
KINYU.  If Japanese banks do not sign up with American banks, the 8 
December NIKKEI KINYU explained, the U.S. banks would give priority 
to doing business with European banks, which are allowed to net. 
This would also contribute to a decline in the competitiveness of 
Japanese banks internationally and Japan's financial markets 
overall, the 24 December NIKKEI KINYU reported.  Thus, the MOF 
authorized Japanese banks to enter into netting agreements on a 
bilateral basis with U.S. banks, according to the 28 December NIKKEI 
KINYU.  The article did not say whether the MOF would authorize 
agreements with European banks as well. 

   Netting Agreements Signed with U.S. Banks -- The Bank of Tokyo 
was the first Japanese bank to sign a netting agreement with a U.S. 
bank when it signed an International Foreign Exchange Masters 
Agreement (IFEMA) with the Tokyo branch of Citibank, according to 
the 9 March NIKKEI KINYU.  This included a comprehensive agreement 
whereby the banks would offset all foreign exchange transactions in 
the event of a default by either party, according to the 9 March 
NIKIEI.  The banks also agreed to calculate the difference on 
foreign currency exchange transactions on a daily basis using the 
FXNET computer system (see below). 

   Mitsubishi Bank signed an IFEMA agreement with Chemical Bank on 
22 March, according to the 23 March NIKKEI KINYU.  The IFEMA with 
Chemical Bank allows it to offset purchases and sales of foreign 
currency on the Tokyo market in the event one of the counterparties 
to a transaction defaults.  The agreement has a broader scope than 
the arrangement between the Bank of Tokyo and Citibank, NIKKEI KlNYU 
observed, in that it applies to foreign exchange transactions at 
Mitsubishi's foreign branches as well. 

   At the end of March, the Industrial Bank of Japan also concluded 
an agreement with Citibank, according to the 14 April NIKKEI KINYU. 

   The 27 May NIKKEI KINYU reported that these three banks are also 
participating in FXNET in London.  FXNET, headquartered in London 
with an office in Japan, is a global computer network conducting 
foreign exchange netting operations that was established by major 
U.S. and European banks.  The article reported that the Bank of 
Tokyo is already engaging in foreign exchange netting with Citibank 
through FXNET in London, while Mitsubishi Bank and the Industrial 
Bank of Japan plan to participate as well.  FXNET has 50 
participating banks worldwide and offers banks-a chance to increase 
efficiency by reducing long-term costs by automating their foreign 
exchange operations, the article reported. 

   Europeans Approach Japanese Banks -- Recently Japanese banks have 
been approached by members of Exchange Clearing House Ltd. (ECHO) to 
participate in a system of "multilateral netting"--simultaneous 
netting conducted through a clearinghouse, rather than directly 
between two banks--that can involve more than two currencies, 
according to the 5 April NIKKEI KINYU.  ECHO, the world's first 
global clearinghouse for foreign exchange established by thirteen 
major European banks and the Hongkong and Shanghai Banking Corp., is 
scheduled to begin multilateral netting operations in July 1994. 
Participation in ECHO requires very little additional investment by 
banks, aside from a security deposit, because SWIFT (Society for 
Worldwide Interbank Financial Telecommunications), the inter-bank 
communication system ECHO employs, is already used globally. 

   Seeing a strong demand for yen in the multilateral netting 
system, ECHO members visited Japan and sounded out the Bank of Tokyo 
and other Japanese banks on whether they wished to participate in 
the clearinghouse system.  They even explained the SWIFT system to 
the MOF and Bank of Japan.  The NIKKEI KINYU article stated that the 
banks are taking a "wait and see" approach to ECHO for several 
reasons.  Multilateral netting is relatively complicated compared to 
bilateral netting and the banks have already started signing 
bilateral netting agreements with U.S. banks.  The article observed 
that European banks hold the lead in this type of netting and hence 
the ambivalent response by the Japanese.  Nevertheless, there will 
be a future need for a global netting system that includes Japanese 
banks. 

   According to the 7 May NIKKEI, Fuji Bank has decided to 
participate in ECHO.  Fuji will make a capital contribution to the 
netting clearinghouse in July 1994 and will begin multilateral 
netting transactions early in 1995.  According to the NIKKEI 
article, Fuji Bank will be the first Japanese bank to settle foreign 
exchange transactions with several foreign banks simultaneously. 

   Foreign Securities Firms To Underwrite Government-Backed Bonds -- 
The Finance Corporation for Local Public Enterprise (Finance Corp.), 
which is overseen by the Ministry of Finance and the Ministry of 
Home Affairs, is revising the share of underwriting allotted to 
financial institutions that underwrite public corporation bonds to 
include foreign securities companies, according to the 6 June NIKKEI 
KINYU SHIMBUN.  Public corporation bonds are a type of government- 
backed bond for which payment of interest and principal are 
guaranteed by the government and are second only to government bonds 
in terms of credit risk, according to the 12 May NIKKEI KINYU.  The 
Finance Corp. and the Japan Highway Public Corporation are the 
principal issuers of these bonds.  With the money it raises through 
issuing bonds, the Finance Corp. makes loans to local public 
authorities and corporations, according to the 6 June NIKKEI KINYU. 

   According to the 6 June NIKKEI KINYU, in order to promote the 
salability of the bonds, the Finance Corp. will focus on the sales 
strength of issuers when it revises the composition of its 
underwriters.  It is moving to decrease the share allotted to banks 
from the current 77 percent to 70 percent and increase the share 
allotted to securities firms from 23 to 30 percent.  Regional banks, 
which have been traditionally weak in selling these bonds, would 
lose their share to the major commercial and long-term credit banks, 
while certain securities firms, which have been prohibited from 
participating, will be allowed to enter the securities underwriting 
syndicates.  Foreign securities firms, along with newly established 
securities subsidiaries of banks, are to be included in the 
securities underwriting syndicates for the first time. 

   The Finance Corp. could institute the new share system as early 
as its July 1994 issue of the bonds, NIKKEI KINYU reported.  Because 
it is the largest issuer of government-backed bonds, the Finance 
Corp.'s steps to revise its underwriting system may influence other 
issuers to do the same. 
   Foreign Trade and Investment - CENTRAL ASIAN REPUBLICS:  Central 
Asian Economic Committees Launched -- The joint economic committees 
recently established in Japan to promote trade and investment in the 
Central Asian republics of Kazakhstan, Uzbekistan, Kyrgyzstan, and 
Turkmenistan, will hold their first meetings in the latter half of 
1994, according to the 14 April NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN.  The 
committees were formed in December 1993 as the result of a 
"government-private sector joint economic mission" sponsored by the 
Ministry of International Trade and Industry (MITI) to the four 
republics.  According to the 18 March NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN, the 
four committees, formed by Japan's general trading companies, steel 
manufacturers, and mining companies, are under the auspices of the 
"Japan Association for Trade with Russia and Central-Eastern Europe" 
which is a MITI-designated industry association.  The goal of the 
committees is to strengthen economic ties between Japan and the 
resource-rich republics, which will receive official development 
assistance from the Japanese Government. 

   The biggest of the four committees is the Japan-Kazakhstan Joint 
Economic Committee chaired by Shinroku Morohashi, chairman of 
Mitsubishi Corp., who headed the government-private sector mission 
to Central Asia.  It has 32 corporate members.  The Japan-Uzbekistan 
Joint Economic Committee, which has 17 members, is chaired by 
Naohiko Kumagai, president of Mitsui and Co.  The Japan-Kyrgyzstan 
Joint Economic Committee has 14 members and is chaired by Tomiichi 
Akiyama, president of Sumitomo Corp.  The Japan-Turkmenistan Joint 
Economic Committee is chaired by Minoru Murofushi, president of 
Itochu Corp., and has 13 members, according to the 18 March NIKKEI 
SANGYO. 

   The first meeting of the Japan-Kazakhstan committee will be held 
on 9 and 10 June, according to the 14 April NIKKAN KOGYO.  In 
addition to 58 projects that have been proposed within the 
committee, it will discuss holding a Kazakhstani industrial trade 
fair and inviting Kazakhstani researchers to Japan to study 
technology.  Trade with Kazakhstan totalled $96 million in 1993, the 
highest among the Central Asian republics, according to the 18 March 
NIKKEI SANGYO.  The 17 May NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN reported that Uzbek 
President Islam Karimov met with leaders of the Japan-Uzbekistan 
committee during his recent visit to Japan to request cooperation in 
modernizing Uzbekistan's communications networks, establishing 
airport facilities, and developing its gold mining capabilities. 

   CHINA:  Omron To Set Up Cash Register Production Joint Venture -- 
Omron, Japan's leading manufacturer of control components, will 
establish a joint venture company in Beijing by August to produce 
electronic cash registers and point-of-sale terminals.  The joint 
venture company, Beijing Gaoteng Business Computer Systems Co. Ltd., 
will be capitalized at $5 million, with the Omron Group contributing 
25 percent, China Great Wall Computer Software and Systems Company 
45 percent, Beijing Sitong New Technologies Industry Co. Ltd.--an 
office equipment sales company--20 percent, and the Qingdao 
Television Factory 10 percent.  Beijing Gaoteng will begin full- 
scale operations in early 1995 with about 55 workers and will 
produce 1.1 billion yen ($10.5 million) worth of point-of-sale 
terminals annually.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 13 Jun 94 p 13) 

   Toray To Build Polyester Production Base in Jiangsu -- Toray 
Industries, Japan's largest manufacturer of synthetic fibers, will 
invest 50 billion yen ($476 million) to build an integrated 
polyester production base in China by the end of 1998.  The base, to 
be located on a 1 million-square-meter site in Nantong City, Jiangsu 
Province will be developed in two phases.  In the first phase a mill 
will be built by mid-1996 to weave and dye polyester long fibers and 
polyester short fiber-cotton blends.  The polyester will be supplied 
by Toray's plants in Thailand, Indonesia, and Malaysia.  In the 
second phase the Nantong mill will produce its own polyester fibers 
and raw cotton. 

   Toray's goal is for annual sales of about 100 billion yen ($952 
million).  When the mill reaches full operation, it will produce 
about as much product as all of Toray's operations in Southeast Asia 
combined.  All production will be sold in China or exported to 
Europe and America; none will be exported to Japan.  (Tokyo ASAHI 
SHIMBUN 3 Jun 94 p 12) 

   Taoka Chemical Forms Synthetic Dye Joint Venture in Tianjin -- 
Taoka Chemical Company, an organic chemical manufacturer affiliated 
with the Sumitomo Group, has established a joint venture company in 
Tianjin to manufacture synthetic dyes.  The new joint venture 
company, Taoka Chemical Tianjin Co. Ltd., is capitalized at 
$900,000, with Taoka contributing 31 percent, Tianjin City Dye 
Chemicals 50 percent, and Sumitomo Corp., 19 percent.  Taoka expects 
the joint venture company to produce about $1.1 million worth of 
dyes in its first fiscal year, which will be exported to Europe and 
the United States.  Taoka had been contracting the production of 
synthetic dyes to Tianjin City Dye Chemicals' No. 5 Factory, but 
decided to form a joint venture company to meet increasing demand. 
(Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 2 Jun 94 p 14) 

   KDK To Establish Electrode Foil Production Operations in 
Guangdong -- KDK, one of only two companies in Japan specializing in 
the manufacture of aluminum electrode foil for capacitors, will 
invest about 500 million yen ($4.8 million) to establish a plant in 
Dongguan, Guangdong Province, to manufacture electrode foil and a 
joint venture company in Hong Kong to own and operate it.  KDK will 
build the plant on a 32,500-square-meter industrial site in Dongguan 
City and equip it with six low-pressure forming machines and a 
sealing rubber production facility.  The plant, Dongguan KDK 
Aluminum Foil Manufacturing Co. Ltd., is scheduled to begin 
operations this fall and will have a monthly production capacity of 
200 million units. 

   KDK will also set up a joint venture company, Hong Kong KDK, 
together with Faston, a Hong Kong firm, to own and operate Dongguan 
KDK.  Hong Kong KDK will be capitalized at HK$8 million ($1 
million), with KDK contributing 49 percent and Faston the remainder. 
(Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 1 Jun 94 p 13) 

   VIETNAM:  Itochu-Isuzu Joint Venture To Assemble Small Trucks -- 
Itochu Corp., one of Japan's "big five" general trading companies, 
and Isuzu Motors, a major manufacturer of trucks and commercial 
vehicles, have decided to form a joint venture company with 
Vietnamese partners to assemble small trucks in Ho Chi Minh City. 
The local partners are "Vietnamese peoples committees and 
individuals"--which presumably includes the Ho Chi Minh City 
Government.  Negotiations with the Vietnamese partners are at the 
final stage and a formal joint venture agreement should be concluded 
by yearend.  This will be the first light truck assembly project in 
Vietnam by a Japanese automaker.  The project a1so marks Itochu's 
first joint venture in Vietnam. 

   The scope of the joint venture and its capitalization have not 
been finalized, but capital investment is expected to be around $20 
million, with Itochu and Isuzu contributing 70 percent.  Plans are 
to begin the construction of a Ho Chi Minh City assembly plant in 
early 1995 for completion by the summer of 1996.  Production will 
begin at a rate of 2,000-3,000 light trucks per year.  In the future 
output will be expanded to three types of vehicles at a level of 
5,000 units annually. 

   Itochu is also planning a joint venture involving passenger car 
production in Vietnam.  In addition, it is eyeing "significant" 
joint ventures in other sectors of Vietnam's economy "at a pace of 
four to five each year," so that after 4-5 years it will have 20-30 
joint ventures operating there.  (Tokyo NIKRAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 27 May 
94 p 1) 

   Construction Companies Open Offices in Hanoi -- Nishimatsu 
Construction, a general contracting company that specializes in 
large civil engineering projects, will open an office in Hanoi in 
mid-May, according to the 19 May NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN.  Nishimatsu 
plans to compete for construction contracts in northern Vietnam 
where the infrastructure is less developed than in the south.  It 
will seek contracts from Japanese companies that are building 
factories in Vietnam and will compete for infrastructural projects 
funded by Japanese official development assistance (ODA), such as 
water and sewer projects and road construction. 

   Nishimatsu will staff its Hanoi office with two Japanese 
executives and four Vietnamese employees.  The number of local 
employees will rise as Nishimatsu wins contracts.  Working closely 
with Japanese trading companies, the office will gather information 
on various construction projects being planned in Vietnam. 

   NIKKEI SANGYO observed that Japan's largest general construction 
companies, such as Obayashi and Kajima, have already established 
offices in Vietnam. 

   Kumagai Gumi, a large general construction company, also has 
opened an office in Hanoi, according to the 24 May NIKKEI SANGYO. 
The company plans to compete for contracts to build infrastructural 
projects, particularly in northern Vietnam.  Its office will be 
staffed initially by one Japanese officer and two Vietnamese 
employees.  The company aims to win contracts worth 2 to 5 billion 
yen ($19-48 million) within three to five years, centering on 
projects financed by Japanese ODA funds. 

   Kumagai will develop its Vietnam office as a "core site" in 
strengthening its Southeast Asian operations.  The company is 
examining the establishment of joint ventures in the future to 
secure construction materials and manpower.  For FY94 the company 
hopes to have contracts in Southeast Asia worth 30 billion yen ($286 
million).  It plans to increase the growth in contract amounts in 
Southeast Asia from the current level of 5 percent of its worldwide 
business to 7 percent. 

   Glass Industry - MITI Denies Report of Tariff Cuts, Prepares for 
Glass Talks -- The Ministry of International Trade and Industry 
(MITI) has made plans to unilaterally abolish tariffs on imported 
sheet glass and will make an offer to this effect at working-level 
talks with the United States in June, according to the 31 May 
evening edition of the NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI).  Japan's 
highest tariff on sheet glass, 6.3 percent, is lower than the U.S. 
maximum rate of 8.8 percent, but according to NIKKEI, MITI's offer 
to abolish the tariffs is designed to gain U.S. "understanding" of 
MITI's position on other measures to ensure market access. 

   However, a 31 May KYODO News Agency report in English said that 
an unidentified "senior" MITI official denied the NIKKEI story.  The 
official stated that the report is "totally groundless" and "MITI 
has not heard anything about the reported plan." 

   The United States is seeking "objective criteria" for measuring 
the extent of glass imports into the Japanese market, but according 
to NIKKEI, Japan and the United States will "inevitably" differ over 
the definition of these criteria.  MITI is willing to conduct a 
survey of wholesalers that are actually trading in imported sheet 
glass, but NIKKEI stated that the ministry will not agree to U.S. 
demands for setting a "future number" of imported glass distributors 
as part of the criteria. 

   The NIKKEI article also reported that MITI will refuse a U.S. 
demand that private firms prepare import purchase plans.  According 
to MITI, it would be "too difficult" to make such plans because 
"most" glass distributors and traders are small and medium-sized 
firms.  Instead, MITI will ask consumers of sheet glass, such as 
construction companies and sash makers, to compile procurement 
"guidelines" that clearly state that they are not bound to trade 
only within their keiretsu or corporate affiliates.  MITI is also 
considering dispatching a joint public and private group to survey 
procurement opportunities in the United States. 

   According to NIKKEI, MITI hopes to reach an agreement with the 
United States before Super 301 trade provisions come into effect in 
September.  However, depending on how the United States evaluates 
the Japanese position, the negotiations could be "protracted." 

   Asahi Glass To Raise Price of Sheet Glass Despite Weak Demand -- 
Asahi Glass Co., Japan's largest integrated glass manufacturer and a 
member of the Mitsubishi Group, announced that it will raise the 
price of commercial sheet glass by 7 to 8 percent in July to boost 
sagging profits, the 27 May NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI) reported. 
According to the firm's financial statements, Asahi's sales fell 
nearly 5 percent in FY93 while its unconsolidated operating profits 
over two years fell more than 68 percent from a FY91 high of 47.768 
billion yen ($455 million) to 15.271 billion yen ($145 million) in 
FY93.  NIKKEI stated that Asahi is raising its prices for the first 
time in more than three years because the firm is "increasingly 
burdened" by fixed costs and is finding it "difficult" to maintain 
profitability. 

   Asahi believes the higher prices will hold because earlier this 
year it discontinued the practice of "after-the-fact price 
adjustment," in which it discounted the market price after delivery 
to distributors.  Now, without discounts or rebates from Asahi, 
distributors and glass traders are responsible for the final market 
price.  According to NIKKEI, this will gradually eliminate the 
heretofore "extremely" low market prices.  Asahi will also begin 
setting its prices monthly, instead of quarterly, to better resp9nd 
to market changes. 

   Asahi also believes its competitive position has improved vis-a- 
vis companies dealing in imported glass.  According to NIKKEI, these 
firms are having difficulty making a profit, despite the advantage 
of the high yen.  Japan imported about $101.31 million worth of 
sheet glass in FY93, which totaled 7.7 percent of the domestic 
market, the 31 May NIKKEI reported.  Over half that amount, however, 
was imported from Japanese production bases overseas. 

   Nevertheless, it is not certain whether Asahi's price increases 
will hold, NIKKEI said, since the economic environment is not 
conducive to price increases.  Demand for commercial sheet glass is 
weak due to the recession in the construction industry, which shows 
little sign of ending.  According to the 28 April NIKKEI, sheet 
glass shipments fell 7 percent in FY93, due to a collapse in orders 
for nonresidential construction.  Furthermore, general contractors 
and other glass consumers are taking a harder line on reducing costs 
and continue to demand price reductions, the 27 May NIKKEI noted. 
Consequently, the price of standard sheet glass at specialty 
wholesale stores in Tokyo has fallen over 15 percent the past year. 
If Asahi's price increases do hold, NIKKEI said, other glassmakers 
will likely raise their prices as well. 

   Nonferrous Metals - Showa Denko To Withdraw From Titanium 
Refining, Sales -- Showa Denko, Japan's fourth largest chemical 
manufacturer, will stop selling titanium sponge, and its titanium 
refining subsidiary, Showa Titanium, will stop refining titanium 
this year because of decreasing demand from the aircraft and defense 
industries, according to the 25 May NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN.  Showa 
Denko, which began titanium sponge sales in 1982 and recorded annual 
sales of several billion yen, is expected to incur more than 4 
billion yen ($38 million) in extraordinary losses related to this 
move.  Showa Titanium, which has a refinery capable of handling 
3,300 tons of titanium annually, will continue manufacturing ceramic 
products and products made of other alloys. 

   The 25 May ASAHI SHIMBUN observed that after Showa Denko ends its 
titanium operations, only two Japanese companies will remain in the 
titanium refining industry--Toho Titanium and Sumitomo Sitix, 
formerly Osaka Titanium. 

   CHINA:  Domestic Developments - Survey Shows Shareholding 
Effective in Reforming Enterprise -- In early 1994, several research 
offices subordinate to the State Council, the Economic and Trade 
Commission, the Enterprise Management Association, the State 
Planning Commission, and the Stock Issuing Supervisory Commission 
conducted a joint survey to investigate results of shareholding 
implementation.  Researchers sent out 1,000 sets of questionnaires 
to respondents in 371 shareholding enterprises nationwide to elicit 
facts and opinions. 

   The survey results are: 

1. Public ownership is the mainstay as indicated by the following 
figures: 


     Shares owned by the state                        33.8% 
     Shares owned by legal entities                   45.2% 
     Shares owned by individuals                      19.4% 
     Foreign ownership                                 1.6% 

2. Opinion on changes of operational mechanism after enterprises 
were transformed into shareholding system: 

     Enterprise made fundamental changes              24.7% 
     Enterprise made major changes                    53.7% 
     Enterprise made no changes                        2.0% 

3. Comparison of enterprise yearly performance and workers benefits 
before and after shareholding: 

     Labor Productivity                                 +57.3% 
     Profits and tax earned by average worker           +85.2% 
     Profits/sales ratio                                +49.2% 
     Profits/capital ratio                              +39.3% 
     Average worker's salary                            +44.0% 



4.  Priorities:  Respondents regard transforming government 
functions, reforming enterprise property rights, and improving the 
market system as the three top priorities in enterprise reform. 

5.  Problem:  Government supervisory units and other state units 
that enterprises must depend upon for the completion of tasks cause 
the most trouble.  Although 75.9 percent of shareholding enterprises 
are now subordinate to various government organs or rely on other 
state units for completion of tasks, only 22.5 percent of the 
respondents consider such subordination necessary.  To conclude, the 
survey indicates transforming government functions is the thorniest 
task in enterprise reform. (Beijing JINGJI RIBAO 8 May 1994, p 1) 

   Article Examines Obstacles To Developing Machine-Building 
Industry -- The system of planned investment management does not 
meet the development needs of the machine-building industry.  At 
present, investment plans are directed only at the domestic market, 
investment is scattered, limited investment is not used where it it 
is needed most, and investment projects are not strongly 
competitive.  In addition, approval procedures for investment 
projects are tedious and may take one to two years. 

   An irrational economic managment system creates duplication in 
construction projects, which causes an imbalance in trade and 
enterprise distribution and low economic efficiency in China's 
machine-building industry.  For a long time, a divided departmental 
and regional management system has caused the domestic market to be 
segmented and irrational protectionism has become more severe every 
day.  Enterprises cannot compete fairly and superior products cannot 
be developed.  The practice of separate budgetary plans for the 
central and local authorities encourages local governments to focus 
on increasing financial resources.  Thus, local governments invest 
in projects that will immediately earn money.  Little attention, for 
example, is given to the need to provide spare parts because this 
kind of enterprise does not immediately generate profits. At 
present, the level of specialization in spare parts in the machine- 
building industry is only one third or less of the level in 
industrially-developed countries. 

   Enterprise equipment is poor, the ability of enterprises to 
develop on their own initiative is weak, the replacment of old 
products with new ones is slow, and labor productivity is low.  Of 
current equipment in the machinery industry, less than 5 percent 
consists of numerically-controlled, precision, or highly efficient 
equipment.  Less than 2 percent of the enterprises have the ability 
to develop because the level of automation and use of new technology 
is low.  The time needed to develop new products is three times that 
of industrially-developed countries.  In 1955 labor productivity in 
Japan's machine-building industry was 2.4 times that of China's, in 
1975 it was 8.6 times, and today it is 20 times higher. 

   The ability to produce high-grade products is insufficient to 
meet needs even though lower tech products are being overproduced. 
At present, China overproduces by 30-40 percent low-grade industrial 
boilers, small machines, machine tools, etc.  The production of new 
technical products does not meet the needs of China's domestic 
industries, thus leading to a trade deficit of over $10 billion. 
With the expansion of the world economy and trade, competition among 
countries and regions has intensified and this will increase the 
difficulty in exporting China's machine-building products.  The 
machine-building industry cannot ignore the impact of increased 
imports due to reduced trade barriers after China rejoins the GATT. 
Although China is beginning to develop new technical products, they 
are no match for the more technically advanced, higher quality, and 
large-scale production of imports.  Prices and production costs for 
domestic products are much higher than those for the same products 
on the international market. 

   Continued reform and opening up will accelerate development of 
the machine-building industry.  First, reform of the investment 
system will give enterprises more decisionmaking authority over 
investment and improve the use of funds.  Establishment of an 
import-export bank will help to expand machine-building exports. 
Establishment of a development bank will help adjust industrial 
distribution and promote a rational product mix.   Second, reform of 
the tax system will increase the tax burden on machine-building 
enterprises, but elimination of separate budgets for central and 
local authorities will promote the role of markets and support the 
production of superior products and eliminate inferior ones.  Third, 
reform of the foreign trade system, especially changes in the 
renminbi foreign exchange rates will help expand machine-building 
exports.  At the same time, the cost of enterprise imports will 
rise, which will lead enterprises to increase investment in science 
and technology, accelerate domestic output, and thereby reduce the 
trade deficit for machine-building products. (Beijing JIDIAN RIBAO 
25 May 94 p 2) 

   Bleak Outlook for Textile Exports in 1994 -- At present China's 
textile exports are facing difficulties and the outlook is bleak. 
Cotton output has declined in the United States, China, and 
Pakistan, and textile prices have increased on the international 
market.  In China, a decrease in cotton output has led to a severe 
shortage of raw material.  Even while procurement prices have 
increased, price swings have become pronounced and export 
enterprises are extremely reluctant to take orders from foreign 
businessmen due to the uncertainties.  As a result, both the foreign 
exchange earnings and quantity of textile exports have declined. 

   According to one company, because of the sharp rise in domestic 
raw material prices, unstable markets, and constant changes in 
prices, export enterprises cannot offer to fix prices in advance for 
foreign businessmen and do not dare to take orders.  Most contracts 
being fulfilled now are old ones.  The company also reported that 
foreign busineesmen have said that if China does not supply the 
material, it will go to the Pakistan and India markets.  (Shenyang 
LIAONING JINGJI RIBAO 12 May 94 p 3) 

   Pudong Plans 100,000-Ton Shipyard -- Pudong plans to build a 
100,000-ton shipyard in Waigaoqiao, for which the basic engineering 
work has been completed.  The shipyard will be located at the 
Nangang He section at the mouth of Chang Jiang, 12 km from the mouth 
of Wusong and 3 km from Gaoqiao town.  It will cover an area of 
200,000 square meters.  With modern shipbuilding and repairing 
facilities, the shipyard will be able to repair ships for domestic 
and foreign clients.  (Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE 0622 0559 GMT 
3 Jun 94) 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - Singapore Investing in 
International Facilities for Yantai City -- The Yantai City People's 
Government and Tangcheng Holdings Company Limited of Singapore 
signed an agreement on 14 May to jointly build the Yantai-Singapore 
international facilities in Yantai. This international city will be 
located in the eastern part of Yantai City proper, covering 658,888 
square meters.  The main buildings include an international meeting 
center and other facilities.  Total investment is $200 million. 
(Jinan DAZHONG RIBAO 15 May 94 p 1) 

   First Yen-Denominated Floating Rate Notes Issued -- The People's 
Construction Bank of China (PCBC) has unveiled the first yen- 
denominated, Chinese Euro/Dragon, floating-rate note issue.  The 
seven-year notes are worth 15 billion yen and carry an interest 
spread of 0.45 points over the six-month yen Libor.  The use of 
Japanese yen is favorable for the PCBC because cheaper funds can be 
obtained once the notes are swapped for other principal foreign 
currencies, such as the U.S. dollar.  Sales are restricted to 
investors based in Hong Kong, Japan, Singapore, Britain, and the 
United States.  (Hong Kong HONG KONG STANDARD (FINANCIAL REVIEW) 2 
Jun 94 p 5) 

   Thai Group to Build Industrial Park in Henan's Luohe -- The Thai 
Cathay Group plans to cooperate with Henan's Luohe in building a 
"Thai city" and a "Thai industrial park."  The two projects, which 
will be located along the Beijing-Shenzhen 107 highway in an area of 
9 square km, will involve a total investment of $5 billion.  The 
"Thai city" will include finance and trade companies, offices, 
management firms, purchasing centers, conference halls, and 
exhibition centers, as well as commercial buildings, miniatures of 
world scenic spots, amusement parks, a racecourse, tourism 
facilities, a 28-story international information center, schools, 
and hospitals.  The "Thai industrial park" will include 500 foreign- 
funded enterprises.  It will include high-tech, food processing, 
textile and light industries, pollution-free  chemical, 
pharmaceutical, metallurgical, and farm produce processing zones. 
(Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO 25 May 94 p 21) 

   Guangdong Trade Delegates Hold Trade Talks in Paris -- A 
Guangdong provincial trade delegation, headed by Yu Fei, vice 
chairman of the Standing Committee of the Guangdong Provincial 
People's Congress, met in Paris with about 100 representatives of 
French trade, entrepreneurial, and financial circles on June 1. 
Investments totaling $900 million were sought for transport, energy, 
and infrastructure projects, including ten railway lines with a 
total length of 2,000 km, 23 express highways, eight large coal- 
fired power plants, and the province's second nuclear power plant. 
The 170-member delegation also staged a week-long commodities trade 
expo in Paris.  Products from more than 80 companies were displayed. 
(Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 1207 GMT 2 Jun 94) 

   Fujian Signs Contracts for Nine Foreign Projects -- A Fujian 
trade delegation signed contracts for nine foreign-invested projects 
in Hong Kong yesterday, involving a total investment of $670 million 
and use of $580 million of foreign capital.  The projects include 
the Fuzhou International Shipping Center, Fuqing Pacific Building 
Materials, Fuqing Yongsheng Real Estate, and Xiamen Xiangyu Bonded 
Zone reclamation.  Fujian hopes foreign investors will invest in 
power plants, highways, port construction, and the transformation of 
state enterprises.  (Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO 25 May 94 p 17) 

   Quanzhou, Fujian Attracts $1 Billion of Foreign Investment -- In 
five days of trade talks held in Hong Kong, Zeng Huabin, vice mayor 
of Quanzhou, said that the city signed contracts for 450 projects, 
involving a total investment of $1 billion.  The projects, which 
focus on infrastructure and construction of industrial development 
zones, include:  the Macao Baoshing Group agreement with the Shishi 
Xinfa Shareholding Company to build a 10,000-ton port, involving a 
total investment of $20.69 million, with the term of cooperation 
lasting 50 years; the Hong Kong Nanfang International Trading 
Company agreement with the Quanzhou Shunde Huashui Hydropower 
Development Project, involving a total investment of 220 million 
yuan, with Nanfang International holding 70 percent of the stakes; 
and the Hong Kong Zhenhua Investment Company's contract with the 
Quanzhou Jinjiang Power Company to build the Jinjiang Diesel Power 
Plant, involving an investment of $12 million, including $9.6 
million invested by Zhenhua Investment.  (Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN 
SHE 1222 GMT 28 May 94) 

   Fujian's Sanduao Attracts Foreign Investment -- There are more 
than 70 foreign-funded enterprises in Sanduao, Fujian, involving a 
total investment of 1 billion yuan.  Planning for the $5.5 billion 
petrochemical plant has been completed.  The project has been 
approved by the Fujian Government and submitted to the State Council 
for examination.  To meet the needs of the project, the city plans 
to build a 300,000-ton crude oil berth, two 50,000-ton berths for 
oil products, a 10,000-ton berth for bulk cargo, a 10,000-ton 
container berth, a 200,000-ton water plant, and a 400,000-kw thermal 
power plant.  To accelerate the development of Sanduao, a 
development zone has been set up in Chengao.  The Shanghai-Guangzhou 
optical fiber line, which runs through Sanduao, has gone into 
operation, the surveying and planning for the Fuzhou-Sanduoa railway 
has been completed, and construction of a 20-km highway has started. 
The city also plans to establish 2,000 programmed telephone lines. 
(Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE 1031 GMT 31 May 94) 

   Shantou Cooperates With Singapore in Building Rolling Mill -- 
Shantou's Hongxing International Corporation signed a contract with 
Singapore's Donggang Steel Company Limited to jointly invest $20 
million to build a steel rolling mill in Shantou.  The mill, to be 
located in the Longhu district, will use new South Korean and 
Taiwanese technology.  The main products include various types of 
special-shaped hollow and solid steel.  The mill will turn out 
100,000 tons by the end of 1995 and 250,000 tons in 1996, with 
annual output value of 1 billion yuan.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 
1404 GMT 25 May 94) 

   Pudong Processing Zone Attracts High-Tech Multinational 
Corporations -- Multinational corporations from 18 countries have 
invested in the Jinqiao Export Processing Zone in Pudong, mainly in 
high-technology industries, including computers, telecommunications, 
lasers, and biological technology.  Nearly a third of some 200 
projects registered are now in production.  For example, Bell of 
Belgium and Siemens of Germany have set up a joint venture which 
should boost the city's telecommunications industry.  (Beijing CHINA 
DAILY (BUSINESS WEEKLY) 5-11 Jun 94 p 4) 

   Dalian Seeks 2 Billion Yuan for Dalian-Yantai Railway Ferry -- 
The central government attaches great importance to the building of 
the Bohai Bay transportation network.  Zhu Rongji and Zou Jiahua 
have given their consent to the plan.  The Dalian-Yantai railway 
ferry, an important link in the network, will require an investment 
of over 2 billion yuan.  As Liaoning and Shandong lack funds, they 
will try to attract capital through various channels.  A Dalian 
official said that foreign investment in the huge project is 
welcome.  (Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO 27 May 94 p 21) 

   Jiangxi Sets Up Investment Zone for Taiwan Businesses -- A state- 
level investment zone for Taiwan businesses was set up in Jiangxi's 
Gongqingcheng.  On 30 April, Wang Zhaoguo, director of the State 
Council's Taiwan Affairs Office, came to Gongqingcheng to inspect 
the investment zone.  Gongqingcheng is located in the middle of the 
Nanchang-Jiujiang industrial corridor and is endowed with a 
favorable natural, social, and economic environment.  As Taiwan 
investment in the mainland now extends into interior areas, the 
Gongqingcheng investment zone provides a very good opportunity that 
should not be missed.  (Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO 31 May 94 p 7) 

   Yunnan Seeks Foreign Partners To Build Kunming-Bangkok Railway -- 
To increase Yunnan's contacts with the outside world, a Yunnan 
official said that the province is determined to build a 
transnational railway from Kunming to Bangkok, which would run 
through Laos and Burma.  The Yunnan section of the railway will 
require an investment of at least $700 million.  The proposal has 
been submitted to the State Council and State Planning Commission 
for approval.  The province is accelerating efforts to prepare a 
feasibility study.  Thailand's prime minister led an industrial and 
commercial delegation to China earlier this year and spoke highly of 
the project.  (Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO 26 May 94 p 27) 

   Xinjiang Airlines To Open International Routes -- In June this 
year, Xinjiang Airlines will open three new international routes: 
Tianj in-Urumqi-New Siberia-Moscow, Urumqi-Islamabad, and Urumqi- 
Chongqing-Hong Kong.  Zhang Ruipu, general manager of Xinjiang 
Airlines, said these routes fit in with Xinjiang's strategy of 
linking its economy with the outside world.  (Beijing GUANGMING 
RIBAO 21 May 94 p 4) 

   Hong Kong's CITIC Real Estate Investment in Fuzhou -- CITIC Hong 
Kong and the Shenzhen Yueye Company have signed an agreement on a 
$137 million real estate joint venture in Yuefang and Quanzhou in 
Fuzhou.  This is one of 481 foreign investment projects entailing 
total investment of $3.5 billion obtained so far by delegations 
attending "China Trade and Investment '94," which was held recently 
in Hong Kong.  Other deals worth over $100 million are for the 
construction of the Fuzhou International Maritime Entrepot Center, 
an industrial project in Xiamen involving Singapore's Huiya 
Investment Group, and a glass factory joint venture involving Hong 
Kong's Pacific Group and Zhangzhou City.  Of the 481 deals, 324 
involved investors from Hong Kong and Taiwan. (Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO 
27 May 94 p 17) 

   Hong Kong Company Involved in Fujian Infrastructure Development 
-- According to Yu Shao-Ki, general manager of the construction firm 
Chung Fuk, the company is involved in a number of infrastructure 
projects on the mainland, including a hydroelectric plant joint 
venture with the Ministry of Water Resources and Fujian Province on 
the Muyangxi River involving a total investment of 2.1 billion yuan; 
and the 42-km Zhangzhou-Xiamen Highway, in cooperation with the Bank 
of China Group and China Merchants Steam Navigation with a total 
investment of 1.4 billion yuan. The firm's other projects are a 100 
million yuan investment in the Xiangzhi Port District in Guangdong's 
Quanzhou City, which consists of two multipurpose wharves with a 
total annual capacity 800,000 tons, roads, warehouses, and new 
towns, and a share in the construction of the 380 million yuan 
Suzhou-Shanghai airport expressway. (Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE 
1248 GMT 30 May 94) 

   Some 100,000 Hong Kong Firms Said Operating in Mainland China -- 
Dong Shuikui, deputy director of the State General Administration of 
Taxation, said that Hong Kong firms rank first in terms of total 
foreign investment in China.  Hong Kong accounts for more than 
100,000 of the approximately 170,000 foreign firms operating on the 
mainland.  (Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE 1031 GMT 31 May 94) 

   Hong Kong's Shougang Concord Acquires 51 Percent of Hebei Plate 
Mill -- Shougang Concord International is buying a 51 percent stake 
in the Qinhuangdao Shougang Plate Mill in Hebei province from its 
parent, Shougang Holdings, for 535.9 million yuan in cash and 
shares.  The Hebei mill began production in March last year and has 
an annual capacity of 350,000 tons of steel plates and 200,000 tons 
of coiled steel sheets.  Shougang Concord said it intends to expand 
the mill's capacity. (Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST (BUSINESS 
POST) 3 June 94 p 3) 

   Hong Kong Economic Interaction With Mainland Viewed -- Hong 
Kong's external trade grew 7 percent to HK$91.44 billion over the 
same period last year.  Economists did not blame the slowing 
mainland economy but instead said that Hong Kong could not be 
expected to sustain the rapid growth seen in recent years.  They 
also said slower growth was inevitable given the larger export base. 
Reexports grew 10 percent to 74.82 billion, while domestic exports 
fell 6.7 percent to $16.62 billion.   Hongkong Bank economist Jim 
Wong pointed to China's trade figures for April which showed that 
the mainland's imports grew by 25.3 percent while exports increased 
by 29.6 percent.  Wong said that the purported growth in China's 
foreign trade did not correspond with the slowdown in Hong Kong's 
reexports.  Wong said China's trade performance in April suggested 
the slowdown could be due to a downturn in other markets.  On an 
aggregate basis, in the first four months, exports grew 8.1 percent 
to HK$333.43 billion, reexports grew 12.5 percent to HK$272.07 
billion, and domestic exports fell 7.8 percent to $61.35 billion. 
(Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST (BUSINESS POST) 28 May 94 p 1) 

   Taiwan:  Restrictions on Fruit Imports Lifted, Tariffs Cut -- The 
Council of Agriculture of the Executive Yuan decided to abolish 
restrictions on importing apples and 15 other kinds of fruits from 
specific regions ahead of schedule.  It also decided to further 
reduce tariffs on farm produce to prevent the issue of open 
agricultural markets from adversely affecting Taiwan's effort to 
join GATT by the end of the year.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 23 May 
94 p 1) 

   Exports Up 1.5 Percent, Imports 2.2 Percent in Second Quarter -- 
Based on a survey on import and export intentions, the Directorate 
General of Budget, Accounting, and Statistics under the Executive 
Yuan noted that because of declining export competitiveness, the 
total value of exports for the second quarter of this year is 
estimated at $22.24 billion, only 1.5 percent higher than the same 
quarter last year.  Total value of imports is projected at  $20.34 
billion, up 2.2 percent.  Among the export goods, electronics and 
electric machinery have the biggest growth rate at 9.98 percent, 
followed by chemical and plastics at 5.32 percent, and vehicles at 
4.12 percent.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 25 May p 2) 

   Market Share of Imported Light Industry Products Exceeds 50 
Percent -- According to the Council for Economic Planning and 
Development, the share of the imported light industry products 
exceeded 50 percent for the first time last year.  The council said 
this indicated that domestically-made light industry products are 
not only losing out in international markets to those made by PRC 
and Southeast Asian companies, but also in the Taiwan domestic 
market.  In 1985, the share of imported light industry products was 
only 10.72 percent.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 29 May p 1) 

   Government To Increase Incentives for Selected Overseas 
Investments -- Foreign Minister Frederick Chien said on 30 May that 
to encourage  private firms to help the nation enhance its relations 
with foreign countries, the government has decided to expand the 
range of investment subsidies and relax loan requirements if 
companies invest in any of the 29 countries that have diplomatic 
relations with Taiwan.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 31 May p 1) 

   State Enterprises May Register Patent Rights in PRC -- The 
Mainland Affairs Council on 30 May decided to lift controls  on 
trademark and patent rights registrations in the PRC.  Except for 
inventions and innovative products that affect national security, 
state-owned institutions will be allowed to indirectly register 
their trademarks and patent rights in the PRC.  (Taipei CHING-CHI 
JIH-PAO 31 May p 1) 

   Economic Growth Expected To Fall Short of 1994 Target -- Because 
of sluggish exports, the Taiwan economy grew by an annual rate of 
5.46 percent during the first quarter of 1994, nearly half a 
percentage point lower than projected.  According to preliminary 
estimates, the economy will grow 5.94 percent for the whole of 1994 
and, for the third consecutive year, will fall short of the target 
set in the national development program.  The Directorate General of 
Budget, Accounting, and Statistics attributed the poor performance 
to a sharp decline in the merchandise trade surplus, which stands at 
$240 million, as well as lower income from interest on foreign 
exchange.  The merchandise and service trade accounts posted a 
combined deficit of $560 million.  The directorate general, however, 
predicted an export upturn in the second quarter, as the world 
economy shows increasingly clear signs of recovery.  It also 
forecast that this year's exports will top $89.6 billion, up 5.55 
percent over last year, while imports will reach $82.7 billion, up 
7.27 percent, to produce a trade surplus of $6.9 billion, or a 12 
percent decline.  The per capita GNP in 1994 will be $11,236 and the 
economy will grow 6.19 percent and 6.22 percent, respectively, in 
the first and second quarters of next year. (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH- 
PAO 21 May 94 p 1) 

   NORTH KOREA:  Government Official Discusses Plans To Boost 
Foreign Trade -- At the Seventh Session of the Ninth Supreme 
People's Assembly in April, Yi Song-tae, chairman of the State 
External Economic Affairs Commission, stated that the DPRK plans to 
put a priority on expanding export markets and maintaining its 
"credibility" in an effort to develop foreign trade.  Yi also 
discussed North Korea's strategies to diversify and increase the 
volume of export products, primarily clothing, metals, and processed 
goods. 

   According to Yi, the DPRK will concentrate on making Southeast 
Asia, the Middle East, and the Near East its principal markets.  It 
also plans to increase trade with capitalist countries, such as the 
European Union countries, and to actively pursue trade with the 
Central and South American countries.  Concurrently, the DPRK will 
continue to develop trade with China, the CIS, and Eastern European 
countries. 

   The DPRK, in particular, will focus on the clothing processing 
sector, Yi noted.  The government will establish clothing processing 
bases throughout the country, modernize the existing factories, and 
"massively" increase production by using its labor force more 
effectively, according to Yi.  In addition, the government plans to 
export more items that have "strategic meaning," such as nonferrous 
metals, iron and steel, cement, and magnesia clinker.  At the same 
time, it will set up additional secondary and tertiary processing 
bases and process raw materials either into semi-processed goods or 
finished products for export, Yi said. 

   Yi promised that the DPRK will enforce regulations on contract 
terms.  He added that the government will formulate stringent import 
rules requiring guaranteed collaterals to insure that payments will 
be made on schedule.  Overall, the government will strengthen trade 
regulations, unify prices and trade activities, and ensure that all 
companies strictly comply with regulations, Yi asserted.  (Pyongyang 
MINJU CHOSON 7 April 94 p 3) 

   SOUTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  Coal Companies, Conglomerates Eye Korea 
Gas Privatization -- SUMMARY:  The Korea Coal Association has 
established a consortium to participate in the planned privatization 
of Korea Gas, according to recent  Seoul press reports.  In 
addition, the association has adopted a recommendation requesting 
the government's "cooperation" in allowing coal firms to acquire 
Korea Gas.  Meanwhile, large ROK conglomerates are gearing up to 
compete for the company.  Several sources noted that the coal 
industry will have little chance of success if it has to compete 
with the conglomerates. 

   According to the 19 April TONGA ILBO, the Korea Coal Association 
has established a consortium that will participate in the 
privatization of Korea Gas.  The ROK Government will reportedly 
begin drawing up plans for the privatization that will take place in 
May 1995.  The consortium is made up of 10 businesses:  Dongwon, 
Samtan, Kyongdong, Hanbo Energy, Kangwon Industries, Chonwon 
Industries, Samchully, Taesong Enterprises, Sampo Energy, and 
Wonjin.  Plans are for over 100 small and medium-sized coal 
companies to become involved in the consortium.  TONGA ILBO reported 
that currently the two largest investors in Korea Gas are the ROK 
Government (50 percent) and Korea Electric Power Company (34.7 
percent).  The 19 April HANGUI? KYONGJE SINMUN stated that other 
                             ? 
investors include Seoul City (7.6 percent), Kyonggi Province (1.9 
percent), Inchon City (1.2 percent), and other regional governmental 
bodies.  The paper noted that Korea Gas has paid-in capital of 177.4 
billion won ($221.75 million). 

   TONGA ILBO also said that conglomerates with coal or oil 
subsidiaries are interested in the privatization of Korea Gas. 
Currently Hyundai (Hyundai Oil Refinery), Lucky-Goldstar (Honam Oil 
Refinery), Sunkyong (Yukong), and Daerim Group are competing for the 
gas company.  The oil companies want to see firms with the 
technology and capital to develop the gas company acquire it and 
protect consumers."  Coal companies oppose the acquisition of the 
gas company by the conglomerates out of fear that the conglomerates 
will have an "energy monopoly" and further concentrate their 
economic power. 

   TONGA ILBO commented that the conglomerates and coal companies 
are "drooling over" the gas company because last year it earned over 
120 billion won ($150 million) in after-tax profits on sales of 
about 900 billion won ($1.125 billion).  In addition, demand for 
liquefied natural gas (LNG) is expected to increase rapidly in the 
future.  According to the 30 April HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN, business 
conglomerates began forming acquisition teams early on, after they 
realized how good the gas company's prospects were. 

   According to the 19 April HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN, the coal 
companies' efforts toward acquiring Korea Gas are related to "self- 
preservation."  The daily noted that the rapid drop in the demand 
for coal has created a "ruinous crisis" for coal companies.  In the 
last five years, anthracite consumption has dropped 62.4 percent, 
while the use of city gas has grown 900 percent.  In 1986, there 
were 361 coal mines, and now there are about 40.  The coal industry 
emphasizes that it is "morally justified" in participating in the 
LNG business, because the drop in coal consumption is due to the 
growth in gas consumption. 
? 

   In addition, the coal industry maintains that the government is 
"responsible to a certain degree" for the crisis now facing the 
industry, HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN reported.  First, coal producers 
have been unable to sell coal for its actual value.  According to 
the paper, from 1951 through 1993, ROK coal companies produced 530 
million tons worth an estimated 114.4 trillion won ($143 billion) at 
today's prices.  However, because of the government's price 
stability policy for coal, the coal only sold for 38 trillion won 
,$47.5 billion).  According to the coal industry's analysis, it 
sacrificed " --for the sake of the national economy--two-thirds of 
the value of the coal it produced.  Secondly, the coal industry 
argues that the government's "coal industry law" has restricted coal 
companies from investing in other business sectors.  Even during the 
Fifth Republic, coal companies could not strengthen themselves 
through diversification or conversions and prepare for the decline 
of their industry.  The Korea Coal Association has adopted a 
recommendation stating that the government "must" cooperate and 
allow the coal companies to acquire Korea Gas.  The coal industry 
has no prospects of winning a competition with large conglomerates, 
HANGU1? KYONGJE SINMUN observed.  Thus, the industry has asked the 
     ? 
government to take these difficulties into account and to offer them 
a 'private contract" for the government's share of Korea Gas. 

   In the same vein, the 30 April HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN noted that 
it will be "truly difficult" for the coal association to acquire any 
of Korea Gas if it is privatized through general public sales.  The 
paper reported that some sectors of society are criticizing the 
government's shift from the original principle of promoting 
managerial efficiency through privatization to promoting the profit 
motive.  This shift has resulted in large enterprises competing to 
promote themselves.  Some people are calling on the government to 
reconsider the existing method of privatization.  According to 
HANGUI? KYONGJE SINMUN, the government must consider whether the 
     ? 
criticism being aired is reasonable and look into ways to encourage 
small and medium businesses (SMB's) to participate in the 
privatization process. 
? 

   According to the 23 April TONGA ILBO, the government is actively 
considering plans to have SMB's participate in the privatization of 
public enterprises.  A MOTIE official commented that SMB 
participation would be desirable in that it would prevent large 
enterprises from monopolizing the newly privatized public 
enterprises and further concentrating their economic power.  The 
paper reported that the government is considering targeting public 
enterprises in sectors where SMB participation is possible, such as 
public enterprises that have smaller economies of scale, are suited 
to small-scale production of a variety of products, and can utilize 
regional resources.  For its part, the Small and Medium Business 
Research Institute would like SMB's to be able to participate in the 
privatization of the Korea Highway Corporation, the Korea Telephone 
Directory Co., the Agriculture and Fishery Marketing Corporation, 
the Citizens National Bank, and the Korea Tobacco and Ginseng 
Corporation. 

   FEATURE:  'Non-Official' Groups Plan New Corporate State 
Relationship -- SUMMARY:  South Korea's Ministry of Trade, Industry, 
and Energy has formed two groups to develop "countermeasures" and 
proactive policies in advance of international agreements on 
environment, trade, and technology that the government believes will 
have an impact on business practices.  According to Seoul newspaper 
reports, these "non-official" organizations are staffed by ROK 
government officials and representatives of quasi-official 
institutions.  One report suggested that this "indirect" style of 
leadership may result in even more government involvement in support 
of private industry. 

   The ROK Government in close cooperation with industry and 
business organizations is preparing measures designed to reduce the 
impact on South Korea's economy of the Uruguay Round (UR) and 
similar international agreements that are expected to follow, 
according to recent Seoul press reports.  For example, on 19 April, 
the Ministry of Trade, Industry, and Energy (MOTIE) established a 
"Non-Official Committee for Developing Advanced Technology" headed 
by a Korea Institute of Science and Technology (KIST) professor in 
anticipation of the more stringent technology controls that advanced 
countries may place on technology as a result of the establishment 
of the World Trade Organization and the Technology Round, the 20 
April MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN said.  The committee reportedly "is to 
provide information which companies need to map long-term business 
strategies and increase the effectiveness of their investments." 
The newspaper noted that the "non-official" group's 28 members 
include officials from the Economic Planning Board, MOTIE, the 
Ministry of Science and Technology (MOST), "and other government 
agencies," as well as representatives from business, academia, 
research institutes, and economic organizations. 












?cI 

? 

   According to MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN, at its first meeting, the 
committee set up a "comprehensive strategy" to develop nine 
technology fields--microelectronics, semiconductors, mechatronics, 
automobiles, aircraft, fiber optics, new materials, biotechnology, 
and "life industries."  By the end of the year, the committee will 
have chosen particular technologies to be developed jointly by 
government and business between 1995 and 2006.  The newspaper stated 
that "as a result of the UR agreement, changes in the way the ROK 
Government supports business will be required, causing a shift in 
the government's role to an indirect style of support by function." 
The committee therefore "will also propose plans to strengthen 
government's leadership function vis-a-vis the private sector," 
including a "plan to reshape the government support structure in a 
more effective direction." 

   In a related move, the 22 April MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN reported 
that the government formed a "Green Round Industrial Countermeasures 
Group" within MOTIE--another "non-official coalition" whose purpose 
is to "study South Korea's status with respect to issues discussed 
by the World Trade Organization's committees on trade and the 
environment" and to devise countermeasures by the end of June. 
According to the newspaper, the group is headed by MOTIE's 
Industrial Policy Bureau chief, and has representatives from nine 
government-affiliated or quasi-independent organizations, including 
the Industrial Advancement Administration, the Federation of Korean 
Industries, the Korea Employers Federation, the Korea Chamber of 
Commerce and Industry, the Korea Traders Association, the Korea 
Trade Promotion Corporation, the Korea Institute for Economics and 
Trade, the Energy Economics Research Institute, and the 
Manufacturing Technology Research Institute. 

   This group reportedly will focus on four areas: trade-related 
measures, measures related to the environment, procedures for 
solving disputes, and removal of trade restrictions.  These areas 
were distilled from what MOTIE believes will be the six topics 
discussed in the early stages of the Green Round:  (1) trade 
measures, such as import and export restrictions, enacted for 
environmental purposes, (2) environmental measures and policies, (3) 
transparency in trade and environment-related measures, (4) 
procedures for solving disputes on environmental issues with the 
World Trade Organization and other parties, (5) market access and 
elimination of trade restrictions, and (6) exporting products that 
are banned domestically. 
? 

   The 19 April MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN suggested that this "non- 
official" group may act as an instrument of government industrial 
"leadership" and as a conduit that gives firms input to government 
policy.  The newspaper named three economic organizations, all 
members of the government's Industrial Countermeasures Group, as 
involved in "working out plans for joint action and studying 
strategies of operation" in anticipation of the commercial issues 
that will be brought up by the World Trade Organization. 

   For example, the Federation of Korean Industries reportedly will 
host a three-day seminar to acquaint "top planning, production, and 
marketing executives" with the links between trade and environment 
expected to come out of the Green Round.  Issues to be raised at the 
seminar include environmental regulations of advanced countries, new 
financial strategies, "green management" and "green" marketing and 
production, MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN reported.  The Korea Employers 
Federation, for its part, has set up a "Headquarters for 
Environmental Operations Measures, ' and will also inaugurate a 
"Blue 
Round Countermeasures Special Committee" composed of labor leaders 
from the 30 largest South Korean conglomerates.  The committee 
reportedly will work out joint steps to deal with international 
labor standards and practices, particularly those of the United 
States.  Finally, MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN reported that the Korea 
Traders Association will submit a list of policy recommendations to 
the government based on its own survey of the Green and Blue Rounds' 
likely effects. 

   FEATURE:  Hyundai Developing Rocket With Russian Technology -- 
SUMMARY:  Hyundai Group is downgrading the status of its venture 
with the Russian company Yakovlev and will concentrate its aerospace 
resources in a new subsidiary, Hyundai Technology Development 
Corporation, according to a Seoul newspaper.  Besides aircraft, the 
company will also develop a rocket large enough to orbit satellites. 

   According to the 9 May MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN, South Korea's 
Hyundai Group has decided that its joint venture with the Russian 
aerospace firm Yakovlev, formed last November, will make it 
"difficult" for Hyundai to invest "full-scale" in the aviation 
industry.  Hyundai, therefore, will use the joint venture firm for 
sales only, while its new subsidiary, the Hyundai Technology 
Development Corporation, will serve as the group's designated 
aircraft manufacturer.  The latter is slated to take charge of the 
production of all rotary and fixed-wing aircraft, including assembly 
production of helicopters through a technology agreement with 
Japan's Kawasaki Heavy Industries and Hyundai's own effort to build 
mid-size aircraft.  "In the long term," MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 
reported, the subsidiary will also be involved in aerospace 
development that will include the development of a "launch vehicle 
for earth satellites." 












jl 
? 

   MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN noted that Hyundai Technology Development 
was set up last February as a fully owned subsidiary of Hyundai 
Precision and Industry, with paid-up capital of 1.5 billion won 
($1.875 million).  The corporation reportedly has 180 employees, 120 
of whom are technical and research personnel.  A 27 April YONHAP 
dispatch added that Hyundai Technology Development Corp. owns 51 
percent of the joint venture Hyundai-Yak Aerospace Co. and Yakovlev 
the remainder. 

   According to the 5 November 1993 MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN, the 
original agreement required Yakovlev to supply technology for 
aircraft design, development, and manufacturing, while Hyundai built 
the plant, paid "development" costs, and managed the operation.  The 
5 November 1993 CHUNGANG ILBO reported that the South Korean 
Ministry of Trade, Industry, and Energy was willing to allow the 
venture despite the complications another mid-size aircraft entrant 
would add to a crowded domestic field (see Pacific Rim Economic 
Review Vol 2 No 24, 1 Dec 93 pp 29-30) and contrary to its own 
industrial specialization policy. 

   FEATURE:  Samsung Introduces Third-Generation Electric Car -- 
SUMMARY:  Samsung has built a new electric car prototype which 
offers improved performance and many of the comforts available in 
standard automobiles, according to South Korean press reports.  The 
vehicle uses conventional storage batteries with an advanced motor 
and other innovations.  Within the next few years, several ROK 
manufacturers reportedly will offer practical electric cars based on 
high-tech batteries that have more power, greater range, and reduced 
charging time. 

   Samsung Heavy Industries recently unveiled the third in its 
series of increasingly sophisticated electric cars--the SEV III- 
-built by the company since June 1993, the 17 May MAEIL KYONGJE 
SINMUN reported.  The newest version is a three-door hatchback with 
an aluminum frame and reinforced plastic body that uses regular 
storage batteries for a power source.  Its maximum output of 90 kw, 
equivalent to a 120 hp gasoline engine, was achieved by making 
major improvements" in the motor and controller, the newspaper 
stated. 

   The car uses a direct drive motor with no transmission, and is 
able to "absorb" the surplus energy created during braking.  Unlike 
most other electric vehicles, Samsung's car comes "fully loaded" 
with power steering and brakes, power windows, heater, and air 
conditioner.  The batteries are stored under the seats and in other 
unused areas to make space for a full complement of passengers. 
Performance and specifications were reported as follows. 
BOT 


           Top speed                     130 kph 
           Range                         180 km 
           Climbing ability              20 degrees 
           Capacity                      4 people 
           Gross Weight                  1,450 kg 
           Length                        3.95 meters 
           Width                         1.604 meters 
           Height                        1.385 meters 


EOT 

   By the end of the year, Samsung, "using its own technology," will 
have developed high-efficiency nickel-lead and "nickel-metal- 
hydrogen" batteries that will extend the car's range to 400 km, 
according to MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN.  A lithium battery-powered car is 
planned for the year 2000. 

   Samsung's electric car benefited from research which its 
subsidiary Samsung Electronics conducted as part of the government- 
backed HAN (Highly Advanced National) projects, according to the 1 
June CHUGAN MAEGYONG.  The ROK Government reportedly will spend 900 
billion won ($1.125 billion) to develop low-pollution vehicles, 
including electric cars, by 2001. 

   CHUGAN MAEGYONG stated that of all Korean manufacturers, Hyundai 
is the most advanced in electric cars.  The company has jointly 
developed with the U.S. firm Ovonics a high-tech nickel-metal- 
hydrogen battery-powered car with a top speed of 130 kph, a range of 
240 km, that can be recharged in three hours.  By 1996, Hyundai 
expects to produce an electric car that takes only 15 minutes to 
recharge, with a range of 350 km and a top speed of 160 kph. 

   CHUGAN MAEGYONG went on to report that Kia Motors exhibited 
electric vehicles at the Asian Games in 1986, at the Seoul Olympics 
in 1988, and again last year at the Taejon Expo.  Daewoo, another of 
South Korea's "big three" automakers, began developing an electric 
vehicle in February 1993 based on a van body and a 12 V 50 amp hr 
enclosed storage battery built by a German company, with a top speed 
of 141 kph and a range of 159 km.  The company plans to introduce a 
marketable car in 1997 developed jointly with Korea Delco Battery. 

   Iljin Advertisement Touts Group's Technological 'Achievements' -- 
The following is a translation of a full-page color advertisement 
that appeared on the back cover of the 11 May MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN, 
the ROK's leading business newspaper. 













33 
? 

   (A large illustration at the top of the page portrays the word 
"Iljin" in steel block letters breaking through a stone wall 
engraved with the abbreviations NAFTA, GR, UR, TR, and EC.) 

   Overcoming the world's barriers through technology. 

   Technological Iljin, technological Korea. 

   A company which every year boldly invests in R and D at more than 
three times the rate of larger companies. 

   A company more than 90 percent of whose 400-plus products were 
developed with our technology and our personnel alone, including 
products which we were the first in South Korea to indigenize 
through our own technology teams, such as PCB electrolytic copper 
plating and industrial composite diamonds, for which South Korea had 
been entirely dependent on foreign countries' advanced technology. 

   (bold) Indigenizing state-of-the-art industries is Iljin's 
unchanging goal. 

   Our company Iljin, which is getting the world's attention for its 
very technology. 

   As a result of our efforts at developing new technology in 
various fields, Iljin has recently been experiencing astonishing 
growth in the most advanced areas as well, such as new materials, 
state-of-the-art data communications, and mechatronics, and is 
moving on with determination to make the dream of a technological 
Korea come true. 
? 

   ROK Government To Subsidize Engineering Technology -- Between 
1995 and 2005, the ROK Government will invest 481 billion won ($601 
million) in six "strategic" areas to help the country establish an 
independent base in engineering technology.  The government also 
intends to establish engineering research centers.  The program, 
based on a Korea Advanced Institute of Science and Technology study 
titled "An Evaluation of the Level of Engineering Technology and a 
Plan To Strengthen Technological Competitiveness," will go into 
effect in the first half of 1995.  The six areas are: (1) core 
processes and construction engineering technology, (2) basic plant 
design technology, (3) advanced production design, (4) computer 
integrated design and technical information systems, (5) technology 
for computer integrated projects, and (6) technology for plant 
packaging.  The Ministry of Science and Technology has organized an 
"Engineering Industry Policy Council" to coordinate engineering 
technology development between different agencies of government with 
responsibilities in the above areas.  As the ROK's engineering 
technology grows, the government hopes to expand the country's share 
of related technology and services from 1.1 percent of the world 
market ($600 million) to 8 percent ($7 billion).  (Seoul MAEIL 
KYONGJE SINMUN 9 May 94 p 14) 

   Daewoo Producing High-Tech Carbon Material for Aerospace -- 
Daewoo Heavy Industries has begun mass producing a high heat- 
resistant carbon composite material which it developed in 
cooperation with the National Defense and Science Institute.  This 
state-of-the-art material, the technology for which is strictly 
controlled by existing producers in the United States, England, and 
France, has applications in such items as aircraft brakes and 
nozzles for rockets.  Daewoo invested 8 billion won ($10 million) in 
research and development on the project.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE 
SINMUN 27 April 94 p 8) 

   Brazing Furnace, Other 'Dual-Use' Products Indigenized -- A 
continuous brazing furnace, so advanced that it has still not seen 
widespread use internationally, was "indigenized" by the South 
Korean firm Jinwon Machinery with support from the Korea Electric 
Power Corporation (KEPCO).  The project was part of a program funded 
by KEPCO to indigenize "electrical equipment" through a consortium 
of 13 companies that include Jinwon, Han-il Level Co., Iljin 
Electric and Machinery, and four private research labs.  Other new 
high-tech products developed through the program are the ROK's first 
standard system for controlling gas flow and a super-high voltage 
circuit breaker.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 9 May 94 p 10) 

















3J- 
? 

   ROK To Increase LNG Carrier Fleet to 10 Vessels by 2006 -- Korea 
Gas estimates domestic demand for liquified natural gas (LNG) will 
reach 4.72 million tons in 1994, 7.4 million tons in 1996, 8.28 
million tons in 1998, 9.57 million tons in 2000, and 104 million 
tons in 2006.  As the demand for LNG grows, South Korea will invest 
in the construction of its own flag LNG carriers in order to 
decrease its dependence on foreign LNG carriers and cut down on 
foreign exchange expenditures.  Korea Gas plans to expand its number 
of ROK LNG carriers to three in 1995, four in 1996, five in 1998, 
six in 2000, and 10 by 2006.  In contrast, the company will reduce 
its use of foreign carriers from three to two in 1995. 

   On 12 April, Hyundai Merchant Marine Company contracted with 
Indonesia to transport 1 million tons of LNG annually.  In June, the 
company will begin using ROK-flagged LNG carriers to transport LNG 
to South Korea.  Beginning next year, Yukong Shipping and Hyundai 
Merchant Marine will begin transporting LNG from Malaysia.  In 1996, 
Hanjin will begin bringing in supplies from Indonesia.  Korea Gas is 
in the process of arranging LNG shipments from Qatar beginning in 
1998 and plans to order four LNG carriers by the end of this year or 
in the first half of 1995.  (Seoul HANGUI? KYONGJE SINMUN 24 Apr 94 
                                        ? 
p 
8) 

   Halla Group, U.S. Firm To Build LNG Base in South Cholla -- Halla 
Group is cooperating with the U.S. firm Enron on plans to build a 
liquefied natural gas (LNG) base and an adjacent 900,000-kw thermal 
power plant in Masan-ri, Haenam County, South Cholla Province.  The 
LNG base will cover an area of about 300,000 pyong and have a 
processing capacity of 2 million tons annually.  Between now and 
1999, Halla Group will build three LNG storage tanks (each with a 
capacity of 125,000 square meters) and a 70,000-DWT (dead weight 
ton) class berth.  The LNG base will cover an area of about 300,000 
pyong and have a processing capacity of 2 million tons annually.  Of 
this, 1 million tons will be supplied as fuel to the power plant, 
while the remaining 1 million tons will be supplied as city gas to 
the Honam region.  The adjacent thermal power plant will be equipped 
with four 150,000-kw gas turbines and will sell its electricity to 
the Korea Electric Power Company.  As soon as Halla and the U.S. 
firm conclude their construction plans, they will submit a letter of 
intent to South Cholla Province.  (Seoul HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN 23 
Apr 94 p 10) 
? 

   Patent Office To Promote Environmental Technologies -- The Office 
of Patent Administration is setting up patent assistance measures to 
promote the development of environmental technologies.  It will use 
its initial review system flexibly in order to handle reviews of 
environmental technology applications first, so that the 
technologies can be commercialized sooner.  The patent office plans 
to work with the Ministry of Trade, Industry, and Energy to set up a 
technology development fund and a commercialization fund for 
superior patents.  As the importance of environmental technologies 
has grown, the number of related patent and utility model 
applications for these technologies has increased--on average, by 
27.3 percent annually since 1988.  This compares to a 10-percent 
average annual increase in all patent and utility model applications 
during the same period. 


Patent/Utility Model Applications for Environmental Technologies 

                                                            Average 
Area              1988   1989   1990   1991   1992   1993  Annual 
                                                         Increase 

Water pollution   94     140    158    212    276    371   31.6 
Air pollution     109    123    158    146    216    286   21.3 
Waste management  13     31     52     86     94     154   64.0 
Noise/vibration   51     73     50     65     73      82   10.0 
Total             267    367    418    509    659    893   27.3 



(Seoul HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN 3 May 94 p 13) 
? 

   Patent Office To Set up New Offices Promoting Inventions, Patents 
-- Next January the Office of Patent Administration will set up the 
Invention Promotion Association, which will take over the 
responsibilities of the existing Korea Invention and Patent 
Association.  The new association will be a "special non-profit 
corporation" and have the lead in promoting new inventions.  The 
patent office also intends to set up three organizations subordinate 
to the new association.  The Patent Technology Commercialization 
Center (a "patent real estate office") will be set up next January 
to handle the transfer or sale of patent rights, royalty fees, etc. 
The Industrial Technology Information Center will be set up in 
January 1996 to handle and supply patent information.  That same 
month the  Intellectual Property Rights Research Institute will be 
set up to develop plans to respond to developed nations' 
"aggression" on the intellectual property rights front.  By 1997 the 
new Invention Promotion Association, its three subordinate 
organizations, and other related organizations--such as the Korea 
Patent Attorney Association--will be housed under one roof.  (Seoul 
MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 3 May 94 p 19) 

   Taerim Receives Order for Gas Processing Facilities From India -- 
Taerim Engineering has received an order from India's state-run ONGC 
Company to build natural gas processing facilities worth $72 million 
using the turnkey method.  This is reportedly an expansion project 
to build facilities to refine 20-41 million cubic meters of natural 
gas daily.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 3 Jun 94 p 10) 

   POSCO Takes Over Japanese Steel Materials Plant -- For the first 
time, an ROK steel company, Pohang Iron and Steel Corporation 
(POSCO), has been selected in an auction to take over a Japanese 
plant, the Wakamatsu Plant of Fukuoka Steel Materials Industry Co in 
Kyushu, which went bankrupt in March.  The takeover bid amounts to 
1.156 billion yen ($10.86 million).  The annual production capacity 
of the plant is 13,000 metric tons.  POSCO will complete payment by 
August and will then engage in steel materials processing.  (Seoul 
MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 28 May 94 p 8) 

   Hyundai Begins Pipeline Project in Vietnam -- Hyundai Heavy 
Industry Company has won a $55-million project to lay pipelines on 
the ground and in the sea in Vietnam.  Hyundai has begun laying a 
107 km-long pipeline between the natural gas exploratory platform in 
the White Tiger offshore oil field and will link this line with a 
17-km long ground pipeline to the Ba Ria combined thermoelectric 
power plant.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 28 May 94 p 8) 
?Development Bank Offers Loan to China To Build Thermal Power 

Plant -- The Korea Development Bank (KDB) announced on 27 May that 
it will offer a $9.5 million loan for the Chinese Government's 
construction of a thermoelectric power plant in Jiangsu Province as 
part of a total $470 million loan package to be offered to China. 
The other loan providers will be the International Bank for 
Reconstruction and Development (IBRD), the J.P. Morgan Bank of the 
United States, the Dresner Bank of Germany, and the Tokyo Bank of 
Japan.  One bank official stated:  "This is the first time a ROK 
financing institution will provide a loan for a project the central 
government of China is pushing ahead."  The term of the loan from 
KDB will be 15 years, including a five-year grace period.  Repayment 
of the principal after 10 years will be guaranteed by IBRD.  KDB 
will officially conclude a loan contract with the Chinese Government 
in Beijing on 29 May.  (Seoul TONGA ILBO 28 May 94 p 11) 

   Gold Star Electric Cable Exports Combines to China -- At the end 
of 1992, Gold Star Electric Cable Company's heavy industry 
department concluded a technology tranfer contract for the 
production of farm implements with Siping Combine-Harvesters Plant 
in Jilin Province, China.  Under the contract, Gold Star recently 
exported 50 units of combine-harvesters worth about $500,000 to the 
plant.  This was the first shipment of a total volume of products 
worth $30 million that will be exported to China.  In addition, Gold 
Star will be paid $650,000 for the technology transfer.  (Seoul 
MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 2 Jun 94 p 10) 

   Samsung To Participate in Russian Telecommunications Projects -- 
Samsung Electronics will participate in four major Russian 
telecommunications projects, including installation and management 
of a local telephone network in Moscow, construction of a long-range 
telecommunications network covering 50,000 km, modernization of a 
local network, and development of a satellite communications network 
in northern areas.  Samsung will have to invest at least $500 
million, which will make it the largest ROK investment in Russia. 
(Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 3 Jun 94 p 9) 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA - INDONESIA:  Coal Production Figures, Volume of 
Deposits Reported -- The president of the state-run coal company 
P.T. Bukit Asam recently stated that Indonesia has 36 billion tons 
in coal deposits, which would be sufficient to meet domestics needs 
for the next 300 years if consumption is controlled.  On the other 
hand, Indonesia is increasingly looking at coal as an export earner. 
Production has surged from 8.7 million tons in 1989 to 28 million 
tons currently.  Output is expected to reach 71 million tons in 
1999, of which 31.7 million will be earmarked for domestic use. 
(Jakarta KOMPAS 10 May 94 p 5) 
? 

   MALAYSIA:  Leader Universal Holdings Begins PRC Joint Venture -- 
Malaysia's Leader Universal Holdings, whose subsidiaries engage 
mainly in production of telecommunications, power, and household 
cables, recently hosted a ground-breaking ceremony for its joint 
venture plant with the PRC's Huanan Communications Co. in the 
Shantou Special Economic Zone.  Called Xunda Electric Cable Co., the 
joint firm will produce communications cables of various types with 
an initial investment of $30 million, supported by the latest U.S. 
and European equipment.  Production is scheduled to begin in early 
1995 with an annual output of 700,000 to 1 million kilometers of 
cable.  Leader, with factories in Malaysia's northwest, Singapore, 
and the Philippines, controls 70 percent of Xunda's stock through 
its Hong Kong-based company.  (Petaling Jaya SIN CHEW JIT POH 7 May 
94 p 3) 

   Bank Consortium To Fund $1.2-Billion Sarawak LNG Project -- An 
international consortium of 37 banks, including 11 Japanese banks, 
signed an agreement on 2 June in Kuala Lumpur to finance a $1.187- 
billion liquified natural gas (LNG) plant expansion project in 
Sarawak, according to the 2 June NIi?EI KINYU SHIMBUN.  The national 
                                   ? 
project, which is being undertaken as a joint venture between 
Petronas, Malaysia's state-owned petroleum company, the Sarawak 
state government, Mitsubishi Corp., and Royal Dutch Shell, will make 
the Sarawak complex the largest LNG facility in Asia.  The target 
date for its completion is May 1996.  The 3 June NIHON KEIZAI 
SHIMBUN noted that the financing package is the "largest ever in 
Asia." 

   NIKi?I KINYU reported that the 11 Japanese banks, including the 
      ? 
Industrial Bank of Japan (IBJ), the Bank of Tokyo, and Mitsubishi 
Bank, will finance 37 percent of the total loan package.  The 
consortium selected six banks, headed by the IBJ and including the 
Bank of Tokyo, Mitsubishi Bank, Britain's Barclays Bank, and the 
American J.P. Morgan Bank, to be the "lead arrangers."  The nine- 
year financing package will be in two parts, an initial $410-million 
installment and a second $777-million installment. 

   Electricity Corporation Awards Contract to PRC Group -- The 
National Electricity Corporation has awarded a $37.5-million turnkey 
contract to the PRC's Xian Electric Group to supply and install 27- 
kilovolt (kv) gas-insulated switchgear (GIS) at two substations in 
Kuala Lumpur.  This is the third such contract awarded to the 
Chinese company.  The contract covers the design, manufacture, 
erection, and commissioning of more than 20 bays of the 275-kv GIS, 
six sets of 275/132-kv and 240 megavolt ampere transformers, 
ancillary equipment, and civil works for the Pudu Ulu and Galloway 
Road substations.  The substations are scheduled to be operational 
in March 1996.  (Kuala Lumpur NEW STRAITS TIMES 21 May 94 p 14) 
?PHILIPPINES:  Manila To Get Telecommunications Tower -- A 

Department of Transportation and Communications official recently 
stated that the government plans to have a $250-million 
telecommunications tower built in Manila.  The 1,432-foot building, 
to be constructed under a build-operate-transfer scheme and 
scheduled for completion in 1998, will house television braodcast 
antennas, equipment for long-distance and cellular telephones, and 
airport radars.  The government has already received proposals from 
two companies--Australia's International Finance and Marketing 
Consultants, which has begun a feasibility study, and Japan's Mitsui 
and Co.  (BALITA 6 May 94 p 2) 

   THAILAND:  Japanese Firm Wins Natural Gas Separator Construction 
Contract -- Toyo Engineering, one of Japan's largest plant 
engineering firms, has been unofficially awarded a 2.4-billion baht 
($96-million) contract by the Petroleum Authority of Thailand, the 
state-owned oil company, to build a natural gas separator plant in 
central Thailand.  The plant, which will have a daily processing 
capacity of 350 million cubic feet, will be built in the Map Ta Phut 
District of Rayong Province.  Construction will begin later this 
year, after the contract is formally approved by the Thai Cabinet in 
June. The plant is scheduled to be completed in 1996. 

   The Petroleum Authority of Thailand already has two separator 
plants in Map Ta Phut District, but is building a third because of 
Thailand's rapidly increasing demand for energy.  (Tokyo NIHON 
KEIZAI SHIMBUN 1 Jun 94 p 13) 

ROK, Japanese Firms To Build Steel Plant in Thailand 

   The South Korean Pohang Iron and Steel Corporation (POSCO), New 
Japan Steel, and Mitsui Products Company have agreed to participate 
in a project to produce grater in Thailand.  A total of 60 billion 
yen ($564 million) will be used to build the ROK-Japan joint steel 
plant.  Upon completion in  in 1997, the plant will be able to 
produce 800,000 to 1 million metric tons of grater annually.  (Seoul 
SEOUL SINMUN 5 Jun 94 p 6) 

   Japanese Firm Approved for Vehicle-Part Production -- The Board 
of Investment has approved Marujun Seiki Industry's proposal  to 
establish a $4-million vehicle-part venture in Saha Rattananakhon 
Industrial Estate.  The project is expected to be completed in June. 
According to Senior Managing Director Takashi Iwata, the Japanese 
company will own 60 percent of the venture, while Thai car firms, 
which cannot be named at this time, will own the remainder. 
(Bangkok BANGKOK POST 4 Jun 94 p 15) 
? 

   VIETNAM:  FEATURE:  Investors Conferences, Foreign Investment 
Policies Reported -- SUMMARY:  The State Commission for Cooperation 
and Investment (SCCI) recently organized two conferences for 
Vietnamese investors to review and discuss foreign investment and 
cooperation efforts in the last six years.  A similar conference for 
foreign investors will be held in the near future. According to SRV 
press sources, the government will issue a series of "major 
policies" regarding foreign investment. 

   The 27 April Ho Chi Minh City THOI BAO KINH TE SAIGON reported 
that the SCCI held two conferences in April for Vietnamese investors 
to review foreign investment in the last six years and identify 
problems that both the state and the investors need to solve 
"urgently."  The first conference was held on 8-9 April in Vinh City 
for the northern region, and the second on 12-13 April in Bien Hoa 
City for the southern region.  At the Vinh City conference, 
participants agreed to form a "Vietnamese Investors Club" where 
members could meet, exchange information, and help one another with 
business matters. 

   THOI BAO KINH TE SAIGON observed that in order for Vietnam to 
attract $12-13 billion in investment until the year 2000, as called 
for by the national economic development strategy, changes must be 
made to improve the country's legal system, simplify administrative 
procedures, provide training for Vietnamese state and enterprise 
managers, and take care of problems relating to land use, labor, 
wages, and taxation.  According to the magazine, the SRV Government 
will issue a series of "major policies" to resolve "persistent 
problems" in foreign investment which have created "difficulties for 
all three participants:  foreign investors, Vietnamese investors, 
and government agencies."  The new policies will reportedly consist 
of the following: 

   1.  A comprehensive plan on investment in Vietnam for domestic 
investors and investors who have foreign partners.  The plan will 
specify priorities granted to various commercial and industrial 
sectors or national regions. 

   2.  An industrial/technological policy that sets guidelines and 
standards for machinery and equipment imports for joint enterprises, 
in order to avoid importing equipment that is too old, obsolete, 
overpriced, or unsuited to current conditions in the country. 

   3.  A real estate property policy based on the premise that 
foreign investors will not have to pay taxes on any land that they 
lease.  The Vietnamese investment partners will be responsible for 
compensating the previous occupants of the land and clearing the 
sites, while any funds expended by foreigners for site clearance 
will be considered part of their capital investment. 
? 

   4.  Policies on income tax, labor, salaries, technology transfer, 
and environmental protection will be formulated with a view to 
creating the best possible conditions for investors while fully 
"respecting the rights" of Vietnam. 

   The SCCI will coordinate with all ministries and agencies to 
simplify and speed up the issuance of investment licenses, according 
to THOI BAO KINH TE SAIGON.  In addition, the license approval 
process will be codified, with specific guidance given for each 
industrial and commercial sector, so that any investor who submits 
the required paperwork will obtain a license without undue delays. 

   THOI BAO KINH TE SAIGON stated that in the near future, the SCCI 
will organize a conference with major foreign investors to solicit 
comments, collect data, and prepare a program to "completely 
overhaul" Vietnam's investment structure in order to attract, 
increase, and speed up foreign investment in Vietnam in the years 
ahead.  This needs to be done to avert the threat of "economic 
backwardness," the magazine concluded. 

   Premier Issues Directive To Raise Revenues, Balance Budget -- On 
4 April, Prime Minister Vo Van Kiet issued Directive No 154/TTg 
tasking all cadres of concerned agencies to tackle "immediately" a 
number of urgent problems.  The directive is aimed at the "extremely 
critical problem of balancing the budget" at a time when too little 
revenue is being raised from the national economy, businesses suffer 
a "severe" lack of capital, and "waste, bribery, corruption, and 
smuggling" are rampant. 

   Under the directive, the Finance Ministry and the General 
Department of Customs must closely supervise the collection of all 
taxes and duties on production-oriented businesses, particularly 
those dealing with beer, alcoholic beverages, tobacco, cement, 
petroleum products, iron, and steel. 

   The Finance Ministry will immediately begin supervising the 
collection of revenues from land use fees, permits, and real estate 
transfers and sales involving state property.  The ministry will 
work with other ministries and provincial agencies to compile a 
report to the government on savings account deposits nationwide, 
with recommendations for managing these funds.  Together with the 
State Bank, the ministry will also immediately organize a treasury 
bond market and explore other means of raising funds.  (Ho Chi Minh 
City SAIGON GIAI PHONG 9 April 94 p 1) 
? 

   Thanh Hoa, Taiwanese Companies Form Joint Venture -- The Vietnam 
Sugarcane Company, under the Ministry of?Agriculture and Food 
                                       ? 
Industry, and four Taiwanese companies--including Tai Tung and Fu 
Mei--have formed a joint venture to build a sugar plant in Thanh 
Hoa, with a processing capacity of 6,000 metric tons of sugar cane a 
day.  Investment capital in the venture amounts to $66 million, of 
which $26.4 million is prescribed capital, with the Taiwanese 
partners contributing 75 percent of the total.  Upon completion, the 
plant will produce approximately 100,000 metric tons of sugar a 
year.  (Ho Chi Minh City SAIGON GIAI PHONG 11 April 94 p 2) 

   Japanese Banks Trailing Others in Vietnam Investment -- Foreign 
banks are beginning to establish branches elsewhere in Vietnam 
besides Hanoi and Ho Chi Minh City.  For example, Malaysia's joint 
venture bank VID Paburik Bank, established in 1992 with branches in 
the country's two main cities, became the first foreign bank to 
locate a branch in the central city of Da Nang.  Indovina, a joint 
venture with Indonesia, will soon open its third branch in Haiphong. 
Other Asian and European banks are preparing to establish branches 
or offices in both Hanoi and Ho Chi Minh City.  By contrast, 
Japanese banks have been more cautious, limiting their involvement 
to Ho Chi Minh City; they do not expect to be represented in both 
Hanoi and Ho Chi Minh City for another two or three years.  (Tokyo 
NIKi?I KIN1?AI? SHIMBUN 20 May 94 p 2) 
   ?      ?  ? 

   Mitsui Importing LPG, Ammonia to Vietnam -- Mitsui and Co. and 
Thailand's Unique Gas will form a joint venture in July called 
U.G.P. to import liquified petroleum gas (LPG) and ammonia into 
Vietnam for local sale.  Its $2-million initial capital is being 
shared 50-50.  Plans are to buy the LPG and ammonia from Indonesia 
and store it in 2,000-ton high-pressure tanks at the Go Rau 
industrial zone outside Ho Chi Minh City.  Initially most customers 
will be Vietnamese manufacturers of foodstuffs, fertilizer, and 
ceramics located in the industrial zone.  Later sales will include 
domestic energy.  This is the first 100-percent foreign investment 
allowed by the SRV Government in which a large Japanese company is 
participating.  Since it "takes time" to arrange a joint venture 
with a domestic Vietnamese company, Mitsui decided to use foreign 
capital to speed up the operation.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 31 
May 94 p 13) 
? 

   Australian, U.S. Firms Plan Power Plant-Factory Complex -- The 
Australian resource development company BHP and the United States' 
General Electric Co. plan to build an electric power station and 
fertilizer factory in Vietnam at a cost of $810 million.  According 
to BHP, which is at the "center" of the project, a natural gas- 
fueled power generating station will be built in the Ba Ria-Vung Tau 
region 65 km southeast of Ho Chi Minh City and a fertilizer factory 
with an annual output of 600,000 tons will be built next to it. 
Although still in the blueprint stage, BHP would use the natural gas 
generated as a byproduct of its oil production at the Dai Hung 
offshore oil fields to fuel the plant as early as October.  GE will 
supply the gas turbines.  BHP is also considering building a 
petrochemical plant in Vietnam.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 3 Jun 
94 p 12) 

   Joint Venture Firm Plans To Install 200,000 Telephone Circuits -- 
The Bakrie Group, one of Indonesia's largest conglomerates, together 
with the U.S. Hughes Corp. and Dac Tho Viet, a state-owned 
commercial company, have signed an agreement to establish a joint 
venture company to install a telephone network with 200,000 
circuits.  Total investment in the project will be "about $700 
million." 

   According to Aburizal Bakrie, president of the Bakrie Group and 
chairman of the Indonesian Chamber of Commerce and Industry, the 
investment ratios in the joint venture have not yet been decided, 
but it is planned that the Bakrie Group and Hughes will hold an 80- 
percent stake and the Vietnamese company the remainder.  Given 
Vietnam's "infrastructural shortcomings," the new company hopes its 
investment plans will receive quick approval. 

   Indonesian private investment in Vietnam has increased recently 
as a result of the April 1994 visit to Indonesia by Vietnamese 
Foreign Minister Nguyen Manh Cam.  Eleven Indonesian companies have 
signed agreements to invest a total of $160 million in projects 
involving Vietnam's petroleum sector, natural gas exploration, coal, 
hotels, timber processing, and others.  The 11 projects have already 
received approval from the Vietnamese Government.  (Tokyo NIKKEI 
SANGYO SHIMBUN 19 May 94 p 3) 
? 

   Northern Telecom To Provide Telephone Equipment -- Northern 
Telecom has signed a memorandum of understanding (MOU) with 
Vietnam's Department of Post and Telecommunications to supply 
switching equipment for a 1 million-line telephone project.  Some 
100,000 lines will be delivered this year.  The contract, valued at 
$6.1 million, will involve supplying DMS-100 switching equipment to 
Haiphong.  A second MOU for the manufacture of switches has been 
signed.  In this instance, Northern Telecom will have to identify 
the yearly production quantity and the percentages earmarked for 
domestic and export markets.  (Bangkok BANGKOK POST 27 May 94 p 21) 

   Export-Import Value Rises to $3.3 Billion -- Vietnam's export- 
import value so far this year has reached $3.3 billion--with half of 
this amount coming from exports--an increase of 27 percent compared 
to the same period last year.  The import value has increased by 32 
percent.  Most of the increase in exports has come from coffee, 
peanuts, rubber, processed marine products, textiles and garments. 
(Hanoi Voice of Vietnam 1000 GMT 31 May 94) 

   Authorities Withdraw 131 Investment Licenses -- The State 
Committee for Cooperation and Investment has withdrawn the licenses 
for 131 projects, leaving 773 valued at $7 billion.  In April alone, 
100 more licenses capitalized at $1.2 billion were granted.  This 
equals 40 percent of the total capital received in all of last year. 
(Hanoi Voice of Vietnam 1000 GMT 1 Jun 94) 

   Construction Boom Keeps Demand, Price of Cement High -- Demand 
for cement has been on the rise since mid-1993 due to a construction 
boom in cities such as Hanoi, Ho Chi Minh City, and Haiphong. 
Prices have gone up between 10 and 45 percent.  The Vietnamese 
Cement Corporation predicts that this year's demand will be about 
6.5 million tons, 8 million tons in 1996, 10 to 12 million tons in 
1997, and 20 million tons in the year 2000.  Nguyen Van Thien, 
general director of the Vietnamese Cement Corporation, recently said 
that domestic producers are unable to meet the demand for cement. 
(Hanoi VNA 0610 GMT 5 Jun 94) 

   Hanoi Issues New Treasury Bills, Bonds -- The Ministry of Finance 
recently announced it will issue six-month treasury bills at 1.7- 
percent monthly interest starting on 1 June.  Treasury bonds with a 
two-year maturity period will also be offered beginning 20 June in 
30 cities and provinces.  Treasury bills, with a minimum value of 
$9.25 each, can be paid in either Vietnamese dong, gold, or U.S. 
dollars.  Treasury bills are registered, while treasury bonds are 
not.  They can be traded, transferred, or mortgaged, but they cannot 
be used to replace banknotes or for the payment of taxes.  All 
income from treasury bills and bonds are tax exempted.  (Hanoi Voice 
of Vietnam 1000 GMT 2 Jun 94) 

EAG/15Jun94/ECONF/TECHTF/East Asia Group 
? 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23115 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000033194001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   21 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-20JUN94-RUSSIA-UKRAINE 
<H3> <TI>      BSF Officers Contest Sevastopol Mayoral Post </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       BSF Officers Contest Sevastopol Mayoral Post </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Former      and current Russian Black Sea Fleet (BSF) officers have 
reportedly entered the 26 June election for the city council 
chairman seat in the Crimean port city of Sevastopol (Krasnaya 
Zvezda, 4 June).  While the chances of any of the BSF officers 
winning appear slim (Interfax, 9 June), their candidacies 
nevertheless could further exacerbate Russian-Ukrainian and 
Crimean-Ukrainian tensions by fueling Ukrainian suspicions of 
Russian meddling in Krym (Crimea).  BSF officer candidacies 
appear to be an effort to secure a stronger voice for BSF 
interests in the running of Sevastopol, the fleet's main basing 
facility.  The registered candidates reportedly include Reserve 
Admiral Aleksey Kalinin, former BSF commander, Colonel Aleksey 
Melnikov, deputy head of BSF air force communications, and Rear 
Admiral Aleksandr Penkin, deputy BSF commander (Krasnaya Zvezda, 
4 June). 
(AUTHOR:  NERO.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ANALYSIS BRANCH, RUSSIA DIVISION (703) 733-6070.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH/JEG 20/1827Z JUN 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23116 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000033294001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   21 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-20JUN94-ISRAEL-PAL 
<H3> <TI>      Israel, PLO Deescalate Dispute Over Jerusalem </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Israel, PLO Deescalate Dispute Over Jerusalem </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                                      Following stern Israeli warnings to the Palestinians, both Israel 
and the PLO are apparently seeking to avoid what had appeared to 
be an imminent confrontation over the status of Jerusalem during 
the interim phase of Israeli-Palestinian peace negotiations. 
Although an immediate crisis has thus probably been averted, 
disputes over Jerusalem are likely to arise again as interim 
negotiations continue. 
                                     END SUMMARY 
   Following press reports, such as that in the 13 June Jerusalem 
Post, that PLO leader Yasir 'Arafat had written to Prime Minister 
Yitzhaq Rabin agreeing to deescalate a growing Israeli- 
Palestinian rhetorical battle over Jerusalem, 'Arafat himself 
appeared to moderate PLO rhetoric on the subject.  Addressing a 
conference of the Organization of African Unity in Tunis, 'Arafat 
charged "some members of the Israeli Government" with creating a 
"fabricated storm" over Jerusalem and with "working to impose a 
status quo . . . regarding an issue that touches the feelings not 
only of the Palestinian people   . . but that of the Arabs, 
Muslims, and Christians throughout the world."  Such actions, he 
continued, violate both UN and other international resolutions as 
well as "stances of the U.S. administration, the European Union, 
Russia, China, Japan and others" and are aimed at "weakening the 
steps [toward] building trust" between Israelis and Palestinians. 
Significantly, however, 'Arafat did not voice his customary claim 
to Jerusalem as capital of a future Palestinian state and said 
that Palestinians "understand the importance of the religious 
position of the holy city for all religions."  After calling on 
all parties to "protect these civil, religious, historic and 
humanitarian values," he vowed that Palestinians "will not allow 
any extremist forces . . . to obstruct or sabotage the peace 
process or to alter the character of the holy city" (Egyptian 
satellite TV, 13 June). 
   In contrast to 'Arafat's caution, Nabil Sha'th, a principal 
Palestinian negotiator in recent talks with Israel, had made a 
point only two days earlier of rejecting reported Israeli 
intentions to restrict existing Palestinian institutions in 
Jerusalem and of reasserting the Palestinian claim to the city. 
While acknowledging that negotiation of Jerusalem's final status 
had been deferred, Sha'th said in an interview that Palestinian 
institutions in the city "should remain to serve the Palestinian 
people in Jerusalem and the other areas of the Palestinian 
territories."  Moreover, he added, once final status negotiations 
begin, Palestinians "will emphasize that Jerusalem is a city that 
was occupied in 1967 and should be liberated when a definitive 
solution is reached so that it may be the Palestinian capital of 
the independent Palestinian state."  Such a status, he argued, 
constitutes "sound implementation of UN Security Council 
Resolution 242 and the Declaration of Principles" (Radio Monte 
Carlo, 11 May). 
   Israeli Carrot and Stick 
   The PLO's apparent tactical retreat on Jerusalem follows both 
strong statements from Foreign Minister Shim'on Peres, among 
other Israeli Government officials, that the government would not 
tolerate any Palestinian attempt to establish governing 
institutions associated with the Gaza-Jericho accord in Jerusalem 
(See Note 1)  and assurances that Israel would not seek to alter 
the status of existing Palestinian institutions.  Interviewed by 
Israeli television on 9 June, Peres began by emphatically 
rejecting Palestinian claims to Jerusalem, which he dismissed as 
"mere dreaming."  For good measure, he went on to reject 
suggestions that Jerusalem could serve as the dual capital both 
of Israel and a future Palestinian entity, saying that "one 
cannot have two capitals in one city because that would mean a 
division of Jerusalem. . . . the historical capital of Israel and 
Israel's capital today."  While pledging that Israel would 
maintain open access to all religious institutions, Peres 
asserted that "in the political sense, the issue of Jerusalem is 
closed."  Turning to alleged Palestinian efforts to create new 
political institutions in the city, Peres warned that "the 
Palestinian Authority must handle autonomy-related affairs from 
Jericho" and that Israel "will not countenance any transfer of 
institutions from Jericho to Jerusalem." 
   (Note 1) As reported by Egypt's official MENA news agency on 3 
May, the Gaza-Jericho self-rule agreement between Israel and the 
PLO specifies that offices of the Palestinian Authority will be 
located in Gaza and Jericho. 
   Despite his warning, Peres also evidently tried to play down 
Israeli press reports (for example, Ma'ariv, 7 June) claiming 
that the Israeli Government was preparing tough new legislation 
to restrict Palestinian political activity outside the territory 
of the autonomy regime.  The government,' he said, is "looking 
into the issue" of allegedly prohibited Palestinian political 
activity, including "whether additional legislation is called 
for."  However, he concluded, "it may very well be that any 
deviations from the law may be rectified through the use of 
existing legislation and no new laws are necessary." 
   Background: Rhetorical Battle Over Jerusalem 
   Despite their agreement in Cairo on 4 May on detailed 
arrangements for implementing the Gaza-Jericho accord, Israel and 
the Palestinians engaged over the next month in an escalating 
verbal battle over Jerusalem, highlighted by a controversial 
speech by 'Arafat and the Israeli Government's embarrassing 
revelation of a previously denied secret letter containing 
assurances regarding the status of Palestinian institutions in 
Jerusalem during the interim period. 
   'Arafat's speech, delivered at a Johannesburg mosque on 10 May, 
was evidently intended to reassure Palestinian skeptics that the 
compromise agreements with Israel, beginning with the Oslo accord 
in September 1993, did not mean any Palestinian concessions on 
Jerusalem, but it also stimulated Israeli concerns about the 
eventual status of the city and of Palestinian institutions in 
it.  In the speech, 'Arafat called for a continued "jihad" to 
liberate the city (text appears in Tel Aviv Ha'aretz, 23 May), 
although he subsequently attempted to play down his remarks, 
claiming he meant a nonviolent campaign (Ool Yisra'el, 18 May). 
Even prior to the speech, Israeli political leaders across a 
fairly broad political spectrum had begun reasserting their claim 
to the city, focusing in particular on the status of Palestinian 
quasi-governmental institutions in Jerusalem, such as Orient 
House, the de facto mainstream Palestinian headquarters.  For 
example: 
   --Jerusalem Mayor Ehud Olmert, a member of the opposition Likud 
party and frequent critic of the government's handling of the 
peace process, said in an interview that he "would take any step 
necessary to curb Palestinian political activity in East 
Jerusalem, barring infringement of civil rights" and specified 
that he "would close down Orient House" (Tel Aviv Ha'aretz, 6 
May).  Deputy Mayor Shmu'el Me'ir went further, charging in an 
interview that "the large number of daily terrorist attacks 
against Jews [in Jerusalem] are initiated and funded by the PLO 
office in Orient House" (Ha'aretz, 13 May). 
   --According to Qol Yisra'el radio, Rabin reaffirmed during a 
reception at Jerusalem's City Hall that under a permanent 
arrangement with Palestinians, the city will be "united under 
Israeli sovereignty and as Israel's capital" (8 May). 
Similarly, Peres said in an interview that Jerusalem's status as 
the unified capital of Israel is "absolute and irrevocable" (Qol 
Yisra'el, 27 May). 
   --On 9 May, the Knesset approved a resolution introduced by Likud 
leader Binyamin Netanyahu but endorsed by Rabin asserting that 
Jerusalem would remain united under Israeli sovereignty and that 
Israel would block any effort to change its status (Qol Yisra'el, 
10 May). 
   Israeli media reports and commentary also tended to fuel concern 
over the city's status.  For example: 
   --The independent New Channel 2 television claimed that Israeli 
security services had uncovered a PLO plan to transfer a large 
part of the Palestinian administrative structure for Gaza and 
Jericho to Orient House and cited an unidentified "senior 
security source" as saying that "recent PLO attempts to create 
facts in Jerusalem have increased beyond belief" (28 May). 
   --Both the daily Yedi'ot Aharonot on 31 May and the daily 
Ha'aretz on 3 June published editorials calling for the closure 
of Orient House. 
   For their part, Palestinians clearly sought, following the 
signing of the Gaza-Jericho implementation agreement, to attach a 
symbolic aura of sovereignty to their existing institutions in 
Jerusalem while claiming that they were adhering to the letter of 
the Gaza-Jericho agreement and reiterating longstanding charges 
of Israeli bad faith.  For example: 
   --In a press release on 9 May, Orient House charged Israel with 
"continuing to pursue the fait accompli policy toward Arab 
Jerusalem by reinforcing a series of measures aimed at enhancing 
a growing [Jewish] settlement in the city."  It is "obvious," the 
statement claimed, that "the political, social, and cultural 
reality that Jerusalem has experienced during 27 years of 
occupation affirms the failure of all Israeli attempts to unify 
and Judaize Jerusalem."  After denouncing Israel's "unfounded 
historic claims" to the city, the statement called for an end to 
"unilateral Israeli measures that are liable to prejudice 
Palestinian rights" and vowed that Palestinians' "top priority" 
in final status talks would be the establishment of Jerusalem as 
"the political and historic capital of the future Palestinian 
state" (Jerusalem Al-Nahar, 10 May). 
   --In a statement broadcast by Ool Yisra'el, West Bank Palestinian 
leader Faysal al-Husayni said that Palestinians "are fighting a 
battle to end the isolation of Jerusalem" from the rest of the 
occupied territories and charged that Israel is "trying to open a 
new . . . battle against us" (30 May). 
   --In an interview broadcast with Qol Yisra'el, Sha'th rejected 
Israeli complaints about Palestinian political activity at Orient 
House.  Distinguishing between Orient House and institutions 
directly related to the administration of Gaza and Jericho, 
Sha'th noted that Orient House existed prior to the Gaza-Jericho 
accord and claimed that Israel had agreed to its continued 
operation during the interim period.  Thus, he charged, Israeli 
complaints about Orient House constitute "an open violation of 
the agreement."  Palestinian agreement to defer negotiations on 
the final status of Jerusalem, he argued, "does not at all allow 
the Israeli side to behave as if Jerusalem was an annexed city" 
(31 May). 
   --In an interview with the East Jerusalem Palestinian daily Al- 
Nahar, al-Husayni said that "the battle of Jerusalem is a 
political, diplomatic, economic, social, educational, and 
cultural battle" in which Orient House plays an important role. 
Israel, he continued, must recognize that Jerusalem is "the 
Palestinians' religious, political, economic, and education 
capital."  Referring to the "Jerusalem Committee," a Palestinian 
body apparently created last January of which al-Husayni is the 
head, he said that it "will comprise shadow institutions for all 
the other institutions existing in Jerusalem" and will "pursue 
things and put pressure to gain Palestinian rights in Jerusalem" 
(3 June). 
   Coming after the month-long Israeli-Palestinian verbal sparring 
over Jerusalem, revelation of the long-denied secret Israeli 
letter to Palestinians--technically addressed to the Norwegian 
foreign minister--appeared to seriously damage the Israeli 
Government's credibility and prompted immediate Israeli press 
speculation on the existence of other, as yet undisclosed 
agreements (for example, Israel TV, 6 June; Yedi'ot Aharonot, 7 
and 8 June).  Although the letter consisted of seemingly bland 
assurances that Israel would not interfere with existing 
Palestinian institutions in Jerusalem (see text in The Jerusalem 
Post, 7 June), its repeated references to "Palestinian 
institutions" and "East Jerusalem" undoubtedly alarmed Israeli 
critics fearful of secret concessions on the city and may have 
prompted the government to toughen its stand against even the 
appearance of flexibility on the issue. 
   Implications 
   The evident wish of both the Israeli Government and the 
Palestinian leadership to avoid an early showdown over Jerusalem 
demonstrates their mutual desire to continue implementation of 
the Gaza-Jericho plan in particular and the peace process in 
general.  Nonetheless, they have clearly only deferred, rather 
than relieved, their deeply rooted and emotional conflict over 
the city.  Moreover, as future negotiations move closer to 
fundamental Israeli-Palestinian differences over matters 
affecting territory and sovereignty, open disputes over Jerusalem 
are almost certain to reemerge, with leaders on both sides caught 
between conflicting pressures to preserve the peace process and 
defend their rival passionate claims to the city.  Considering 
the tortuous negotiations already required simply to agree on the 
Gaza-Jericho plan, the early reintroduction of far more 
tendentious, fundamental issues such as Jerusalem will likely 
place a serious strain on the existing structure of negotiations 
and increase pressure on both sides to take up matters currently 
consigned to final status talks. 
(AUTHOR: MORTON.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
NEAR EAST ANALYSIS BRANCH (703) 733-6094.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH/JEG 20/1946Z JUN 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23117 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000033394001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   21 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-20JUN94-RUSSIA 
<H3> <TI>      Media Politics Heating Up </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Media Politics Heating Up </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                                         Like its predecessor the Supreme Soviet, the State Duma, 
con tending that current media coverage of the legislature is 
biased, is attempting to extend its control over the media, 
voting to create its own television and radio production company 
and preparing legislation mandating extensive, commentary-free 
coverage of government bodies.  Apparently attempting to preserve 
another potential means of control, the Duma is ignoring calls to 
enact industry-wide tax exemptions to ease the serious financial 
crunch affecting the press, preferring instead to continue the 
system of subsidies allocated on a case-by-case basis.  Although 
the Duma's actions threaten to revive a struggle for control of 
the media that was a major point of contention between the 
presidency and the former legislature, President Boris Yeltsin 
has reacted with restraint suggesting that he is confident that 
he can use his levers of control over the media to prevent the 
Duma from gaining the upper hand. 
                                     END SUMMARY 
   The Duma has recently sought to correct what it perceives as 
unfair coverage of legislative activities by the two major state 
television companies and unfair advantages held by the cabinet 
and the executive branch in the media sphere (See Box 1).  Recent 
Duma efforts to influence the media include: 
   --The Law on the Procedure for Coverage of Government Authorities 
by State-Owned Mass Media, approved on a first reading on 13 
April (See Note 1) (ITAR-TASS, 13 April).  According to press 
accounts of draft versions of the law, it would mandate that the 
media cover the activities of the president, the parliament, the 
cabinet, and the judiciary without editorializing; establish 
minimum airtime requirements for such coverage; and grant federal 
and regional officials access to airtime.  In addition, the law 
would diminish the government's influence over the media by 
ending cabinet sponsorship of the dailies Rossiyskiye Vesti and 
Rossiyskaya Gazeta (Obshchaya Gazeta No. 17, 29 April; Moskovskiy 
Komsomolets, 6 April; Novaya Yezhednevnaya Gazeta, 15 April). 
   (Note 1)  According to an account signed to press on 3 May, the 
Duma approved a final version of the law and passed it to the 
Federation Council for consideration (Moskovskiye Novosti, No. 18 
1-8 May).  However, no other sources have been observed to 
confirm this report.  According to the Russian Constitution, the 
Federation Council must take under consideration laws approved by 
the Duma within 14 days, otherwise they are considered approved 
and sent to the president for his consideration (Rossiyskaya 
Gazeta, 10 November).  To date no press reports on the Federation 
Council's consideration of the law have been observed. 
   --In a further effort to increase its influence in television and 
radio broadcasting, on 27 May the Duma adopted a decree creating 
a Duma radio and television company that, according to press 
reports, would reside within the Duma apparatus and be charged 
with producing 30-minute daily programs on Duma activities for 
broadcasting "at a time convenient for the population" (Interfax, 
27 May; Segodnya, 28 May). 
   Conspicuously missing from the Duma's legislative agenda has been 
a bill to free the press of tax burdens and alleviate other 
publishing expenses.  Federation Council Chairman Vladimir 
Shumeyko has proposed such legislation, which would alleviate the 
need for subsidies and reduce the possibilities for political 
manipulation of the press (Rossiyskiye Vesti, 20 May).  But 
according to ITAR-TASS (20 April) a bill to grant tax preferences 
to the media has "stumbled in parliament," making it likely that 
subsidies will continue for the foreseeable future. 
   "Parliamentary Hour" Revisited? 
   Much of the media commentary on the Duma's decision to create its 
own television and radio company has criticized the move as an 
attempt to reanimate the former Supreme Soviet's RTV-Parliament, 
the television production company which the pro-reform media 
viewed as a tendentious and unpopular propaganda vehicle for the 
former legislature.  An Izvestiya reporter mused (3 June) on 
whether history would "repeat itself and replicate a failed 
experiment," and Rossiyskiye Vesti (15 April) cited Ostankino 
Deputy Chairman Gennadiy Shipitko's comment that "programs like 
'Parliamentary Hour' . . . will not . . . fire us with 
enthusiasm," while a Moskovskiy Komsomolets reporter 
characterized the Duma's action as a "program for the radical 
brainwashing of the citizens" (30 March).  In fact, as if to 
confirm fears of a reprise of "Parliamentary Hour," the Duma has 
reportedly chosen Yuriy Marechenkov, former head of RTV- 
Parliament and one-time media affairs adviser to Yeltsin's arch- 
rival, former Supreme Soviet Chairman Ruslan Khasbulatov, to head 
the new company (Moskovskiy Komsomolets, 30 March). 
   As Shipitko's comment suggests, television network officials have 
shown little enthusiasm for reviving broadcasts of programming 
produced by parliament, and the parliament may find it difficult 
to force the issue.  The Duma, unlike the old Supreme Soviet, 
does not have sponsorship authority over the All-Russian 
Television and Radio Broadcasting Company (RTV) and therefore 
cannot simply issue orders to the network.  RTV Chairman Oleg 
Poptsov, who was ordered to air "Parliamentary Hour" by the 
Supreme Soviet (Vedomosti Syezda Narodnykh Deputatov Rossiyskoy 
Federatsii i Verkhovnogo Soveta Rossiyskoy Federatsii, No. 13, 1 
April 1993), has said that the Duma's decree attests to 
"pretensions to a certain informational exclusivity" that could 
provoke a chain reaction from the other branches of government, 
leading to the development of what he sarcastically called a 
variety of "wonderful" radio and television services each serving 
a different branch of government, rather than the viewer 
(Segodnya, 28 May).  While the Duma's budget authority does give 
it potential leverage over RTV and Ostankino, threats to cut 
television financing for refusing to air parliamentary 
programming would most likely alienate television-viewing 
constituents and meet considerable resistance from Yeltsin. 
   Even if the Duma could convince one or both of the major 
companies to air its programming, the expense of creating and 
equipping a new production company from scratch would likely 
prove prohibitive.  According to Yuliy Nisnevich, chairman of the 
parliamentary Subcommittee on Computer Science and 
Communications, such a venture would cost "millions of dollars," 
leading him to speculate that allocation of the money for such a 
project is "unlikely" (Izvestiya, 3 June). 
   Yeltsin's Opposition 
   Although Yeltsin has firmly condemned the Duma's decree, he does 
not appear to be trying to rally public opposition, suggesting 
confidence in the strength of his position and a desire to 
discourage confrontation while he is aiming his primary effort in 
domestic policy at reducing political tension and creating an 
atmosphere of cooperation.  A "Vesti" news report asserted that 
Yeltsin had objected to the Duma's decision to create its own 
television service, calling it "an attempt at information diktat" 
that would demonstrate the Duma's desire to "destroy the existing 
balance of powers" between the branches of government (Russian 
TV, 27 May).  Yeltsin's press spokesman Vyacheslav Kostikov 
accused the Duma of "encroaching" on freedom of the press 
(Segodnya, 28 May) and, in an apparent reference to Yeltsin's 
victory over the Supreme Soviet in the violent political showdown 
last fall, he advised the Duma that Yeltsin "urges the deputies 
to take into account the lessons of living history" and to show 
"wisdom and political tact" (Interfax, 27 May).  After these 
initial statements, Yeltsin's administration has not been 
observed to comment on the matter and neither he nor the 
reporters who questioned him raised the issue during his 10 June 
speech and press conference, where he lauded his own recent 
efforts to bring about political accord in society (Russian TV, 
10 June). 
   Shumeyko Also Opposed 
   Federation Council Chairman Vladimir Shumeyko has also taken 
issue with the Duma's actions, calling them undemocratic and 
proposing his own bill that would give the press across-the-board 
tax exemptions.  He reportedly wrote to Duma Chairman Ivan Rybkin 
that the draft law on media coverage looks "like an army drill 
instruction" and "has nothing in common with democracy and the 
free press" and asserted that "the constitution's ban on 
censorship is . . . breached by a whole range of the bill's 
clauses" (Interfax, 23 May).  He also offered his own media 
initiative, a proposal for a draft law that would address the 
acute financial difficulties facing the press.  The law would 
exempt the press from payment of the profits tax and value-added 
tax, from import and export duties, and from compulsory sale to 
the state of 50 percent of their hard currency earnings 
(Rossiyskiye Vesti, 20 May). 
   Chernomyrdin Addresses Press Finances 
   Prime Minister Viktor Chernomyrdin, without responding explicitly 
to the Duma's initiatives, has turned his attention to the 
press's acute financial difficulties and issued a directive 
allocating 110.4 billion rubles to support the print media (See 
Box 2) (ITAR-TASS, 27 April).  At the same time, according to 
Chernomyrdin's subordinate Boris Mironov, chairman of the Russian 
Federation Committee for the Press, Chernomyrdin supports a draft 
law on state protection for the media that would exempt print 
media from customs duties on newsprint and printing equipment, 
and grant them a 50-percent discount on postal, telegraph, and 
telephone costs that would amount to an additional 1 billion 
rubles in support to the press (Izvestiya, 29 April). 
   Outlook 
   With television remaining state-owned and the press either state- 
sponsored or partially subsidized, control over the media will 
probably continue to be a source of contention, and the 
parliament will be unlikely to resist the temptation to attain a 
greater share of influence over the media.  Its efforts could 
backfire, however, spurring administration efforts to 
denationalize the state's media holdings to keep them out of the 
hands of the legislature.  For example, privatization of all 
television programming production--estimates already suggest as 
much as 80 percent of Ostankino's programming is privately 
produced (Rossiyskiye Vesti, 1 April)--while retaining government 
control over the television broadcasting infrastructure could 
give Yeltsin a large advantage over the opposition:  pro-reform 
television programs would be produced privately and thus beyond 
the reach of the parliament's authority while the administration 
would retain ultimate control over access to broadcasting. 
   ***BEGIN BOX 1*** 
   Decline in Legislature's Influence Over Media 
   Following the dissolution of the Supreme Soviet in September, the 
cabinet assumed sponsorship of all media formerly sponsored by 
the Supreme Soviet.  These included, most importantly, the All- 
Russian State Television and Radio Broadcasting Company (RTV) and 
the daily newspaper Rossiyskaya Gazeta.*  The presidency, 
meanwhile, assumed significant new authority in the media sphere 
with the adoption of the new constitution, which makes the 
president the guarantor of media freedoms, and through Yeltsin's 
recent reorganization of the media bureaucracy.**  The new 
Federal Assembly currently sponsors no media and aside from its 
budget making authority has little de jure authority over the 
media. 
   *The Cabinet continues to sponsor these media as well as the 
Ostankino Television and Radio Company and Rossiyskiye Vesti, 
inter alia. 
   **On Yeltsin's reorganization of the media bureaucracy see the 
Trends of 2 March 1994, pages 11-18. 
   ***END BOX 1*** 
   ***BEGIN BOX 2*** 
                     Press Subsidies--Opening Pandora's Cash-Box 
   A recently published list of members to the new commission to 
distribute press subsidies in Russia seems weighted to favor pro- 
reformers.  Sergey Gryzunov, deputy chairman of the Russian 
Federation Committee for the Press will head the commission.  The 
list of members also includes Presidential Press Secretary 
Vyacheslav Kostikov; Yabloko member Igor Yakovenko from the Duma 
Committee on Information Policy and Communications; Omsk Governor 
Leonid Polezhayev from the Federal Assembly; and Igor 
Shabdurasulov from the Council of Ministers, as well as Russian 
Journalists Union Chairman Vsevolod Bogdanov; Yasen Zasurskiy, 
dean of the Journalism Faculty at Moscow State University; and 
Ivan Laptev, president of the Russian Association of Publishers 
and Editors-in-chief and former member of Izvestiya's editorial 
board (ITAR-TASS, 25 May). 
   By opting for a policy of subsidizing individual newspapers on a 
case-by-case basis rather than offering blanket concessions on 
production costs, the government has opened the door wide to 
discrimination, politicization, and deal-making and created 
incentives for self-censorship.  Discussing the commission's 
distribution predilections at a recent press conference, Gryzunov 
said that publications with a "worldwide reputation" would be 
given a "priority right" to survival (Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 6 
May).  In a recent Izvestiya (28 May) profile, Press Committee 
Chairman Boris Mironov, Gryzunov's boss, asserted his intention 
to protect Russia's "national heritage," meaning, in Izvestiya's 
interpretation, such publications as Pravda, Sovetskaya Rossiya, 
and Trud.  If the subsidy committee does in fact give priority to 
publications with a long history, it would benefit the opposition 
press and put pro-reform papers at a disadvantage. 
   ***END BOX 2*** 
   (AUTHOR:  CRIMMINS.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL 
CHIEF, ANALYSIS BRANCH, RUSSIA DIVISION, (703) 733-6070.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGHJEG/20/2014Z JUN 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23118 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000033494001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   21 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-079--INDONESIA 
<H3> <TI>      INDONESIA:  Nahdlatul Ulama Making Political Comeback </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       INDONESIA:  Nahdlatul Ulama Making Political Comeback </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
SUMMARY:       According to Jakarta newspapers, Indonesia's largest 
Islamic socio-religious organization Nahdlatul Ulama wants to return 
to politics and to the fold of the United Development Party (PPP), 
the country's official Muslim party.  However, the papers noted, the 
organization will have to face many challenges before this can be 
accomplished. 

   The 4 May SUARA PEMBARUAN reported that Nahdlatul Ulama (NU), the 
largest Islamic socio-religious organization in Indonesia, has 
decided to return to the fold of the official Muslim party, the 
United Development Party.  In 1984, the organization left the party 
and politics when it reaffirmed its commitment to "Kithah 1926," 
which stipulates that the organization would engage only in social 
and religious activities. 

   However, according to SUARA PEMBARUAN, NU reemerged in the 
political arena when it held a rally of some 500,000 supporters in 
Jakarta a few months prior to the 1992 general election. 
Politicians and observers were ""caught off guard"" when NU received 
such a show of support, the paper said.  However, the paper quoted 
NU Chairman Abdurahman Wahid as saying that the rally was only meant 
to manifest NU's stand that its members will always be ""loyal to 
the country'" and will always "respect" the state ideology of 
Pancasila and the 1945 Constitution. 

   Both ANGKATAN BERSENJATA and KOMPAS on 6 May observed that NU's 
attempts to represent itself as a ""political force"" in the country 
comes at a time when Indonesia's Muslims have become ""more 
aggressive"" in the political arena.  For instance, as a result of 
Muslim protests, the government has abolished the state-sponsored 
lottery.  More recently, the Muslims were able to get the movie 
""Schindler's List" banned in Indonesia because they objected to the 
""heavy Jewish propaganda"" conveyed in the picture. 

   According to SUARA PEMBARUAN, ANGKATAN BERSENJATA, and KOMPAS, in 
mid-April, 40 NU politicians gathered at the Indonesian Miniature 
Park to discuss political developments in the country, gearing up 
for the PPP congress in August.  By the end of the meeting, the 
participants concluded that NU had a ""good chance"" of gaining the 
top PPP post and called for the creation of a special commission 
whose mandate will be to invite NU members, who had left the PPP in 
1984, to rejoin the party.  In addition, the commission will work 
for the election of an NU member as PPP chairman at the upcoming 
congress, the papers said.  NU has not officially named any 
potential candidates, however, NU Chairman Abdurahman Wahid and NU 
official Yusuf Hasjim will most likely be in the running, according 
to the papers. 

   SUARA PEMBARUAN implied that chances for NU to play a leading 
role in the PPP are good, since some political observers have noted 
that the PPP must come up with a popular figure as its party 
chairman in order to be competitive with Golkar's Harmoko, who is 
the current information minister, and PDI's (the Indonesian 
Democratic Party) Megawati Sukarnoputri, the daughter of President 
Sukarno.  The paper also quoted Moechtar Mas'oed of Gajahmada 
University as saying that the PPP will become larger and more 
respected if it is led by NU politicians, because the number of 
ulamas (Islamic scholars; informal leaders in Islamic countries) 
among its members will also increase.  At the same time, SUARA 
PEMBARUAN pointed out that NU politicians should expect "'numerous 
challenges" from within the PPP.  For example, the PPP is planning 
to have several "'prominent" figures run for the party leadership, 
including Ismail Hasan Metareum, the current PPP chairman.  In 
addition, the paper noted that NU must deal with ""internal 
conflicts" and "political ambitions,"' saying the organization has 
""a long way to go" before it can reunite with the PPP. 
  (Author:  Ching.  Questions and/or comments, please call Chief, 
Southeast Asia/Korea Branch at (703) 733-6524.) 
EAG/20JUN94/POLCHF/ASIA DIVISION/JEG 20/2055Zjun 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23119 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000033594001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   23 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-22JUN94-JAPAN-U. S. 
<H3> <TI>      Japan-U.S.:  MITI Divided on Fate of Semiconductor Pact </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Japan-U.S.:  MITI Divided on Fate of Semiconductor Pact </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
Japan's      Ministry of International Trade and Industry (MITI) 
appears to be divided over whether to press the United States for 
the repeal of the 1991 U.S.-Japan Semiconductor Agreement when 
the pact comes up for review in July 1994.  On 13 June two senior 
MITI officials gave conflicting signals on the issue to the 
Japanese press.  According to the 14 June edition of the 
business-oriented Nihon Keizai Shimbun, a senior MITI official 
told the newspaper the previous day that Japan was considering 
presenting a proposal to terminate the accord at the round of 
U.S.-Japan semiconductor talks which began on June 15.  The 
official argued that the accord "sets a bad example" because it 
contains a numerical target for the foreign share of the Japanese 
semiconductor market, and because it "gives the United States an 
excuse to impose sanctions against Japan" if Tokyo fails to meet 
this target.  By contrast, the 14 June Mainichi Shimbun reported 
that another unnamed senior MITI official told the paper on the 
13th that the Japanese Government "will not seek to repeal the 
agreement" before it expires in July 1996.  The official told the 
paper that a number of MITI officials feel strongly that Japan 
should not risk further straining relations with the United 
States by pressing to repeal the Semiconductor Agreement just as 
the contentious bilateral framework talks are resuming. 
The ministry may be under pressure from the Japanese 
semiconductor industry to push for the repeal of the 
Semiconductor Agreement--a factor that may be influencing the 
views of those in the ministry who want to terminate the accord. 
According to the 10 June Asahi Shimbun, at a news conference 
following a meeting of officials from U.S. and Japanese 
semiconductor firms on 9 June, Hidehiko Yoshida, vice president 
of the Toshiba Corporation and chairman of the Committee of Users 
of Foreign Semiconductors, called for the termination of the 
Semiconductor Agreement.  Yoshida criticized the provision in the 
agreement stipulating that foreign semiconductors should reach a 
20 percent share of Japan's semiconductor market, asserting that 
"in the past, this figure has tended to take on a life of its own 
beyond the purpose for which it was originally intended."  He 
argued that the figure was "no longer necessary" and that "the 
private sector should be left alone to look after its own 
affairs" now that increasing contacts between the U.S. and 
Japanese semiconductor industries had laid the foundation for 
future cooperation between the two. 
(AUTHOR:  COHEN.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ASIA DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (7O3)-733-6534.) 
EAG/HEBBEL/SDJ 22/1527Z JUN 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23120 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000033694001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   23 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
ATTN USVIENNA FOR IAEA 
FBIS TRENDS-DPRK-ROK-U.S. 
<H3> <TI>      North Accepts South's Call for Talks on Inter-Korean Summit </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       North Accepts South's Call for Talks on Inter-Korean Summit </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                              In a move clearly designed to defuse the current crisis over the 
nuclear issue, Pyongyang has accepted Seoul's proposal to hold a 
vice premier level meeting next week to prepare for an inter- 
Korean summit.   Although Pyongyang media portrayed in a positive 
light former U.S. President Jimmy Carter's recent visit--at which 
North Korean President Kim Il-song broached the proposal for a 
North-South summit--North Korean media have not acknowledged 
foreign reporting that it was Kim who initiated the current move 
toward an inter-Korean summit during Mr. Carter's visit. 

                          END SUMMARY 

Pyongyang's acceptance, which came in a 22 June "telephone 
message" from Premier Kang Song-san to ROK Prime Minister Yi 
Yong-tok (Pyongyang radio, 22 June), seemed calculated to project 
an image of sincerity.  In a departure from the longstanding 
inter-Korean practice of counterproposing sundry amendments to 
the other side's proposal, Kang said that the North Korean 
delegation will be headed by "an official of a vice-premier 
level" and that it will be at Panmunjom on 28 June, as suggested 
by the South.  Eschewing snide remarks that often marked 
Pyongyang's past communication to Seoul (SEE NOTE), Kang 
"welcomed" the South's "readiness" to hold a summit. 

(NOTE: For instance, in a 6 September 1993 telephone message on 
the inter-Korean exchange of special envoys, Kang told his 
Southern counterpart that it was fortunate that the South, 
"although belatedly," came to an "understanding of the true 
meaning" of envoy exchange (Pyongyang radio).) 

Justification for Shift     Kang sought to justify the abrupt 
turnabout in North Korean policy--from the months-long 
vilification of ROK President Kim.Yong-nam as a "traitor" to 
Kim's acceptance by Pyongyang as a dialogue partner of "the Great 
Leader"--by essentially denying that there has been any change. 
Ignoring the fact that Seoul's call for the preparatory talks was 
in response to Kim Il-song's reported initiative, Kang depicted 
the South Korean proposal as in conformity with the North's long- 
standing and "consistent" policy of seeking to "remove distrust 
and confrontation" between the two halves of Korea through summit 
talks.  Appealing to the nationalistic aspirations of South 
Koreans, Kang reiterated Pyongyang's call to achieve 
"independent" national reunification "without relying on outside 
forces."  He did not acknowledge the go-between role reportedly 
played by former U.S. President Carter. 

Carter Visit     Pyongyang's treatment of the former President's 
15-18 June visit seemed designed to show that, despite its 
confrontational behavior in recent weeks,  North Korea still 
hopes to salvage its relations with the United States.  While 
President Kim Il-song's talks with Mr. Carter were routinely 
reported to have held in a "sincere" and "warm" atmosphere 
(Pyongyang radio, 16 June, KCNA, 17 June), Kim, in a gesture 
reserved only for the most distinguished of foreign visitors, 
personally accompanied the former President on a visit to one of 
the country's "gigantic" construction projects (KCNA, 17 June). 
Pyongyang radio also portrayed North Korean Foreign Minister Kim 
Yong-nam as being upbeat about the prospects for improved 
relations, quoting him as describing Mr. Carter's "extraordinary 
visit" as a possible beginning of a "gradual" process of turning 
the current "distrust and hostility" between the two countries 
into "good-neighborliness, friendship, and mutual respect."  The 
radio also quoted Foreign Minister Kim as stating that all U.S.- 
North Korean problems, including the nuclear issue, can be solved 
if the United States respects North Korea's "sovereignty" (16 
June). 

In a further indication of North Korean interest in using the 
visit to play up the prospects for improved relations with 
Washington, Pyongyang radio also reported approvingly, and in 
considerable detail, Mr. Carter's comments--made at a post-visit 
press conference in Panmunjom--calling for the establishment of 
"full relations" between the United States and North Korea.  It 
cited the former President as saying that despite "differences of 
opinion" between the two countries, outstanding issues can be 
resolved through "direct talks."  In addition, the radio cited 
him as predicting that the nuclear issue will be resolved 
"smoothly" (18 June). 

Implications     Pyongyang's willingness to forego polemics with 
the South over the summit issue--at least initially--points up 
the alarm with which it apparently views the current crisis. 
Similarly, North Korean media's upbeat portrayal of Mr. Carter's 
visit appears to reflect the North Korean leadership's eagerness 
to avoid a showdown with the United States and the international 
community. 

(AUTHOR:  YIM.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ASIA DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6534.) 
EAG/HORTON/SDJ 22/1817Z JUN 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23121 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000033794001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   23 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
WARNING: VIENNA PLEASE PASS TO BOSNIA 
FBIS TRENDS-22JUN94-YUGOSLAVIA 
<H3> <TI>      Former Yugoslavia </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Former Yugoslavia </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
Show      of Solidarity Follows Speech Cautioning Hardliners 

                        SUMMARY 

   The declaration by Zoran Lilic, president of the Federal Republic 
of Yugoslavia (FRY), that Belgrade would not continue to pay the 
heavy price for the Bosnian and Krajina Serbs to maintain an 
uncompromising position toward a peace settlenient does not appear 
to have affected their negotiating stances.  Despite Lilic's 
cautionary statements,  Bosnian and Krajina Serb leaders have 
continued to take tough stands on the crises in their regions 
without any hint of censure from Belgrade. 

                        END SUMMARY 

   While suggesting criticism of Serbs who oppose peace talks, 
Lilic's statements in a June speech in Novi Sad were most likely 
intended more to reiterate Belgrade's position that it supports a 
peaceful resolution of the Balkan conflict.  Insisting that the 
FRY (Serbia and Montenegro) needs peace so that the UN will lift 
the economic sanctions imposed on the country, Lilic warned that 
"nobody has the right" to drag Serbia and the FRY into the war 
and "exhaust their own country."  He emphasized that the 
population of the FRY "cannot be the hostages of a single leader" 
whether he is "from the FRY, the Republic of Srpska" in Bosnia- 
Herzegovina, "or the Republic of Serbian Krajina" in Croatia.  He 
declared that the people of the FRY have a "justified" 
expectation of a "successful outcome to the peace talks" and 
"cannot agree to the option of their endless foot-dragging, 
sabotage, and blackmailing" (Belgrade TV, 7 June).  Most likely 
trying to avoid open conflict in Serb ranks, Lilic did not 
specify who was responsible for the footdragging and sabotage of 
peace negotiations. 

   Lilic's remarks echoed those of Serbian President Slobodan 
Milosevic on other occasions when the Serbian president has 
called--albeit with mixed success--upon the Bosnian or Krajina 
Serbs to compromise for the greater good of Serbia, the FRY, and 
all Serbdom.  During the negotiations in January 1993 that 
eventually led to the Vance-Owen peace plan for Bosnia- 
Herzegovina, Milosevic reportedly warned Karadzic that he "could 
not hold all of Yugoslavia as his hostage" by refusing to 
compromise (Vreme, 13 June).  Ultimately, Karadzic and the 
Bosnian Serbs rejected the Vance-Owen plan in May 1993 in 
defiance of Milosevic's wishes.  At the same time, the Belgrade 
media used the episode to argue that the UN sanctions against the 
FRY were unjust because, as the Yugoslav leadership had claimed 
all along, Belgrade's influence over the Bosnian Serbs was 
limited.  When Milosevic sought to persuade then-President of the 
RSK Milan Babic to accept the Vance peace plan for Croatia, the 
Serbian president similarly warned the RSK leader that he would 
not be allowed to hold the Serbs of Yugoslavia as "hostages" to 
Babic's personal ambitions (Tanjug, 11 January 1992).  In that 
instance, Milosevic proved successful:  The Krajina Serbs 
accepted the Vance plan and removed Babic from office in February 
1992. 

   Lilic's remarks apparently had unintended consequences that the 
Serbian leadership and the Milosevic-controlled media have tried 
to counter.  The FRY President's statements set off a round of 
speculation in the independent Belgrade media, particularly in 
the daily Borba, that the speech was symptomatic of a growing 
rift between Milosevic and Karadzic (Borba, 9 and 11-12 June; 
Vreme, 13 June).  Radovan Karadzic, president of the "Republic of 
Srpska" (RS) in Bosnia-Herzegovina, Milan Martic, president of 
"Republic of Serbian Krajina" in Croatia, and other leaders 
dismissed the matter by asserting that the speech did not refer 
to them (Vreme, 13 June).  In an interview in a Belgrade daily, 
Karadzic declared that if Serbia is "provoked and dragged into 
the war" it would be neither because of the Bosnian Serbs 
intentions nor as a result of their actions.  Moreover, he 
deflected the thrust of Lilic's warning by claiming that the 
United States is "working to get Serbia and the FRY involved in 
the war" (Vecernje Novosti, 17 June).  On the other hand, Biljana 
Plavsic, "vice president" of the RS, responded bitterly to 
Lilic's remarks.  She likened him to Serbian opposition party 
leader Vuk Draskovic, whom she accused of advocating surrender to 
the "blackmail" offered the Serbs in the peace talks (Borba, 9 
June). 

   Several subsequent statements denied the existence of any rift 
between Belgrade and its allies across the Drina and, at the same 
time, appeared to be an attempt to tone down--if not deny--the 
message sent by Lilic's speech.  Not long after the controversy 
over the speech erupted in the media, the Belgrade television 
news program Dnevnik carried a statement from a local leader of 
the ruling Socialist Party of Serbia reemphasizing the Serbian 
position that the Serbs had been victims in Bosnia-Herzegovina 
and that peace would only come with the international community's 
and other warring sides' "acknowledgment of the interests of the 
Serbian people."  Zeljko Simic, deputy premier of the FRY, 
blandly claimed that Lilic's remarks were only intended as a 
general warning against possible "willful actions of any 
politician" and that Lilic had not even excluded himself from 
those who needed to be cautioned.  He insisted that Lilic's 
speech had been delivered "with the aim of sobering both the 
public and certain significant political individuals" and 
"warning" them not to put their "personal interests, or even 
their will," above the national interests of the FRY (Belgrade 
radio, 13 July). 

Unyielding Stance 

   The Milosevic regime's response to Bosnian and Krajina Serb 
behavior since the controversy over Lilic's speech suggests that 
Belgrade has made no effort to persuade its allies to compromise 
and, if anything, may have encouraged a renewed effort to stand 
firm: 

   Quality for Quantity.  Neither the Belgrade leadership nor 
Milosevic-controlled media have been observed to criticize 
Karadzic despite his recent escalation of Bosnian Serb 
territorial demands that could dampen hopes for a peace 
settlement in the near future.   Although Karadzic, during his 
13-15 June visit to Moscow, suggested that the Bosnian Serbs 
could agree to the 51-49 percent split of Bosnian territory 
between the Bosnian government and the Serbs, he insisted that 
that could happen only if the boundaries of the proposed 
territorial division were significantly renegotiated (Moscow TV, 
14 June).  The Serbs, he said, demanded an exchange of territory 
based on the principle of "quantity for quality" to create 
"compact territory" (Tanjug, 14 June).  Then, in his 17 June 
interview with Vecernje Novosti, Karadzic backtracked from his 
Moscow statements, saying that the Serbs could not accept a 49- 
percent share of Bosnian territory as a "final solution."  He 
also reiterated previous demands that the Serbs be granted 
control of parts of Sarajevo, suggested that he might also seek 
control of Tuzla, and discussed the Serbs' proposal for an 
exchange of territory with Croatia to gain access to the Adriatic 
south of Dubrovnik (Tanjug, 17 June). 

   Karadzic's uncompromising demands were not reported by the 
Belgrade media until after he consulted with Milosevic on 16 
June, suggesting that the Bosnian Serb leader felt the need to 
get Milosevic's  approval before announcing  his latest 
negotiating position.  In an apparent attempt to dispel the 
rumors of a rift between the two leaders, Karadzic and a smiling 
Milosevic were shown on Belgrade television conferring amiably on 
Karadzic's return from a  14-15 [?]June visit to Moscow. 
Although the report did not broadcast the two leaders' comments 
to each other, a Tanjug statement read by the television news 
announcer gave no indication of any deviations from previous 
statements professing the Serbs' desire for peace and their 
demand for "equal treatment" by the international community 
(Belgrade TV, 16 June). 

   No Compromises from Knin.  Suggesting that Lilic's 7 June speech 
also did not signal a softening of Belgrade's support for the 
Krajina Serbs' demands or negotiating tactics, negotiations 
between Zagreb and Knin scheduled for 16 June foundered when the 
Serbs refused to accept the presence of more than two Croatian 
journalists at the talks.  The Belgrade media gave no indication 
that the Milosevic regime objected to the scuttling of the talks 
over what appeared to be a minor protocol point.  Moreover, 
suggesting bleak prospects for future talks, Martic has demanded 
from the Croatian Government "compensation to hard currency 
account holders" and to the "57,000 pensioners" living in the 
RSK, warning that such compensation is a precondition for the 
reopening of the Adriatic oil pipeline shut down by the Serbs 
since the early days of the 1991 war in Croatia.  He also has 
declared that the pipeline can be reopened only if it were 
allowed to deliver "Krajina crude oil" to the Pancevo refinery in 
the FRY (Tanjug in Serbo-Croatian, 14 June).  Not only does 
Zagreb deny the Krajina Serbs' right to pump the oil from oil 
fields owned by Croatian companies, but it--and the international 
community--would adamantly oppose such a violation of the UN 
sanctions against the FRY. 

Prospects 

   While Lilic's speech served as a reminder that the Milosevic 
regime intends to retain control of the Serbian nationalist 
movement in former Yugoslavia, it did not signal a retreat from 
Milosevic's goal of eventually uniting all Serbs in one state. 
Although Milosevic is willing to let the FRY make significant 
sacrifices to obtain that goal, Lilic's speech implies that 
Belgrade has set limits on the demands that the Serbs should make 
and the tactics they should use to achieve them.  Those limits, 
however, are apparently intended to rein in only the most extreme 
demands by Bosnian and Krajina Serb leaders.  Belgrade's apparent 
endorsement of Martic's and Karadzic's toughened negotiating 
strategies suggests that they have stayed within the limits.  At 
the same time, it helps Belgrade's efforts to win the lifting of 
UN sanctions to claim that the Bosnian and Krajina Serbs act 
independently and that Belgrade disapproves of the Bosnian war. 

(AUTHOR:  NASH.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF 
ANALYST, EUROPE &amp; LATIN AMERICA GROUP (703) 733-6120.) 
ELAG/GILl SON/SDJ 22/1826Z JUN 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23122 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000033894001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   23 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS ANALYSIS-22jun94-Russia 
<H3> <TI>      Russian Military Expands Media Influence </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Russian Military Expands Media Influence </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
Faced      with continuing budget cuts and low morale, the Russian 
military has turned to the electronic media in an effort to build 
greater public support for the Armed Forces and military 
spending.  Apparently convinced that electronic media are more 
effective means for influencing public opinion than traditional 
print media, the Ministry of Defense has expanded its television 
and radio production capabilities while substantially reducing 
the number of ministry-sponsored newspapers, magazines, and 
journals.  As a result, radio and television programming written 
and produced at the Ministry of Defense has begun appearing 
regularly on the national radio and television networks.  While 
it is too soon to tell if the effort is having the desired 
effect, defense ministry programming, which often plays to 
Russians' sense of injured national pride, could end up 
strengthening Russian nationalism. 

The Central Television and Radio Broadcasting Studio of the 
Ministry of Defense ("VoyenTV") was created less than two years 
ago as a broadcasting service aimed mainly at servicemen, but the 
ministry now appears to have enlarged its mission, using it as a 
tool to influence public opinion at large on problems facing the 
armed forces: 

-- When the ministry announced the creation of its own television 
and radio studio in September 1992, studio chief Aleksandr 
Yakubovskiy said the studio would "inform the Russian and foreign 
public" of developments within the armed forces, but suggested 
that its main mission was to broadcast to military personnel and 
to coordinate the work of smaller military radio and TV studios 
operating in military units around the country.  According to 
Yakubovskiy, the intent was to facilitate the "normal activities 
of military personnel," and to "promote the revival of military 
traditions, cultural enlightenment of soldiers and officers, and 
the preparation of draftees for service in the armed forces." 
Yakubovskiy added that the studio had arranged to broadcast its 
programs through the Russian Radio and Television Broadcasting 
Company (RTV) and stressed that the ministry studio was "a 
component part" of RTV (ITAR-TASS, 23 September 1992). 

-- Over the next 18 months, studio officials began describing the 
studio's mission in broader terms and its programming expanded 
rapidly into the civilian electronic media, suggesting that the 
Defense Ministry is placing increased emphasis on communicating 
through such media and targeting its communications at the 
general public.  Perhaps reflecting an enhanced estimation within 
the ministry of the importance of electronic media, Yakubovskiy 
said in a 27 April 1993 interview that radio and television are 
"where the future lies; it is the future of all mass information 
media" (Ostankino TV).  In a 23 October 1993 interview with 
Krasnaya Zvezda, deputy studio chief Vladimir Borovyak described 
the studio's mission as to help implement "Russia's military 
policy," foster an "understanding of the problems of war and 
peace," provide "correct information" about life in the army and 
navy, and assist in the "struggle against unbridled pacifism." 
Radio and television reports produced by the ministry studio have 
been carried not only on RTV but on the Ostankino Radio and 
Television Broadcasting Company (OTV) (See Note 1) as well as 
regional and local broadcasting outlets.  According to Borovyak, 
ministry-produced reports are included on "Vesti" and "Novosti"- 
-the main news programs of RTV and OTV, respectively--and full- 
length specials produced at the ministry were appearing on 
national and regional networks (Krasnaya Zvezda, 23 October 
1993).  In addition, the studio's radio reports are now being 
aired regularly by Radio Mayak (which is part of OTV), Radio 
Rossii (which is part of RTV), and Moscow Radio International 
Service, in addition to the ministry's own frequencies, which are 
aimed at Moscow, the Baltics, the.Caucasus, and Central Asia 
(Radio Mayak, 23 July 1993; Radio Rossii, 30 October 1993; Moscow 
Radio International Service, 23 November 1993). 

(Note 1) RTV and OTV are the only national radio/television 
networks in Russia.  Both are government owned and are overseen 
by the Federal Television and Radio Broadcasting Service, headed 
by Aleksandr Yakovlev. 

Defense Ministry television products, which are often identified 
onscreen by the "VoyenTV" or "Radar-TV" (See Note 2) logos, 
consist of background video footage provided in support of 
military-related news, audio-visual reports that are carried as 
part of regular newscasts, and prepackaged programs of varying 
length that are broadcast periodically.  In addition to "Vesti" 
and "Novosti," military television contributes to the morning 
program "Utro" (OTV), the weekly military-affairs programs 
"Poligon" and "Military Review" (OTV), and reportedly to the "Man 
and Law" (OTV), "Far from Moscow" (RTV), and "Key to the Start" 
(network affiliation unknown) programs.  Military television also 
produces at least two weekly programs of its own-- "Military 
Courier," which airs on RTV, and "VoyenTV On The Air," which airs 
on the "Northern Crown" regional network--and has reportedly 
produced documentaries on the arms trade, the Russian 
contribution to the 1993 Le Bourget air show, and the airborne 
troops, each of which, according to military TV chief Borovyak, 
aired first on OTV and then in some cases was repeated on 
regional channels. (See Note 3) 

(Note 2) The "Radar-TV" logo represents the Television and Radio 
Society, also called "Radar," which was inaugurated in February 
1991 under sponsorship of the then-USSR Ministry of Defense. 
"Radar" appears to have survived the USSR's breakup primarily as 
a producer of relatively in-depth radio and television programs 
sometimes in conjunction with the ministry's Central Radio and 
Television Broadcasting Studio.  While the exact relationship 
between Radar-TV and VoyenTV is unclear, their missions seem to 
be the same.  Radar-TV's original director, Col. Valeriy 
Voloshin, said in 1991 that the goal of the Radar studio would be 
"to raise the prestige of the armed forces, to strengthen the 
unity of the army and people, and to promote army reforms" 
(Moscow Radio Domestic Service, 13 December 1990; Pravda, 22 
February 1991). 

(Note 3) The information on military TV's contributions to the 
"Man and Law," "Far from Moscow," and "Key to the Start" programs 
and its documentary productions comes from Borovyak's 23 October 
1993 interview with Krasnaya Zvezda.  The information on its 
production of "Military Courier," "VoyenTV On The Air," and its 
contributions to "Vesti," "Novosti," "Utro," "Military Review," 
and "Poligon" comes from the Borovyak interview, program videos 
displaying the "VoyenTV" or "Radar-TV" logos, and television 
listings in Sem Dney, Krasnaya Zvezda, Moskovskaya Pravda, and 
Moskovskiy Komsomolets. 

The Information War 

The expansion of military TV and radio programming is in part an 
effort to counter what the military portrays as inaccurate or 
biased coverage of military issues by the civilian media.  In a 
17 February Krasnaya Zvezda article, Maj. Gen. Yevgeniy 
Korotchenko, a professor at the General Staff Academy and a 
frequent commentator on military affairs, suggested that unnamed 
forces are deliberately engaged in a war of disinformation to 
exploit Russia's weakened state.  Characterizing information as a 
"weapon," Korotchenko chided the "public mass media" for 
"falsification and manipulation of facts," adding that 
television, in particular, can be "an agent for social 
degradation."  Korotchenko suggested that the military address 
the problem by aggressively rebutting such misinformation through 
"television and radio appeals, direct contacts, press 
conferences, and briefings."  Korotchenko noted the "special 
role" of television in influencing the populace and said TV "is 
becoming the predominant means of information in the armed 
services." 

Allegations that civilian media misinform the public about the 
armed forces and calls for the military to take corrective action 
have been a consistent theme in the military media since the 
Russian Armed Forces were created two years ago: 

-- The May 1992 edition of Armiya carried an article asserting 
that an "information vacuum" about the armed services was being 
filled by large-circulation civilian publications, such as 
Komsomolskaya Pravda and Izvestiya, which provide only "an 
extremely approximate depiction" of military life, with the 
result that "people have begun to fear military service." 

-- In an interview published by Krasnaya Zvezda on 11 September 
1992, then-chief of the Defense Ministry Press Service Valeriy 
Chirvin said the ministry wanted to establish "a partnership" 
with the news media to counter "hearsay, unverified information, 
and sometimes outright lies." 

-- More recently, Chief of the General Staff Col. Gen. Mikhail 
Kolesnikov condemned "pseudosensationalistic stories, unconfirmed 
facts, rumors, conjecture, and sometimes even barefaced lies" in 
the civilian news media, adding that the military should "stop 
being always on the defensive" and more assertively combat "liars 
and spreaders of disinformation and calumny" (Krasnaya Zvezda, 16 
March).  (See Box for information on military efforts to suppress 
critics of defense ministry policies in the independent press and 
electronic media.) 

Until recently, the ministry appeared pleased with the results of 
its effort to reach the public through television.  In October 
1993--a year after the studio was created--Krasnaya Zvezda 
correspondent Igor Yadykin praised military TV, asserting that it 
has "already managed to sear us" with the "harsh truth of 
soldiers' gray daily routines" and claiming that military TV "is 
beginning to win prestige among viewers" (23 October 1993).  In a 
similarly upbeat comment in the same article, Borovyak said the 
studio is planning new programs, including "news and analysis and 
topic-related programs," has established relationships with 
civilian production studios for production of specials on 
military topics, and hopes to inaugurate "educational programs 
for cable television and satellite television." 

More recently, however, the ministry's Central Television and 
Radio Studio has reportedly been subjected to severe criticism 
within the ministry, possibly because some in the ministry 
thought that the studio did not do enough to aid the military's 
effort to increase the 1994 defense budget.  According to 
Komsomolskaya Pravda (26 May), Gen. Vladimir Kosarev, the chief 
of the ministry's Information and Press Directorate, which 
oversees the studio, "came down like a ton of bricks" on the 
studio for failure to "give wide and full representation . . . of 
the process of developing the Russian army" and accused the 
studio of "financial irregularities" and "nepotism."  In an 
indication that he continues to support the ministry's efforts at 
publicizing the army via television and radio, Kosarev reportedly 
called for replacing the studio leadership with "more experienced 
cadres." 
Military Journalists' Unacknowledged Roles 

In addition to placing programs produced at the Ministry of 
Defense studio on civilian television, some VoyenTV 
correspondents also report on military affairs for civilian news 
and military-affairs programs without acknowledging their ties to 
the Defense Ministry, thus further expanding the military's 
influence over programming on military and security issues: 

-- Aleksandr Ostrovskiy, a correspondent and director for VoyenTV 
productions, is also a frequent contributor to OTV programs, 
including Novosti, Utro, and Itogi, even though his connection 
with VoyenTV is often not acknowledged (OTV, 19 January 1993, 18 
July 1993, 17 November 1993, 9 January, 2 February).  In his 
unattributed reports, Ostrovskiy often deals with military- 
funding problems, placing the blame for these problems in typical 
VoyenTV fashion on the Ministry of Finance or the government in 
general while avoiding criticism of Defense Ministry officials or 
policies (OTV, 21 April 1993, 15 May 1993, 26 June 1993, 9 
January, 2 May). 

-  While Ostrovskiy is associated mainly with OTV, his VoyenTV 
colleague Igor Krondo has provided similarly uncritical military 
news for RTV as a reporter for Vesti without acknowledgement of 
his military links (RTV, 3 October 1993, 14 October 1993, 31 
October 1993, 6 November 1993).  In early 1994, the Defense 
Ministry announced that Krondo would host VoyenTV's new "Military 
Courier" program, and since then he has not been observed to have 
appeared on Vesti (Krasnaya Zvezda, 22 January). 

-- Other VoyenTV correspondents who have doubled as reporters for 
civilian TV without always acknowledging their VoyenTV connection 
include Mikhail Zverev (Vesti and Novosti), Aleksandr Ilyin 
(Vesti and Novosti) and Viktor Tkachenko (Vesti and Novosti) 
(RTV, 14 July 1993, 13 November 1993, 22 April 1994, 28 April 
1994; OTV, 21 April 1993, 26 April 1993, 27 July 1993, 18 
November 1993). 

Military Television:  The Message 

The cumulative effect of military television programming has been 
to juxtapose Russia's potential as a great power with the reality 
of the country's current political and economic decline.  This 
effect derives from three themes that surface often in military 
TV programming:  the high technological achievements of Russia's 
military-industrial complex, the deleterious effect of budget 
cuts on armed forces research and development, and the plight of 
the average serviceman--especially low pay and lack of housing. 
Examples abound: 

-- Military television reports on Russian military-technological 
achievements are usually rife with hyperbole and comparisons with 
allegedly inferior Western efforts.  A segment on the weekly 
VoyenTV program "Military Courier" extoled the new SU-34 bomber 
as a machine that "has its own features, its own bearing, its own 
fighting spirit, and its own purely Russian unpredictability.  It 
was created for us, for our spirit, for the defense of Russia" 
(RTV, 20 January).  A newly developed combat helicopter, the KA- 
SO "Black Shark," was described as "one of the best combat 
machines of the future" whose aerodynamic qualities are" 
unrivaled." A new troop transport vehicle was heralded as 
"unparalleled in the world," and a new multiple rocket launcher 
was championed as "unique" and "superior" to American models 
(Military Courier, RTV, 28 January, 11 February, 11 March). 

-- Military TV reporting on the effect of military budget cuts 
are often linked to the prospect of Russia losing its superpower 
status.  On 25 April 1993, a VoyenTV segment on OTV's weekly 
"Military Review" program criticized a government order blocking 
further development of the MiG-29M "superfighter," which the 
program characterized as unsurpassed in aerial combat.  "Clearly 
we are once again making a mistake here," the correspondent said, 
adding, "surely it is not necessary to go to such unreasonable 
lengths" to cut defense spending.  During a 9 January segment on 
OTV's "Poligon" program, VoyenTV correspondents praised Russia's 
Typhoon-class ballistic missile submarines as the "pride and joy" 
of the Russian Navy and unequaled in the world, only to add 
gloomily that budget problems threaten not only the Typhoon but 
"the very future of the Russian Navy" (9 January).  More 
recently, VoyenTV has addressed the recent battle over the 
defense budget in even blunter terms.  For example, a 27 May 
segment on "Military Courier" (RTV) claimed that continued 
production of the Russian SS-25 mobile ICBM--"our latest and most 
powerful missile"--might have to be "substantially curtailed" 
because of the shortage of finance, thus "impairing" the missile 
force's "combat readiness."  In a direct challenge to the 
legislators, correspondent Tkachenko asked rhetorically, "Will 
Russia continue to be a great power, or will it turn into a 
banana republic?  Today this does not depend on the missile 
troops but on the politicians." 

-- Military television portrays the average serviceman as 
increasingly despondent over the lack of social and material 
support.  A 1992 documentary produced by Radar-TV painted a 
disturbing picture of the strategic missile forces, citing 
mounting social tension" and "thousands of officers with no 
housing, officers who have lost all hope that they will ever be 
able to live in normal conditions" (OTV, 22 November 1992).  A 27 
April 1993 VoyenTV report on "Utro" described the severe housing 
shortage for reserve officers, highlighting an interview with the 
weeping wife of a reserve officer about to be evicted (OTV).  On 
another VoyenTV report, the commander of the airborne troops 
complained of a shortage of food and housing at some garrisons, 
adding that "not a single soldier being withdrawn [from former 
Soviet republics and Eastern Europe] has an apartment" (Moscow 
Central TV, 1 August 1993).  More recently, according to a 
VoyenTV report, the lack of housing and pay delays of up to three 
months contribute to "a very depressing picture" for servicemen 
(OTV, 23 February). 

Military Radio 

Although perhaps lacking the impact of television, radio 
programming attributed to the Ministry of Defense has expanded 
even faster, enjoys more airtime, and covers a wider scope of 
subjects than military TV.  The ministry inaugurated a 25-minute 
program, "Radio Slavyanka," over Mayak Radio (which is part of 
OTV) in July 1993.  "Radio Slavyanka" has since begun daily 30- 
minute broadcasts aimed at Russian troops in Tajikistan (August 
1993), daily two-hour shortwave broadcasts to the Baltics, the 
Caucasus, and Central Asia (October 1993), and apparently 
continuous broadcasts on its own frequency to the Moscow area 
(January 1994).  "Radio Slavyanka" also began broadcasting over 
Radio Rossii (a part of RTV) in January 1994, announcing that it 
had arranged to provide 1O-minute newscasts three mornings a week 
plus a 35-minute program every three weeks (Mayak Radio, 23 July 
1993, 6 August 1993, and 1 February; Radio Rossii, 1 November 
1993 and 16 January 1994). 

While military radio covers many of the same topics as military 
television, the medium appears also to serve as a forum for top 
military officials.  Statements by or interviews with Defense 
Minister Pavel Grachev, Chief of Staff Kolesnikov, deputy defense 
ministers, and chiefs of the armed forces branches are aired more 
frequently on military radio than on military TV.  For example, 
Grachev used military radio on numerous occasions during and 
after the 3-4 October 1993 crisis to praise the performance of 
the military and to assure listeners that the military was under 
control.  Military radio also carries more "straight" news 
reporting on a wider variety of topics, including CIS and foreign 
affairs, than military TV.  "Radar" radio--the broadcasting 
cousin of Radio Slavyanka--mainly airs interviews on defense- 
related issues with leading officials, but has not been observed 
to have aired since 3O December 1993, suggesting that the "Radar" 
radio studio is being phased out or integrated into Slavyanka 
(Mayak Radio, 27 September 1993, 30 December 1993; Radio Rossii, 
6 October 1993, 12 October 1993, 16 January, 20 February; Moscow 
Radio, 21 April). 

"Optimizing" the Military Press 

The expansion of Russian military involvement in the electronic 
media appears in part to be an effort to compensate for the 
reduced influence of military newspapers, magazines, and 
journals, which have suffered in recent years from declining 
subscriptions and rising costs. (See Note 4)  As early as May 
1992, the military journal Armiya was mourning the falling 
prestige and subscription rates of military publications, 
recalling that before the breakup of the Soviet Union, well- 
funded military publications catered to a broad range of readers 
"and enabled Russia's military-political leadership to exert an 
appropriate degree of influence upon the public mind" (No. 9, May 
1992).  In August 1992, the Defense Ministry newspaper Krasnaya 
Zvezda, noting the "disastrous rise" in production costs, said 
that the armed forces' reduced ability to reach military 
pensioners and other constituents was impeding-their ability "to 
influence [the] solution" of military problems  (1 August 1992). 

(Note 4) According to the May 1992 edition of the journal Armiya, 
not a single military publication printed then at the Krasnaya 
Zvezda printing plant was profitable.  The journal reported that 
1992 subscriptions to Armiya, Krasnaya Zvezda, and "the 15 or so" 
national military magazines had dropped by SO percent from 1991, 
while the cost of subscribing to these and other national armed 
forces periodicals increased on average by a factor of 10 to 12 
during the first half of 1992.   According to print-run data 
published in each edition of Krasnaya Zvezda, for example, 
1,059,353 copies of the newspaper were printed on 31 October 
1991--before the breakup of the Soviet Union; 650,651 copies were 
printed on 3O June 1992--six months after the union's collapse; 
and only 160,000 copies were printed on 20 April 1994.  According 
to Maj. Gen. Kosarev, chief of the ministry's Information and 
Press Department, in 1993 the army published a total of 102 
periodicals (national and regional), at a cost of slightly over 1 
billion rubles (ITAR-TASS, 11 February 1994). 

In response to the financial crisis, the ministry announced in 
February that it would reduce the number of newspapers and 
magazines, eliminating some and consolidating others (ITAR-TASS, 
11 February). (See Note 5)  Maj. Gen. Kosarev, chief of the 
ministry's Information and Press Department, cited financial 
problems, the overall reduction in the numerical strength of the 
armed forces, and the existence of "unnecessary" military 
newspapers as reasons for the cutbacks.  Those that remain, he 
added, will be "optimised"--meaning they will be upgraded with 
improved equipment.  Kosarev said the changes, when combined with 
increased television and radio output, "will allow us to make the 
Defense Ministry's mass media more compact, to make effective use 
of the authority of the military press, and to increase its 
influence on our society and on the army." 

(Note 5) According to a 13 March RTV report, five journals- 
-Aviatsiya I Kosmonavtika (Aviation and Space), Vestnik 
Protivovozdushnoy Oborony (The Air Defense Herald),  Voyennyy 
Vestnik (The Military Herald), Voyenno-Ekonomicheskiy Zhurnal 
(The Military-Economic Journal, until recently called The Armed 
Forces Rear Services), and Teknika I Vooruzheniye (Equipment and 
Arms)--will be combined into one--Armeyskiy Sbornik (The Army 
Collection).  In addition, three educational-analytical journals- 
-Armiya (Army), Sobesednik Voyna (The Soldier's Interlocutor), 
and Argument (Argument)--will be consolidated into a journal to 
be called Oriyentir (The Orientator), which is scheduled to begin 
publishing in July 1994.  Other accounts say that Syn Otechestva 
(Son of the Fatherland), a weekly newspaper that was first 
published in 1812, is to be closed (Komsomolskaya Pravda, 2 
February; Obshchaya Gazeta, 11-17 February). 

Implications 

The ministry's effort to use civilian radio and television 
programming to publicize the achievements of and difficulties 
faced by the armed forces probably represents its assessment that 
propagating what it considers to be an accurate picture of 
military life will increase public support for the armed forces. 
The effort could, however, have other effects on public opinion. 
By contrasting past achievements with the depressing economic 
realities in Russia today, it is likely to reinforce a sense of 
wounded national pride, which could fuel Russian nationalism.  As 
the ministry's media activities increase--and they are supported 
by a new bureaucracy reportedly significantly larger than that 
which existed under the USSR Ministry of Defense--and if 
alternative views of the military are stifled, the effect could 
be to reinforce a sense of loss of national prestige among the 
Russian people, strengthen the appeal of authoritarian forces in 
society, and weaken the forces of democratization. 

Box 

       Ministry of Defense Efforts to Suppress Media Criticism 

In addition to its effort to provide the mass media with 
information that supports its interests, the Russian Ministry of 
Defense has also shown a willingness to use pressure tactics to 
try to suppress critics of the ministry in the print and 
electronic media.  While most of the ministry's efforts have not 
succeeded in removing its critics, evidence suggests that it has 
succeeded in toning down the criticism: 

-- In November 1992, Grachev reportedly tried to have the 
occasionally irreverent RTV military-affairs program "Aty-Baty" 
taken off the air and replaced by a Defense Ministry production. 
According to Interfax (25 November 1992), Grachev said he had 
convinced President Boris Yeltsin to instruct then-Minister of 
the Press and Information Mikhail Poltoranin "to consider the 
expediency" of continuing the program.  Grachev, according to 
Interfax, complained that "Aty-Baty" had a "clear anti-army 
bias."  Although "Aty-Baty" remains on the air with a contract 
reportedly extending through 1994, program director Igor 
Serebryakov later acknowledged that the program's "objective 
position" causes "anger and resentment among very many forces" 
and that "a very powerful pressure has been applied to our 
journalists since the creation of the company and it continues 
even now" (RTV, 31 July 1993).  In fact, "Aty-Baty" programming 
since Grachev's attack has lacked the feisty irreverence of 
earlier programs, which probed such issues as the sudden 
resignations of reform-minded advisers to Grachev (31 October 
1992) and carried interviews with members of officers' assemblies 
critical of ministry policies (6 December 1992).  More common now 
are relatively bland programs on topics such as military training 
institutes (19 December 1993, 9 January 1994, 6 March 1994) or 
interviews with Duma members who offer only guarded criticism of 
the ministry (20 February 1994).  The change in tone did not go 
unnoticed by Pravda, which reported on 11 June 1993 that "Aty- 
Baty," fearful of losing its contract, had decided to "fawn up" 
to Grachev. 

-- In December 1992, Lt. Col. Aleksandr Zhilin, the reformist 
editor-in-chief of the military affairs weekly Armiya Rossii,* 
was dismissed from the army, reportedly on Grachev's personal 
orders (Izvestiya, 14 January 1993).  Officially dismissed for 
participation in a commercial publication," many observers 
believe Zhilin was fired for publishing criticism of the Defense 
Ministry in Armiya Rossii (Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 29 January 1993; 
Kuranty, 11 February 1993).  Zhilin himself said in an interview 
that Grachev was "alarmed" by Armiya Rossii articles blaming the 
Defense Ministry for corruption in the armed forces and alleging 
that the army was nearing "a social explosion" (OTV, 12 February 
1993).  The newspaper continued publishing through at least March 
1993, after which it was no longer observed, and since then 
Zhilin has continued his criticism of the ministry as a 
commentator for Moskovskiye Novosti (19 May 1993, 21 November 
1993, 2 February 1994). 

-- In a 25 November 1993 article, Komsomolskaya Pravda military 
correspondent Igor Chernyak, whose "Military Review" column 
occasionally criticized Grachev, wrote that Komsomolskaya Pravda 
had been "crossed off the list" of newspapers invited to a 
Defense Ministry briefing.  Chernyak suggested that the the paper 
was excluded because it published complaints from army officers 
that, "to put it mildly, do not flatter the military department." 
Three months later, the Defense Ministry newspaper Krasnaya 
Zvezda carried a blistering attack on Chernyak in an 
unattributed, front-page article.  The military newspaper accused 
Chernyak of "repeatedly publishing unverified facts or 
information known to be false."  Krasnaya Zvezda labeled one 
Chernyak report--on the alleged resignation of Army Chief of 
Staff Kolesnikov--as "an attempt to sow enmity . . . and thus 
weaken one of the most stable of state institutions--the Russian 
Armed Forces" (19 February).  Although Chernyak continues to 
write about the armed forces in Komsomolskaya Pravda, another 
journalist, Aleksandr Khokhlov, has authored the "Military 
Review" column since 1 March.  Thus far, Khokhlov's articles have 
avoided the kind of personal barbs that Chernyak occasionally 
aimed at ministry leaders.  The switch to Khokhlov--a veteran 
Komsomolskaya Pravda writer whose service on the paper predates 
the breakup of the USSR--may have been intended to molify the 
Defense Ministry and regain access to ministry briefings, which 
Khokhlov evidently is allowed to attend (Komsomolskaya Pravda, 1 
March, 22 March, 13 April, 27 April, 1 May). 

*The newspaper was reportedly cofounded by the Russian 
Information Agency (RIA), the independent military-affairs 
information agency MARS, and the Committee for the Social 
Provision for Servicemen of the Russian Ministry of Defense 
(Radio Rossii, 22 November 1992; Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 29 January 
1993; Kuranty, 11 February 1993).  See FBIS Foreign Media Note FB 
PN 93-085, "Defense Ministry Slammed for Firing 'Armiya Rossii' 
Editor, Other 'Dissident' Groups," 26 February 1993, for more 
details surrounding the firing of Zhilin. 

End Box 

(AUTHOR:  ROBERTON.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL 
CHIEF, ANALYSIS BRANCH, RUSSIA DIVISION, (703) 733-6070.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH/SDJ 22/1910Z Jun 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23123 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000033994001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   23 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-22Jun94-Ukraine 
<H3> <TI>      Anti-Reformist Masol Named Premier by Kravchuk and Leftists </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Anti-Reformist Masol Named Premier by Kravchuk and Leftists </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                              Appearing to join leftists rather than fight them, President 
Leonid Kravchuk on 15 June proposed that the Supreme Soviet elect 
as premier Vitaliy Masol, a foe of reforms whom Kravchuk himself 
had helped force out of office in late 1990.  Kravchuk explained 
that he chose the leftist Masol over others simply because he was 
the only candidate with a chance of winning a majority in the 
Supreme Soviet, where leftists form the biggest faction and 
control the leadership, and in fact the Supreme Soviet quickly 
approved him.  The nomination of Masol--a sharp critic of 
Kravchuk rival Leonid Kuchma and a favorite of new Supreme Soviet 
Chairman and presidential candidate Oleksandr Moroz--suggests 
that Kravchuk may be collaborating with Moroz, whom Kravchuk 
surely wants to keep in the presidential race to take away some 
of Kuchma's votes in the east and prevent any possibility of a 
Kuchma victory in the first round. 

                        END SUMMARY 

   Kravchuk offered Supreme Soviet leaders several possible 
candidates for premier, including some who were at least moderate 
economic reformers, but virtually no nationalists or non- 
easterners.  He presented the candidates to the Supreme Soviet 
Presidium, commission chairmen, and heads of factions on 1 June 
(Vysokyy Zamok, 4 June).  Vecherniy Kiev on 7 and 8 June reported 
"from unofficial sources" that Kravchuk had proposed seven 
possibilities--present acting Premier Yukhym Zvyahilskyy (from 
Donetsk), Kravchuk's Odesa protege Valentyn Symonenko, Industry 
Minister Anatoliy Holubchenko, head of the Dnipropetrovsk Oblast 
State Administration (Presidential Representative) Pavlo 
Lazarenko, Liberal Democratic Party leader and former Kuchma and 
Kravchuk adviser Ivan Markulov (Donetsk), Dnipropetrovsk factory 
director Anatoliy Melnyk, and Masol (Donetsk).  Markulov is a 
strong advocate of privatization, Vecherniy Kiev characterized 
Lazarenko as leaning to reform, saying that he "has the 
reputation of an adherent of reforms among circles close to 
Kravchuk," while Symonenko had been put in charge of economic 
reform by Kravchuk in 1992 but was assailed by reformers as not 
really pushing reform. 

   After gauging reaction from the Supreme Soviet leadership, 
Kravchuk on 15 June formally proposed Masol, probably the most 
anti-reformist of the group and certainly no friend to Kravchuk. 
Kravchuk explained that he was proposing Masol simply because he 
was taking account of the "balance of forces in the Supreme 
Soviet" and that "other candidates do not have the support of a 
majority in the Supreme Soviet Presidium and groups" (Kiev radio, 
15 June). (See Note 1)  Kravchuk had played the key role in 
forcing Masol to resign as premier in 1990 (see below), and Masol 
has been harshly critical of Kravchuk, accusing him, for example, 
of tolerating corruption in his presidential entourage (Silski 
Visti, 14 June).  As the 17 June Kyivska Pravda pointed out, 
Kravchuk said "not one word about Vitaliy Masol's working 
qualities" when he presented his candidature to the Supreme 
Soviet. 

(Note 1) Kravchuk had similarly bowed to the will of the dominant 
forces in the Supreme Soviet in late 1992 when he proposed Kuchma 
for premier instead of his own favorite, Valentyn Symonenko. 
(See the Trends of 21 October 1992, pages 25-27.) 

The leftists, who won the largest number of deputies in the 
March-April election and won control of the posts of Supreme 
Soviet chairman and deputy chairmen, clearly supported Masol. 
Moroz praised him as a possible premier in a 21 May Demokratychna 
Ukraina interview, and Masol had been shown special honor when 
the Supreme Soviet opened in early May.  On its opening day, the 
parliament elected a temporary Presidium of five, including Masol 
(ITAR-TASS, 11 May), even though he, unlike the other four, was 
not head of one of the main Supreme Soviet factions.  After 
Kravchuk's nomination, leftist Supreme Soviet First Deputy 
Chairman Oleksandr Tkachenko announced that 12 of the Supreme 
Soviet's commissions backed Masol's candidacy, while two opposed 
and three abstained (Kiev radio, 15 June). 

Masol was quickly approved by the Supreme Soviet, but angry 
democrats and nationalists boycotted the election.  The vote was 
199 to 24 for Masol, with one invalid vote, but the announcement 
of the vote specified that 302 deputies had received ballots but 
only 224 cast votes (Kiev radio, 16 June), indicating that almost 
80 deputies had boycotted the vote.  Rukh Chairman Vyacheslav 
Chornovil had said that "since we are not able to effectively 
influence the formation of the cabinet, our faction, after 
holding consultations, will probably not take part in forming the 
government" (Holos Ukrainy, 28 May), and ITAR-TASS on 16 June 
reported that the majority of the opposition did not participate 
in the voting. 

Masol 

Judging by Masol's recent statements as well as his background, 
he is probably the most leftist-conservative of the proposed 
candidates.  In his 15 June speech to the Supreme Soviet after 
being nominated, Masol called for closer ties to Russia and for 
more state regulation of the economy.  Although he committed 
himself to Ukraine's independence and territorial integrity, he 
defined Ukraine's "economic isolationism" and "breaking of 
economic ties with our age-old partners and neighbors" as "the 
main causes of the state's economic decline" and called for 
closer ties with Russia.  While citing the need for faster 
reforms, a transition to market relations, and support for 
entrepreneurship, as well as declaring Ukraine "a market 
economy," Masol assailed the Ukrainian Government for having 
copied Russian reformer Yegor Gaydar's reforms and he stressed 
protection of the population against the effects of market 
forces; he said nothing about free prices.  Masol added that 
"while giving the reforms a stronger impetus, the government must 
ensure state regulation of the economy, especially in strategic 
industries, which is being done in every market-oriented country" 
(Kiev radio, 15 June). 
Although he gave favorable mention to economic reform in his 
Supreme Soviet speech, Masol had made clear his anti-reform views 
and his hostility to Kravchuk and Kuchma just a few days earlier. 
In a long interview in the 3, 7, 9, and 14 June Silski Visti 
entitled "What the 'New Political Course' Has Brought," Masol 
delivered scathing attacks on even the modest reforms of the 
Ukrainian Government, contending that since he left power in late 
1990 the "least favorable variant" of policy has been followed. 
He argued that the fall of production, the "catastrophic lowering 
of people's level of living," and the growth of social tension 
"could have been avoided" and blamed these on the repeated 
"experiments on our own people" and those who "deceived" the 
people with "slogans of 'freedom' and 'democracy,' 'national 
revival' and 'independence'" and promises to create a "miraculous 
market" by means of "shock therapy."  To divert the public from 
dissatisfaction with dropping living standards, he argued, the 
leaders blamed "conservatives" for resisting change and stirred 
up tension with Russia to create an external threat.  He made it 
clear he was blaming both Kuchma and Kravchuk for the disastrous 
policy and, reflecting his dislike for Kravchuk, also directly 
accused the president of tolerating corruption in his 
presidential entourage.  In addition to the Silski Visti 
interview, in a 14 June interview with UNIAN, he criticized those 
who opposed a planned economy and said that he really did not 
want the post of premier but he was "unable to remain on the 
sidelines after the Kuchma government made so many ill-considered 
moves." 

Masol's dislike of Kravchuk and the reformers and his fond 
nostalgia for state planning and the Soviet Union are not 
surprising in view of his career.  He had been Ukraine's Gosplan 
chairman from 1979 until 1987 when he was named premier by 
Ukrainian Communist Party First Secretary Volodymyr 
Shcherbitskyy.  He was driven out of that office in October 1990 
when the democratic opposition organized strikes demanding his 
resignation and dissolution of the Supreme Soviet, after which 
then Supreme Soviet Chairman Kravchuk worked out a compromise, 
persuading Masol to resign to placate the strikers.  Masol's 
subsequent occasional interviews--in the 23 February 1993 Holos 
Ukrainy, 24 July 1993 Demokratychna Ukraina, and in the June 1994 
Silski Visti--underscore how much he resented being sacrificed as 
the scapegoat in a cave-in to the democratic opposition.  In 
retirement he wrote a book "The Lost Chance" lamenting the 
collapse of the USSR (Kyivska Pravda, 17 June).  He has not been 
prominent since leaving office, but ran for the Supreme Soviet 
this March as an independent and won in a runoff in Chernihiv 
over a CPU candidate (Post-Inform, 11 April).  Although not a CPU 
member, he says he "remains a communist at heart" (ITAR-TASS, 16 
June). 

Kravchuk-Moroz Connection 

Kravchuk's nomination of Masol suggests that he has made some 
sort of deal with Moroz or is at least collaborating with him to 
undercut his rivals Plyushch and Kuchma, seeing them as more 
threatening than Moroz and Masol, at least for the moment.  The 
nomination's timing strongly suggests that Kravchuk was motivated 
by political calculations rather than a desire to get the 
government moving in a new or more activist direction.  Kravchuk 
had been willing to let the government go on with only an acting 
premier and virtually no cabinet changes since.shortly after 
Kuchma left as premier last September only to now rush to name a 
new premier just before the presidential election.  In doing so, 
he appeared to be responding to Moroz's expressed wishes, since 
the parliament speaker in his first speech after being elected 
called for immediate election of a new premier without waiting 
for the presidential election (Kiev radio, 18 May).  Kravchuk, 
according to Moroz, also did not object to Moroz's proposal to 
amend the constitution to put all executive power in the premier 
rather than the president (UNIAN, 20 May; Aktsent, 10 June). 

Masol's nomination aids Kravchuk by placing a sharp critic of 
Kuchma as head of government (someone Kuchma will surely seek to 
dislodge if elected president) and pleases Moroz, who not only 
praised Masol as a potential premier (Demokratychna Ukraina, 21 
May) but laid out an economic program apparently based on Masol's 
ideas.  Moroz's report to the Supreme Soviet, carried on Kiev 
radio on 15 June, called for more state regulation and blamed the 
crisis on the dismantling of the "planned-administrative system 
of management" without replacing it with new market structures, 
the "collapse of the USSR national economic complex," the 
"mechanical" adoption of other countries' experience, and "ill- 
considered price liberalization" and privatization.  Masol denied 
having drawn up the economic program that Moroz was to present to 
the Supreme Soviet but said that much of it had been borrowed 
from his own writings (UNIAN, 14 June), and he lauded Moroz's 
program in his own 15 June Supreme Soviet speech (Kiev radio, 15 
June). 

Whether or not Kravchuk secretly provided Moroz with the extra 
votes needed to be elected Supreme Soviet chairman (as Chornovil 
charged in the 20 May Nezavisimost and Silski Visti) remains 
unclear, but Moroz's election did undermine Kravchuk rival 
Plyushch and did not disturb Kravchuk.  Kravchuk spoke favorably 
of Moroz's election and said he could work with?him, according to 
                                              ? 
the 19 May ITAR-TASS.  Now Kravchuk's nomination of Masol appears 
to establish a temporary alliance to weaken Kuchma, whom he has 
said is his main rival (Interfax, 3 June; Izvestiya, 4 June). 
For his part, Moroz also has an interest in working with Kravchuk 
because Kuchma is a competitor for some of the same constituency 
as Moroz and also because an aggressive President Kuchma may be 
more difficult to work with for Supreme Soviet Chairman Moroz 
than President Kravchuk.  Kuchma reacted negatively to Masol's 
appointment, calling the appointment just 10 days before the 
election a political game, and predicted a clash with Masol if he 
himself is elected president (Mayak radio, 17 June; UNIAN, 18 
June). 

Implications 

Ukraine is clearly lurching to the left, as exemplified by the 
big Communist victory in the March-April Supreme Soviet election, 
the leftists' capture of most leadership posts in the Supreme 
Soviet, and now leftist Masol being named head of government. 
Even if Kravchuk, who is virtually the only hope for the 
nationalists, is elected president, he may be pulled in a more 
socialist, anti-reform, pro-Russian direction along with the 
Supreme Soviet and cabinet, especially if the Supreme Soviet 
amends the laws to transfer some presidential powers to the 
premier.  Even though Kuchma is more pro-Russian, he favors a 
strong presidency and his election would lead to an early clash 
with the Supreme Soviet and new Premier Masol over power, if not 
policy. 

(AUTHOR:  HAHN.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ANALYSIS BRANCH, RUSSIA DIVISION, (703) 733-6070.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH/SDJ 22/2011Z JUN 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23124 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000034094001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   24 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
(DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING ITEM 
IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT CONSUMERS. IT 
IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND BEHAVIOR AND IS 
ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER U.S. GOVERNMENT 
COMPONENTS) 
FOREIGN MEDIA NOTE--FB PN 94-080 
<H3> <TI>      ALGERIAN ABSTRACTS #7 </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       ALGERIAN ABSTRACTS #7 </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
The      following summaries highlight information from articles that 
appeared in Algerian and West European press.  The hardcopy version 
of this Foreign Media Note contains 4 cartoons with captions. 

   Guards Authorized To Carry Weapons 

   The Ministry of Interior has authorized uniformed security guards 
to carry weapons for self-protection when employed to guard company 
buildings or deliver money, precious metals, or chemical products. 
Security delivery vehicles will be equipped with radios and must 
carry certificates verifying the nature of the cargo being 
transported.  The measure was reportedly introduced in December 1993 
after a series of attacks against companies and public offices. 
(Algiers EL WATAN in French 2 May 94) 

   Flow of Refugees to France Continuing 

   According to a front-page article in the French-language daily EL 
WATAN, some 10,000 Algerians have fled to France, including doctors, 
journalists, and other professionals, despite a bleak outlook for 
employment in that country.  Technical workers such as architects 
and electronics experts, for example, have found it necessary to 
work as industrial designers or to repair household appliances in 
dormitory towns largely inhabited by North Africans.  The article 
quoted Algerian writer Rachid Mimouni, who criticized the fact that 
Algerian Islamist extremists "have been welcomed in European 
countries," while those whose lives have been threatened "f ind no 
assistance."  (Algiers EL WATAN 18 May 94) 

   GIA Publication Comments on Assassinations 

   Algiers daily EL WATAN reported that the Armed Islamic Group 
(GIA) has claimed responsibility for the assassination of a French 
priest and nun in its weekly newsletter, AL ANSAR.  The newsletter 
called the killings part of "the policy of liquidation of Jews, 
Christians, and infidels on Algeria's Muslim soil," describing the 
clerics as "crusaders who spent long years spreading evil."  EL 
WATAN cited "informed observers" who attributed the double 
assassination to Mohamed Gousmi, who controls the GIA's "battalions 
of death" (kata'ib al-mawt) and his deputy, Djamel Zitouni.  Gousmi 
is said to have personally sent news of the killings to Peshawar as 
a way of demonstrating his rejection of those FIS leaders who have 
condemned acts of terrorism.  Another GIA head, Emir Dehilis, has 
condemned to death FIS representative Rabah Kebir; according to EL 
WATAN, documents proving the existence of this death threat were 
found in a GIA arms cache in Ain Ghrab. 

   According to EL WATAN, information for the GIA bulletin is faxed 
from Algiers to the Peshawar, Pakistan home of "Abou Amine," who is 
said to be close to Afghan Prime Minister Golbodin Hekmatyar.  (Abou 
Amine reportedly replaced "Abou Anas", or Bounoua, who was a 
representative for the Islamic Salvation Front (FTS) and the son-in- 
law of Shaykh Abdallah Azam.)  Abou Amine compiles the newsletter, 
writes its editorials, and faxes it to Warsaw for onward 
transmission to Europe and Algeria.  According to EL WATAN, this 
"fragile" relay system enables the Algerian "Afghans" to maintain 
their leadership over the GIA, whose "emirs" are increasingly 
"uncontrollable."  (Algiers EL WATAN 15 May 94) 

   GIA, FIS Relations Decline 

   According to the Paris-based expatriate weekly AL-WATAN AL- 
'ARABI, "informed sources" have reported that a conflict between the 
GIA and the FIS is anticipated following the assassination of a 
French priest and nun.  According to AL-WATAN AL-'ARABI, the roots 
of the dispute between the two groups began when the GIA accused the 
FIS of colluding with the Algerian Government in an ambush that 
targeted a house in Algiers owned by a FIS member in which a large 
number of GIA leaders were killed.  The operation reportedly took 
place with the collusion of the FIS as a sign of its "good faith" in 
executing the agreement between the two sides stipulating that the 
FIS would aid President Zeroual in eliminating the extremists within 
the scope of a political settlement.  (Paris AL-WATAN AL-'ARABI 27 
May 94) 

   GIA-MIA-AIS Unification Denied 

   The reported unification of the Armed Islamic Group (GIA) and 
Armed Islamic Movement (MIA) under the umbrella of the Islamic 
Salvation Army (AIS)--announced earlier this year by Qamr Eddine 
Kherbane and Anouar Haddam, both members of the FIS executive 
council--has not materialized, according to Algiers daily LIBERTE. 
AL ANSAR, the GIA mouthpiece, has reportedly announced that all GIA 
"sections" and "companies" have rejoined the ranks of the GIA, with 
the exception of Said Mekhloufi's group.  The LIBERTE article stated 
that an AIS communique reportedly signed by Abou Mohamed Abdelhadi 
subsequently alleged that the Al Ansar statement was "nothing but 
lies" since "the AIS invited and continues to invite GIA elements to 
rejoin in order to close ranks, but they refused."  According to 
LIBERTE, the GIA-MIA merger originated in 1992 after several GIA 
leaders were killed or jailed, and MIA head Said Mekhloufi dissolved 
his group in the hope of forming a unified movement with the GIA. 
(Algiers LIBERTE 12 May 94) 

   (For reaction by Islamic Society Movement (HAMAS) leader Mahfoud 
Nahnah to the reported split, see the 13 June 94 Near East-South 
Asia Daily Report, "HAMAS leader Calls for Dialogue, End to 
Violence.") 

   Civilian Defense Force Shelved 

   According to a "reliable source," Algerian officials have decided 
not to pursue the mobilization of civilians proposed by former 
Interior Minister Selim Saadi on 23 March.  Saadi had raised the 
possibility of using civilian reservists as an anti-terrorist civil 
defense force during a visit to Blida.  Officials have reportedly 
decided that Algerian security forces are "sufficiently capable" of 
continuing their anti-terrorist measures.  (Algiers EL WATAN 12 May 
94) 

   Egyptian Anti-Terrorism Productions To Be Broadcast 
   The 11 April edition of Algiers daily LIBERTE reported that 
Algiers ENTV television plans to broadcast two Egyptian productions, 
"al-'Ailah" ("The Family") and "al-Irhabi" ("The Terrorist"), both 
of which both dealt with religious extremism and violence.  "Al- 
'Ailah," an Egyptian television series, is scheduled to be broadcast 
first, followed by a showing of the film, "al-Irhabi." (Algiers 
LIBERTE 11 Apr 94; Algiers ALGERIE ACTUALITE 12-18 Apr 94) 

   Television Documentary on Origins of Armed Islamist Groups 

   The London-based expatriate magazine AL-MAJALLAH reported on an 
Algerian television program by journalist Lotfi Cheriet called "al- 
Kabus" ("The Nightmare"), a documentary about "terrorism and the 
roots of political and fundamentalist violence in Algeria."  The 25- 
minute program described the origins of armed Islamist groups from 
the early 1980's.  Various viewpoints were presented, including 
those of opponents of Islamist groups and "neutral" scholars.  In 
addition, the documentary 4ncluded "provocative" statements by 
Abdelkader Chakendi, a "repentant" former Islamist leader. 
According to the article, Chakendi at one time worked with Said 
Makhlouf i, leader of the Algerian "Afghans" and with Abdelkader 
Chebouti, appointed by Ali Belhadj to be commander in chief of the 
Armed Islamic Group (GIA).  The program also showed footage of 
training centers established by the Islamists in late 1990. (London 
AL-MAJALLAH 4 Jun 94) 
   (QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, AFRICA/LEVANT 
BRANCH AT (703) 733-6408) 
ENEAG/23 Jun/POLCHF/TOTF/NEASA Division/ta 23/2253z jun 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23125 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000034194001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   25 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-24JUN94-SLOVAKIA 
<H3> <TI>      Government's Minority Rights Bill Fails </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Government's Minority Rights Bill Fails </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                                      Prime Minister Jozef Moravcik's efforts to improve relations with 
the Hungarian minority suffered a setback when the government's 
legislation on using bilingual signs in Hungarian-populated areas 
was rejected by parliament.  Vehement opposition from former 
Prime Minister Vladimir Meciar's party--the largest in 
parliament--and increasing pressure by Hungarian minority parties 
to make more concessions have dimmed prospects for easing 
interethnic tensions. 
                                  END SUMMARY 
   Possibly calculating that further efforts in behalf of the 
Hungarian minority would undercut his party's chances in the 30 
September parliamentary elections, Prime Minister Jozef Moravcik 
has indicated that other legislation to grant the Hungarian 
minority in southern Slovakia greater cultural autonomy might 
have to wait until after the elections.  Following the 
parliament's rejection of the bilingual sign legislation on 3 
June, the coalition parties announced that although they will 
reintroduce the bill in July, they will not make any concessions 
to Hungarian demands to widen the scope of the legislation (CTK, 
17 June).  On 14 June, Moravcik told Bratislava radio that a 
   "solution" on the issue will most likely "be the responsibility 
of the future government" after the autumn elections.  In an 
interview published in the 14 June edition of Budapest daily 
Nepszabadsag, Moravcik said that he "assumes" that "establishing 
conditions for" the signing of the European charter on minority 
issues will also be a "task for a new government." 
   Apparently trying to gain support from Hungarian minority parties 
as well as improve relations with Hungary, Moravcik has attempted 
to improve on his predecessor Vladimir Meciar's tense 
relationship with the Hungarian minority.  Shortly after he 
replaced Meciar in March, Moravcik announced that his governing 
coalition had agreed to offer some concessions to the Hungarian 
parties in exchange for their support of his "policy statement." 
Among the Hungarian demands were laws protecting Hungarian 
surnames and placenames and the establishment of special 
departments for minorities in the Education and Culture 
Ministries (Bratislava radio, 10 May).  On 27 May, the government 
fulfilled the first of these demands by passing a law allowing 
Hungarians to enter names in local registers without the "ova" 
suffix normally used by Slovak women (SME, 28 May).  When he 
introduced his policy statement to parliament, Moravcik said that 
his predecessor's "nurturing of national intolerance" was "alien" 
to Slovaks' "national character," adding that the creation of a 
"peaceful atmosphere" between citizens "of different ethnic 
backgrounds" is "of great value" (Bratislava radio, 12 April). 
   Meciar Opposition 
   Meciar has sought to use Moravcik's support for improving 
relations with the Hungarians against him by portraying the prime 
minister as an unwitting tool of foreign governments.  Shortly 
after Moravcik's government was confirmed, Meciar accused it of 
coming to a "secret agreement" with the Hungarian parties that 
met "outrageous conditions" demanded by the Hungarians (CRK, 8 
May).  Following parliament's rejection of the proposed signpost 
law, Meciar accused Hungarians at home and abroad of "staking 
out" territory "by means of signposts" and called the government 
a "vassal" of Budapest (Slovenska Republika, 4 June).  The 68 
deputies--out of 150 in the parliament--from Meciar's Movement 
for a Democratic Slovakia (HZDS) and its ally, the Slovak 
National Party (SNS) were instrumental in rejecting the signpost 
law and walked out of parliament in protest over the passage of 
an earlier bill on Hungarian surnames (CTK, 7 June; SME, 28 May). 
   Hungarian Pressure 
   Threatening to cut off vital support for the government, the 
Hungarian parties have put Moravcik under growing pressure to 
provide concessions to minorities.  Tacit support from the two 
Hungarian parties represented in parliament--Coexistence with 
nine deputies and the Hungarian Christian Democratic Movement 
(MKDH) with five--has given the governing coalition a slim 
majority on many legislative issues.  According to CTK, however, 
by either abstaining or voting against the signpost bill, three 
Coexistence deputies, protesting an amendment exempting villages 
named after Slovak historical figures, left the government one 
vote short of the number necessary to pass the law (CTK, 7 June). 
Coexistence chairman Miklos Duray linked his continued 
cooperation with the government to its ability to reach a 
compromise on the issue (CTK, 15 June).  Although MKDH leader 
Vojtech Bugar, who is attempting to form an electoral coalition 
with Coexistence, had earlier condemned Duray's statement that 
the governing coalition was "not keeping its promises" to the 
Hungarians, MKDH leaders have recently echoed Duray's threat to 
withdraw support for the government.  While Bugar had earlier 
stated that "even a blind person" could see that the agreement's 
points are being "successively fulfilled" (SME, 31 May), he 
asserted on 6 June that the government had "not yet fulfilled its 
promise" to set up minority deprtments in various ministries 
(SME, 7 June).  Demanding that the government amend the signpost 
law to reflect the objections of the Hungarian dissenters, MKDH 
deputy Pal Farkas warned that "nobody can expect blind support 
from us" (CTK, 15 June). 
   Implications 
   With early parliamentary elections rapidly approaching, 
Moravcik's ability, and willingness, to pass legislation he had 
promised to the Hungarian parties appears to be limited.  The 
issue of the government's relations with the Hungarians will 
likely be utilized by both Meciar, who is seeking to portray the 
governing coalition as a threat to the Slovak nation, and by the 
Hungarian parties, which could try to encourage a strong 
Hungarian turnout at the elections by playing an increasingly 
prominent political role.  Under such pressures, Moravcik will 
find it difficult both to placate Hungarian demands in return for 
their support on vital legislative matters--such as a new 
privatization law--and to avoid any appearance of caving in to 
Hungarian demands right before the elections. 
   (AUTHOR:  MIHAILOVICH.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL 
CHIEF ANALYST, EUROPE/LATIN AMERICA GROUP, (703) 733-6120.) 
3Z/Gilison/SM 24/1745Z JUN 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23126 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000034294001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   25 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-24jun94-Russia 
<H3> <TI>      Parliamentary Chambers Pass 1994 Budget </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Parliamentary Chambers Pass 1994 Budget </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                               On 24 june both chambers of the Federal Assembly passed the 1994 
budget, resisting furious Defense Ministry attempts to boost 
defense allocations and approving a budget bill with few major 
changes from the Government's proposals except for a significant 
increase in agricultural spending skillfully wangled by the 
agrarian lobby.  The State Duma concluded its revisions two weeks 
earlier when it approved the bill by a one-vote margin in a vote 
that revealed a surprising lineup of forces--support from the 
Agrarians, Communists, and ultranationalist Liberal Democrats 
despite the low defense budget, while reformers largely voted 
against it or abstained.  The budget's relatively quick passage 
through the legislature may not, however, be an accurate portent 
for future budget processes, as the Duma already appears to be 
preparing for a more lengthy and rigorous scrutiny of the 1995 
budget. 

                          END SUMMARY 

   On 24 june the Duma voted 273 to 80 (with 8 abstentions) to pass 
the 1994 budget (ITAR-TASS, 24 june), reversing its defeat two 
days earlier, when the Duma failed to pass it on the third 
reading--supposedly a mere formality (See Box 1)--and when the 
Duma's usual high absenteeism and perhaps some last-minute doubts 
on the part of deputies prevented it from mustering the required 
majority.  Duma Chairman Ivan Rybkin, evidently unwilling to let 
the chamber defeat the budget and risk being branded as 
ineffective, bent the rules of procedure in forcing repeat votes. 
The Agrarian Faction, eager to pass the budget because of its 
generous allocations to agriculture, aided Rybkin in this 
endeavor, reportedly proposing that the Duma hold a repeat vote 
on the 24th because 15 of its members were absent on 22 june 
(Interfax, 22 june).  Rybkin, reportedly angry at the budget's 
failure to pass (Segodnya, 23 june), canceled all scheduled 
business trips by deputies and ordered them all to be present for 
the "crucial" budget vote on Friday (Interfax, 22 june). 
Earlier, Rybkin had predicted that the third and supposedly final 
reading of the budget, scheduled for 22 june, would be a largely 
pro forma review of the law's language (Interfax, 9 june), and 
its defeat in three separate votes (See Note 1) evidently came as 
a surprise. 

   (Note 1) On the first attempt, with 295 deputies (out of 450) 
voting, it failed by a wide margin of 32 votes; the second vote, 
with 299 deputies present, failed by only six votes; and the 
third vote failed by a wider margin of 14 votes, despite the 
presence of 315 deputies (ITAR-TASS, Interfax, 22 june). 
According to Article 116 of the Duma's regulations, the Duma 
needs a majority of the total number (obshcheye chislo) of the 
chamber's deputies, defined in Article 86 as 450, to adopt laws 
(Reglament Gosudarstvennoy Dumy Federalnogo Sobraniya--Parlamenta 
Rossiyskoy Federatsii, dated 25 March and 25 April 1994). 

   Upper House's Surprise Support 

   Possibly indicating the upper house's sensitivity to pressure 
exerted on it to pass the budget and not appear obstructionist, 
the Federation Council also passed the budget the same day 
despite having voiced objections to its low level of defense 
spending (ITAR-TASS, 24 june).  In response to statements from 
Federation Council leaders on the need to increase the defense 
allocation (See Box 2), the Duma had signaled that it would not 
back down on the budget, issuing a statement after it had 
approved the budget's provisions on 8 june affirming its position 
and portraying its vote as one of fiscal responsibility that 
establishes "firm control" over "taxpayers' money" (Radio Rossii, 
Interfax, 10 june).  The Duma's Rybkin lashed out at the upper 
chamber's threat to reject the budget, warning that if it tried 
to "destroy the budget," he would expose its opponents and "tell 
the public who they used to be and why they have been undermining 
the budget for four years" (Interfax, 8 june).  Moreover, the 
Duma reportedly refused to hear a presentation by the Federation 
Council's chairman of the Budget and Finance Committee, Nikolay 
Gonchar, on the Federation Council's objections to the budget 
(ITAR-TASS, 21 june).  President Boris Yeltsin may have pressured 
Shumeyko to encourage the Federation Council to pass the budget 
when the two met on 9 june, reportedly to discuss the 
"effectiveness" of the upper chamber's work and presumably also 
to discuss the budget passed the day before in the Duma (Moscow 
NTV, ITAR-TASS, 9 june). 

   Budget's Main Provisions 

   The Duma had completed its revisions to the budget on 8 june with 
few major changes to the government's figures, resisting severe 
pressure from the Ministry of Defense and two of its own 
committees for a huge boost in defense allocations, holding the 
line on the deficit, but significantly increasing spending on 
agriculture.  The budget calls for overall expenditures of 194.4 
trillion rubles (R) and revenues of R124.4 trillion, leaving a 
deficit amounting to 9.6 percent of GDP (Interfax, 8 june).  The 
government's original figures had called for expenditures of 
R183.1 trillion, revenues of R120.7 trillion, and a deficit 
estimated at 8 to 9 percent of GDP (ITAR-TASS, 15 April). 
Despite intensive lobbying by the military (see box 3), the 
budget calls for only R40.6 trillion in defense spending, far 
below the R55 trillion supported by the Duma's Defense and 
Economic Policy committees and only a modest increase from the 
R37.1 trillion figure approved on 11 May in the first reading. 
In contrast to the military's setback, agriculture fared well, 
receiving R15.3 trillion, up from R11.9 trillion in the 
government's draft (ITAR-TASS, 27 May; Kommersant-Daily, 28 May). 
Deputy Premier and Agrarian Party member Aleksandr Zaveryukha 
credited the increase to "tough work" conducted by the Ministry 
of Agriculture in the government and the Duma (Rossiyskaya 
Gazeta, 26 May). 

   Committees Vie for Influence 

   The budget's relatively quick progress in the Duma marks a 
victory for Mikhail Zadornov (Yabloko bloc), the moderate 
reformist chairman of the Duma's Budget, Taxation, Banking, and 
Finance Committee, who apparently concluded that the Duma should 
postpone any effort to make major revisions in the budget until 
it begins consideration of the 1995 budget.  In an interview to 
the mass circulation newspaper Trud (23 March), Zadornov stated, 
"In the current year, unfortunately, there is little that can be 
changed [in the budget]."  Instead, he appears eager to get a 
start on the 1995 budget, which he has asked the government to 
submit in September (Segodnya, 16 April) in the expectation that, 
working with a less pressing deadline, the Duma will exert 
greater influence on economic policy in 1995. 

   By contrast, Economic Policy Committee Chairman Sergey Glazyev 
(Democratic Party of Russia) wanted to delay passage of the 1994 
budget and attempt more ambitious revisions now.  He urged that 
the budget be rejected at its first reading for failing to 
address structural reforms, complaining in particular about the 
high levels of investment in agriculture and the fuel and energy 
complex at the expense of technology-intensive industries and a 
military conversion program, without which, he contends, it will 
be impossible to "break the dangerous trends" in the production 
slump (Delovoy Mir, 7 April; Segodnya, 14 April).  Like Zadornov, 
Glazyev has emphasized the need to start working on the 1995 
budget, but, unlike his colleague, was willing to finish 1994 
without a budget, continuing the ad hoc quarterly budget approval 
practice employed in recent years (Segodnya, 14 April). 

   Major Amendments Rebuffed 

   Anticipating that the Duma would attempt major revisions on the 
second reading, especially in the defense allocation, Zadornov 
made clear that his committee would brook no amendments altering 
the basic revenue and expenditure guidelines approved on the 
first reading.  Zadornov successfully proposed that the Duma 
reject "automatically" any of the almost 300 proposed amendments 
that would change the budget's basic parameters (Segodnya, 8 
June).  Rybkin evidently supported Zadornov's goal and reportedly 
delayed the start of the budget discussion to meet with the heads 
of all factions behind closed doors, where he proposed that the 
Duma vote on all amendments endorsed by the budget committee as a 
package (Radio Ekho Moskvy, 8 june). 

   The combined efforts of Zadornov and Rybkin successfully thwarted 
attempts by the Defense and Economic Policy committees to 
increase the defense budget to R55 trillion.  Projecting that the 
government would gain R28.6 trillion in additional revenues from 
the sale of state property in the post-voucher phase of 
privatization, Glazyev's committee called for allocating an 
additional R18 trillion to defense (ITAR-TASS, 25 May; Segodnya, 
27, 28 May; Novaya Yezhednevnaya Gazeta, 8 june).  Zadornov's 
committee treated that revenue projection with suspicion, 
contending that any "excess" revenues would "hardly exceed R3 
trillion," but agreed to create an off-budget fund for 
privatization receipts earmarked for the military (Segodnya, 28 
May, 8 june).  Defense Committee Chairman Sergey Yushenkov 
(Russia's Choice) cited Glazyev's revenue projections when he 
stated at a press conference that his committee would "insist" on 
increasing the defense budget from R37 trillion to R55 trillion, 
adding for good measure that the higher figure had "practically 
been agreed upon by the president, the Government, and the 
Security Council" (Interfax, Moscow NTV, 19 May) (see box 4). 

   How the Factions Voted 

   The Duma approved the budget on the second reading by only one 
vote above the required majority, 227 to 40 (32 abstentions), 
with most of the support coming from left-wing, nationalist, and 
centrist factions, while reformers either abstained or voted 
against (Krasnaya Zvezda, Izvestiya, 16 june): 

   -- Left-Wing Factions.  An analysis of the 8 june budget vote 
conducted by the "Information Analysis Group" under the 
leadership of Aleksandr Sobyanin (Izvestiya, 16 june) indicates 
that the budget received the highest proportional support from 
the Agrarian and Women of Russia factions, followed by the 
Communist Party of the Russian Federation (CPRF) faction. 
Appearing to view a viable budget as a necessary tool of 
government, CPRF leader Gennadiy Zyuganov called the budget's 
adoption "the logic of common sense" (Radio Ekho Moskvy, 8 june). 
Suggesting, however, that the Agrarian-CPRF alliance in the Duma 
may break down when agrarian and military-industrial interests 
are placed in direct competition, 95 percent of Agrarian deputies 
voted for the budget--including Rybkin--while only 73 percent of 
the CPRF faction did so. 

   -- Liberal Democratic Party of Russia (LDPR).  The faction's 42 
votes (of 64 members) for the budget (Izvestiya, 16 june), 
despite the modest defense allocation, appear to reflect the 
capriciousness and inconsistency with which party leader Vladimir 
Zhirinovskiy approaches politics.  Before the first reading 
Zhirinovskiy vowed to vote against the budget unless Yeltsin 
dismissed Foreign Minister Andrey Kozyrev, privatization tsar 
Anatoliy Chubays, and Interior Minister Viktor Yerin (Interfax, 
ITAR-TASS, 15 April), but then he flip-flopped and encouraged 
faction members to vote for it on the first reading (Russian TV, 
13 May).  Zhirinovskiy's move to support the budget appeared to 
reflect his resistance to attempts by reformist factions to 
defeat it, explaining to journalists: "If the initiative to vote 
the budget down was ours, we would vote.  But we do not want to 
help the [Yabloko] faction and Russia's Choice remove this 
government and take its place.  We will remove this government in 
the fall, but we will do it for ourselves" (ITAR-TASS, 13 May). 
Zhirinovskiy's absence on the day of the vote may have helped the 
budget's passage, relieving the Duma of his usual 
obstreperousness. 

   -- New Regional Policy (NRP).  The pro-industry NRP, whose 
members are largely elected from districts and are therefore more 
sensitive to constituents' localized concerns than deputies 
elected from party lists, also voted against the budget. 
According to Sobyanin, only 28 percent of the faction's members 
voted for the budget, the lowest percentage of any faction except 
the reformist Russia's Choice and Yabloko bloc (Izvestiya, 16 
june).  Indicating that, like the Federation Council, the NRP is 
concerned about maintaining local defense industries, faction 
leader Vladimir Medvedev said before the vote that the NRP would 
vote for the budget only if the defense allocation was increased 
to R55 trillion (Interfax, 7 june).  The faction recently allied 
itself with former Security Council Chairman Yuriy Skokov, 
chairman of the Federation of Russian Commodity Producers. 
According to media accounts of a "secret" meeting on 17 May, 
Skokov and NRP deputies reportedly explored avenues of 
cooperation, resulting in an agreement signed by Medvedev and 
Skokov on "devising common approaches to political and economic" 
issues and "resolving urgent problems at the federal and regional 
level" (Obshchaya Gazeta, 20 May; Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 28 May). 

   -- Russia's Choice.  The decision by many faction members to 
follow faction leader Yegor Gaydar's lead in abstaining appears 
to reflect a compromise between the faction's conviction that the 
budget was seriously flawed and its reluctance to vote the budget 
down and possibly endanger Prime Minister Viktor Chernomyrdin's 
Government.  Only 11 out of 74 Russia's Choice deputies (15 
percent) voted for the budget, among them Foreign Minister 
Kozyrev.  Reflecting the faction's views of the budget's flaws, 
Gaydar has criticized the "high level of military spending," 
system of regional transfer payments that he contends 
"subsidize[s] the south at the expense of the north," excessive 
subsidies to "inefficient" coal mining and agriculture, and 
insufficient funding of science, education, and culture 
(Izvestiya, 26 May; Radio Rossii, 8 june). 

   -- Yabloko.  In a strong show of unity, only one Yabloko member 
voted for the budget, a reflection of faction leader Grigoriy 
Yavlinskiy's opposition to the economic reform priorities pursued 
by Yeltsin since 1992.  Yavlinskiy has objected to the 
government's use of "monetarist instruments" for managing the 
economy and for attempting deregulation in an economy where 
monopolies still dominate.  He also supports a more activist 
structural policy that favors investment in technology-intensive 
industries that can produce output for export and in what he 
considers the "driving sectors of the economy"--aircraft 
building, the oil industry, construction materials, and housing 
(Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 16 April). 

   Implications 

   The budget's adoption--a signal by both parliamentary chambers of 
their acquiescence to the government's economic policy--may mark 
a milestone in Russia's political reform process, formally 
transforming some of Yeltsin's critics into players in 
determining policy and bringing an unprecedented openness to the 
debate on the country's military spending.  In casting their 
votes in favor of the budget, some of Yeltsin's harshest critics 
from the nationalist opposition, especially the CPRF and LDPR, 
now have accepted a shared responsibility for the plight of the 
military.  Their vote--which the military newspaper Krasnaya 
Zvezda (16 june) construed as a vote against an "adequate defense 
budget"--may undercut their criticisms of Yeltsin's security 
policy and weaken their support among military personnel.  The 
unprecedented debate carried out in the country's press and 
broadcast media on the military budget has probably drawn new 
public attention to the question of how much defense the country 
can afford, and, during a period of widespread economic hardship, 
possibly reduced sympathy for the Ministry of Defense's attempts 
to protect servicemen.  The Defense Minis try itself may in the 
future find that it has to expand its lobbying efforts beyond the 
government and the Duma's Defense Committee to gain legislative 
votes, a move that could further open up defense policymaking to 
legislative influence. 

   The legislature's lenient treatment of the 1994 budget may not, 
however, accurately foreshadow the 1995 budget process.  The 
Federal Assembly passed the 1994 budget quickly and with 
relatively few changes largely because of Rybkin's unwillingness 
to let the Duma defeat it, Duma Budget Committee Chairman 
Zadornov's efforts to institutionalize the budget process and get 
away from the ad hoc quarterly budgets of recent years, and the 
Federation Council's surprisingly rapid abandonment of its 
opposition.  With the experience of one budget behind it and more 
time to work on the 1995 budget, the legislature may be more 
forceful in its future efforts to effect changes in the 
government's economic policy. 

Box 1 

                          The 1994 Budget Process 
   In March the Duma adopted special procedures for considering and 
adopting the 1994 budget, reducing the duration of the budget 
hearings and authorizing the Budget, Finance, Banking, and 
Finance Committee to coordinate and expedite the amendment 
process to make up for the delay in the government's submission 
of the budget  (ITAR-TASS, 23 March; Rossiyskiye Vesti, 25 
March).  The 1994 budget went through the following steps: 

   18 March -- Premier Chernomyrdin submitted the government's draft 
budget to the State Duma. 

   23 March -- The Duma determined procedures for reviewing the 
draft. 

   15 April -- The Duma began preliminary hearings on the budget 
with Acting Finance Minister Sergey Dubinin formally presenting 
the government's draft.  The Duma adopted the budget "in 
principle" in a vote of 225-57, 21 abstentions (Interfax, 15 
April), thus beginning the formal review process. 

   11 May -- The Duma approved the budget's basic parameters in a 
first reading vote of 237-77, 12 abstentions (Rossiyskaya Gazeta, 
7 june).  After the first reading the budget was sent to 
committees for detailed review.  As stipulated in the procedures 
adopted in March, the budget committee has responsibility for 
coordinating all amendments proposed by the committees and 
recommending their adoption or rejection at the budget's second 
reading. 

   8 june -- The Duma approved the budget on the second reading, 
after which, according to the Duma's regulations, no further 
amendments can be introduced. 

   22 june -- The Duma was scheduled to vote on the budget on the 
third and last reading, but despite Duma Chairman Ivan Rybkin's 
prediction that it would be a "formal" vote on the law's 
"juridical" language (Interfax, 9 june), the budget went down in 
defeat in three separate attempts (Interfax, ITAR-TASS, 22 june). 

   24 june -- The Duma held a repeat vote for the third reading, 
passing the budget 273-80, 8 abstentions (ITAR-TASS, 24 june). 
The Duma then passed the budget immediately to the Federation 
Council, despite rules giving it five days to forward the bill to 
the upper house.  The Federation Council also adopted the budget 
the same day. 

   After the budget's approval by the Federation Council, it is 
forwarded to President Yeltsin for his signature. 

End Box 1 

Box 2 

             Federation Council Leaders on Record Opposing Budget 

   Prior to the suprise 24 June vote in favor of the budget, 
Federation Council leaders had suggested that the upper chamber 
would reject the budget on the grounds that the modest defense 
allocation would hurt regions economically dependent on large 
defense industries.  Chairman Vladimir Shumeyko predicted after 
the Duma's first reading that the Federation Council would reject 
the budget because rejection was "in the interests of Russia's 
regions" (ITAR-TASS, 18 May).  At a conference of regional 
legislative leaders after the second reading, Shumeyko emphasized 
the importance of a large defense budget for the regions, stating 
that "for 33 regions, the defense sector forms the basis of their 
industry" (Ostankino TV, 11 June).  In attacking the Duma's 
adoption of the budget, Shumeyko has contended that the Duma 
represents narrow party interests while the regions--represented 
in the Federation Council-- " reflect the real state of affairs in 
Russia" (Ostankino TV, 11 June).  On a more strident note, he 
even darkly implied that the Duma's "political set up" makes it 
interested in destabilizing the political situation, and its vote 
on the budget reveals its thinking that "the worse [the situation 
is], the better; we'll change the authorities more quickly"* 
(Moscow NTV, 9 June) 

   Although less strident than Shumeyko, who may be pursuing his own 
political ambitions, other Federation Council leaders appeared to 
share his views.  The chamber's budget and finance committee 
chairman, Nikolay Gonchar, stated that the Duma's modest defense 
allocation "will bring the manufacturing industries of [33 of 
Russia's] regions to their knees" (Interfax, 9 June).  Similarly, 
Defense and Security Committee Chairman Petr Shirshov claimed 
that increasing the defense budget would benefit 33 regions and 
warned that the R37 trillion allocated by the Duma for defense 
will prevent the military from replacing obsolescent equipment 
and force cuts in training and exercises (Krasnaya Zvezda, 9 
june).  Suggesting that the chamber as a whole shared its 
leaders' views, the Federation Council adopted a decree on 2 June 
calling for an increase in expenditures of R23 trillion, 
including a R55 trillion outlay for defense, but support for the 
decree was hard to gauge since the media were not observed to 
report a vote total (Nezavisimaya Gazeta, 3 june). 

   * In what appears to have been a misrepresentation of Yeltsin's 
position, presidential spokesman Vyacheslav Kostikov also implied 
that the Duma's disinclination to approve the higher defense 
allocation was an attempt to foment friction between Yeltsin and 
the military.  Kostikov quoted Yeltsin as saying that the Duma's 
defense allocation was "not adequate enough," and Kostikov 
remarked that it was a "ploy . . . to put the Army on a ration so 
as to bring it into a head-on collision with the president" 
(Interfax, 19 May). 

End Box 2 

Box 3 

                 Military Lobbying Efforts Faulted 

   Senior Russian military officials, apparently confident that the 
Duma would increase the armed forces budget allocation from the 
recommended R37 trillion to R55 trillion, reportedly were stunned 
when the Duma refused to approve the increase on the budget's 
first reading on 11 May (Kommersant-Daily, 14 May).  Despite what 
one television reporter termed a "furious" lobbying effort 
following the 11 May vote (Moscow NTV, 22 May), the military was 
unable to secure enough votes to significantly increase the 
defense allocation before the budget was approved on its second 
reading on 8 June.  Russian media have attributed the failure to 
Defense Minister Pavel Grachev's poor lobbying tactics and the 
military media's ineffectiveness in generating public sympathy 
for the armed forces. 

   Grachev's Performance Criticized 

   According to Kommersant-Daily (14 May), some Defense Ministry 
officials said Grachev made a "strategic mistake" in relying too 
heavily on the apparent support of President Boris Yeltsin and 
Prime Minister Viktor Chernomyrdin.  "Certain" that a favorable 
defense budget would be approved with their support, commentator 
Ilya Bulavinov wrote, Grachev "left the parliament completely out 
of his considerations."  The result was "a situation where 
virtually no one defended the military's interests in the State 
Duma."  Even the Defense Ministry newspaper Krasnaya Zvezda (7 
June) suggested that military lobbying had failed.  Parliamentary 
reporter Vladimir Yermolin, noting that lobbying "is a relatively 
new phenomenon in our life," suggested that reasoned arguments 
are not enough--" the main thing is to get busy with your elbows; 
the army has not learned this yet."  Grachev's ineffective 
lobbying may also result from his alleged reluctance to engage 
the Duma on other issues.  According to the government newspaper 
Rossiyskiye Vesti (21 June), legislators--including Defense 
Committee Deputy Chairman Yevgeniy Loginov--have often complained 
about Grachev's preference for sending subordinates to meet with 
Duma members rather than attending himself. 

   Indeed, in his own statements Grachev suggests that the military 
saw its main enemy in the budget battle as the Finance Ministry- 
-not the Duma--and leaves the impression that he regards 
political trench warfare as beneath him.  On the eve of the 
budget fight, Grachev suggested that within the government "only 
the Finance Ministry" was "insisting" on the recommended defense 
budget (Interfax, 17 March).  Similarly, in an 18 March interview 
with the Italian newspaper La Repubblica, Grachev said that 
"unless the Finance Ministry yields," the Russian military would 
become "an army of unemployed men."  In the same interview, 
Grachev provides a clue to his attitude toward lobbying: "I do 
not want to make any threats, nor do I intend to humiliate myself 
by begging.  At government meetings I put forward concrete 
figures so that it is clear where such a policy [the Finance 
Ministry's proposed budget] could lead us." 

   Military Media Castigated 

   In addition to the lobbying efforts of senior Defense Ministry 
officials, the ministry's public relations arm--especially its 
radio and television studio*--has since its inception in late 
1992 been trying to generate public support for the military's 
interests by airing programs that highlight the plight of the 
average serviceman, especially lack of housing and low pay.  With 
the military's budget failure in the Duma, the effort seems to 
have fallen victim to internal recriminations and second 
guessing: 

   -- According to Komsomolskaya Pravda (26 May), the ministry's 
Central Radio and Television Broadcasting Studio was subjected to 
severe internal criticism following the Duma's first budget vote. 
The article claimed that Gen. Vladimir Kosarev, the chief of the 
ministry's Information and Press Directorate, which oversees the 
ministry's studio, "came down like a ton of bricks" on the studio 
for failure to "give wide and full representation . . . of the 
process of developing the Russian army" and accused the studio of 
"financial irregularities" and "nepotism."  Kosarev also 
reportedly called for replacing the studio leadership with "more 
experienced cadres." 

   -- While not mentioning the studio's performance explicitly, 
Krasnaya Zvezda suggested that publicizing the plight of Russian 
servicemen does not elicit much sympathy from an already 
impoverished people.  A 9 June article by Yermolin questioned the 
need "to paint a vivid picture" of army life.  "In a country 
where the majority of the population only just makes ends meet, 
people are no longer shocked by the notion of a poverty stricken 
officer."  In another article on 10 June, Yermolin acknowledged 
that "no one was shaken" by portrayals of "the problems faced by 
the army, by officers and their families, and of the tragedy of 
the defense industry." 

   * The ministry's radio and television studio produces a number of 
programs that air regularly on national and regional radio and 
television networks as well as through the military's own 
broadcasting outlets.  The studio also contributes to civilian 
news programs, such as Vesti and Novosti. 

End Box 3 

Box 4 

             Yeltsin, Chernomyrdin Lukewarm Toward Military 

   President Yeltsin apparently offered little more than verbal 
support to the military's effort to raise defense spending to R55 
trillion.  In response to a March memorandum from Defense 
Minister Pavel Grachev warning of the inadequacy of the planned 
defense budget, Yeltsin only tepidly endorsed the military's 
position, reportedly writing that he "share[d] the defense 
minister's concern' (Izvestiya, 12 May).  However, it was not 
until the day before the budget's first reading that Yeltsin 
reportedly sent a message to Premier Viktor Chernomyrdin saying 
"I consider it expedient to agree" with the R55 trillion 
allocation (Interfax, 10 May). 

   After the second reading, when it was clear that the Communists, 
Agrarians, and even a majority of the Liberal Democratic Party of 
Russian (LDPR) faction--the very factions that have so frequently 
accused Yeltsin of destroying the army--had voted for the more 
modest defense allocation, Yeltsin evidently saw little need to 
fight for the military.  At his Independence Day press 
conference, Yeltsin indicated that the military would have to 
learn to live within its budget and criticized the armed forces 
for not making cuts "more energetically."  He indicated that 
Russia could not support the 3-million-strong army of the former 
Soviet Union and also said there "must be some reduction" in 
defense industry orders (Russian TV, 10 June).  To that end, he 
has reportedly drafted a presidential edict that will reduce 
state orders to defense enterprises (ITAR-TASS, 18 June). 

   The military also failed to find an ally in Premier Chernomyrdin, 
who demonstrated a commitment to fiscal restraint with the 1994 
budget.  During the Duma's first reading of the budget, 
Chernomyrdin cautioned deputies that "only a strictly balanced 
budget can mobilize the market" and emphasized that the 
government's deficit target would ensure that inflation is kept 
"under control" (ITAR-TASS, 11 May).  At a meeting of the Russian 
Government Presidium the following day, Chernomyrdin acknowledged 
that the defense budget was an "important problem" and said that 
the government "shall back the military-industrial complex," but 
he stopped short of endorsing increased funding (ITAR-TASS, 12 
May).  Moreover, Chernomyrdin is reportedly prepared to seek 
further cuts in allocations for the military, including 
abolishing credits for military housing construction, one of the 
Defense Ministry's highest priority programs (Moskovskiy 
Komsomolets, 18 May). 

End Box 4 

(AUTHOR:  O'CONNELL.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL 
CHIEF, ANALYSIS BRANCH, RUSSIA DIVISION, (703) 733-6070.) 

ENEAG/BLOUGH/JF 25/0002Z JUN 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23127 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000034394001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   25 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-24JUN94-CHINA-U.S. 
<H3> <TI>      China Touts Progress in IPR Protection, Warns Against </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       China Touts Progress in IPR Protection, Warns Against </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Sanctions 

                               SUMMARY 

   Mindful of the need to demonstrate progress in protecting 
intellectual property rights (IPR) in China or face the 
imposition of new U.S. sanctions, Beijing in recent days has been 
publicizing the steps it is taking to protect these rights.  At 
the same time, Beijing has warned Washington that any attempt to 
pressure China on the IPR issue will be counterproductive. 

                          END SUMMARY 

   Seeking to deflect U.S. criticism of its IPR protection efforts, 
Beijing has undertaken an extensive propaganda campaign to 
document China's alleged progress in this area.  As the 
centerpiece of this campaign, Beijing on 16 June issued a white 
paper entitled "Intellectual Property Protection in China" that 
chronicles the history of China's legislation on this issue and 
details its alleged progress in implementing these laws (see 
box).  In a clear reference to Washington, the paper, which was 
released by the State Council's Information Office and carried by 
Xinhua on the 16th, denounced as "unfounded" charges by "some 
naysayers" that Beijing has "not yet established a 'full and 
effective' intellectual property system."   Beijing, the paper 
claimed, has made "big strides" in protecting IPR and now has a 
"complete legal system" for their protection. 

BOX:  Progress in IPR Protection 

   The white paper offered the following as evidence of China's 
progress in protecting intellectual property rights: 

   -- Programs in IPR education have been initiated at "over 70 
institutions," and the education system for training professional 
personnel in this field has provided "batch after batch of 
qualified personnel in IPR protection." 

   -- In 1993 China received "170,000 applications" for trademark 
registration, including "130,000 applications for new 
trademarks." 

   -- Higher people's courts in several provinces and municipalities 
directly under the central government--such as Beijing, Shanghai, 
Guangdong, Fujian, and Hainan--have, since 1992, established 
intellectual property rights courts.  Intermediate people's 
courts in "all special economic zones as well as Beijing and 
Shanghai" have also set up IPR courts, while the intermediate 
people's courts in the capitals of other provinces and autonomous 
regions and municipalities have set up "collegial panels" 
specializing in IPR cases.  From 1986 to the end of 1993, "3,505 
cases concerning IPR disputes were accepted and handled by 
people's courts throughout the country." 

   -- Between 1992 and 1993, the people's courts "have accepted 734 
criminal cases for counterfeiting trademarks, of which 731 have 
been tried, with 566 people being sentenced to fixed terms of 
imprisonment, criminal detention, or other punishments." 

   -- China today has "more than 50 patent offices" established by 
local governments and "more than 20 patent offices" established 
by various ministries and departments under the State Council. 
China also has "well over 7,000 full-time trademark 
administrative personnel throughout China in addition to 300,000 
part-time personnel." 

   -- From June 1991 to the end of 1993, "local administrative 
organs" have "investigated and dealt with more than 150 cases" 
involving pirated books and video products. 

   -- In the last ten years, "administrative departments for 
industry and commerce" have dealt with "130,000 cases of 
trademark violation and counterfeiting," including "3,000 cases 
involving the counterfeiting and other violations" of foreign 
trademarks. 

END OF BOX 

   Despite its claims of substantial progress in protecting IPR, the 
white paper admitted that China still has "much work" to do to 
"optimize" its IPR protection system.  In particular, the paper 
noted that "awareness" of IPR remains "comparatively weak and 
underdeveloped" in China and in "some" government departments 
there is "insufficient appreciation of the importance" of IPR 
protection.  The paper went on to say that the State Council has 
drawn up a "Decision on Further Strengthening IPR Protection" 
which, when implemented, will mark a "great new step forward" in 
China's efforts to "ensure" IPR protection. 

   PRC Media on IPR Protection 

   Since the beginning of June, Chinese media, particularly 
Beijing's English-language paper, China Daily, have been replete 
with examples of China's alleged progress in protecting 
intellectual property rights. 

   -- Trademark protection.  On 3 June, for example, China Daily 
provided evidence of China's alleged success in protecting 
trademarks, reporting that "a number" of illegal producers and 
retailers in Guangdong Province had been "closed down" for 
infringing on the rights of British holders of the Lucozade 
trademark.  The article went on to note that Chinese 
administrative authorities handled "13,042 cases of trademark 
infringement and counterfeiting," of which "about 500 cases 
involved foreign trademarks."  The 19-25 June edition of Business 
Weekly--China Daily's weekly supplement--touted China's efforts 
in protecting foreign trademarks, such as M &amp; M, Readers' Digest, 
and the Financial Times, quoting a lawyer with the Beijing office 
of a U.S. law firm as saying that China's IPR laws provides 
"protection which is as good as that in other Asian countries." 

   -- Compact and laser disc piracy.  A 13 June China Daily article 
highlighted China's alleged progress in addressing another area 
of U.S. concern, the piracy of compact (CDs) and laser (LDs) 
discs.  The article claimed that "momentum is gaining" in the 
nationwide crackdown against pirated CDs and LDs. According to 
the paper, the crackdown, which began in mid-April, is 
"particularly gaining ground" in Beijing, Jiangsu, and Guangdong. 
In Beijing, for example, police "last week" allegedly "smashed" 
three stores, confiscating 1,607 LDs and 125 CDs in addition to 
1,480 cassettes and tapes.  In Jiangsu Province, the paper said, 
investigators targeted two LD factories and found one of them- 
-which was fined 200,000 yuan ($23,000)--in violation of the 
copyright law.  They also conducted "six secret checks" in the 
provincial capital, seizing 5,000 smuggled and pirated discs.  In 
other cities, they "seized more than 15,000 copies."  In an 
interview carried by Xinhua on 21 June, Shen Rengan, a deputy 
director of the State Copyright Bureau, cited more evidence of 
China's alleged progress in protecting IPR.  According to Shen, 
"incomplete statistics" show that in 1993 the State Press and 
Publications Administration (PPA) "confiscated 480,000 boxes of 
pirated videocassette tapes."  He said Beijing has achieved 
"remarkable results" this year in its crackdown on audio-visual 
publishers.  An 18 June report on Shen's remarks went even 
further, suggesting that the crackdown had resulted in "several" 
illicit production lines being "destroyed." 

   -- Book piracy.   In yet another effort to show China's progress 
in this area, a 21 June China Daily report revealed that Beijing 
has started a crackdown against book pirates.  According to the 
article, police have been "cracking down" on the sale of 
"illegally published and pornographic" material following the 
issuance of a PPA "directive" requiring PPA regional branches to 
"cooperate" with local Public Security organs in starting a 
"comprehensive search" for pirated books and pornographic 
material.  The paper claimed that the  crackdown has been 
particularly successful in Beijing, Hunan, and Guangdong, and 
quoted Huang Xiaoxin, a spokesman from the PPA's Distribution 
Department, as saying that printing houses and backroom printing 
shops in these locales had been "closed down and the main 
offenders arrested."  In Hunan, for example, Huang said that a 
number of people from a county printing house are now "awaiting 
trial" for "illegally printing" 250,000 copies of the Xinhua 
Dictionary.  Huang went on to note that a book merchant now 
awaiting trial in Heilongjiang Province faces the "death penalty" 
if found guilty of pirating. 

   New Legal Punishments 

   In addition to indicating that Beijing plans to step up its 
efforts to protect IPR, Chinese media reporting has also 
suggested that Beijing plans to legislatively stiffen the 
penalties for copyright infringement.  Song Jian, State 
Councillor and head of the State Science and Technology 
Commission, for example, suggested that new penalties are in the 
offing, noting, in a statement carried by Xinhua on 16 June, that 
Beijing plans to "further amplify" its laws and regulations and 
that future punishments for IPR violations will be "more severe." 
According to a spokesman for the National People's Congress 
(NPC), the upcoming session of the NPC Standing Committee, which 
is scheduled to open on 28 June, will again "deliberate" the 
draft regulation regarding copyright violations.   The NPC 
Standing Committee had discussed, but failed to pass, the 
regulation at its last session in early May.  Media reporting at 
the time had indicated that the draft regulation included 
provisions for prison sentences of up to five years, criminal 
detention, and/or fines for those convicted of "serious" 
copyright violations (Xinhua, 5 May). 
   Warnings on U.S. Sanctions 
   Although admitting that China's present IPR protection system has 
a number of shortcomings, Beijing has indicated that attempts by 
Washington to pressure China on IPR issues will be 
counterproductive.  Deputy Director Shen, for example, clearly 
had Washington in mind when he pointed out that "threats to 
exercise pressure" through sanctions does not represent a 
"constructive attitude" toward seeking a solution to what he said 
are the "inevitable" problems accompanying the development of an 
IPR protection system (Xinhua, 21 June).  Hui Yongzheng, a Vice 
Minister of the State Science and Technology Commission, went 
even further in warning Washington, saying that while China is 
"always ready to cooperate" with others on the IPR issue, it will 
"resolutely oppose any act of interference in its internal 
affairs under the pretext of IPR protection" (Xinhua, 22 June). 
   Prospects 
   With growing internal pressure from its own market reforms acting 
as the driving force for change, Beijing will continue its 
efforts to develop a comprehensive IPR protection system. 
However, it is likely that differences over IPR issues will 
continue between Washington and Beijing. 
(AUTHOR:  HEBBEL.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL, CHIEF, 
CHINA ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6097.) 

EAG/HORTON/JF 25/0140Z JUN 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23128 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000034494001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   29 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-28JUN94-IRAQ 
<H3> <TI>      Saddam Battles Economic Crisis, Expects Sanctions Victory </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       Saddam Battles Economic Crisis, Expects Sanctions Victory </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
SUMMARY 

                                Recent Iraqi media treatment of the UN-imposed sanctions and of 
President Saddam Husayn's assumption of the prime ministry 
reflects Baghdad's judgment that while it has good chances of 
winning an end to sanctions, it must in the meantime take strong 
measures to deal with a severe economic crisis, both to allay 
domestic discontent and to sustain the credibility of its 
campaign to lift the sanctions. 

                           END SUMMARY 

   Official Iraqi statements about the UN Security Council's March 
and May reviews of the sanctions have been increasingly 
optimistic.  An "official spokesman," reporting on a joint 
meeting of the Revolution Command Council (RCC) and Ba'th Party 
Command held on 29 May to evaluate the latest sanctions review, 
asserted that while some UN Security Council members expressed 
"positive positions" in March, in May "the overwhelming majority 
of the Security Council member states call[ed] for acknowledging 
the progress made in applying Security Council resolutions and 
stress[ed] the need to discuss the lifting of the blockade as 
soon as possible" (Iraqi News Agency [INA], 29 May).  In contrast 
with a corresponding Iraqi official statement in March, which 
merely expressed hope that Security Council members who favor 
lifting the sanctions "may grow into a majority" and cautioned 
that it is too early "to know for certain whether or not there is 
serious and imminent hope for lifting" the sanctions (INA, 27 
March), the spokesman said in May that the U.S. position, "the 
principal obstacle to lifting the blockade," has been "isolated" 
and that the international community is "stepping up its demand 
that the unjust blockade . . . be lifted." 

   In a press conference on 1 June, Deputy Prime Minister Tariq 
'Aziz expounded at length Baghdad's optimistic assessment (Al- 
'Iraq, 2 June). (See Note 1)  Describing the March review as "a 
substantial" and "crucial" change, he characterized the May 
review as "progress on the path to lifting or easing the 
blockade." Buttressing his position, he said that "the level of 
both listening to, and understanding of, the Iraqi viewpoint" is 
"much higher and deeper than ever before."  He noted that Iraqi 
envoys have been able to make visits that "until recently were 
out of the question," citing his own visits to Austria and Spain 
as examples.  He assessed visits to Iraq by "major entrepreneurs 
who are heavyweights in their countries" as a tribute to "Iraq's 
steadfastness" and acknowledgment that "the blockade will be 
lifted."  While refusing to predict a date at which the sanctions 
will cease, 'Aziz characterized the forthcoming July review as 
"very important and possibly decisive" and cited the French UN 
envoy as saying "the time will come very soon" to discuss lifting 
the sanctions. 

(Note 1)  'Aziz may have given the press conference partly in 
order to respond to a minority Iraqi view, occasionally expressed 
in Babil, the daily owned by Saddam's son 'Udayy.  For example, 
an article by Mazhar 'Arif claimed that "the blockade will 
continue" and that "only our poor media have swallowed up the lie 
that the review this month is better than it was two months ago, 
and that it will be even better in July" (Babil, 21 May). 

   'Aziz also expressed confidence that the United States would not 
veto a resolution lifting the sanctions.  He argued that because 
the sanctions resolutions were based on "the so-called 
international consensus," a U.S. veto would dramatize the 
dissolution of the consensus and deprive the sanctions of their 
"legal and logical" basis.  In such circumstances, he said, 
states who want to do business with Iraq "would not comply" with 
the resolutions.  He claimed that "luckily" Americans are 
"pragmatists" and that eventually the U.S. Administration will 
reluctantly "admit its failure." 

   'Aziz emphasized that Iraq's brightening prospects of lifting the 
sanctions are due mainly to its "steadfastness," a term used in 
Iraqi media to connote adherence to the regime's positions and 
rallying around Saddam.  'Aziz contrasted the favorable hearing 
he now gets from foreign states with the situation in 1991 and 
1992, when, according to him, even representatives of countries 
with "vested interests in Iraq" did not listen to him because 
they thought that "Iraq would not hold out." 

Economic Crisis 

   Despite these expressions of optimism about the sanctions, alarm 
about the state of the domestic economy appears to have played 
the key role in Saddam's decision to assume the prime ministry on 
29 May.  The RCC statement announcing his assumption of the post 
attributed the move to the need to "reinforce the heroic 
steadfastness of our great people" against "the unjust blockade" 
by demonstrating "exceptional interest in economic issues and the 
citizens' lives" (INA).  The full gravity of the situation was 
brought out in two articles by Salah al-Mukhtar, chief editor of 
the Information Ministry's daily Al-Jumhuriyah, who confessed 
that in recent months, many of the government's efforts to ease 
"the negative economic impact of the blockade so citizens do not 
despair" had been "ineffective," thus necessitating Saddam's 
becoming prime minister to "dispel darkness and despair and 
create hope" (Al-Jumhuriyah, 31 May).  In a subsequent article, 
al-Mukhtar said flatly that before Saddam became premier, "food 
prices had skyrocketed," the "vast majority of citizens could not 
afford to buy basic supplies," and "many people despaired as they 
saw their situation getting worse and their income slipping 
through their hands just one day after being paid"  (Al- 
Jumhuriyah, 4 June).  In another effort to counteract despair, 
Saddam's press secretary 'Abd-al-Jabbar Muhsin responded to 
"those who claim that despair is justifiable" by arguing that 
Iraq's problems emanating from its two last wars are not "the 
manifestations of decadence" but rather "the signs of [laudable] 
ambition" (Al-Oadisiyah, 7 June). 

Saddam Speeches 

   Addressing the cabinet after assuming the post, Saddam himself 
indicated that the people had grounds for complaint.  He said 
that "when onions, potatoes, or tomatoes become scarce, [Iraqis) 
make an issue out of this."  He also referred to unspecified 
negative "phenomena that I noticed in the state departments" that 
ministers must work to "overcome" (Baghdad radio, 30 May). 

   Saddam argued that allaying popular discontent is the key to 
eroding the sanctions.  He claimed that "the Iraqis weaken their 
position when they grumble too much and when their patience is 
disrupted," because then even countries sympathetic to Iraq "will 
no longer be enthusiastic about insisting on shortening the time 
for lifting the blockade."  Accordingly, he argued that the more 
the ministers increase the people's patience, the better Iraq's 
chances of ending the blockade with minimal concessions -- in 
"the way we wish."  Saddam emphasized that "additional patience 
and efforts" are required precisely now because Iraq has entered 
the "last 10 days of Ramadan," i.e. the endgame of the struggle 
over the sanctions. 

Saddam Directly in Charge 

   Evidently addressing popular criticism, Saddam sought to show 
that he knows and cares about people's problems and that he is 
personally taking charge to insist on effective state action.  In 
discussing high prices, he proclaimed several times that he is 
not "unaware of things" and that he "follow[s] up people's 
lives."  He insisted that "we must revive and reactivate the 
state." 

   Saddam continued these themes in subsequent speeches.  Addressing 
top Information Ministry officials and his son 'Udayy on 8 June, 
Saddam said, "it has become clear to everyone that the leadership 
has begun to take care of some details."  Evidently responding to 
complaints that the Ba'thist leadership had grown old and 
ineffective, Saddam said that "it is impermissible for the Ba'th 
state to age, grow old, or become flabby.  It should remain 
youthful and wise at the same time" (Baghdad radio).  In remarks 
to the cabinet on 15 June, Saddam said that the cabinet must 
engage in "hard work" that will be "felt by all citizens," who 
should see that "their state has become more active and vibrant." 
Discussing red tape but evidently also alluding to bribery and 
corruption within the bureaucracy, Saddam said that "mistakes and 
deviations" must be "rapidly and firmly" corrected.  He added 
that "we must work to make the deviant constantly feel that he 
will not go unpunished regardless of how long this might take" 
(Baghdad radio). 

New Spending 

   In his effort to deal with popular discontent, Saddam has 
embarked on major new spending.  He ordered substantial increases 
in the salaries of state employees, Armed Forces personnel, and 
Internal Security Forces, as well as transportation allowances 
for such personnel and family allowances for their wives and 
children (Baghdad radio, 12 June).  To overcome farmers' 
reluctance to sell their produce to the government, Saddam nearly 
doubled the prices the government pays to farmers (Baghdad radio, 
13 June).  He also increased the income of various categories of 
retirees (Baghdad radio, 12 and 2O June).  Finance Minister Ahmad 
Husayn has said that the new benefits for state employees alone 
will obligate the state treasury for an additional 15 billion 
dinars a year (Baghdad radio, 14 June).  According to an Iraqi 
estimate cited by Reuter, the increases in prices paid to farmers 
will amount to another 3O billion dinars a year (16 June). 

   To protect the consumer from inflation, Saddam has ordered 
stringent efforts to enforce official prices.  On 2 June, Baghdad 
radio reported that the RCC adopted a decree "authorizing the 
party section commands and the people's councils in the regions 
to close wholesale and retail shops if their owners violate the 
prices announced by the state's competent  agencies."  Earlier, 
the director of the Economic Crime Combat Department said that on 
28 May his organization began a campaign to stabilize prices at 
marketplaces, and that "this campaign will continue nonstop, to 
put an end to whoever is deluded into tampering with the people's 
subsistence" (Al-Jumhuriyah, 31 May). 

Raising Revenue 

   Apparently to offset the new expenditures, Saddam has ordered an 
effort to increase state revenue, rationalize public spending, 
and reduce energy consumption at all state institutions (Baghdad 
radio, 11 June).  The government has tripled the artificially low 
price of gasoline and raised the price of lubricating oil by 
nearly 14-fold (Reuter, 16 June).  On Saddam's instructions, 
wealthy merchants have been given "a chance to voluntarily 
contribute to the importation of food" (INA, 18 June).  A group 
of "businessmen and industrialists" have "voluntarily" 
contributed $2.275 million "to finance food imports" on condition 
of being repaid after the embargo is lifted.  Trade Minister 
Muhammad Mahdi Salih, who announced these contributions, added 
that this first group of contributors will be followed by others. 

   Saddam has also adopted a number of measures to diminish the 
demand for dollars.  He has nearly tripled the foreign travel 
tax, added 91 products to the list of officially prohibited 
imports, and issued new bank regulations slashing the amount of 
cash Iraqis may take out of the country from $300 to $50 (Babil, 
19 June; Reuter, 23 June). 

Draconian Penalties 

   To curb crime, which has grown in step with the country's 
economic troubles, and to support its economic policies, Baghdad 
has introduced the Koranic punishments of hand amputation and 
foot amputation for many types of theft, including car theft, and 
for some types of robbery (Baghdad radio, 4 June).  The religious 
affairs minister praised the new penalties because "the rule of 
God is better than all other rules in achieving deterrence" 
(Baghdad radio, 5 June).  Later, Baghdad radio announced that the 
same Koranic punishments would be meted out to "those who sell 
foreign currency outside the officially licensed offices," to 
"farmers who deliberately fail to deliver grains to the marketing 
centers," and to "merchants who stockpile items listed in the 
ration cards with the aim of monopoly and tampering with prices 
in departure from the fixed price" (13 June).  In addition, the 
Ministry of Trade has been authorized to seize and operate any 
flour mills that "do not comply with the production plan in terms 
of the required quality and quantity" (Baghdad radio, 23 June). 

   Media treatment and initial reports suggest that Baghdad will not 
shrink from applying the new penalties.  Saddam's son 'Udayy, in 
a Babil editorial under the pseudonym Abu-Sirhan, (See Note 2) 
endorsed amputation for theft, emphasizing that "the important 
thing is to see the competent agencies stringently implement the 
decree" (5 June).  He stressed that the decree must not become a 
dead letter, a fate he claimed was suffered by a decree that 
prescribes execution for brothel madams.  The Ba'th Party daily 
Al-Thawrah, arguing that the public must be able to distinguish 
between honorable war invalids and ignominious thieves, advocated 
tattooing a plus mark on the cheek of the amputated criminal, on 
a part of the face where hair does not grow (9 June).  On 22 June 
Baghdad radio announced that two "culprits" had been sentenced to 
hand amputation for stealing carpets from a mosque. 

(Note 2)  The hypothesis that "Abu-Sirhan" is a pseudonym used by 
'Udayy is based on the assumption that only 'Udayy could directly 
attack nearly all Iraqi leaders other than Saddam.  Abu-Sirhan's 
articles have contained extremely harsh criticisms of the 
cabinet, emphasizing the "gap" between Saddam's "way of thinking 
on the one hand and the implementing tools on the other" (Babil, 
20 and 22 January 1994); have claimed knowledge of Saddam's 
movements and intentions (Al-Jumhuriyah, 2 January 1992); and 
have dared to point out flaws in the Iraqi national character 
(Babil, 1 June 1994).  In Babil, Abu-Sirhan's articles appear on 
page 1 and are referred to with respect even by deputy ministers 
(Babil, article by Information Ministry First Under Secretary 
Nuri Najm al-Marsumi, 3 February 1994; Babil, 9 May 1994). 

Saddam's Gamble 

   Saddam appears to have gambled that his measures will curtail 
further economic deterioration long enough to enable him to gain 
a major victory in eliminating the sanctions.  This expectation 
was made explicit in an article by Al-Jumhuriyah chief editor 
Salah al-Mukhtar, who predicted that the United States is 
"inevitably about to lose another strategic conflict" because 
Saddam personally has started to lead "the blockade-breaking 
battle" (Al-Jumhuriyah, 31 May). 

Initial Results 

   Although Saddam achieved a short-term success, he does not seem 
to have reversed the long-term trend toward a weaker dinar and 
higher prices.  INA on 5 June reported a dramatic decline in 
vegetable and other food prices since Saddam became prime 
minister, and both Iraqi and Western media reported that the 
dinar's exchange rate had rebounded from 510 to the dollar on 29 
April to 435 to the dollar in early June.  Salah al-Mukhtar 
attributed this success to "the feeling that supervision, sound 
measures, and strict judgment have returned" (Al-Jumhuriyah, 4 
June).  However, while the official exchange houses were still 
offering no more than 445 dinars to the dollar on 21 June, Babil 
reported that the dollar was worth between 10 and 25 percent 
more, or as much as 550 dinars, on the black market (21 June). 

Implications 

   Since he could have applied all the recent measures without 
becoming prime minister, thus partly insulating himself from 
blame in case of failure, Saddam evidently judges that a victory 
on the sanctions issue is near and that he can stave off economic 
collapse until then.  At the same time, he has decided that 
drastic measures, including both carrots and sticks, are needed 
to deal with enormous popular discontent with current economic 
conditions and crime. 

(AUTHOR:  BUDER.  OUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
NEAR ANALYSIS BRANCH, (703) 733-6094) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH/SDJ 28/1817Z JUN 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23129 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000034594001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   29 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
WARNING: ATTN USVIENNA FOR IAEA 
FBIS TRENDS-KOREA 
<H3> <TI>      North, South Agree on Summit, DPRK Upbeat on U.S. Talks </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       North, South Agree on Summit, DPRK Upbeat on U.S. Talks </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
SUMMARY 
                               With a swiftness that clearly reflected both sides' eagerness to 
defuse the crisis on the Korean peninsula, the North and South 
have agreed to hold the first ever inter-Korean summit next month 
in Pyongyang.  The summit agreement comes in the wake of 
Pyongyang's upbeat assessment of the prospects for U.S.-North 
Korea high-level talks scheduled to begin in Geneva early in 
July.  Underscoring its desire for better relations with 
Washington, Pyongyang has muted its commemoration of the Korean 
war anniversary. 
                        END SUMMARY 
   Judging from the initial reporting by Pyongyang and Seoul media, 
both sides seemed to have made concessions in adopting an 
agreement at the 28 June vice-premier-level meeting held to pave 
the way for the summit (Pyongyang radio, Yonhap, 28 June): 
   + The North accepted the South's proposal that the meeting 
between ROK President Kim Yong-sam and DPRK President Kim Il-song 
take place from 25 to 27 July, thereby giving up a propaganda 
opportunity.  The North had insisted on 15 August, the date 
Pyongyang uses to stage a joint North-South celebration marking 
Korea's liberation from Japan, an event to which the North 
perennially invites South Korean dissidents and the South 
prevents them from attending. 
   + The South accepted Pyongyang as the venue for the summit 
without an explicit pledge that a second summit will be held in 
Seoul on "principle of reciprocity."  The agreement calls for the 
following round of talks to be "decided" on by the two 
presidents. 
   + The agreement stipulates that both sides "make joint efforts" 
to build an atmosphere conducive to the summit, presumably 
keeping Seoul from openly pressing for international sanctions 
against the North and binding Pyongyang to refrain from extreme 
vituperation against the South.  In addition, the agreement calls 
for working-level contacts, to start on 1 July, to hammer out 
procedural and logistic matters. 
   Further underscoring the eagerness with which both sides 
attempted to avoid controversy and make rapid progress toward 
defusing the current crisis, the agreement conspicuously avoided 
listing any summit agenda, thus leaving it unclear, at least on 
paper, what the two leaders will be discussing when they meet. 
In the annals of inter-Korean dialogue, the North and South have 
frequently engaged in bitter and prolonged wrangling over 
agendas, often resulting in the failure of bilateral talks. 
   DPRK-U.S. Talks     The agreement on an inter-Korean summit comes 
on the heels of Pyongyang's upbeat assessments of the upcoming 
DPRK-U.S. talks, slated to start on 8 July in Geneva (KCNA, 27 
June).  In the first confirmation of earlier Western reporting on 
former U.S. President Carter's recent visit to Pyongyang, a 23 
June Foreign Ministry spokesman's statement said that during the 
visit President Kim Il-song had made a proposal on the nuclear 
issue (KCNA).  The statement described President Kim Il-song's 
proposal as an "important" one containing "well-intentioned 
measures" Pyongyang will take to "break the present deadlock" 
between Pyongyang and Washington and reach a "fundamental 
solution" of the nuclear issue.  It also said that the Kim Il- 
song proposal led to agreement on the upcoming bilateral talks 
and claimed that President Clinton has "welcomed" the North 
Korean stand and pledged to formally withdraw the discussion of 
sanctions at the UN Security Council.  The spokesman's statement 
also expressed hope that the talks will result in a "fundamental 
solution" of the nuclear issue and an improvement of bilateral 
relations with Washington. 
   Subsequently, a 25 June Foreign Ministry spokesman's statement 
hinted at a possible resolution of the issue of opening up two 
suspected nuclear sites that the international community insists 
could yield important clues to North Korea's history of past 
nuclear reprocessing activity.  Criticizing alleged insistence by 
South Korea and Japan on a "special inspection" of the sites, the 
spokesman linked the resolution of this issue to conf idence- 
building between Pyongyang and Washington.  As the upcoming 
bilateral talks proceed "successfully and confidence is built" 
between the two parties, the spokesman said, the issue of past 
reprocessing will be resolved "naturally." 
   War Anniversary     Clearly seeking to provide an favorable 
atmosphere for bilateral talks, Pyongyang has, for the third year 
in a row, toned down its commemoration of the 25 June anniversary 
of the outbreak of the Korean war.  Pyongyang media have again 
conspicuously refrained from reporting on any anti-U.S. rallies 
in North Korea that have traditionally kicked off a monthlong 
"anti-U.S. struggle" period.  Moreover, in a move that signified 
further downgrading of the war anniversary, Pyongyang radio has, 
for the first time, failed to broadcast the commemorative 
editorial carried by the party paper Nodong Sinmun.  The North 
Korean news agency KCNA, however, carried a summary of the 
editorial as usual (25 June).  Far from being belligerent, the 
KCNA summary of the editorial called on Washington to end the 
confrontation with Pyongyang and on Seoul to work toward 
unification so as to avoid the repetition of "the disaster." 
   However, apparently in anticipation of Seoul's release of Korean 
war related Russian documents, which ROK President Kim reportedly 
received from Russian President Yeltsin during his recent trip to 
Moscow (ITAR-Tass, Yonhap, 2 June), the editorial revived the 
claim that the United States started the war.  Moreover, 
Pyongyang radio in a 27 June commentary underscored this point, 
claiming that Washington "planned, prepared for, and provoked" 
the Korean war.  According to the South Korean press agency 
Yonhap, the Russian documents reportedly "prove" that the North 
invaded the South (2-10 June). 
   Implications     Pyongyang may calculate that in the worst case 
scenario the scheduled inter-Korean summit could provide the 
North with a fallback position should the Geneva talks fail. 
However, by placing the prestige of Kim Il-song behind the 
current push for DPRK-U.S. talks, Pyongyang seems to be 
projecting optimism for their success at least for now. 
   (AUTHOR:  YIM.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL CHIEF, 
ASIA DIVISION ANALYSIS TEAM, (703) 733-6534.) 
EAG/HEBBEL/ta 28/2346z jun 94 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23130 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000034694001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   30 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
DUE TO COPYRIGHT OR OTHER RESTRICTIONS THE FOLLOWING 
ITEM IS INTENDED FOR USE ONLY BY U.S. GOVERNMENT 
CONSUMERS. IT IS BASED ON FOREIGN MEDIA CONTENT AND 
BEHAVIOR AND IS ISSUED WITHOUT COORDINATION WITH OTHER 
U.S. GOVERNMENT COMPONENTS. 
FBIS TRENDS-29JUN94-JORDAN-SYRIA 
<H3> <TI>                                       SUMMARY </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>                                        SUMMARY </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
Despite   Syria's obvious irritation and criticism from domestic 
opposition, the Jordanian government appears determined to move 
forward in bilateral negotiations with Israel following Israeli- 
Jordanian meetings in Washington on 6-7 June.  Statements by King 
Husayn during his recent visit to Washington and editorials in 
Jordan's mainstream press have strongly countered charges that 
the current negotiations betray pan-Arab ideals, while 
nonetheless arguing that Jordan must attend to its own interests 
in the peace process.  While the opposition's vocal criticism 
will probably continue, it appears unlikely to disrupt the 
government's agenda. 
                                     END SUMMARY 
      Jordan Determined To Proceed With Israel Negotiations 
   At his 21 June Washington press conference, King Husayn replied 
to criticism that his government had sacrificed pan-Arab ideals 
to achieve progress in talks with Israel and declared that Jordan 
is prepared to proceed with negotiations on matters--such as 
borders and water rights--that concern Jordan's sovereignty 
independently of progress in negotiations between Israel and 
other Arab parties.  He asserted that since "no other country in 
the Arab world" had contributed more to Palestinian and pan-Arab 
causes than Jordan, "nobody has the right to [tell Jordan] what 
to do" in its policy toward Israel.  While Husayn said he 
eventually hoped to see "the coming together of a comprehensive 
peace in the region," he stressed that above all, he is "aware of 
[his] responsibilities towards [his] people, and [is] carrying 
them out."  When questioned about Syrian criticism of Jordan's 
talks with Israel, he replied indirectly and with apparent 
irritation, asking rhetorically: "Is Jordan expected to be the 
last one to ratify a peace treaty?"  Moreover, the king indicated 
several times throughout the press conference that pan-Arab 
coordination on the Arab-Israeli peace talks had never been 
achieved at an acceptable level and that, while he hoped for 
progress on all tracks of the process, Jordan's talks with Israel 
are "a question of a sovereign matter regarding Jordan itself," 
and are not "tied to movement on another track" (Amman TV, 21 
June). 
   Significantly, King Husayn stopped short of categorically stating 
that Amman would not sign a final agreement with Israel before 
the attainment of a comprehensive peace.  Asked whether he would 
be willing to sign a peace treaty with Israel independently of 
the other tracks, Husayn responded that while Jordan is 
"searching for a comprehensive peace," it is a "sovereign 
country" that is "dealing with [its] own problems," adding: "We 
[Jordanians] started at the same point, and we are trying to see 
what we can achieve" (Amman TV, 21 June). 
   Editorials Hail Pragmatism, Ridicule Opponents 
   Editorials in Jordan's establishment press praised the 
government's stance toward Israel as being practical and 
farsighted, and combined support for border and water 
negotiations with firm reiterations of Jordan's commitment to a 
comprehensive final peace arrangement on all tracks.  In 
addition, several newspaper columns made disparaging references 
to opponents of the negotiations. 
   --A column in Al-Dustur urged "starry-eyed" citizens to "wake up" 
to a transformed Middle East, adding that talks between Jordan 
and Israel are "nothing to be ashamed of," and that "the day is 
not far off when Israel will have embassies in Arab capitals." 
In a thinly veiled swipe at opponents of the government's policy, 
the column concluded that Amman "cannot possibly be the citadel 
of verbal Arab rejectionism, whose bark has, over decades, been 
worse than its bite" (21 June). 
   --An Al-Ra'y editorial praised the "Jordanian Arab futuristic 
view of the comprehensive peace" that would start with border and 
water talks and proceed to "security, joint cooperation, and 
other issues within the framework of the comprehensive peace." 
In a likely reference to critical articles published in the 
opposition press, the editorial went on to denounce the "media 
clamor" over Jordan's unilateral moves as unwarranted, 
"especially since Jordan has always promoted Arab solidarity and 
encouraged Arab solutions to all the nation's issues" (13 June). 
   Opposition Reaction 
   Various opposition political parties, most prominently the Muslim 
Brotherhood-backed Islamic Action Front (IAF), have taken 
advantage of greater press freedom brought about by the king's 
cautious political liberalization to publicize a hard line 
against the government's course.  They have categorically 
rejected separate negotiations with Israel, accusing the 
government of deserting the Palestinian cause, damaging pan-Arab 
coordination, and abandoning the principle of a comprehensive 
solution.  The IAF, which has 16 members in the House of 
Representatives, also criticized Jordan's recent cabinet 
reshuffle, which brought 10 House deputies into the cabinet as 
ministers, (See Note 1) as a move aimed solely at consolidating 
government support for its negotiations with Israel. 
   (Note 1) Apparently, the cabinet reshuffle was intended to 
preempt parliamentary attacks on the government's peace process 
policy.  Information Minister Jawad al-'Anani stated that the 
ministerial shakeup was intended to "consolidate cooperation 
between the [executive and legislative] arms of government and 
strengthen the performance of the cabinet in light of the fast 
changes in the area and the peace process" (Jordan Times, 9-10 
June). 
   --IAF deputies in the House of Representatives issued a statement 
rejecting Jordan's negotiations with the "Zionist enemy," 
asserting that the bilateral agendas signed in Washington 
"reflect a Jordanian retreat from the constant principles" of 
"rejecting a unilateral peace, adhering to the Islamic and Arab 
character of Jerusalem, and the right of refugees to return to 
their country and territories from which they were expelled by 
the usurper Jews."  The statement also warned the government 
against "making the same mistake as the Palestinian negotiator by 
throwing himself into the lap of the Zionist entity" (Al-Majd, 20 
June). 
   --The Jordanian Arab Constitutional Front Party warned that the 
government's stance "constitutes an imminent threat to Jordan and 
the Palestinian cause and harms the cooperation and coordination 
between the Arab brothers in Syria and Lebanon" (Al-Majd, 20 
June). 
   --A joint statement issued by the IAF and the Pan-Arab Action 
Front (PAAF) condemned Jordan's 8 June cabinet reshuffle as being 
"aimed at weakening the opposition in the House of 
Representatives . . . in order to go ahead with plans to sign a 
unilateral reconciliation agreement with the Zionist enemy."  The 
joint IAF-PAAF statement also accused the government of deviating 
from its "so-called national constants that focused on a 
comprehensive solution, the return of Jerusalem, and solving the 
problem of refugees" (Al-Sabil, 21-27 June). 
   --A statement by the secretary of the Jordanian Arab Socialist 
Ba'th Party's Supreme Command emphasized "the need for pan-Arab 
solutions to any regional issue, since solutions to any regional, 
political, or economic issues will be incomplete if not discussed 
and addressed within the framework of the comprehensive Arab 
solution" (Al-Ra'y, 14 June) 
      Syria Criticizes Israeli-Jordanian Diplomacy 
   Steadily escalating attacks on Jordan in Syria's tightly 
controlled media illustrate Damascus' irritation over indications 
of significant progress in the 6-7 June talks between Jordan and 
Israel.  For example, a Damascus radio report on 22 June appeared 
to launch an indirect attack on King Husayn himself.  The report 
first cited optimistic statements by the king and other unnamed 
Jordanian officials on the course of Israeli-Jordanian 
negotiations, made during the the king's recent visit to the 
United States.  The radio went on, however, to quote extensively 
from what it said were Jordanian opposition statements, including 
such comments as: "the Israeli-Jordanian agenda is another step 
in the political capitulationist settlement plan" and "the 
Jordanian Government has placed the country in a dark political 
tunnel." 
   Following the 6-7 June talks, Syrian media initially voiced 
Syria's concern without criticizing the Jordanian Government.  On 
8 June, for example, the daily Tishrin harshly condemned 
Jordanian journalist Fahd al-Fanik's calls in two recent columns 
(Amman Al-Ra'y, 2 &amp; 4 June) for Jordan to move forward in 
negotiating a peace treaty with Israel.  The next day, Damascus 
radio reported that Jordanian Prime Minister 'Abd-al-Salam al- 
Majali had denied press reports that he had criticized Syria and 
had expressed "absolute faith" in the "common objectives and 
destiny" of Jordan and Syria. 
   Within the next several days, however, Damascus radio adopted an 
openly critical tone.  On the 11th, it hinted at official 
dissatisfaction, reporting that Syria had postponed a scheduled 
meeting that day of the Joint Syrian-Jordanian Higher Committee- 
-a body promoting bilateral cooperation--because "both the date 
and circumstances are not suitable for the Syrian side."  By the 
12th, the radio all but openly attacked Jordan.  After repeating 
standard denunciations of Israeli policy toward Syria, the radio 
attacked the "weakness of certain parties and individuals" [in 
dealing with Israel] as a result of shortsightedness, limited 
vision, and weakness of their pan-Arab affiliation and 
understanding of the objectives which the Arab people aspire to 
realize." 
   Implications 
   Notwithstanding continuing criticism from opponents of the 
government's decision to negotiate with Israel, King Husayn's 
statements indicate that Jordan is prepared to pursue economic 
and political gains from talks on water rights and border 
demarcation, even though Husayn is probably not at this point 
prepared to sign a final peace treaty with Israel independently 
of the other tracks.  While the domestic opposition is not likely 
to pose any substantial threat to his government, it is probably 
an irritant to King Husayn, who doubtless sees his personal 
credibility as a pan-Arab leader being challenged.  Nevertheless, 
the newly reshuf fled cabinet has probably made the government 
confident that it can manage opposition from the IAF and other 
dissenting parties. 
   Thus far, Damascus has shown no sign of relenting in its 
criticism of current Jordanian, or for that matter Palestinian, 
negotiations with Israel.  For now, Syria seems likely to 
maintain its rhetorical attacks while biding time in the hope 
that the Israeli-Palestinian track will break down, thereby 
strengthening Syria's position vis-a-vis both Israel and other 
Arab parties. 
   (AUTHORS: MURRAY, MORTON.  QUESTIONS AND/OR COMMENTS, PLEASE CALL 
CHIEF, NEAR EAST ANALYSIS BRANCH (703) 733-6094.) 
ENEAG/BLOUGH/SM 29/1952Z JUN 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-23131 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "cr00000034794001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<DATE1>   30 June 1994 </DATE1>
FBIS 
FOREIGN PRESS SURVEY-FBPSP 94-13-ASIA 
<H3> <TI>      PACIFIC RIM ECONOMIC REVIEW -- 29 JUNE 1994 </TI></H3>

</HEADER>

<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>       PACIFIC RIM ECONOMIC REVIEW -- 29 JUNE 1994 </PHRASE></F></HT>



<TEXT>
BEGINNING      WITH THE 13 JULY ISSUE, THE ELECTRONIC VERSION OF THE 
PACIFIC RIM ECONOMIC REVIEW WILL BE DISSEMINATED TO SUBSCRIBERS AS 
SEPARATE DOCUMENTS ACCORDING TO COUNTRY OR REGION:  JAPAN, CHINA, 
SOUTH KOREA, SOUTHEAST ASIA.  THE HARDCOPY VERSION OF THE PACIFIC 
RIM ECONOMIC REVIEW WILL CONTINUE TO CARRY MATERIAL ON JAPAN, CHINA, 
SOUTH KOREA, AND SOUTHEAST ASIA UNDER ONE COVER. 

   Table of Contents 

   JAPAN:  Auto Industry - FEATURE:  Japanese Sales of Imported 
Autos Rapidly Expanding 

   Economic Trends - Public Investment Estimated To Reach 510 
Trillion Yen by 2000; MITI Committee Urges Paper Companies To Invest 
Overseas Environmental Issues; Eco-Business Market Valued at $128 
Billion in 2000 

   Financial Issues - FEATURE:  Japanese Banks' Inroads in China 
Commercial Banks; FEATURE:  FY93 Financial Statements of Life 
Insurers Reported; Federation of Credit Associations Restructuring, 
Internationalizing; First Japanese to Establish Hedge Fund 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - CHINA: Tokyo Gas To Set Up Office 
in Beijing; Sanwa Denki To Manufacture Color Monitors in Shanghai 

   INDIA:  Marubeni, Toshiba To Build Two 250,000kw Generators 
UZBEKISTAN; Trading Companies Sign Cooperation Agreements With 
Government 

   VIETNAM:  Itochu in Joint Venture To Manufacture Electric Cable; 
Tomen, Taiwan Firm Establish Joint Venture Can Production Company; 
Honda To Begin Assembling Motorbikes in Ho Chi Minh City; Fuji Xerox 
To Begin Marketing Copying Machines; Firm To Build Large Sewing 
Factory in Ha Tinh 

   Machine Tools/Robotics - April MT Orders Down 12.2 Percent, 
Domestic Orders Drop 20 Percent 

   Petroleum/Energy - NKK Wins LNG Tanker Order From Nippon Yusen 
Subsidiary 

   Telecommunications/Satellites - Toyota Motor Expected To Acquire 
Major Share in Teleway Japan, IDO; MPT Limits NTT Participation in 
Handiphone Market To Nurture Competition 

   CHINA:  Domestic Developments - Ministry of Machine Building 
Plans To Develop Auto Industry; State Commissions Formulate 
Automobile Industry Policy; MPCC Plans To Be Largest PRC Oil 
Refinery by Year 2000; Heilongjiang's Suifenhe Signs Trade Contracts 
With Russia; Heilongjiang Firms Signs Joint-Venture Project With 
Russia; Heilongjiang Company Signs Barter Trade Contract With 
Russia; Hong Kong Firm in Joint Venture to Rebuild Guangdong 
Highways; Guangzhou Wharf Project Being Handled by Hong Kong Firms; 
Hong Kong Firm To Develop Guangzhou Housing Project; Hong Kong Firm 
Invests in Fuzhou Housing Project; Bavarian Bank Sets Up Business 
Center in Shanghai; Netherlands' Largest Bank Opens Shanghai Branch 
Taiwan Group Signs Pharmaceutical Agreement With Beijing Firm; 
Guangdong's Huizhou Builds Joint Venture Container Production Base; 
Thai Group Shows Interest in Shenzhen Subway; Australian Businessmen 
Sign 335 Letters of Intent for Cooperation; Heilongjiang State Farms 
Introduce Foreign Capital Taiwan; International Commercial Bank To 
Return To Ho Chi Minh City; Total Industrial Output Expected To 
Double in Eight Years; Overseas Investment Adversely Affects 
Domestic Tax Revenues 

   NORTH KOREA:  Increased Use of Silicate Bricks Noted 

   SOUTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  ROK Moving 'Full Scale' Into Next- 
Generation Displays; Ministries Differ on How To Revise 
Communications Industry; New Laser Has Applications in 
Semiconductors, Diagnostic Equipment; Auto Technology Imports  Up 
Average of 6.6 Percent Since 1990; Government Stresses Labor- 
Management Cooperation; Government Advocates Creation of 
Regional Economic Body; Reimports of Electronics From China 
Increasing; Kia To Export $40 Million Worth of Car Parts to Japan; 
Daewoo To Export Armored Cars to Malaysia; ROK To Begin 'Officially' 
Exporting Cars to China; Asia Cement To Enter China's Market; 
Undersea Optical Cable Link to Russia To Be Completed in 1995; 
Hyundai Precision To Introduce Technology From Germany; 
Hyundai To Export 'Accents' to Europe, Middle East, Asia 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA -  BURMA:  Hong Kong Securities Firm Establishes 
'Myanmar Fund'; French Company To Build Gas Turbines at Power 
Station; Thai Farmers Bank To Open Resident Office in Rangoon; 

   INDONESIA:  Indonesia Seeks ROK Participation in Oil Field 
Development; P.T. Telkom Launches Global System for Mobile 
Communications; Trade Agreement With Czech Republic Signed; Increase 
in Textile, Garment Exports to Japan Reported; Trade Chamber Expects 
Lower Australian Import Duties 

   LAOS:  Thailand, PRC, Singapore To Establish Trade Complex in 
Laos; Telekom Malaysia To Establish Joint Venture in Sri Lanka; 

   SINGAPORE:  FEATURE:  Electronic Access to Information, Services 
Available By 2000; Singaporean Banks Expanding Into Asia; Increase 
in 1993 Trade With The Netherlands Reported 

   THAILAND:  Foreign Bank Branches To Be Upgraded; Electricity 
Authority To Increase Purchases From Laos; State Bank of Vietnam 
Receives $100-Million Loan 

   VIETNAM:  FEATURE:  Vietcombank Branching Out, Expanding 
Services; Figures on Foreign Investment Projects Reported; $4- 
Billion Investment Projected for Northern Economic Triangle; Foreign 
Banks Seeking to Establish Branches; Joint Venture Planned To 
Exploit Bach Ho LPG; Government Approves 'Largest' Port Construction 
Project; Vietnam To Restrict Import of New Foreign Cars; Foreign 
Investment in Road, Bridge Projects Reaches $700 Million; Foreign 
Investment Capital Figures From 1988 to 1992 Reported; Italian 
Businesses To Invest $48 Million in Vietnam; Construction of 
'Primary' Southern Port Started; Joint Venture To Produce 
Nonalcoholic Beverages Licensed; Singapore Reported To Be Top ASEAN 
Investor; Exports of Rice, Paddy to Taiwan, PRC Reported; Canada 
Opens Trade Office in Ho Chi Minh City; Indonesian Chemical Company 
Setting Up Joint Venture; Construction of 'Largest' Rice Mill in 
Mekong Delta Completed 

   (Pacific Rim Economic Review FBPSP 94-13) 

   JAPAN:  Auto Industry - FEATURE:  Japanese Sales of Imported 
Autos Rapidly Expanding -- SUMMARY:  After reaching record levels in 
FY93, sales of imported autos in Japan are expected to reach new 
highs in 1994.  According to media and industry reports, sales of 
imported autos have surged during the first five months of 1994. 
Market share for imported autos has also increased due to the 
appreciation of the yen and a drop in sales of domestically-produced 
autos. 

   Sales of Imported Autos Reaching 'Record Levels' -- According to 
the 20 June SANKEI SHIMBUN, sales of imported autos reached "record 
levels" in FY93, totaling 217,633 units.  Regarding 1994, Nakahide 
Inayama, president of Yanase and Co., the largest auto import dealer 
in Japan, stated that sales of imported autos are expanding 
"unbelievably" and should surpass the levels reached in FY93. 
Masaji Gumizawa, vice chairman of the Japan Automobile Importers' 
Association, believes that import sales will gain further momentum 
and could top 300,000 units by yearend. 

   According to the following chart, for the first five months of 
1994, sales of imported passenger cars, trucks, and buses totaled 
108,239 units, a 39.62 percent increase over the same period in 
1993.  In May alone, import sales totaled 21,579 units, more than a 
48 percent rise over 1993 and the seventh consecutive year-on-year 
increase.  The following charts are derived from the March 1994 
JIDOSHA TOKEI GEPPO (Monthly Automobile Statistics Report) published 
by the Japan Automobile Manufacturers Association.  March, April, 
and May 1994 figures are from the 8 April, 11 May, 7 June 1994 
NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN, respectively. 


                1993              1994           Percent 
               Sales             Sales           Increase 

   Jan         9,088            12,156            33.76 
   Feb        14,117            17,812            26.17 
   Mar        23,051            32,440            40.73 
   Apr        16,729            24,254            44.97 
   May        14,540            21,579            48.41 

   Total:     77,525           108,241            39.62 



   Import Market Share on the Rise -- The 4 June SHUKAN DAIYAMONDO 
reported that sales of imported autos are increasing, while sales of 
domestically-produced autos are falling.  Consequently, the market 
share for imported autos is continuing to rise.  On a calendar year 
basis, market share of imported autos has risen from 2.88 percent in 
1990 to 3.12 percent for 1993.  For the first five months of 1994, 
the market share for imports has risen to 4.32 percent. 


                   Total            Import       Market 
                   Sales            Sales        Share 

   1990          7,777,493        223,923          2.88 
   1991          7,524,759        199,922          2.66 
   1992          6,959,073        184,615          2.65 
   1993          6,467,279        201,481          3.12 
   1994 
    Jan            357,674         12,156          3.40 
    Feb            519,253         17,812          3.43 
    Mar            679,170         32,440          4.78 
    Apr            502,195         24,254          4.83 
    May            446,703         21,579          4.83 
   1994 
 Total:          2,504,995        108,241          4.32 



   German Autos Maintain Highest Sales -- According to the 20 June 
SANKEI SHIMBUN, demand for imported autos is growing because the 
appreciation of the yen has led to lower prices, which are "meeting 
the needs of consumers."  Foreign automakers are using low prices as 
well as improved quality as "weapons" to sell their cars, the paper 
said.  As the following chart shows, Germany remained the largest 
seller of imported passenger cars in Japan for 1993, even though 
sales of German cars have fallen by nearly 29 percent since 1990. 
SANKEI stated that much of the fall was due to the fact that Yanase 
and Co. stopped handling Volkswagen and Audi cars in January 1993. 
For the first five months of 1994, however, VW/Audi has sold 13,486 
autos, nearly a 50 percent increase over the same period last year. 


Passenger Car Sales:      1990       1991       1992       1993 

Germany Total          137,442    119,048    104,680     97,684 
   Mercedes Benz        38,844     34,187     29,605     27,913 
   BMW                  36,527     33,798     28,532     25,790 
   VW/Audi              53,461     44,562     42,082     24,878 
   Opel (GM)             4,021      2,725      1,371     17,042 

U.S. Total              28,602     30,128     37,085     54,493 
   Honda USA             7,534     14,302     19,835     26,880 
   General Motors        8,513      9,261      9,089      8,525 
   Toyota USA            2,109        862      2,363      7,955 
   Chrysler              1,432      1,491      1,602      5,699 
   Ford Motor            6,030      2,959      3,402      5,111 

UK Total                19,653     17,130     14,914     17,498 
Sweden Total            13,704     12,363     10,494     13,116 
France Total            14,018     10,854      7,906      5,840 
Italy Total              5,933      5,754      4,573      4,565 



   U.S. Automakers Increase Sales, Expect Higher Growth -- Between 
1990 and 1993, sales of U.S.-made autos have increased by more than 
90 percent.  The best selling U.S. import, however, is made by a 
Japanese subsidiary firm, Honda USA.  According to the evening 
edition of the 17 June NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN, Honda USA became the 
largest automobile exporter overall from the United States during 
the first quarter of 1994, having exported 24,877 autos between 
January and March, mostly to Japan. 

   Nevertheless, sales of passenger cars from the U.S. "Big Three" 
automobile manufacturers have also increased greatly over the first 
five months of 1994.  According to the following chart, General 
Motors has increased sales by 11.36 percent, Ford by 113 percent, 
and Chrysler by more than 300 percent over 1993 levels. 


             General Motors      Ford Motor        Chrysler 

             1993     1994      1993     1994     1993     1994 

   Jan        414      529       158      465       40      659 
   Feb        589      712       419      714      156    1,093 
   Mar        924      875       573    1,100      330    1,608 
   Apr        607      687       441      921      378    1,273 
   May        529      608       311      847      501    1,003 

Total:       3063     3411      1902     4047     1405     5636 



   General Motors sold 8,525 vehicles in 1993, but this does not 
include the 17,042 autos sold under the Opel nameplate, which are 
from General Motor's European subsidiary.  According to the 20 June 
NIKKEI WEEKLY, General Motors hopes to increase sales to 100,000 
units by the year 2000.  Ford sold 5,111 vehicles in 1993, but the 
NIKKEI WEEKLY reported that a great majority of those sold were 
actually produced by Ford's Japanese partner, Mazda Motor Corp. 
Nevertheless, Ford hopes that sales of its new Mustang, for example, 
will increase the ratio of imported vehicles to over 50 percent this 
year.  In addition, the 10 June NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN reported that 
Ford plans to import three models with right-hand side steering from 
Europe.  Consequently, the company hopes to expand the number of 
sales outlets from 288 to 700 and to increase annual sales to 
200,000 units by the year 2000.  Chrysler sold 5,699 vehicles in 
1993, and sales are robust due to the success of its right-hand side 
steering Jeep Cherokee, the NIKKEI WEEKLY stated.  The firm expects 
to sell over 13,000 vehicles this year, including the Vision and 
Grand Cherokee. 

   Economic Trends - Public Investment Estimated To Reach 510 
Trillion Yen by 2000 -- According to the 15 June NIHON KEIZAI 
SHIMBUN (NIKKEI), a study shows that the amount of Japan's public 
investment will "surely" exceed the 430 trillion yen ($4.3 trillion) 
goal set in the 10-year public investment plan from FY91 to FY2000, 
which was agreed to by both the U.S. and Japanese Governments during 
the U.S.-Japan structural impediments initiative talks in June 1990. 
That goal takes inflation into consideration and includes machinery 
investment and land purchases as well as actual construction costs. 

   According to the article, the Ministry of Construction's (MOC) 
Committee on Medium- and Long-term Estimates of Construction 
Investment has released a study which predicts that total public 
investment in construction--actual construction costs plus machinery 
investment and land purchases--will reach 510 trillion yen ($5.1 
trillion) between FY91 and FY2000.  The study's calculations assume 
that between FY93 and FY2000 construction investment will increase 
only enough to keep pace with inflation. 

   According to NIKKEI, the study noted that construction investment 
for FY93 is estimated at 31.8 trillion yen ($318 billion), a 4 
percent "real"--i.e., above the inflation rate--increase from FY92. 
If the amount of construction investment continues to increase at a 
"real" annual rate of 4 percent every year from FY93 as the base 
year, it will reach 350 trillion yen ($3.5 trillion) by FY2000. 
Consequently, total public investment in construction from FY91 
would reach 560 trillion yen ($5.6 trillion) by FY2000. 

   NIKKEI reported that the study also included another scenario 
that assumes that there will be no supplementary budget in FY94. 
Based on an estimate of construction investment of 28 trillion yen 
($280 billion) for FY94, instead of the estimated 31.8 trillion yen 
($318 billion) figure for FY93, and an annual growth rate of 4 
percent, the study predicted that construction investment will reach 
310 trillion yen ($3.1 trillion) by FY2000 and total public 
investment will be 510 trillion yen ($5.1 trillion).  Explaining the 
reason for the lower base figure, the study noted that in FY93 
construction investment increased greatly thanks to three economic 
stimulus packages implemented during the year, and therefore "it 
would be difficult to maintain the same rate of increases in 
construction investment from such a high base." 

   The article observed that the MOC study shows Japan will be able 
to exceed the goal of the 10-year plan "without additional public 
investment projects."  It also noted that the study may affect 
current debates between the private sector and the Ministry of 
Finance (MOF) over whether additional public investment projects are 
needed to expand domestic demand when the government reviews the 10- 
year plan in late June.  The private sector has been asking the 
government to implement an additional 100 trillion yen ($1 trillion) 
in public investment, while the MOF remains "hesitant." 

   MITI Committee Urges Paper Companies To Invest Overseas -- The 16 
June evening edition of NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN reported that the 
"Committee on Issues Within the Paper and Pulp industry," a private 
advisory group of the Ministry of International Trade and Industry's 
(MITI) Consumer Goods Industries Bureau, estimated in a recent 
report that the Japanese paper and pulp industry will grow an 
average 2.3 percent annually from the present until 2000 while 
demand in China and several Southeast Asian countries is expected to 
grow at an annual rate of 9 percent.  The report recommended that 
Japanese paper companies actively advance into Asia in order to 
compete on the international market. 

   The 10 June NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN observed that Japanese companies 
are being urged to develop overseas markets because it will be 
difficult for them to boost domestic facilities in current 
conditions where the continuing high yen is pressuring companies to 
import rather than produce domestically,  Domestic demand in the 
Japanese paper industry has decreased for two consecutive years 
since 1992 because of the extended recession, and there is a surplus 
supply of 5 million tons because Japanese companies invested heavily 
to boost their domestic facilities during boom economic times.  The 
report projected that domestic demand in 2000 would equal about 32.9 
million tons, which is nearly equal to current production capacity 
of 33.1 million tons.  Paper products, which include newsprint and 
other printing paper, will grow at an annual rate of 2.4 percent to 
19 million tons, and paperboard would grow at an annual rate of 2.1 
percent to 13 million tons. 

   According to the 16 June ASAHI SHIMBUN, the report also mentioned 
specific measures that Japanese paper manufacturers should take in 
order to overcome the severe conditions predicted for the future. 
The report stated that it was essential for Japanese manufacturers 
to shift away from achieving market share supremacy and that they 
should import foreign products instead of making products 
domestically which are not price competitive.  Manufacturers should 
also cut costs for quality control by standardizing quality control 
systems and link up with foreign capital resources to cut costs for 
procuring raw materials. 

   The report also discussed environmental issues facing the 
Japanese paper industry, mainly recycling efforts, the 17 June 
NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN noted.  The report mentioned the "recycle 55 
plan," which aims to recycle and reuse 55 percent of all paper by 
March 1995, and raised the issue of drafting a "post 55 plan."  It 
also stressed that consumers need to have a progressive attitude 
toward recycling paper and that regional governments should create 
measures for recycling. 

   Environmental Issues - Eco-Business Market Valued at $128 Billion 
in 2000 -- On 16 June, the Environment Agency reported the results 
of a study conducted by the Sanwa Research Institute Corp. (SRIC) to 
calculate the future scope of the eco-business market, which 
includes environmental products and services.  The SRIC established 
the base value of the eco-business market at 5.96 trillion ($59.6 
billion) for 1990 and projected that the market would grow by 8 
percent annually from 1990 to 2000 and by 7.8 percent annually 
between 2000 and 2010.  According to the SRIC's calculations, the 
eco-business market will be valued at 12.8 trillion yen ($128 
billion) in 2000 and 26.2 trillion yen ($262 billion) in 2010. 

   The SRIC identified four groups of high-growth environmental 
products and services and drew up estimates for the future markets 
of each group.  The four groups include:  1) environment-friendly 
equipment and pollution prevention equipment; 2) environment- 
friendly products, such as solar power generating systems, household 
energy conservation devices, and low-emission vehicles; 3) services 
dedicated to protecting the environment, such as waste treatment and 
environmental impact assessment services; and 4) businesses which 
maintain the public infrastructure, such as those which build 
transportation systems and energy-conserving buildings. 

   According to the SRIC, services concerned with protecting the 
environment will be the largest growing industry.  The markets for 
pollution prevention equipment, solar power generating systems, and 
household energy conservation devices will expand to exceed 3 
trillion yen ($30 billion) each and stimulate the semiconductor, 
electronics, gas, and petroleum industries.  The electric vehicle 
market, which is projected to achieve a value of 1.8 trillion yen 
($18 billion), will also have a "ripple effect" on the electronics, 
rubber, and resin industries.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 17 Jun 
94 p 2) 

   Financial Issues - FEATURE:  Japanese Banks' Inroads in China -- 
Summary:  Japan's largest banks have established substantial 
operations in China, and now regional banks are following in their 
footsteps, according to press reports.  The two major problems 
facing Japanese banks--the Chinese Government's reluctance to 
approve offices in Beijing and difficulty in obtaining and using 
renminbi--remain to be solved, but the Chinese Government has 
approached the banks for assistance in several areas. 

   Firmly Established Commercial Banks Increase Lending - The major 
commercial banks, which have already established a presence in China 
(see table below), are increasing their lending volume, according to 
the 24 May NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN.  They are driven by the increasing 
demand for funds resulting from economic liberalization and by a 
sense of "wanting to reclaim their place as leaders in the vast 
Chinese market."  As examples, Dai-Ichi Kangyo Bank's loans in China 
have doubled in the last two years, Mitsubishi Bank has increased 
its line of credit at an average rate of 14 percent over the past 
three years, while Sakura and Fuji banks intend to increase lending 
by more than 10 percent in FY94. 

   The following is a list of the offices the 11 major commercial 
and three long-term credit banks have established in China, 
according to the 26 May NIKKEI KINYU.  (B denotes a branch, which 
engages in full banking operations such as taking deposits and 
making loans.  RO denotes a representative office, which does not 
engage in banking operations, but typically gathers information.) 


Commercial Banks  Beijing  Shanghai  Guangzhou  Dalian  Shenzhen 
Tianjin 
Asahi Bank*       RO       RO 
Bank of Tokyo     RO       B         RO         B       B 
Dai-Ichi Kangyo*  RO       B         RO         RO 
Daiwa Bank        RO       B         RO 
Fuji Bank         RO       RO        RO         B       B 
Hokkaido Takushoku         RO                   RO                B 
Mitsubishi Bank   RO       B         RO         RO 
Sakura Bank       RO       B         B          RO                RO 
Sanwa Bank        RO       B         RO         B       B         RO 
Sumitomo Bank     RO       RO        B          RO 
Tokai Bank        RO       RO        RO 
Long-Term Credit  Banks 
Long-Term Credit 
Bank of Japan     RO       RO        RO 
Industrial Bank   of 
Japan             RO       B         RO         B 
Nippon Credit Bank         RO 

   *Asahi Bank also has representative offices in Qingdao and 
Fuzhou, while Dai-Ichi Kangyo has one in Xiamen. 


   'China Boom' Spreads Among Regional Banks -- The 15 April NIHON 
KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI) reported that the "China boom" evident among 
Japan's major commercial banks is spreading to the regional bank 
level.  Six banks, five of them regional banks, have been 
tentatively authorized by the Ministry of Finance (MOF) to establish 
overseas offices in 1994.  Five of the offices will be in China and 
one in Hong Kong.  Sumitomo Trust Bank and Hokuriku, Iyo, and Shinwa 
Banks have been authorized to establish representative offices in 
Shanghai, while Fukuoka City Bank has been authorized to establish 
offices in Dalian and Aomori Bank has gotten permission to set up 
offices in Hong Kong.  Two other regional banks, Juroku Bank and 
Nishi-Nippon Bank, have already established offices in Shanghai, 
while Yamaguchi Bank has an office in Dalian. 

   In what is reportedly a rare move for a medium-sized regional 
bank, the Bank of Nagoya has established "cooperative business 
agreements" with seven regional governments in China, according to 
the 8 March NIKKEI KINYU.  The two most recent agreements were 
concluded with the city governments of Changzhou and Kunshan. 
Cities with which previous agreements were made include Nantong and 
Suzhou.  Under the agreements, the Bank of Nagoya introduces its 
customers seeking joint venture projects and technology exchange in 
China to the city governments.  The bank deliberately seeks 
agreements in the more remote areas of China where it can negotiate 
directly with the leaders of the regions.  It has been building this 
network of cooperative business agreements since 1985, NIKKEI KINYU 
reported. 

   Even credit associations are seeking business in China, according 
to the 25 April NIKKEI KINYU.  The National Federation of Credit 
Associations has received informal authorization from the MOF to 
establish an office in Hong  Kong in October and plans to set up 
representative offices in Shanghai and Dalian to assist Japanese 
companies entering the China market.  With the new offices, the 
association expects that individual credit associations will be 
doing business with 530 Japanese businesses operating in China and 
Hong Kong in 1994. 

   Key Issues Are Beijing Branches, Acquiring Renminbi -- So far no 
bank has a branch in Beijing, and upgrading representative offices 
to branches in the capital city is the "linchpin" of their business 
strategies in China, according to the 26 May NIKKEI KINYU.  Building 
good connections to the central government through branches in 
Beijing is the key to penetrating the interior regions, the paper 
asserted.  To this end five banks--Sumitomo, Sanwa, Industrial Bank 
of Japan, Bank of Tokyo, and Mitsubishi--are waging a "public 
relations war" to be the first bank authorized to upgrade their 
Beijing representative offices, according to the 2 March NIKKEI 
KINYU.  The Bank of Tokyo and Mitsubishi Bank made direct personal 
appeals to the mayor of Beijing in February for the upgrade, while 
Sumitomo Bank, considered the most likely candidate for a full 
branch, held a three-day seminar in mid-March for the benefit of 
Chinese banks, which was "highly praised" by Chinese authorities, 
according to the 8 April NIKKEI KINYU. 

   The Chinese Government has proposed that the banks form "joint- 
venture banks" with Chinese banks in conjunction with their requests 
to establish Beijing branches, according to NIKKEI KINYU.  China is 
reportedly seeking a transfer of the financing and supervisory know- 
how of Japanese banks to the Chinese side through the "joint-venture 
banks," but the Japanese are reportedly ambivalent.  However, the 
article observed they can not afford to ignore the Chinese 
authorities' requests.  Competition from U.S. and European banks is 
leading the Japanese banks to gradually accept the government ' s 
proposal. 

   Another key issue facing banks is the difficulty of obtaining 
local Chinese currency, renminbi, the 26 May NIKKEI KINYU reported. 
Japanese banks cannot satisfy the large-scale funding Japanese 
companies require to build factories because foreign banks are 
prohibited from dealing in the local currency directly.  Currently 
Japanese banks can meet small-scale needs for funds by introducing a 
Japanese company to a local Chinese bank, where the Japanese company 
can open an account and withdraw renminbi. Occasionally a Japanese 
bank will guarantee a renminbi loan for a Japanese company.  But on 
the whole it is difficult to obtain renminbi, according to the 26 
May NIKKEI KINYU, and authorization to use the currency could be "a 
matter of life or death" for Japanese banks in China, according to 
the 8 March NIKKEI KINYU. 

   The MOF has made a formal appeal to the Chinese authorities to 
lift the ban on the use of renminbi, while executives from 
Industrial Bank of Japan, Mitsubishi, Sanwa, and Sakura and other 
banks have made informal appeals, according to the 23 May NIKKEI. 
Earlier in the year, Japanese banks discussed the issue with the 
People's Bank of China, according to the 8 March NIKKEI KINYU, and 
from that discussion understood that they would be allowed to use 
renminbi on a trial basis for deposit-taking functions. They 
interpreted this as the first step toward full banking operations, 
according to NIKKEI KINYU.  But the 25 May ASAHI SHIMBUN reported 
that the People's Bank of China had not yet completed its revision 
of the rules governing foreign banks' use of renminbi and that 
"there was no possibility of it doing so in the near future." 

   Bank Support Networks Intended To Stimulate Direct Investment -- 
In an attempt to assist small-to-medium-sized corporations entering 
the China market, Sanwa Bank conducted a series of seminars in 
"caravan" style, traveling throughout Japan, visiting over 100 
branches and engaging 2,500 bankers, according to the 26 May NIKKEI 
KINYU.  The "caravan" style seminar is designed to expand Sanwa's 
support services to its branch customers seeking to do business in 
China.  The bank has also increased the number of China specialists 
working in Japan to provide overall business support to the "Sanwa 
Bank Group" in China, according to the 11 March NIKKEI KINYU. 

   In a similar move to assist its small-to-medium-sized customers, 
Mitsubishi Bank will dispatch over 100 branch managers to study 
economic conditions in China, according to the 26 May NIKKEI KINYU. 
By the beginning of June 1994 it had already dispatched 43 branch 
managers to hear the concerns of Japanese companies already 
operating in China regarding the currency, labor, and legal 
difficulties of doing business there, according to the 6 June ASAHI. 

   Meanwhile, Fuji Bank has sent roughly 50 branch managers to 
Japanese factories in China to research conditions there, according 
to ASAHI.  While visiting factories in Beijing, Dalian, Shanghai, 
and Shenzhen, the branch managers also held discussions with Chinese 
authorities about conditions in China.  The bank has written a 
handbook for small-to-medium-sized businesses concerning Asian 
currencies and financial markets, according to the 1 April NIKKEI 
KINYU, which is devoted primarily to explaining China's newly 
unified exchange rate system. 

   Dai-Ichi Kangyo Bank has increased personnel in its "invest in 
China" group, according to the 3 June NISHI NIHON SHIMBUN, and in 
June for the first time will send branch managers to observe 
conditions in China, with a second delegation being planned for the 
fall. 

   Nippon Credit Bank, one of the three long-term credit banks, held 
a seminar in June teaching regional financial institutions how to 
advise corporations on entering the China market, according to the 
16 June NIKKEI KINYU.  Financial institutions with which Nippon 
Credit does business have been unable to respond adequately to 
companies seeking advice on the business climate in China and the 
seminar was intended to provide a stronger advisory network for 
them. 

   The Bank of Saga, a medium-ranked regional bank, has created a 
China trade and investment research group with 80 corporate members. 
The research group will hold "invest in China" seminars once a month 
until October 1994, according to the 7 June NIKKEI KINYU. 

   Chinese Organizations Request Assistance -- The Shanghai Bankers 
Association, which has 37 members, proposed a business tie-in with 
the Osaka Bankers Association during a visit to Japan in May, 
according to the 7 June ASAHI.  This would reportedly be the first 
tie-in between bankers associations in Japan and China, the paper 
observed.  The tie-in would involve exchanging researchers and 
information on financing conditions within the two countries and 
conducting investment seminars.  While the Osaka Bankers Association 
is currently considering the proposed tie-in, the 7 June MAINICHI 
SHIMBUN reported that Osaka has indicated that it will cooperate 
with the Shanghai association, and according to ASAHI expects to 
receive a formal proposal during the summer of 1994.  A final 
decision on the details of the tie-in is expected by the end of the 
year at the earliest. 

   Finally, the Government of China is requesting the assistance of 
Japanese banks in modernizing its online banking system, according 
to the 24 May NIKKEI KINYU.  It is requesting assistance in creating 
an "online data management system" that links banks with trade, 
tariff, and foreign currency exchange authorities there.  In 
addition, the government is seeking assistance in building a network 
that would allow the use of credit and bank cash cards throughout 
China.  Requests for assistance were made informally through the 
Japanese banks' offices in China and were more formally voiced by a 
representative of the state-run China National Electronics Import 
and Export Corporation during a recent visit to Japan. The data 
management system is expected to be completed within 1994, while 
the cash and credit card network will take the next eight to ten 
years to complete.  For the time being, Japanese banks are using 
know-how from having developed their own payments and data 
management systems in advising the Chinese on the modernization 
scheme. 

   FEATURE:  FY93 Financial Statements of Life Insurers Reported -- 
SUMMARY:  In FY93, Japanese life insurers earned less interest and 
dividend income than in FY92, reflecting the "low interest era," and 
sales of individual insurance policies declined due to a fall in 
personal income, according to press reports.  All major life 
insurers recorded "unrealized profits" of shares they held as 
"special profits" to improve their balance sheets, and some actually 
sold shares and real estate to raise money.  Some mid-ranked 
insurers are having financial problems, which is expected to 
accelerate reorganization of the life insurance industry. 

   The 10 June ASAHI SHIMBUN reported that based on the FY93 
financial statements of life insurers released on 9 June, some of 
the mid-ranked life insurers are having financial problems.  For 
example, Toho Life recorded a recurring loss for the first time in 
the postwar period and Chiyoda Life reported a large number of 
nonperforming assets.  Mid-ranked life insurers tried to compete 
with major life insurers by offering high yield, "saving-type" 
insurance policies and by extending loans to real estate businesses 
during the bubble economy.  After the bubble burst, however, ASAHI 
noted, they had to pay their "dues."  ASAHI commented that the 
financial difficulties of mid-ranked insurers will probably 
accelerate reorganization of the life insurance industry through 
mergers and acquisitions. 

   Revenues Declined -- Japan's eight largest life insurers 
collected approximately 22.3 trillion yen ($223 billion) from sales 
of insurance policies in FY93, a 2.3 percent increase from FY92, 
according to the 10 June NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI).  While sales 
of individual "annuity-type" and group insurance policies increased 
greatly, sales of individual life insurance policies, the companies' 
main product, remained sluggish. Reasons for the low sales included 
a decline in personal income due to the prolonged economic slump and 
an increase in premium rates starting in April 1993, according to 
the 10 June NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN.  The paper concluded that it will 
be "tough" for life insurers to increase sales of their policies in 
the future.  Moreover, Japan's life insurance market is unlikely to 
grow rapidly, since about 90 percent of Japanese households already 
have some kind of life insurance coverage. 

   The 10 June NIKKEI KINYU reported that the total value of 
individual life insurance policies issued by the eight largest life 
insurers increased "only" 5.1 percent--less than the 7.5 percent 
increase in FY92--to 1,170 trillion yen ($11.7 trillion) in FY93. 
All eight life insurers suffered a drop in their rates of increase 
in FY93 compared with FY92.  Sales by Nippon Life Insurance, Japan's 
largest life insurer, increased only 3.6 percent, the lowest rate of 
increase among the eight.  By contrast, the total value of sales of 
individual annuity-type life insurance policies increased 24.1 
percent to 55 trillion yen ($550 billion), according to the 
10 June ASAHI. 

   Yield Rates Fell -- Reflecting the "low interest era," the eight 
life insurers earned "modest" dividend and interest income, from 
3.36 to 4.25 percent returns on their assets, according to the 10 
June NIKKEI KINYU. Although life insurers planned to increase loans 
to companies as a means of stable long term investment, they could 
not loan as much as they hoped to because of the lack of demand for 
funds.  The ratio of loans in the total assets dropped to 39.2 
percent in FY93 from 40.4 percent in FY92. 

   The 10 June NIKKEI KINYU reported that in order to avoid pegging 
assets to low interest rate instruments over the long term, life 
insurers invested their funds in short term instruments, such as 
designated money trust funds, cash deposits, and call lending.  Most 
insurers increased their ratios of designated honey trust funds to 
total assets.  For example, Daiichi Life and Sumitomo Life increased 
their ratios from 2.6 percent and 3.9 percent in FY92 to 4.4 percent 
and 4.9 percent in FY93, respectively. The average ratio of bash 
deposits and call lending of the eight large insurers increased to 
9.0 percent in FY93 from 5.6 percent in FY92.  The ratio of deposits 
and call lending of Nippon Life, in particular, rose from 6.7 
percent to 12.1 percent, which contributed to its "low" yield rate 
of 3.34 percent (4.16 pErcent in FY92). 

   To raise their incomes, all eight life insurers recorded 
"unrealized profits" from shares they held as "special profits," 
according to the 10 June NIKKEI.  Such special profits totaled 544.5 
billion yen ($5.45 billion).  The paper warned that as life insurers 
use up unrealized profits, their financial bases will be weakened. 

   While Nippon Life and Daiichi Life raised most of the money they 
needed from interest and dividend incomes, Chiyoda Life and Sumitomo 
Life sold shares to raise approximately 40 percent of their cash 
needs, according to the 10 June NIKKEI KINYU.  Sumitomo Life also 
sold real estate worth 76.9 billion yen ($769 million) to meet its 
cash needs, according to the 10 June ASAHI. 

   Some Still Have Nonperforming Asset Problems -- According to the 
10 June NIKKEI, the total outstanding balance of nonperforming 
assets (loans extended to companies which have gone bankrupt and 
those on which interest payments have been suspended for more than 
six months) of the eight largest life insurers was 377.7 billion yen 
($3.78 billion), a 6.9 percent decrease from FY92.  NIKKEI reported 
that life insurers actively wrote off nonperforming assets through 
sales of the loans to the Real Estate Resolution Corporation. 

   Although the outstanding balance of nonperforming assets declined 
on the whole, NIKKEI noted that some life insurers still have 
"serious problems" with nonperforming assets.  For example, Chiyoda 
Life has the largest amount, 197.9 billion yen ($1.98 billion), in 
nonperforming assets.  The paper noted that this amount was 
"relatively large."  Chiyoda Life stated that it would resolve the 
nonperforming asset problem "within two years." NIKKEI asserted, 
however, that it would be difficult for Chiyoda Life to do so in two 
years because of the sluggish real estate market.  Another example 
is Sumitomo Life.  Although nonperforming assets held by Sumitomo 
Life itself total 49.1 billion yen ($491 million), its affiliated 
nonbank lenders collectively have a "large" amount of nonperforming 
assets, which required Sumitomo Life to spend a total of 130 billion 
yen ($1.3 billion) to help its affiliated nonbank lenders in FY93. 
The paper concluded that it would take three to five years for 
Sumitomo Life to bail out its affiliated nonbank lenders. 

   Toho Life Records Loss -- According to the 10 June ASAHI, in its 
FY93 financial statement Toho Life, a mid-ranked life insurer, 
became the first company in the postwar era to record a recurring 
loss, 19.8 billion yen ($198 million).  The primary cause was the 
56.7 billion yen ($567 million) lost from sales of foreign 
investment trust funds that contained "hidden losses."  Although 
Toho Life sold Japanese stock shares and real estate to realize non- 
recurring profits, they were not sufficient to make up the losses. 

   The 10 June ASAHI noted that Toho Life expanded its customer base 
by offering high yielding, saving-type life insurance policies 
during the bubble economy.  However, it could not make enough 
profits from domestic investments after the bursting of the bubble. 
To increase profits, according to the article, Toho Life "heavily" 
invested funds totalling 190 billion yen ($1.9 billion) in high- 
return, high-risk foreign investment trust funds during 1991-1992. 
Due to the recent fall in the U.S. bond market and appreciation of 
the yen, however, its foreign currency denominated assets declined 
in value. 

   In the 10 June ASAHI, Toshiuchi Sakogawa, vice president of Toho 
Life, explained that the company decided to sell off foreign 
securities with hidden losses in order to improve its assets, rather 
than making the FY93 financial statement "look good."  He continued 
that Toho Life also expects the next year to be tough, since the 
company intends to sell off the remaining portion of its foreign 
securities with hidden losses in FY94.  In addition, Sakogawa said 
that Toho Life would write off domestic nonperforming or low 
yielding assets to improve its yield rates.  He expects it will take 
three years to finish write-offs and sell-offs of nonperforming or 
losing assets.  In order to improve its financial condition, Toho 
Life plans to reduce its workforce by 660 employees, 20 percent of 
the total, by the end of FY95 through mergers of branches. 

   Federation of Credit Associations Restructuring, 
Internationalizing -- The National Federation of Credit 
Associations, the central bank of Japan's more than 400 credit 
associations, will begin overhauling its organizational structure in 
June in order to increase international operations and enhance non- 
member lending, according to the 2 June NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN.  The 
Federation rivals mid-ranking commercial banks in terms of funds 
under management--roughly 13 trillion yen ($130 billion) as of the 
fiscal year which ended March 1994, according to the 23 May NIKKEI 
KINYU.  It absorbs excess funds of the individual credit 
associations to invest in negotiable securities (roughly 40 
percent), make loans (roughly 30 percent), and to lend in the short- 
term money market (30 percent).  Liberalized interest rates have 
made its traditional portfolio management emphasizing securities 
more difficult however, and the overhaul is intended to shift use of 
money from domestic securities transactions to increased lending, 
according to the 2 June NIKKEI KINYU.  This includes participating 
in syndicated loans abroad, more direct lending to members of credit 
associations operating in foreign countries, and increased lending 
to large, non-member corporations, NIKKEI KINYU reported.  As part 
of the reorganization, the Federation's international "section" will 
be upgraded to a department and simultaneously separated from the 
general treasury department, according to the 2 June NIKKEI KINYU. 

   The Federation currently has four offices overseas, a branch in 
New York, a representative office and securities subsidiary in 
London, and a representative office in Singapore, according to the 
23 May NIKKEI KINYU.  It is seeking to shift its overseas focus to 
Asia because an increasing number of credit association customers 
are attempting to enter Asian markets, according to the 25 April 
NIKKEI KINYU.  From a survey it conducted on corporations seeking 
advice on China, for example, the Federation found that the number 
of credit association customers operating there doubled over the 
past three years, with 1993 showing the largest increase in history, 
according to the 13 April NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN.  In order to assist 
these customers, the Federation plans to open a Hong Kong office in 
October followed by offices in Shanghai and Dalian, according to the 
25 April NIKKEI KINYU.  The Singapore office, which previously was 
engaged primarily in research, will begin participating in loan 
syndication.  At home, the 2 June NIKKEI KINYU reported, the new 
international department will include a "trade and investment 
consulting" office to provide information on the local economies of 
China and Vietnam, among other places, and to assist domestic 
Japanese firms in locating joint venture partners in Asia. 

   First Japanese to Establish Hedge Fund -- Koichi Kawai, formerly 
the president of Paribas Asset Management Japan, will reportedly be 
the first Japanese ever to establish a hedge fund, according to the 
14 June NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN.  "Hedge fund" is a general term for an 
investment fund employing high-yield derivatives, such as financial 
and commodity futures, swaps and options, according to the 8 June 
NIKKEI KINYU.  The fund will be registered in the Cayman Islands and 
begin operations in September 1994. Kawai, who has already raised 
several billions of yen (roughly $20-30 million), is holding a 
seminar in July to attract investment by Americans.  The fund is to 
be limited to fewer than 100 investors to qualify for exemption from 
regulation by the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission. 

   For the time being, 70 percent of the fund's investment will be 
in small-scale Japanese stocks traded over the counter while the 
remainder will be invested in promising Asian and Latin American 
markets.  The Asian portion of the fund's investment strategy will 
be devised by Kawai, while the Latin American portion will be left 
to a mid-sized U.S. hedge fund, "Emerging Market Advisors," with 
which Kawai will form a partnership. 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - CHINA:  Tokyo Gas To Set Up Office 
in Beijing -- Tokyo Gas, Japan's largest gas utility company, will 
open an office in Beijing on 1 July to gather information on China's 
domestic energy situation and to make preparations to enter China's 
rapidly growing city gas business.  Tokyo Gas plans to use this new 
office to strengthen its relationship with Beijing Gas, with which 
it signed a cooperation and exchange agreement in 1979 to conduct 
technical exchanges and to train Beijing Gas employees.  Tokyo Gas 
is studying the possibility of sending specialists to China in the 
fields of pipelines, pipelaying, and safety technologies.  The 
Beijing office will also collect information on China's foreign 
purchases of gas and track trends in the city gas business 
throughout China. 

   Tokyo Gas, which is already developing the city gas business in 
Malaysia together with Petronas, the Malaysian state-run oil 
company, is considering a preliminary survey in China to see whether 
similar business opportunities exist.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 
11 Jun 94 p 10) 

   Sanwa Denki To Manufacture Color Monitors in Shanghai -- Sanwa 
Denki, Japan's second largest manufacturer of color monitors, will 
establish a joint venture company in Shanghai to produce color 
monitors and video game machines.  The unnamed joint venture will be 
capitalized at 220 million yen ($2.2 million) with Sanwa Denki 
contributing 30 percent; Shanghai Yongxin Shadow Mask Co., a CRT 
manufacturer, 55 percent; Taiwan Le-hsin Electronics, a video game 
manufacturer, 8 percent; and Chiahe Electronics, a Taiwanese 
electronic parts trading company, 7 percent. 

   Sanwa Denki will provide the technology and 80 million yen 
($800,000) worth of production equipment which will be installed at 
one of Shanghai Yongxin's factories, which is currently idle.  The 
factory will begin production on 20 October and have a maximum 
monthly production capacity of 100,000 color monitors and 10,000 
video game machines.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 9 Jun 94 p 22) 

   INDIA:  Marubeni, Toshiba To Build Two 250,000kw Generators -- An 
international consortium, including Marubeni, Toshiba, and the Tapur 
Group,  an Indian conglomerate, is planning to construct a power 
plant in India under a build-operate-transfer arrangement.  Total 
investment for the power plant, which will consist of two 250,000kw 
coal-fired generators, will be more than $500 million.  The 
consortium has completed a preliminary feasibility study and will 
begin a full-scale study within the year with the goal of beginning 
construction in two or three years.  The consortium is also 
considering establishing a joint venture company to build and 
operate the power plant, which will be located near the city of 
Nagpur, in central India. 

   N. K. P. Salve, the Indian minister of power, requested Japanese 
cooperation in this project while visiting Japan in June 1993.  The 
Japanese agreed to participate "on a private basis as a symbol of 
Japanese-Indian economic cooperation."  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 
20 Jun 94 p 14) 

   UZBEKISTAN:  Trading Companies Sign Cooperation Agreements With 
Government -- Three of Japan's largest general trading companies, 
Marubeni Corp., Mitsui and Co., and Mitsubishi Corp., have concluded 
economic cooperation agreements with the Government of Uzbekistan. 
The agreements follow the the economic assistance agreements 
negotiated with international financial institutions, such as the 
World Bank and European Bank for Reconstruction and Development, as 
well as the recent commitment by the Japanese Government to extend 
trade insurance to Uzbekistan. 

   Only a general outline of the agreement Marubeni concluded with 
the Uzbek Government has been disclosed.  It involves cooperation in 
ten areas, including extraction and refining of gas and oil, 
processing of agricultural products, establishing communications 
networks, building tourism facilities, and airport construction. 
One project already under way is the construction of a new oil 
refinery in Bukhara with an annual capacity of 2.5 million tons, 
which is scheduled to be completed early in 1997.  The agreements 
signed by Mitsubishi and Mitsui are reported to be very similar to 
that signed by Marubeni. 

   The trading companies have "high hopes" for Uzbekistan despite 
the fact that economic reform has just begun there.  Many projects 
they are planning for Uzbekistan are contingent upon financing from 
the International Monetary Fund (IMF), and they anticipate the IMF 
will shortly authorize between $60 and $70 million in loans to 
Uzbekistan.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 16 Jun 94 p 2) 

   VIETNAM: Itochu in Joint Venture To Manufacture Electric Cable -- 
Itochu Corp., one of Japan's largest general trading companies, and 
a Vietnamese state-owned firm have agreed to form a joint venture 
company to manufacture electric cable.  The Vietnamese partner is 
"Kiyadeibi," a company based in Ho Chi Minh City that is under the 
jurisdiction of Vietnam's Ministry of Heavy Industry.  Initial 
investment in the joint venture will be $5 million, with Itochu 
contributing 10-20 percent and Kiyadeibi the remainder.  The two 
sides are examining whether to use the Vietnamese firm's facilities 
or build a new plant to manufacture the cable.  If their decision is 
to build a new plant, the necessary funds will be borrowed from 
banks. 

   The goal of the two companies is to begin cable production next 
summer at a level of 4,000 tons annually.  Vietnam's current demand 
for cable is about 2,000 tons, but is expected to increase rapidly. 
Although Vietnam's 500-km north-south power transmission project has 
been completed, construction projects are underway to extend 
transmission lines to Vietnam's major regional cities.  In addition, 
new power generating facilities will be built in Vietnam funded by 
official development assistance extended by Japan and other Western 
nations and by World Bank loans, which will require additional 
transmission cable.  If the joint venture is able to reach its 
4,000-ton production target, this would be the first time Vietnam 
has been able to meet domestic demand for cable.  (Tokyo NIKKEI 
SANGYO SHIMBUN 15 Jun 94 p 6) 

   Tomen, Taiwan Firm Establish Joint Venture Can Production Company 
--Tomen, a general trading company, together with President 
Enterprises, a Taiwanese comglomerate, and a Vietnamese state-owned 
company have formed a joint venture company in Vietnam to 
manufacture cans to be used in exporting fruits and vegetables.  The 
Vietamese firm, the Fruits and Vegetables Import-Export Corporation, 
is "under the umbrella" of the Ministry of Agriculture.  The 
Vietnamese Government has high expectations that the joint venture 
will generate large foreign exchange earnings. 

   The joint venture firm, "Tobekan Company," will be headquartered 
in Ho Chi Minh City and will have an initial capital investment of 
$5 million. President will contribute 50 percent, Tomen 25-30 
percent, and the Vietnamese company the remainder.  Of the $8 
million required to build and equip the new company's plant, about 
$3 million will be borrowed from banks. 

   The new company will begin producing cans this summer to support 
exports of Vietnamese pineapple, "other fruits," and vegetables to 
Japan, the United States, and Europe.  In the first year of 
operations the company plans to produce 10.5 million cans, 
increasing to 45 million cans within 3 years and 60 million in 4 
years, which will be a level sufficient to meet Vietnam's domestic 
demand.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 14 Jun 94 p 5) 

   Honda To Begin Assembling Motorbikes in Ho Chi Minh City -- Honda 
Motor will begin the assembly production of motorbikes in Vietnam in 
mid-1995 at a level of 270,000 to 300,000 units per year, according 
to the 12 June NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI).  The motorbikes 
produced will be 70 to 100-cc displacement "Super Cub" models. 
Honda has applied to Vietnam's State Commission for Cooperation and 
Investment for permission.  (For a report on Suzuki beginning 
motorbike production in Vietnam, see the 18 May 1994 Pacific Rim 
Economic Review, page 12.) 

   According to the NIKKEI article, Honda, as a rule when setting up 
overseas operations, prefers to establish 100 percent-owned 
production subsidiaries.  However, in this case Honda will form a 
joint venture company in which it will hold an 80-90 percent stake. 
The NIKKEI article did not specify the Vietnamese joint venture 
partner, or why Honda decided on the joint venture.  The highest 
amount Honda would invest in the project is 10 billion yen ($100 
million).  An assembly plant will be built in the southern part of 
Ho Chi Minh City. 

   At present in Vietnam imported Honda two-wheel vehicles account 
for more than 90 percent" of the 2 to 2.2 million two-wheel 
vehicles.  Some 270,000 to 280,000 Honda bikes are imported yearly. 
Thus, when Honda begins production, it will have a market 
"monopoly."  The company will gradually develop a sales and service 
network throughout the country. 

   Fuji Xerox To Begin Marketing Copying Machines -- Fuji Xerox, 
through its Singapore subsidiary, Fuji Xerox Asia-Pacific, has begun 
selling copying machines in Vietnam through an agreement with the 
state-owned Vietnam Computer Company 2.  Fuji Xerox decided to enter 
the Vietnamese market now because demand for office equipment has 
expanded more quickly than anyone imagined.  This will be the first 
time Vietnam Computer has marketed copiers.  The company acts as an 
agent for IBM in selling computers in Vietnam. 

   Fuji Xerox must catch up with Ricoh, which began selling copiers 
in Vietnam three years ago through a local sales agent.  Canon, 
another major manufacturer of copiers, has not set up a direct sales 
system in Vietnam. 

   Within the Xerox Group, Fuji Xerox's sales area covers the entire 
Asia-Pacific region with the exception of China.  With its entry 
into Vietnam, Fuji Xerox Asia-Pacific now has a sales network 
involving ten countries, including Australia, Singapore, South 
Korea, and Taiwan.  (Tokyo NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 3 Jun 94 p 8) 

   Firm To Build Large Sewing Factory in Ha Tinh -- Hikosen, a 
privately owned Tokyo firm that makes women's apparel and sundry 
goods, has received formal approval from the Vietnamese Government's 
Board of Investments to build a sewing factory in Vietnam.  The 
factory, the company's third overseas plant, will be built in Ha 
Tinh City, central Vietnam, in early 1995.  In the 1980's Hikosen 
built a sewing plant in Vung Tao, southern Vietnam, and another in 
the Philippines. 

   While the scale of the Ha Tinh plant has not yet been decided, it 
will be a large facility designed not only for Hikosen's production 
needs but also for use by other Japanese apparel companies on a 
tenant basis.  Hikosen initially plans to employ 400-500 workers, 
but the entire factory complex "at a minimum will employ 5,000 
workers."  The factory will have about 50,000 sewing machines, of 
which Hikosen will use 1,000.  Apparel and sewn goods made under 
Hikosen's label, such as aprons, sweaters, T-shirts, and various 
types of bags, will be exported to Japan via the nearby port of 
Vinh.  Detailed sewing work will be contracted out to local plants 
or individuals. 

   The Vietnamese Government wants to invigorate economic activity 
in northern Vietnamese cities like Ha Tinh, which lack industries. 
It wants to develop Ha Tinh as a large sewing industry center and is 
seeking to expand economic activity through subcontracting and other 
local operations.  (Tokyo NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 3 Jun 94 p 25) 

   Machine Tools/Robotics - April MT Orders Down 12.2 Percent, 
Domestic Orders Drop 20 Percent --  A survey conducted by the Japan 
Machine Tool Builders' Association showed April machine tool (MT) 
orders dropped 12.2 percent compared to April 1993 to 42.86 billion 
yen ($428.6 million), according to the 8 June NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN. 
Domestic orders totaled 24.243 billion yen ($242.43 million), a drop 
of 20.2 percent.  The 8 June NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN noted that 
domestic orders from the auto industry fell 23.5 percent, while 
those from the general machinery industry fell 22.7 percent. 

   According to the NIKKEI SANGYO, April exports were up 1.0 percent 
to 18.563 billion yen ($185.63 million), with exports to the United 
States, China, and Southeast Asia particularly strong.  Exports for 
the first four months of 1994 were up 6.9 percent from the same 
period in 1993. 

   Petroleum/Energy - NKK Wins LNG Tanker Order From Nippon Yusen 
Subsidiary -- NKK, one of the world's five largest steelmakers, has 
won an order to build a liquefied natural gas (LNG) tanker for Asia 
LNG Transport, a joint venture of Nippon Yusen and a Malaysian 
company.  The contract for the 18,800 cubic meter LNG tanker, which 
will incorporate NKK's Technigas Mark II membrane technology, will 
be valued at 8-9 billion yen ($80-$90 million).  Construction is 
scheduled to begin in September 1995 and the tanker will be 
delivered in the spring of 1997 to Asia LNG Transport, which 
will use it to deliver LNG to a project in Sendai City. 

   NKK reportedly won the order because it had previously built a 
similar tanker for Seibu Gas, and was willing to denominate the 
contract in dollars rather than yen.  Shipbuilding companies are 
shifting their attention to LNG tankers for the domestic market 
because of the high yen and an anticipated shift to the use of 
natural gas by mid-sized regional gas utility companies.  (Tokyo 
NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 8 Jun 94 p 12) 

   Telecommunications/Satellites - Toyota Motor Expected To Acquire 
Major Share in Teleway Japan, IDO -- Teleway Japan and Nippon Idou 
Tsushin (IDO) announced on 1 June that they will increase their 
capital by issuing new stock through a third-party allocation 
scheme.  Toyota Motor Corp., which is a major shareholder in both 
companies, will assume the stock from both companies "which is not 
spoken for" by other shareholders and is expected to become the 
"number-one" shareholder of both companies and begin assuming 
responsibility for managing operations.  Both companies will settle 
the details at their respective shareholders' meetings in late June, 
and the changes will go into effect in the fall. 

   Teleway Japan will increase its capital to 49.8 billion yen ($498 
million).  About 20 shareholding companies are expected to respond 
to the stock offering, including Toyota, which will increase its 
percentage share in the company from 6.9 percent to nearly 40 
percent.  Teleway Japan calculated a 12.5 billion yen ($125 million) 
loss after final accounting for FY93 and its cumulative losses are 
close to 43.9 billion yen ($439 million).  It expects excess 
liabilities of 10 billion yen ($100 million) for FY94 and is seeking 
to turn pretax profits in the black from FY97.  (Osaka MAINICHI 
SHIMBUN 2 Jun 94 p 10) 

   IDO is increasing its capital to support the 50 billion yen ($500 
million) expansion of the Motorola-based cellular telephone network 
and the conversion to digital systems.  Toyota will assume a share 
of IDO which is three times its current investment and Tokyo 
Electric Power Co. and Chubu Electric Power Co. are expected to 
double their investments. 

   According to figures calculated for FY93, IDO registered profits 
in the black for a fourth consecutive year.  IDO's sales turnover 
was 17 percent higher than FY92 at 94.8 billion yen ($948 million) 
and its pretax profits were 20 percent higher at 1.5 billion yen 
($15 million).  IDO is seeking to increase its sales in FY95 by 20 
percent but expects a downturn of 2-3 billion yen ($20-30 million) 
in pretax profits because it has reduced its basic rates.  It also 
expects an increase in its fixed costs.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO 
SHIMBUN 2 Jun 94 p 7) 

   Toyota has been an investor in both companies purely out of an 
obligation to personal requests from other executives, but it will 
gain a new responsibility for the companies along with its new 
investment status.  Toyota is designing a full-scale strategy for 
developing its position in the information communications market 
within the year and is especially focusing on measures to boost 
Teleway Japan's operations.  (Tokyo ASAHI SHIMBUN 1 Jun 94 p 12) 

   MPT Limits NTT Participation in Handiphone Market To Nurture 
Competition -- The 16 June NIHON KEZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI) reported 
that the Ministry of Posts and Telecommunications (MPT) decided not 
to approve Nippon Telegraph and Telephone's (NTT) participation in 
the market for next-generation personal handiphone communications 
systems (PHS) as part of NTT's main business operations.  The MPT, 
however, will allow NTT to participate in the market via a separate, 
independent company because it wants to create an even competition 
among NTT, existing companies such as Dainidenden, and new entrants 
to the market. 

   The MPT felt that NTT's operational base, which it established 
when it was a public enterprise, would give the company an edge in 
developing new businesses such as the PHS and, as a result, NTT 
would have a monopoly in the new market and competing companies 
could not evolve.  One of the MPT's main concerns is that the PHS 
requires an extensive network of transmitting stations placed at 
distances from 100 to 500 meters apart.  NTT has the advantage 
because it can place these types of stations atop its 170,000 
public telephone booths and on its 12 million telephone poles 
nationwide.  Other companies would have to rent spaces on top of 
buildings and establish new sites for their transmitting stations 
and would not be able to compete because of the extra costs. 

   The decision is part of a measure to restrain expansion of NTT's 
main operations and will also influence discussions regarding the 
scheduled MPT review of the company's operational structure in 1995. 
It may also lead to other measures to restrict NTT participation in 
the multimedia application software market.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI 
SHIMBUN 16 Jun 94 p 1) 

   New Common Carriers Will Lead the Handiphone Market -- According 
to another article appearing in the 16 June NIKKEI, recent 
developments indicate that the new common carrier telephone 
companies will be the leading force in PHS commercialization efforts 
even though NTT has also begun similar efforts.  There is a strong 
desire among the new common carriers to use PHS-related business 
activities as a "trump card" against the giant NTT.  This is 
especially true for the long-distance carriers which pay close to 50 
percent of their revenues to NTT for accessing its network and reap 
limited returns in subscriber revenues because of the limited number 
of circuits and low capacity.  The PHS business is appealing to 
communications businesses because it has the potential to develop 
into an alternative to the existing NTT network.  If the service 
area for PHS units expands, there is a high probability that 
consumers will be switching away from the NTT domestic urban 
network.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 16 Jun 94 p 13) 

   CHINA:  Domestic Developments - Ministry of Machine Building 
Plans To Develop Auto Industry --  The Ministry of Machine Building 
recently formulated a three-stage development plan for the 
automobile industry.  During the first stage from 1994 to 1996, 
total investment in the auto industry will exceed 46.4 billion yuan, 
an annual average increase of 36 percent.  The state will strive to 
reduce enterprise production costs and prices for passenger cars. 
Investment in the spare parts industry will also be increased. 
During the second stage from 1997 to 2000, annual auto output will 
be 150,000-240,000 and total investment will exceed 99.2 billion 
yuan.  The major focus of production will be on economical cars.  A 
few automobile enterprise groups will be set up and products will be 
developed that can compete on the open market.  During the third 
stage from 2000 to 2010, total investment will be 43 billion yuan 
and the annual increase in auto output will be about 3 million. 
(Harbin HEILONGJIANG RIBAO 20 May 94 p 7) 

   State Commissions Formulate Automobile Industry Policy --  The 
State Planning Commission, State Economic and Trade Commission, and 
the Ministry of Machine-Building Industry recently formulated 
"Policies on Automobile Industrial Technology." The main points are: 

   1.  The state will support automobile enterprises efforts in 
establishing their own development and research organizations and 
forming their own product development capability by absorbing 
foreign technology.  The state will provide funds to enterprise 
groups to jointly develop large research projects. 

   2.  The state will popularize the use of vehicles that employ 
electronic and new technology, are fuel efficient, and have low 
pollution levels.  The state will also encourage research and 
development of new types of fuel and power for vehicles. 

   3.  Automobile enterprises must ensure that their products are 
advanced.  Improvement of current products and development of new 
products must attain the 1990 international level and technology 
imports must meet 1990 international levels. 

   4.  Prior to the year 2000, passenger vehicles and pick-up trucks 
weighing less than 3.15 tons must gradually be converted to use 
gasoline rated at 90 octane or more.  Passenger vehicles weighing 
less than two tons must use unleaded gas.  Passenger vehicles 
exceeding five tons and pick-up trucks produced after the year 2000 
must use diesel fuel. 

   5.  The state will support the establishment of a national-level 
research, testing, and inspection organization for automobiles and 
motorcyles that will be responsible for formulating standards, 
product certification, establishing examination procedures for 
imports and exports, and related tasks.  The state will encourage 
automobile enterprises to set up joint ventures and technology 
research and development corporations with foreigners. 

   6. The state will encourage automobile enterprises to use modern 
electronic technolgy, software processing equipment, and automated 
equipment to raise the per capita equipment utilization rate and 
equipment technology levels. (Shenyang LIAONING JINGJI RIBAO 13 May 
94 p 3) 

   Hainan Company To Exploit Gas Reserves in South China Sea -- A 
large joint-stock company based in Haikou will soon be set up 
comprising petroleum enterprises from Hainan Island and the mainland 
to accelerate natural gas exploration in the South China Sea.  The 
gas reserves in this area (estimated at 100 billion cubic meters) 
are considered to be the largest in the country.  The Western Nanhai 
Sea Company is the leading sponsor with fixed assets of 4 billion 
renminbi.  The Eastern Nanhai Sea Company under the China National 
Offshore Oil Corporation, the Natural Gas Utilization Company, the 
China Offshore Petroleum and Natural Gas Sales Company, and the 
Hainan Trust and Investment Company are also involved.  Investments 
of $1.25 billion have already been made in this area and natural gas 
is expected to be supplied to Hainan Island and Hong Kong in January 
1996.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 1324 GMT 20 Jun 94) 

   MPCC Plans To Be Largest PRC Oil Refinery by Year 2000 -- Sinopec 
Maoming Petrochemical Corporation (MPCC) has announced a $2.3 
billion development program to turn itself into the largest oil 
refining and petrochemical complex in China by the year 2000.  MPCC 
is already the biggest oil refiner in China with an annual capacity 
of 8.5 million tons.  The corporation plans to have an annual 
capacity of 13.5 million tons by 1996 and 17 million tons by the end 
of the century when it will be the largest oil refining center in 
Asia.  MPCC will build four more oil refineries at a total cost of 
$574.7 million.  Construction of two refineries will start later 
this year, while the other two will be completed in 1996.  Foreign 
oil firms that are showing interest in cooperating with MPCC include 
Amoco Corp of the United States, Agip of Italy, and Chia Tai of 
Thailand.  MPCC is also in the process of building a 300,000-ton 
ethylene plant at a cost of $1.4 billion, financed in part with 
$723 million in foreign loans.  Construction of the plant began in 
late 1992 and it will produce 800,000 tons of petrochemical products 
annually from June 1996.  Most of its advanced equipment will be 
imported from the West.  Forty percent of the investment belongs to 
MPCC while the remainder lies with the China International 
Petrochemcical Corporation.  Later this year, MPCC will begin the 
construction of another depot and two oil wharves in Fangcheng, 
Guangxi Zhuang Autonomous Region.  These facilities are needed 
because MPCC now supplies oil products to seven provinces and 
regions in southwest China. (Beijing CHINA DAILY (BUSINESS WEEKLY) 
12-18 Jun 94 p 5) 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - Heilongjiang's Suifenhe Signs 
Trade Contracts With Russia -- A trade delegation from Suifenhe 
signed three contracts worth $1.15 billion with Russia at the Harbin 
trade fair on 16 June.  These include two barter trade contracts and 
one contract for processing supplied materials.  One barter trade 
contract concerns importing timber, steel products, chemical 
fertilizers, and nonferrous metals, and exporting foodstuffs and 
beverages.  The other calls for exporting garments and foodstuffs 
and importing logs.  (Harbin Heilongjiang Radio 0000 GMT 17 Jun 94) 

   Heilongjiang Firms Signs Joint-Venture Project With Russia -- On 
20 June, the Heilongjiang International Engineering Technology 
Cooperation Company and a company in the Zhuhai Special Economic 
Zone jointly signed a contract with a Russian company to establish 
an aerial tourist company in Zhuhai.  The total investment is $2.06 
million.  The Chinese side will provide 52 percent.   The company 
will be involved in selling aerial technology, leasing, tourism, 
advertisement, aerial photography, and aerial surveys.  The 
contracted period is 15 years.  (Harbin Heilongjiang Radio 1000 GMT 
20 Jun 94) 

   Heilongjiang Company Signs Barter Trade Contract With Russia -- 
The Heilongjiang International Economic and Trade Company signed a 
barter trade contract with a trading company of Blagoveshchensk, 
Russia at the Harbin trade fair on 19 June.  Heilongjiang will 
export instant noodles and canned food to Russia and import chemical 
fertilizers. The contract is worth $10 million.  (Harbin 
Heilongjiang Radio 1000 GMT 19 Jun 94) 

   Hong Kong Firm in Joint Venture to Rebuild Guangdong Highways -- 
Hong Kong's Guangzhou Enterprise (Group) and Guangdong's Xinfeng 
County have signed a contract to jointly invest 110 million yuan to 
rebuild the Xinfeng sections of National Highway 105 and Provincial 
Highway 1912.  The firms involved are the Guangdong Provincial 
Xinfeng Highway Development General Company and Xiangjie Limited, 
which is a wholly owned subsidiary of Guangzhou Enterprise (Group). 
The two sides have an equal share in the joint venture, which will 
run for 25 years.  Reconstruction of this section of National 
Highway 105 is expected to be completed by the end 1994 and that of 
Provincial Highway 1912 by the mid-1995.  (Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO 4 
Jun 94 p 5) 

   Guangzhou Wharf Project Being Handled by Hong Kong Firms -- 
According to Kuo Pei-Nan, vice chairman of the board of directors 
and concurrently general manager of Hong Kong-based Guangzhou 
Investment, his company and Stanley Ho's Shun Tak Holdings will take 
the lead in developing Guangzhou's Zhoutouzui Wharf.  Each will have 
35 percent stake in the project and their combined investment in the 
first phase is 500 to 600 million yuan.  The wharf will be 
redeveloped into a complex including an international pier, a 
commercial and entertainment center, and residential buildings.  Kuo 
also said that Guangzhou Investment has also signed a letter of 
intent to invest 200 million yuan in the Nanfang Cement Plant on the 
outskirts of Guangzhou to increase the plant's annual output from 
160,000 tons to 400,000 tons.  (Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO 4 Jun 94 p 14) 

   Hong Kong Firm To Develop Guangzhou Housing Project -- Huang 
Kaiwen, director of the Guangzhou City Land and Property 
Administrative Bureau, recently disclosed that Hong Kong's Cheung 
Kong (Holdings) Ltd., New World Development, and Guangzhou 
Investment signed a letter of intent on a "Home Ownership Plan" with 
the Guangzhou City Government last October.  Low-cost residential 
housing occupying 5 million square meters of land and with a total 
floor space of 7.5 million square meters will be built in the Baiyun 
District of northern Guangzhou.  Total investment will reach HK $20 
billion.  Cheung Kong has 35 percent stake in the project, as does 
New World Development, while Guangzhou Investment has a 20 percent 
stake and the Guangzhou City Government 10 percent.  (Hong Kong TA 
KUNG PAO 7 Jun 94 p 5) 

   Hong Kong Firm Invests in Fuzhou Housing Project -- According to 
Li Yichun, director of the Fuzhou Land Management Bureau of Fujian's 
Fuzhou City, the early stage of a project to protect and transform 
"three lanes and seven alleys" in Fuzhou has been completed.  The 
demolition of houses on more than 50 mu of land has been completed, 
prospecting work is under way, and pile-driving and construction 
will soon begin.  Hong Kong's Cheung Kong (Holdings) Ltd. and the 
Fuhui Ornament Company will invest a total of 3.5 billion yuan.  The 
project covers a total of 661 mu of land, is divided into six 
phases, and is expected to be completed in eight to 12 years.  By 
the end of April this year, Cheung Kong had invested more than 400 
million yuan in the project.  According to a senior manager with the 
joint venture, in the first stage, four blocks with over 1,000 
residential units and two blocks of 16-story office buildings are 
scheduled for sale in six months.  The whole project includes the 
construction of 29 blocks of high-rise residential buildings, six 
blocks of high-class office buildings and apartments, five large 
commercial and trade centers, entertainment centers, and social 
clubs.  (Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE 0920 GMT 13 Jun 94) 

   Bavarian Bank Sets Up Business Center in Shanghai -- The German 
state of Bavaria is teaming up with its bank Bayerische Landesbank 
to set up a business center in Shanghai to help German companies 
establish joint ventures.  The center, which opens next month, will 
assist medium-sized companies from all over Germany despite the fact 
that its major backers are Bavarian.  Bayerische Landesbank and 
Deutsche Bank will play an increasingly active role in funding their 
compatriots and others in mainland deals.  General manager Volker 
Stoeckel said that Bayerische Landesbank played a part in building 
10 power plants in southern China, underwriting smaller diesel- 
fueled stations costing $30 to $50 million, of which the bank 
usually invests $10 million itself.  (Hong Kong EASTERN EXPRESS 22 
Jun 94 p 34) 

   Netherlands' Largest Bank Opens Shanghai Branch -- ABN AMRO Bank, 
the largest bank in the Netherlands, expanded its presence in China 
by opening a branch in Shanghai on 8 June.  Bank vice chairman 
Michael Drabbe said that the Shanghai branch will form the base for 
ABN AMRO to build a network in China.  The bank already has a 
representative office in Beijing and is applying to open a similar 
office in Guangzhou.  Branches are planned for other commercial and 
financial centers in China.  The Shanghai branch has been in trial 
operation since last November.  It will concentrate on corporate 
finance, trade finance, loans, deposits, and international payments. 
It has already arranged and been lead manager for three large 
syndicated loans to China, including a $50-million loan for the 
Waigaoqiao Power Plant in Shanghai's Pudong New Area and a $36- 
million loan for the West Pacific Petrochemical Company in Dalian. 
"We do not want to be a large bank in China overnight," Drabbe said, 
"but we are here to stay."  With a network of over 1,800 branches in 
more than 60 countries, ABN AMRO has one of the most extensive 
banking networks in the world.  Its total assets place it among the 
seven largest banks in Europe and the 17th largest in the world. 
(Beijing CHINA DAILY (BUSINESS WEEKLY) 12-18 Jun 94 p 3) 

   Taiwan Group Signs Pharmaceutical Agreement With Beijing Firm -- 
Taiwan's Taifeng Group has signed an agreement with Beijing's 
Tongrentang to invest 300 million yuan in setting up the Beijing 
Tongrentang Taifeng Pharmaceutical Company Limited simultaneously on 
both sides of the strait.  The factory in Taiwan will be set up in 
Zhanghua.  Taiwan's Taifeng Group has become the sole agent for 
Beijing Tongrentang, which has been established for over 300 years, 
and may use its trademark for 20 years.  Although Beijing 
Tongrentang did not provide any capital for the joint venture, it 
holds 25 percent of the stake.  It can share in the distribution of 
dividends but does not have to take responsibility for losses or for 
the distribution of fixed assets after termination of the venture. 
(Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE 0832 GMT 16 Jun 94) 

   Guangdong's Huizhou Builds Joint Venture Container Production 
Base -- Huizhou laid the foundation stone for its first Sino-foreign 
container production base, lifting the curtain on construction of 
the Wuyangfu Industrial City, which covers an area of 3 square km 
and involves a total investment of 5 billion yuan.  There will be 25 
projects in the first phase, including the container company, and a 
motorcycle plant with an output value of 4 billion yuan and an 
expected 2 billion yuan in profits and taxes a year.  When the whole 
city is completed, it is estimated that output value will exceed 8 
billion yuan and profits and taxes, 5 billion yuan.  The container 
company will import advanced equipment from the ROK, the United 
States, Japan, and Germany, and produce international standard 
twenty foot equivalent units.  The ROK will be responsible for 
exporting and marketing 100 percent of the goods during the first 5 
years.  Total investment in the project, covering 110,000 square 
meters, amounts to $20 million.  Once operational, the company will 
be able to produce 24,000 containers, with a total output value of 
$60 million and a net profit of $6 million.  It is estimated that 
total investment can be recovered within three and a half years. 
The project is expected to go into operation on 19 December. 
(Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 1032 GMT 12 Jun 94) 

   Thai Group Shows Interest in Shenzhen Subway -- Thailand's 
Jinwanli Group signed a letter of intent with Shenzhen regarding 
investment in and the operation of the first phase project of 
Shenzhen's Subway Line No. 1.  The line, which will be 25 km long 
with 22 stations, will run from Luohu Railway Station to the Nantou 
Inspection Post.  The project, which involves an investment of $1.8 
billion, is expected to start in 1995 and completion is expected in 
4 years.  A feasibility study has been made and the proposal has 
been submitted to the State Planning Commission for examination and 
approval.  According to the letter of intent, the Thai group will be 
responsible for accumulating the funds, completing the project on 
schedule, and operating the subway for a set number of years.  (Hong 
Kong WEN WEI PO 4 Jun 94 p A6) 

   Australian Businessmen Sign 335 Letters of Intent for Cooperation 
-- The deputy director of the American and Oceanian Affairs 
Department of the Chinese Ministry of Foreign Trade and Economic 
Cooperation, Shi Jianxin, has revealed that 335 letters of intent 
involving investment of $3.96 billion were recently signed at the 
"Seminar on Trade and Investment in China" in Sydney.  The 100- 
strong Chinese delegation sought investment in Melbourne and Sydney 
between 1 and 8 June, offering 519 projects worth $7 billion.  Most 
of the cooperation projects involve infrastructure, including power 
plants, highways, railroads, bridges, and manufacturing industries 
covering metallurgy, chemicals, machinery, food processing, 
textiles, agriculture, animal husbandry, electronics, electrical 
appliances, and building materials.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 
1250 GMT 9 Jun 94) 

   Heilongjiang State Farms Introduce Foreign Capital -- 
Heilongjiang state farms have used foreign capital to improve 
farming. They have established economic and technical cooperative 
relations with more than 20 countries, including the United States, 
Japan, Canada, ROK, and CIS, and introduced $250 million of foreign 
capital, including $70 in World Bank loans and $50 million in 
foreign bank loans.  (Harbin Heilongjiang Radio 1000 GMT 18 Jun 
94) 

   Taiwan:  International Commercial Bank To Return To Ho Chi Minh 
City -- The Ministry of Finance said on 10 June it has approved the 
upgrading of China International Commercial Bank's (CICB) 
representative office in Ho Chi Minh City to a branch office.  The 
CICB ceased operations after the Vietnamese communists took Saigon 
in 1975.  This will be the first time the bank has  operated in Ho 
Chi Minh City since 1975.  The Vietnamese Government has agreed to 
cancel all the past rights of claim belonging to and debts incurred 
by the CICB in Vietnam.  The CICB has yet to file an application 
with the Central Bank of Vietnam for permission to upgrade its 
representative office to a branch bank status.  (Taipei CHING-CHI 
JIH-PAO 11 Jun 94 p 6) 

   Total Industrial Output Expected To Double in Eight Years -- 
According to the "White Paper on Taiwan's Industrial Policy for the 
Coming Decade," which was compiled by the Economic Affairs 
Ministry's Industrial Consultation Committee, Taiwan's total 
industrial output will maintain an annual growth rate of 6 percent 
to reach $320 billion by the year 2002, almost doubling the present 
value of $188 billion.  It is estimated that high technology 
industries will turn out 60 percent of products in the future. 
While the textile industry will remain Taiwan's largest industry, 
with its output value topping $34.6 billion by 2002, the machinery, 
automobile, consumer electronics, pharmaceutical, and petrochemical 
sectors will emerge as future star industries following a doubling 
of their output.  Although the information industry will be the 
fastest growing industry, with its output increasing to $25 billion 
from $8 billion at present, the petrochemical industry will draw the 
greatest interest from domestic investors.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH- 
PAO 3 Jun 94 p 1) 

   Overseas Investment Adversely Affects Domestic Tax Revenues -- 
Director of the Taxation Bureau Lin Chien-hsiung said recently that 
investment by Taiwan businesses abroad has adversely affected tax 
revenues at home, adding that the taxation bureau will adopt proper 
measures to deal with this situation.  The bureau will find out why 
Taiwan businesses keep their profits abroad for long periods of 
time.  According to the director, Taiwan's tax revenues from 
business profits amounted to $4.07 billion a few years ago, about 
the same as personal income tax and business tax, but in 1993 total 
business tax rose to $6.255 billion while business profits tax 
dropped to U.S. $3.948 billion.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 13 Jun 94 
p 2) 

   NORTH KOREA:  Increased Use of Silicate Bricks Noted -- According 
to the 17 May NODONG SINMUN, in recent years, about 50,000 silicate 
brick houses have been built in North Korea, of which 35,000 are 
located in farming villages.  The 19 May NAEWOE TONGSIN cited an 
article from CHOSON SINBO--a publication of Chosen Soren 
(Association of Korean Residents in Japan)--stating that out of 
80,000 new houses built in Pyongyang, about 18,000 were built with 
silicate bricks.  Silicate brick houses preserve heat better and are 
more durable than cement block houses, the article said.  In 
addition, the silicate brick production process is reportedly so 
simple that bricks can be produced quickly and in large quantities, 
using sand and quicklime or slaked lime.  Currently, there are 
silicate brick factories in Anju in South Pyongan Province, Pihyon 
in North Pyongan Province, and Hamhung in North Hamgyong Province. 

   NAEWOE pointed out that increased use of silicate bricks may be 
the result of a cement shortage in the country.  The publication 
noted that North Korea came "far short" of meeting its production 
goal of 22 million tons of cement under the Third Seven-Year Plan. 
Moreover, most of the cement produced in North Korea is for export 
to Southeast Asia and the Middle East, leading to a "serious" cement 
shortage in the construction sector. 

   SOUTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  ROK Moving 'Full Scale' Into Next- 
Generation Displays -- SUMMARY:  ROK conglomerates are investing 
heavily in liquid crystal display (LCD) technology and manufacturing 
equipment to reduce their dependence on Japanese imports and secure 
a competitive position in this next-generation electronics field, 
according to Seoul press reports.  Samsung is building the country's 
first LCD color filter plant and has made organizational changes 
that will allow the group to focus on this sector.  Both Samsung and 
Orion will realize early production of LCD-related items through 
technical tieups with Toshiba.  Some $2.5 billion will be invested 
totally in LCD's by top South Korean firms through 1998. 

   South Korea's four largest electronics manufacturers are 
investing "full scale" in liquid crystal display development while 
taking other steps to secure a competitive international position in 
this "next-generation" sector by the second half of the decade. 
According to the 26 May MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN, Samsung Group is 
developing 9.4-inch thin film transistor (TFT) LCD's for notebook 
personal computers (PC's).  It reportedly began building a plant at 
the end of last year to mass produce the item by early 1995. 

   The same newspaper reported on 13 May that Samsung is making 
organizational changes to allow its electronics-related subsidiaries 
to concentrate more fully on individual product types.  Samsung 
Electronics has been developing the 9.4-inch TFT color units, but 
will transfer production by the end of 1995 to Samsung Display 
Devices (formerly Samsung Electron Devices), which at present 
manufactures only twisted nematic (TN) and super-twisted nematic 
(STN) LCD's.  The latter subsidiary in turn will cede production of 
monitors to Samsung Electronics, computers to Samsung Data Systems, 
and deflecting coils (used in monitors) to Samsung Electro- 
Mechanics.  According to the newspaper, Samsung Display Systems will 
have invested 500 billion won ($625 million) by 1998 to expand its 
share of the world's TFT-LCD market to 7-8 percent. 

   In addition, the 7 June MAEIL KYONGJE reported that Samsung 
Corning will spend 60 billion won ($75 million) on a factory in 
Suwon to manufacture color filters for TFT-LCD's, which when 
completed in June 1995 will have an annual output of 1.5 million 10- 
inch filters.  According to the paper, South Korean manufacturers 
have been entirely dependent on Japan for these filters.  As Samsung 
and other ROK companies gear up to produce TFT-LCD's as next- 
generation replacements for cathode ray tubes by 1995, demand for 
this "core component" is expected to rise sharply.  Although the 
June MAEIL KYONGJE article stated that local production of TFT-LCD's 
would reduce South Korea's dependence on Japan, earlier articles 
from the same newspaper nevertheless identified at least two avenues 
of Japanese support for Samsung's LCD program, namely, Samsung 
Display Devices' plan to set up a "research institute" in Japan to 
obtain LCD technology (MAEIL KYONGJE 8 Nov 93) and Samsung's 
agreement with Toshiba to "jointly develop" LCD integrated circuits 
(MAEIL KYONGJE 28 Dec 93). 

   Meanwhile, Orion Electric Co., a subsidiary of the Daewoo Group, 
is investing 91 billion won ($113.75 million) in a factory to 
produce color LCD's for notebook PC's, according to the 4 June MAEIL 
KYONGJE.  The plant will produce 840,000 9.5-inch color STN-LCD's 
annually and another 12 million TN and small-to-medium STN-LCD's. 
The same paper's 26 May issue gave a lower annual production figure 
of 720,000 9.5-inch color units by 1995 and added that the company 
will invest another 350 billion won ($437.5 million) into TFT-LCD 
production equipment from 1995. 

   Although other domestic firms have developed prototype color STN- 
LCD's, Orion will be the first South Korean company to mass produce 
them, thanks to a technology transfer agreement the company signed 
with Toshiba in March 1993, according to the 4 June MAEIL KYONGJE. 
Orion's new "in-line equipment" will produce four LCD surfaces on 
each glass substrate wafer in a clean room "with a degree of purity 
under 100."  The paper noted that color LCD's for notebook PC's had 
been available only through Japanese companies such as Toshiba, 
Sharp, and NEC and that Orion's production is expected to save the 
ROK 120 billion won ($150 million) annually in import costs. 

   Finally, the 26 May MAEIL KYONGJE reported that Goldstar is 
developing 9.5-inch TFT-LCD's for notebook PC's, and 5.6-inch units 
for portable televisions.  The company will invest 300 billion won 
($375 million) in production facilities by 1995 and spend another 
200 billion won ($250 million) betwen 1996-97 to increase production 
capacity to 1 million units annually.  Hyundai this year will expand 
its production facilities for small and medium color STN-LCD's and 
work out plans to build larger units.  The company reportedly will 
have a TFT-LCD line finished by the end of 1995, that will be able 
to produce prototypes.  Hyundai will spend 460 billion won ($575 
million) on this item alone between 1995-98. 

   MAEIL KYONGJE also noted that Samsung, Orion, Goldstar, and 
Hyundai will invest a total of about two trillion won ($2.5 billion) 
in LCD's by 1998, in anticipation of a world market that will grow 
from $8.4 billion in 1995 to $15 billion by the year 2000. 

   Ministries Differ on How To Revise Communications Industry -- 
Friction is growing between the Ministry of Trade, Industry, and 
Energy (MOTIE) and the Ministry of Communications (MOC) over who 
will take the lead in the information and communications industry. 
On 6 June, the MOTIE-affiliated Korea Institute for Industrial 
Economics and Trade (KIET) released a proposal for restructuring the 
communications industry.  KIET's proposal differs greatly from one 
presented in April by the Communications Development Research 
Institute, an affiliate of the MOC.  In its proposal, KIET suggests 
shifting from the current system of designating key communications 
businesses to a licensing system.  KIET's proposal would allow 
communications service providers to freely participate in the 
industry and allow businesses with their own communications 
facilities to operate them commercially.  However, the 
communications institute fears that abolishing restrictions would 
lead to problems of vertical integration.  It does not want 
businesses with communications facilities to participate in the 
overall industry.  The MOC plans to prepare its amendment for 
presentation to the National Assembly in September.  (Seoul 
MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 7 Jun 94 p 1) 

   In general the amendments proposed by KIET and the communications 
institute have a common starting point and share similar views on 
some issues.  However, the two institutes differ on the issue of 
qualification standards and on the amount of participation various 
businesses may have.  The following is an overview of the main 
points of contention, the current system, and the revisions proposed 
by the institutes. 

   Enterprise's framework -- Current system:  Enterprises are 
divided into two categories.  A. Key communications enterprises-- 
general (city phone service, etc.) and special (mobile telecom, 
etc.)  B. Value-added service providers--use general communications 
enterprises' equipment 
   The communications institute proposes maintaining the current 
system, with general enterprises owning the communications 
facilities and value-added service providers using those facilities. 
   KIET proposes allowing value-added service providers to use cable 
TV facilities as well as those of general enterprises. 

   Restrictions on participation in key enterprises -- Current 
system:  A.  General enterprises--individual companies are limited 
to a total share of 10 percent, equipment manufacturers are limited 
to a total of 3 percent, and foreign participation is not allowed. 
B. Special enterprises--individual companies are limited to a total 
share of 33 percent; government, equipment manufacturers, etc. are 
limited to a total share of 10 percent; foreigners are limited to a 
total share of 33 percent. 
   The communications institute recognizes the need to relax 
restrictions, but is undecided as to concrete percentage limits. 
   KIET proposes lifting all restrictions on participation for ROK 
entities and determining foreign participation according to the 
outlook for the Uruguay Round agreement. 

   Commercial use of communications facilities -- Current system: 
Companies are prohibited from using their own communications 
facilities for "outside purposes." 
   The communications institute proposes continuing the current 
system, while allowing enterprises with such facilities to offer 
limited communications services. 
   KIET proposes abolishing the current system and allowing 
companies to use their communications facilities for commercial 
purposes.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 7 Jun 94 p 3) 

   New Laser Has Applications in Semiconductors, Diagnostic 
Equipment -- The Korea Advanced Institute of Science and Technology 
(KAIST, a ROK Government-funded research institute within the 
Ministry of Science and Technology) has developed a high-energy 
laser with potential applications in semiconductors, nuclear fusion, 
and a variety of medical and diagnostic equipment.  Developed by 
KAIST's Laser Science Research Center, the device reportedly 
produces 2 trillion watts of power.  In terms of technological 
sophistication, the development puts South Korea within the ranks of 
the 10 most advanced nations in laser research. 

   KAIST began working on high-energy lasers in 1988 and has 
invested 730 million won ($912,500) in their development.  The 
present device is made up of a master oscillator, a reamplifier, and 
a five-stage main amplifier.  The length from the main oscillator to 
final output is 40 meters and the beam at final output is 9 mm in 
diameter.  Based on neodymium-glass, the laser has 80 joules of 
energy at a wave length of 40 trillionths of a second. 

   The laser will make it possible for South Korea to develop its 
own X-ray lithography technology needed for next-generation one 
giga-DRAM chip memory elements with line definitions of only 0.15 
microns.  It will also have applications in genetic engineering, 
medicine, and optics, including X-ray microscopes and holograms. 
KAIST will begin work immediately on a device with a seven-stage 
amplifier that produces ten trillion watts of power.  (Seoul MAEIL 
KYONGJE SINMUN 8 June 94 p 57) 

   Auto Technology Imports Up Average of 6.6 Percent Since 199O -- 
The South Korean auto industry imported 85 different auto 
technologies in 1993, six more than in 1992.  The number of imported 
technologies has risen an average of 6.6 percent annually since 
1990.  The industry imported 42 technologies (or 49.4 percent) from 
Japan, 12 (14.1 percent) from the United States, 11 (12.9 percent) 
from England, and seven (8.2 percent) from Germany.  ROK companies 
have allowed $190 million for royalties, excluding fees for ordinary 
technologies.  Most of the royalties went to Germany ($102.8 
million, or 53.9 percent), while $57.67 million (30.2 percent) went 
to Japan, $16.55 million (8.7 percent) to England, and $5.53 million 
(2.9 percent) to the United States.  Finished automobile 
manufacturers accounted for 39 of the imported technologies.  For 
example, Daewoo Motors imported 13 technologies, Asia Motors seven, 
Hyundai and Kia four each, and Ssangyong Motors three.  Samsung, 
which wants to enter the car manufacturing industry, also imported 
four technologies from Japan's Nissan.  (Seoul KUKMIN ILBO 21 May 94 
p 6) 

   Government Stresses Labor-Management Cooperation -- At a meeting 
held on 23 May to discuss the "new economy" development plan, 
President Kim Yong-sam stressed the importance of a "harmonious" 
labor-management working relationship, saying that "without it, we 
will not be able to improve our national competitiveness and attract 
overseas investment."  To bolster his message, the ROK president has 
ordered the Ministry of Trade, Industry, and Energy (MOTIE) and the 
Ministry of Labor to set up offices dedicated to promoting labor- 
management cooperation.  (Seoul HANGUK ILBO 24 May 94 p 4) 

   MOTIE and other government agencies will reportedly formulate 
policies providing incentives such as tax breaks and other 
exemptions to companies that promote cooperative labor-management 
relations.  For example, companies that offer company stocks and 
bonds to their employees will be granted a tax break.  (Seoul 
HANGYORE SINMUN 24 May 94 p 7) 

   Government Advocates Creation of Regional Economic Body -- The 
ROK Government plans to push for the creation of an economic body 
favoring economic development in Northeast Asia.  As envisioned by 
the government, South Korea, Japan, China, and North Korea would 
form the "main body," with South Korea being at the very center of 
the organization.  The government will form a special committee that 
will draw up a blueprint to renovate and develop airports, harbors, 
and train and truck terminals to meet international standards.  The 
committee will also assist the country's key industries in getting 
ready for regional and international scale operations.  Although the 
overall plan is only in the preliminary stage, the government has 
already decided to compile all statistical data in accordance with 
OECD (the Organization of Economic Construction and Development) 
standards.  (Seoul HANGYORE SINMUN 28 May 94 p 7) 

   Reimports of Electronics From China Increasing -- In the first 
four months of this year, ROK companies reimported $95.16 million 
worth of electronics products from China, an increase of 58.9 
percent over the same period in 1993.  The increase follows ROK 
firms' moves to set up two-tiered production, in which low-value 
products are produced in China and high-value and high-tech products 
are produced domestically.  The reimports included $53.13 million 
worth of electronics parts (an increase of 69.1 percent), $12.72 
million worth of finished industrial electronics products (an 
increase of 22.4 percent), and $29.3 million worth of finished 
household electronics (an increase of 62.5 percent).  With regard to 
electronic parts, reimports of integrated circuits alone increased 
400 percent, totaling $3.16 million.  Recently ROK investment in 
China in the area of finished electronics products has increased, 
therefore imports of finished electronics products from China are 
also expected to increase significantly in the future.  (Seoul 
HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN 6 Jun 94 p 9) 

   Kia To Export $40 Million Worth of Car Parts to Japan -- Kia 
Motor Company will begin shipping $40 million worth of compact car 
parts to Japan's Mazda in July.  South Korea exported $76 million of 
car parts to Japan last year and $24 million in the first four 
months of this year.  Mazda decided to order car parts from Kia 
because the strong yen has rapidly weakened the international 
competitiveness of its finished cars.  Meanwhile, Kia intends to 
develop other parts for export, in case the yen remains strong. 
(Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 14 Jun 94 p 10) 

   Daewoo To Export Armored Cars to Malaysia -- Daewoo Heavy 
Industries recently announced it will export 22 armored cars worth 
$13 million to Malaysia.  This will be the second shipment to 
Malaysia, following last year's shipment of 42 armored cars.  (Seoul 
TONGA ILBO 18 Jun 94 p 10) 

   ROK To Begin 'Officially' Exporting Cars to China -- During talks 
held on 9 June between Wu Yi, China's foreign trade and economic 
cooperation minister, and her ROK counterpart, Kim Chol-su, it was 
announced that China will "officially" import ROK cars for the first 
time.  Minister Wu said that a barter-trade contract will soon be 
signed between Daewoo Corporation and the China Machinery Import and 
Export General Bureau.  Under the contract, Daewoo will exchange 
5,000 of its passenger cars for Chinese corn and machinery parts. 
Another ROK car manufacturer, Hyundai Motors, is also negotiating 
with China to export its cars through official channels.  (Seoul 
HANGYORE SINMUN 10 Jun 94 p 2) 

   Asia Cement To Enter China's Market -- Asia Cement has concluded 
a joint venture agreement with China's Dalian Second Cement to build 
a concrete plant.  The new venture has a total paid-in capital of 
$579 million.  The plant will be able to produce 200,000 cubic 
meters of mixed concrete annually and will be equipped with modern 
environmental devices.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 11 Jun 94 p 8) 

   Undersea Optical Cable Link to Russia To Be Completed in 1995 -- 
Korea Telecom recently announced that construction of an undersea 
optical cable to link South Korea, Russia, and Japan had begun in 
Pusan.  Work is scheduled to be completed by January 1995.  Dubbed 
the "R-J-K undersea optical cable," the 1,717-km cable has a 
capacity of 15,000 communication lines.  South Korea will shoulder 
22 percent or 80 billion won ($100 million) of the construction 
costs.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 14 Jun 94 p 16) 

   Hyundai Precision To Introduce Technology From Germany -- Hyundai 
Precision plans to introduce technology from Germany to produce 
vertical machining centers.  The technology will help diversify 
Hyundai's production of machine tools.  Hyundai has agreed to pay 
the German company supplying the technology 3 percent of its net 
sales, in addition to an up-front payment of 500,000 marks 
($315,000).  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 12 Jun 94 p 6) 

   Hyundai To Export 'Accents' to Europe, Middle East, Asia -- 
Hyundai Motor Company will export its four-door Accent passenger car 
to Europe and Asia beginning in June, and to North America beginning 
in July.  It will also export three- and five-door cars to the 
Middle East, Europe, and Asia beginning in August, and to North 
America beginning in September.  Hyundai will increase its 
production capacity from 18,000 cars per month to 33,000 beginning 
in September.  The company will supply 17,000 of the cars produced 
this month to the domestic market.  In July, it will produce 24,500 
cars, exporting 10,500 of them and selling the rest domestically. 
(Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 18 Jun 94 p 8) 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA:  BURMA - Hong Kong Securities Firm Establishes 
'Myanmar Fund' -- The Hong Kong firm Kerry Securities has 
established a "Myanmar Fund"  as a vehicle to invest in Burmese 
companies that are "advancing into a market economy," as well as in 
Burmese foreign debt instruments.  The $50-$100 million fund will 
probably be listed on the Dublin Stock Exchange. 

   Kerry Securities is controlled by Robert Kwok, a Malaysian-born 
Overseas Chinese tycoon who also controls the Shangri-La luxury 
hotel chain.  In March 1994, Kwok announced that he will build a 
hotel in Rangoon. 

   Burma has no foreign exchange holdings and because it has been 
late in repaying its debts to the governments of the advanced 
countries and financial institutions, it has no access to new 
government financing or private bank loans.  Thus, Burma must rely 
on direct investment by foreign companies, and the new fund 
apparently is the first example of this type of financing. 

   According to Kerry Securities, the fund's investment objectives 
include investing in Burmese joint ventures with foreign companies, 
investing in government enterprises that are being privatized as 
well as in infrastructure projects, purchasing government debt 
instruments and government and corporate bonds and short-term 
financing.  To diversify risk, no single investment can exceed 20 
percent of the fund's total investment and this limit probably will 
be set even lower, at 10-15 percent.  The fund will be managed by 
Kerry Investment Management, another company in the Kerry corporate 
family.  (Tokyo NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN 12 Jun 94 p 1) 

   French Company To Build Gas Turbines at Power Station -- The 
Myanmar Electric Power Enterprise (MEPE) and France's European Gas 
Turbines SA have signed a contract to build three 33-megawatt gas 
turbines at the Ahlone power station to generate additional power 
for Rangoon by the end of the year.  Burma also plans to build 
another 100-megawatt power station in the near future.  (Rangoon THE 
NEW LIGHT OF BURMA 10 Jun 94 p 3) 

   Thai Farmers Bank To Open Resident Office in Rangoon -- The Thai 
Farmers Bank, Thailand's third largest bank, will open a resident 
office in Rangoon, according to Burma's Central Bank.  To date eight 
foreign banks have received permission to open offices in Burma, 
including the Thai Military Bank and the Development Bank of 
Singapore.  (Tokyo NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN 12 Jun 94 p 5) 

   INDONESIA:  Indonesia Seeks ROK Participation in Oil Field 
Development -- At a recent press conference in Seoul, Indonesian 
Minister of State for Research and Technology Habibie expressed hope 
that ROK businesses will "actively participate" in expanding 
electricity installations and developing oil fields in Indonesia, 
projects in which Indonesia will invest a total of $61 billion. 
Minister Habibie said that the Indonesian Government will invest $35 
billion in developing the oil fields on the Natuna Islands during an 
eight-month period and $26 billion in expanding electricity 
installations.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 19 Jun 94 p 2) 

   P.T. Telkom Launches Global System for Mobile Communications -- 
The state-run telecommunications company P.T. Telkom plans to start 
its Global System for Mobile Communications (GSM) on 1 July in Batam 
island.  GSM, a cellular mobile communication system that works on a 
900-Mhz frequency with digital technology, is the latest in 
communications.  (Jakarta BISNIS INDONESIA 27 May 94 p 6) 

   Trade Agreement With Czech Republic Signed -- Czech Industry and 
Trade Minister Vladimir Dlouhy and Indonesian Trade Minister S.B. 
Joedono recently signed an agreement to strengthen bilateral trade 
relations.  According to Minister Dlouhy, Czech businessmen are 
looking for Indonesian partners to manufacture truck engines for 
export to Egypt, Turkey, China, and North Korea.  In addition, the 
Czech Republic is interested in exporting its Skoda cars to 
Indonesia.  In the past, imports to Indonesia from the Czech 
Republic have included steel, raw material for plastics, machinery 
and equipment for cement factories, glassware, and chemical 
products.  Indonesian exports to the Czech Republic have included 
natural rubber, coffee, plywood, office machinery, furniture, 
telecommunications equipment, and textiles.  (Jakarta MERDEKA 26 May 
94 p 4) 

   Increase in Textile, Garment Exports to Japan Reported -- Doddy 
Sukandar, secretary of the National Agency for Export Development, 
recently stated that textile exports to Japan from January to 
November 1993 reached $446.18 billion, increasing by 2.9 percent 
over the same period in 1992. In addition, garment exports increased 
by 4.8 percent, from $327.98 billion in 1992 to $343.67 billion in 
1993.  According to Sukandar, the market share of Indonesian 
textiles in Japan increased from 2.6 percent to 2.8 percent and that 
of garments from 2.7 percent to 2.8 percent.  (Jakarta THE 
INDONESIA TIMES 9 Jun 94 p 1) 

   Trade Chamber Expects Lower Australian Import Duties -- The 
Indonesian Chamber of Commerce and Industry (Kadin) has expressed 
hope that Australia will lower the import duties imposed on 
Indonesian commodities exported to Australia, with a view to 
boosting trade and improving the balance of trade between the two 
countries.  Aburizal Bakrie, Kadin's president, signed a memorandum 
of understanding with the Australian Chamber of Commerce and 
Industry in Jakarta on 8 June to make adjustments to the tariff and 
nontariff barriers against several Indonesian products.  Bakrie said 
last year that Australia enjoyed a trade surplus of $627 million, 
with total bilateral trade volume reaching $2.17 billion dollars. 
(Jakarta Radio Republik Indonesia Network 0000 GMT 9 Jun 94) 

   LAOS:  Thailand, PRC, Singapore To Establish Trade Complex in 
Laos -- Thailand, the PRC, and Singapore plan to establish a $400- 
million, duty-free trade complex at Don Sai Island, Laos, to be 
called the Golden Triangle Company.  The trade center will be a 
duty-free port with goods supplied by various countries, including 
Laos, Burma, the PRC, and Singapore.  Goods from the PRC will 
include garments, herbal medicines, and farm tools, while products 
from Laos and Burma will consist of silverware, handicrafts, and 
gems.  Singapore will sell electrical appliances and film negatives 
and Thailand will sell miscellaneous products.  The goods will be 
transported along the Mekong River and sold at the trade complex or 
exported to nearby countries.  (Bangkok Voice of Free Asia 1030 GMT 
21 Jun 94) 

   MALAYSIA:  Telekom Malaysia To Establish Joint Venture in Sri 
Lanka -- Telekom Malaysia recently announced that it will operate a 
digital cellular telephone network in Sri Lanka by the end of the 
year.  The joint venture company, MTN Network Ltd., will become the 
fourth cellular network operator in Sri Lanka, but the first to 
offer a digital-based system, using the Global System for Mobile 
Communications (GSMC) standard.  The company will start off with 
10,000 subscribers.  (Kuala Lumpur BERITA HARlAN 24 May 94 p 7) 

   SINGAPORE:  FEATURE:  Electronic Access to Information, Services 
Available By 2000 -- SUMMARY:  Kuala Lumpur and Jakarta papers 
recently reported that Singapore is resolved to become a "push- 
button, electronic city-state" by the year 2000.  The National 
Computer Board envisions a future in which virtually all computers 
will be interconnected and Singaporeans will have electronic access 
to information and services at any time and in any place, the papers 
said. 

   The 17 May Kuala Lumpur BERITA HARlAN reported that Singapore is 
well on its way to becoming a "push-button electronic city-state" by 
the year 2000.  Presently, Singaporeans can already push a few 
buttons on automated bank teller machines to purchase stocks and 
bonds, obtain stock market data from a pocket-size pager, dial for 
health care information, and phone in tax returns on incomes of up 
to $12,000 a year. 
   The 19 May Jakarta BISNIS INDONESIA reported that one in four 
Singapore households owns a computer and 10 percent of them are now 
connected to modems for external communication.  The paper added 
that under the government's "Information Technology 2000" plan, 
virtually all computers in homes, offices, schools, and factories 
will eventually be interconnected.  In addition, the paper noted 
that NCB (National Computer Board) Chief Executive Ko Kheng Hwa's 
vision is to transform Singapore into an "Intelligent Island" where 
people will have access to on-line information and services, any 
time, anywhere.  The NCB projects that by the year 2000, it will be 
technologically feasible for Singaporeans to work, shop, and bank 
from home via an electronic screen and by pushing a few keys or 
using voice commands, according to BERITA HARIAN and BISNIS 
INDONESIA. 

   BERITA HARIAN reported that the NCB is supported by several 
partners in this project, including Singapore Telecom.  It is 
equipped with satellite stations and transoceanic cables and linked 
with BISDN (Broadband Integrated Services Digital Network).  NCB 
Chief Executive Ko said that BISDN can provide more video channels 
and allows a single telephone cable to handle multiple, simultaneous 
transmissions. 

   According to BERITA HARIAN, several new projects will soon be 
under way.  One of them will link local and overseas libraries and 
allow users to access multimedia information databases from their 
homes and offices.  In 1996, Singapore plans to start an electronic 
road pricing (ERP) system for cars entering business districts 
during peak hours.  While motorists driving to Singapore's shopping 
and business districts during peak hours must now purchase a daily 
or monthly permit, in the future, they will need to have a stored- 
value card attached to their vehicles.  BERITA HARlAN also cited 
Ko's prediction that by the end of the decade, Singaporeans will be 
able to touch an icon on a television screen placed at an 
information kiosk to read movie or concert reviews, select seats, 
and purchase tickets electronically. 

   Finally, BERITA HARIAN and BISNIS INDONESIA said that the cost of 
this fast-paced networking operation will be several billion 
dollars.  The two papers noted that last year alone the public and 
private sectors spent about $1.2 billion for computer hardware and 
software, while Singapore Telecom spent more than $280 million for 
telecommunications infrastructures. 

   Singaporean Banks Expanding Into Asia -- Singapore's large banks 
are stepping up their involvement in other Asian countries.  The 
Development Bank of Singapore has had offices in Beijing, Bombay, 
and Rangoon since spring of this year.  It is involved through its 
affiliated companies in the trading industries in Sri Lanka and the 
Philippines and is on the Shanghai and Shenzhen stock exchanges in 
China. 

   Another Singaporean bank, the Overseas-Chinese Banking 
Corporation, with the addition of a Tianjin branch in December 1993, 
now has three branches in China.  The bank has permission to set up 
a representative office in Rangoon, may establish an offshore branch 
in Bangkok, and is considering investing in Indonesian banks and 
moving into Vietnam. 

   The Overseas Union Bank is moving ahead with preparations to 
establish an office in Chengdu, China and has applied for permission 
to open an offshore bank in Bangkok, where it now has a 
representative office.  The bank opened an office in Ho Chi Minh 
City in 1993. 

   The Keppel Bank has received permission to establish a 
representative office in Beijing.  It is preparing to open an office 
in Rangoon and a branch in Vietnam and seeks opportunities to enter 
Bangkok, Manila, Jakarta, and Taipei.  (Tokyo NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN 8 
Jun 94 p 5) 

   Increase in 1993 Trade With The Netherlands Reported -- Trade 
between Singapore and the Netherlands amounted to $1.45 billion in 
1993, an increase of 53 percent, according to a Royal Netherlands 
Embassy statement.  Singapore's imports from the Netherlands, 
involving mostly refined oil products, rose 73 percent, while its 
exports to the country rose 37 percent and consisted of computers, 
semiconductors, transistors, and medical equipment.  (Singapore 
BUSINESS TIMES 16 Jun 94 p 2) 

   THAILAND:  Foreign Bank Branches To Be Upgraded -- Five of the 46 
foreign bank branches that provide Bangkok International Banking 
Facility (BIBF) services may be upgraded to full branches by next 
year in line with Thailand's planned liberalization of the financial 
sector, according to Bank of Thailand Governor Wichit Suphinit. 
(Bangkok BANGKOK POST 20 Jun 94 p 21) 

   Electricity Authority To Increase Purchases From Laos -- 
Beginning in September, Thailand will purchase more electricity from 
Laos.  Sombun Maninawa, general manager of the Electricity 
Generating Authority of Thailand (EGAT), recently said that 
electricity from Laos will not cost more than electricity generated 
in Thailand.  EGAT will issue government bonds worth $122 million to 
finance various projects, including the purchase of electricity. 
(Bangkok Radio Thailand Network 0000 GMT 16 Jun 94) 

   State Bank of Vietnam Receives $100-Million Loan -- The state- 
owned Krung Thai Bank and the Export-Import Bank of Thailand 
extended a $100-million loan to the State Bank of Vietnam on 17 
June, marking a new era of financial liberalization.  Prime Minister 
Chuan Likphai said the credit extension is designed to help 
Vietnam's reconstruction.  (Bangkok Radio Thailand Network 0000 GMT 
19 Jun 94) 

   VIETNAM:  FEATURE:  Vietcombank Branching Out, Expanding Services 
-- SUMMARY:  Vietcombank is expanding its services into new, 
consumer-oriented sectors possibly in conjunction with other Asian 
banks, a Tokyo financial newspaper reported.  The bank is also 
broadening its network of domestic and overseas branches and offices 
in response to the country's economic growth and increased dealings 
with foreign companies. 

   Vietnam's largest state-run bank, the Vietnam Foreign Trade Bank 
(also called Vietcombank) will have established financial service 
companies in five sectors by the year 2000, the 12 June Tokyo NIKKEI 
KINYU SHIMBUN reported.  According to the bank's vice-president, 
these sectors include leasing, credit cards, real estate, 
consulting, and non-banks.  The real estate and consulting companies 
will be fully invested subsidiaries of Vietcombank.  Companies in 
the other three sectors will be joint ventures with foreign 
companies. 

   NIKKEI reported that the leasing company in particular could take 
the form of a joint venture with Japan or Singapore.  The paper 
added, however, that due to Vietnam's "poorly defined" provisions 
for enforcing existing laws on mortgage and loan guarantees, the 
willingness of foreign leasing companies to participate is 
"uncertain." 

   Meanwhile, NIKKEI's 14 June edition stated that Vietcombank is 
planning a network of domestic and overseas branches.  The bank 
reportedly will establish its first foreign branch in Hong Kong 
early next year.  It is now setting up offices in France and Sweden 
and is considering opening offices in Tokyo, Singapore, and Moscow. 

   Domestically, the bank is augmenting its branches in export 
processing zones in response to economic growth and increased trade 
with foreign companies, the paper reported.  These include Tan Thuan 
in Ho Chi Minh City and future zones planned for Hanoi, Haiphong, Da 
Nang, Can Tho, and Lai Chau.  Branches are also being set up in Minh 
Hai, in the southernmost part of the country, and in Lang Son, on 
the PRC border.  NIKKEI noted that 23 domestic branches are planned 
altogether:  17 in the main cities, and six in the export processing 
zones. 

   Figures on Foreign Investment Projects Reported -- As of 18 
March, 897 foreign investment projects capitalized at $8.468 billion 
have been licensed.  Investment capital increased by an average of 
51.6 percent between 1988 and 1992.  In 1992, investment capital 
registered a 70-percent increase over the combined total of the four 
previous years, while the 1993 figure was 40 percent higher than the 
year before.  (Ho Chi Minh City SAIGON GIAI PHONG 24 Apr 94 p 2) 

   Between 1991 and 1993, investment in industries accounted for 45 
percent of the total registered capital.  By contrast, in previous 
years, there had been a heavier concentration of investment in 
hotels and oil and gas projects.  Investment in natural resources 
exploitation currently accounts for only 2 percent of total 
investment.  Provinces in mountainous areas that did not receive any 
foreign investment in the past have recently obtained about 35 
projects, capitalized at $175 million.  However, nationwide, a 
number of projects worth approximately $612.8 million have been 
terminated or withdrawn.  (Ho Chi Minh City THOI BAO KINH TE SAIGON 
27 Apr 94 pp 10, 11) 

   $4-Billion Investment Projected for Northern Economic Triangle -- 
Deputy Prime Minister Phan Van Khai recently approved a priority 
project under which Hanoi, Haiphong, and Ha Long city in Quang Ninh 
Province will form a "strategic triangle" for economic development. 
According to the Ministry of Construction, the investment estimate 
for this "northern priority triangle" will reach approximately $4 
billion by the year 2000. 

   The triangle will include industrial districts, export processing 
zones (EPZ), industrial parks, and tourist service districts in 
areas such as Soc Son-Noi Bai, Sai Dong, the southern part of Thang 
Long bridge, and Dong Anh in Hanoi; Minh Duc, Dinh Vu, Vat Cach, and 
Fourteenth Street in Haiphong; and Uong Bi and Quang Yen in Quang 
Ninh.  (Ho Chi Minh City TUOI TRE CHU NHAT 24 Apr 94 p 5) 

   Foreign Banks Seeking to Establish Branches -- Foreign banks have 
been seeking authorization to establish branches in Vietnam, 
according to the 10 June Tokyo NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN.  Currently, 
nine foreign banks have branches either in Hanoi or Ho Chi Minh 
City.  They include four French banks (Credit Lyonnais, Indosuez 
Bank, National Bank of Paris, French Foreign Trade Bank), two Thai 
banks (Bangkok Bank, Thai Military Bank), and one bank each for 
Taiwan (Cathay Investment and Trust) and Australia-New Zealand (ANZ 
Bank), according to the September 1993 Ho Chi Minh City THOI BAO 
KINH TE SAIGON.  Standard Chartered, the ninth bank, is British and 
was recently authorized to establish a branch in Hanoi, according to 
the 9 June NIKKEI KINYU. 

   The 10 June NIKKEI KINYU reported that approximately 20 foreign 
banks have either formally or informally sought authorization from 
the Vietnam State Bank--the central bank of Vietnam--to upgrade 
their representative offices to full branches.  (Representative 
offices typically do not engage in full banking operations.) 
Deutsche Bank, Hongkong and Shanghai Banking Corp., and the Korean 
Shinhan Bank expect to receive such authorization for their offices 
in Ho Chi Minh City between this summer and fall. 

   Japanese banks have the largest presence in terms of overall 
number of offices, according to the 8 June NIKKEI KINYU.  Seven of 
Japan's largest banks, including Bank of Tokyo, Daiwa, Sakura, 
Tokai, Fuji, Mitsubishi, and Sanwa have established representative 
offices in Ho Chi Minh City, while two others, Asahi and Sumitomo, 
expect to receive authorization to establish offices there by this 
summer.  According to NIKKEI KINYU, the Industrial Bank of Japan and 
Long-Term Credit Bank of Japan are currently planning to establish 
representative offices in Hanoi bringing to 11 the number of 
Japanese banks with offices in Vietnam.  No U.S., German, or 
Japanese bank presently has a branch in Vietnam, according to the 9 
June NIKKEI KINYU. 

   A Japanese bank will conclude what is reportedly the first 
agreement of its kind between the Vietnamese Government and a 
foreign bank, according to the 8 June NIKKEI KINYU.  Sakura Bank, 
one of Japan's leading commercial banks, and Vietnam's Ministry of 
Trade will provide one another with information on their domestic 
economies and industries and assist companies seeking to enter one 
another's market.  Sakura, which has counseled some 40 Japanese 
companies seeking to enter Vietnam in the past six months, expects 
the agreement to provide an avenue for accurate and timely 
information on commercial law and tax reform in Vietnam where 
information is conspicuously deficient. 

   Joint Venture Planned To Exploit Bach Ho LPG -- Japan's Mitsui 
and Co.  will join with the English firm British Gas, the Canadian 
firm Trans-Canada Pipelines, and Vietnam's state-run gas company 
Petro Vietnam in a three-way venture to exploit offshore gas 
produced at the Bach Ho fields.  Some $400 million will be invested 
in the project, which envisions building a 130-km pipeline to the 
mainland and an LPG (liquefied petroleum gas) plant in Vung Tau, as 
early as this year.  The British and Canadian companies will be 
responsible for the project's technology and the Japanese firm will 
handle sales.  South Korea's Hyundai Group will lay the pipeline and 
build other facilities.  A part of the planned 260,000-ton annual 
LPG production will be exported to Southeast Asia, China, and Japan, 
with the remainder used as fuel for a local power generating plant. 
There are plans to sell some of the gas later as a precursor for 
fertilizer and other chemical products.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 
10 Jun 94 p 1) 

   Government Approves 'Largest' Port Construction Project -- A 
project to build a deep water port at Sao Mai-Ben Dinh, Ba Ria-Vung 
Tau Province at a total cost of more than $900 million has received 
government approval.  It will be built in two phases.  The first, 
from 1994 to 1997, consists of building a port that will receive 
ships with a maximum tonnage of 80,000 metric tons and include an 
industrial complex and a container platform.  In the second phase, 
from 1998 to 2000, the port will be enlarged to handle ships up to 
200,000 metric tons and a refinery and petroleum reservoir will be 
built.  Upon completion, the port will be the "largest" in Vietnam, 
with an installed capacity of 50 million metric tons per year.  The 
project involves a joint venture between the Service and 
Construction Investment Company of Ben Dinh Village and Japan's 
Tredia Investment Company.  (Hanoi VNA 0547 GMT 6 Jun 94) 

   Vietnam To Restrict Import of New Foreign Cars -- According to 
the Korea Trade Promotion Corporation, Vietnam has "strengthened" 
its regulations on foreign car imports, giving the right to import 
new foreign cars for less than 12 passengers to only eight 
companies, including Savico, while stipulating that importers of 
more than 50 cars at one time should receive import permission from 
the Ministry of Commerce and Tourism before granting letters of 
credit.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 9 Jun 94 p 11) 

   Foreign Investment in Road, Bridge Projects Reaches $700 Million 
-- More than $700 million in foreign capital has been invested in 
projects to restore, upgrade, or build bridges and roads during the 
past two years.  According to a forecast from economic offices, this 
figure will rise to about $800 million in 1996 and $1 billion in 
1997.  These funds are used mainly for projects such as the ones 
that restored and upgraded Highway No. 1, 100 km of Highway No. 5 
(linking Hanoi and Haiphong), and Highway No. 18, linking Bac Ninh 
with Quang Ninh.  (Hanoi VNA 0600 GMT 12 Jun 94) 


   Foreign Investment Capital Figures From 1988 to 1992 Reported -- 

   Sector                  Number of Projects    Registered Capital 
                                                 (in million 
                                                 dollars) 
   Industries              488                   3,557 
   (light, heavy, mining) 

   Oil, gas                26                    1,279 

   Agriculture, fishery,   94                      585 
   forestry 

   Postal, communications  20                      631 

   Tourist, hotels         106                   1,604 

   Services                115                     467 

   Banking, finance        13                      156 

   Others                  33                      221 


   Total                   895                   8,500 

   As of 25 December 1993, the actual committed capital of foreign 
investment projects accounts for about 30 percent of the registered 
capital, totaling $2.084 billion, of which $1.672 billion comes from 
foreign investors, $312 million from the Vietnamese side, and $100 
million in loans. 




   Year                   Investment Capital     Investment Capital 
                          of Licensed            of Operating 
                          Projects               Projects 
                          (in million dollars)   (in million 
dollars) 

   1988                    366                     234 
   1989                    539                     330.5 
   1990                    596                     482 
   1991                  1,288                   1,159 
   1992                  1,939                   1,921.6 
   1993                  2,728.4                 2,716.5 

   Total                 7,456.4                 6,843.8 




   Year                   Actual Committed       Investment Capital 
                          Capital                of Projects 
                          (in million dollars)   Withdrawn 
                                                 (in million 
dollars) 

   1988                    239                     132 
   1989                    366                     208.5 
   1990                    349                     114 
   1991                    513                     129 
   1992                    471                      17.4 
   1993                    146                      11.9 

   Total                 2,084                     612.8 

(Ho Chi Minh City THOI BAO KINH TE SAIGON 27 Apr 94 pp 10, 11) 



   Italian Businesses To Invest $48 Million in Vietnam -- Italian 
businesses are exploring cooperation opportunities in Vietnam and 
want to invest in the food industry, textiles, steel, granite, and 
cement.  A group of 22 Italian entrepreneurs and bankers recently 
paid a working visit to Hanoi and the industrial group Italia 
Confindustria plans to send specialists to study the Vietnamese 
economy and provide technical training for young Vietnamese 
industrialists.  According to the Italian Government's special envoy 
Rosolino Orlando, an initial investment of $48 million will be made, 
with increasingly larger investments to follow.  (Hanoi TUAN BAO 
QUOC TE 19-25 May 94 p 4) 

   Construction of 'Primary' Southern Port Started -- Construction 
of Phu My Port in Phu My Village, Chau Thanh District, Ba Ria-Vung 
Tau Province started on 30 April.  Investment in the project totals 
$9 million, of which 60 percent is contributed by the French 
companies Conco and Sogema and the Norwegian company Norsk Hydro. 
Construction will be completed in 16 months.  The part will be "the 
first primary port" in the Ho Chi Minh City-Dong Nai-Ba Ria-Vung Tau 
economic triangle.  During the first phase, it will be able to 
receive ships of 30,000-40,000 metric tons.  (Ho Chi Minh City 
SAIGON GIAI PHONG 2 May 94 p 1) 

   Joint Venture To Produce Nonalcoholic Beverages Licensed -- 
Vietnam's Vinalimex and the multinational company Coca-Coca 
Indochina Pte Ltd. have formed a 30-year joint venture to produce 
nonalcoholic beverages.  The new company is called Coca-Coca Ngoc 
Hoi.  It was licensed in April and is capitalized at $20.4 million, 
of which $15.46 million is prescribed capital.  (Hanoi NHAN DAN 7 
May 94 p 4) 

   Singapore Reported To Be Top ASEAN Investor -- According to the 
State Committee for Cooperation and Investment, Singapore is 
currently the top ASEAN investor in Vietnam.  To date, it has 
invested $544 million in 62 projects in the food, packaging, and 
electronic industries.  Vietnam has attracted $1 billion worth of 
foreign investment in the first five months of the year, of which 
$163 million came from Singapore.  (Singapore SBC 1400 GMT 10 Jun 
94) 

   Exports of Rice, Paddy to Taiwan, PRC Reported -- The Kien Giang 
Export-Import Joint Corporation has signed contracts worth $24 
million to export 106,000 metric tons of rice and 4,000 metric tons 
of paddy to Taiwan and the PRC.  These exports will occur between 
now and the end of the year.  (Hanoi Voice of Vietnam Network 1100 
GMT 17 Jun 94) 

   Canada Opens Trade Office in Ho Chi Minh City -- The Canadian 
Embassy has announced the establishment of the Canadian Trade Office 
in Ho Chi Minh City. The office will provide commercial information 
and will also serve Canadian joint ventures and direct investment 
projects.  Trade between Vietnam and Canada increased from $7.37 
million in 1989 to almost $42 million last year.  (Hanoi Voice of 
Vietnam 1000 GMT 13 Jun 94) 

   Indonesian Chemical Company Setting Up Joint Venture -- The 
Indonesian chemical manufacturer Unggul Indah Corp. will produce 
ingredients for synthetic cleansing agents in Vietnam in 
anticipation of increased demand from the influx of foreign 
companies there.  The firm will establish a $7.25-million joint 
venture called UIC Vietnam, through which it will import alkyl 
benzene produced in its Indonesia plant, for the manufacture 
alkylbenzene sulfonate (a precursor for cleaners) in Vietnam.  Some 
30,000 tons will be produced annually starting this year.  About 
half this amount is used in Vietnam at present, all imported from 
neighboring countries.  More than 10 projects involving joint 
ventures with Indonesian companies have been approved by the 
Vietnamese Government to date.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 12 Jun 
94 p 3) 

   Construction of 'Largest' Rice Mill in Mekong Delta Completed -- 
Tien Giang, the "largest" rice mill in the Mekong Delta, was 
recently completed.  The mill's processing capacity is 150 metric 
tons of paddy a day.  Equipment for the mill came from India.  Tien 
Giang is a 20-year joint venture between the Tien Giang Insecticide 
Company and Agrocommodities Co of the French Orco group.  Initial 
investment capital in the venture totals $3 million, with the two 
sides holding equal shares.  (Hanoi NHAN DAN 4 May 95 p 1) 

   (Pacific Rim Economic Review FBPSP 94-13) 

JF 30/0345Z JUN 

</TEXT>

</DOC>
